{u'tt0119488': [u"\nL.A. Confidential is, without a doubt, the best film of the 1990s, and quite possibly one of the best films ever made.\n\nAs with any great film, it all starts with the writing.  The story is riveting, the dialogue is smart and quite funny, and the characters are written in three dimensions.\n\nThe acting is phenomenal.  Perhaps a bigger tragedy than L.A. Confidential's loss to Titanic in the Best Picture race is that none of the three lead actors even garnered nominations.  Russell Crowe, Guy Pearce, and Kevin Spacey are absolutely phenomenal; it is their characters that drive this fascinating story about police corruption in 1950s Los Angeles.  We get to know these people, to understand who they are and why they do what they do, and to root for them to overcome their imperfections.\n\nThe directing is fantastic.  Curtis Hanson doesn't shove anything in the audience's face; instead, he allows the audience to discover the film's nuances on their own.  (That makes this an excellent film for repeat viewings, you truly catch something new every time).  1950s Los Angeles is reproduced beautifully.  The editing is quick and seamless, the music is perfect for the film (Hanson should teach other directors how to do a montage effectively), and the cinematography is great.\n\nI can't find a negative thing to say about this film.  It's truly a masterpiece.", u'0.364856', u'\nSix years ago, a director by the name of Curtis Hansen came out with a small time film named L.A. Confidential. Though the movie garnered several big nominations at the 1997 Academy Awards, the nation had been swept up by the gigantic and romantic blockbuster, Titanic, thus shrinking the chances of this brilliant movie from garnering any real awards. 1997 completely screwed this phenomenal film, in which three brilliant actors gave the performances of their careers.\n\nRussell Crowe plays Detective Bud White, a tough L.A. cop who bends the rules in order to bring justice to the city. He is ruthless, and unforgiving of anyone, which brings him into direct conflict with Detective Lieutenant Ed Exley, played by Guy Pearce. Russell Crowe became with this role a full pledged character actor,: the cop with a steel physique, and a vulnerable heart. He becomes so believable and real to the audience, you can not help but sympathize for his character under the circumstances.  From this role, Crowe went on to garner three best actor nominations, winning for his role in Gladiator.\n\nGuy Pearce, the little known Australian body builder, became the character known as Ed Exley, a straight, uptight detective trying to live up to the legend his father created before him. Exley has so much to prove to the LAPD, trying to show them that he is just as good, maybe even better, than his father. He plays the politics in a corrupted police department very well, and is able to use these skills in solving the corrupt and mysterious case of the Night Owl murders. This film officially put Guy Pearce in the big leagues of film, making his next appearances in Memento and The Count of Monte Cristo. He is a severely underrated actor who deserves better than what he has been getting.\n\nFinally, the ever wonderful Kevin Spacey. Spacey plays Lieutenant Jack Vincenes, a cop who gives a popular LA police show, Badge of Honor, real solved cases in return for money. Jack sees his life as an ever going soap opera, until he comes across a case that somehow has a connection to the Night Owl murders. Kevin Spacey has proved time and again his abilities as an actor, and he continues with this performance. \n\nCurtis Hansen does a wonderful job bringing this story to the big screen. His talents, although recognized, have not been awarded as of yet. I can only hope that someday, someone will give this amazing director something worthy of his talents. \n\nHighly Recommended. \n\nMJR\n', u'0.30471', u'\nL.A. Confidential most likely falls into the category of one of the best movies of the past twenty years. The complex story line seemed to burst at the seams with intelligence.  I found the complexity of several different sub-plots working together challenged the intellectual part of my brain while the intense action through out the entire movie satisfied the craving of the not-so-intellectual part of my brain that enjoys seeing a good brawl followed by a good shoot-out.  Brian Helgeland and Curtis Hanson did and excellent job of combining many elements of several different kinds of films into one.  They seem to have made this movie with several different audiences in mind.  I for one, as I have mentioned, enjoyed the intellectual aspect as well as the action, while my wife enjoyed the combination of a love story with drama.  It really has something for everyone.  Bringing together all of these elements into one film sets it apart from many others. Of course the best aspect of L.A. Confidential is the way that not everything is as it seems, and then, in an instant, all of the plots are sprung like a trap and come together for a grand finale.  Overall L.A. Confidential is an exceptional film that contains something for everyone.\n', u'0.408515', u'\n"L.A. Confidential" is brilliant.  The screenplay and direction are second-to-none.  The performances by the ensemble cast are also superb. Kim Basinger stands out the most with her Oscar-winning role.  Kevin Spacey, Russell Crowe, Guy Pearce, James Cromwell, David Strathairn, and Danny DeVito all have their moments as well.  The film deals with the seamy side of Los Angeles in the post-World War II 1950s.  Los Angeles is a place of shady dealings and police corruption.  To add to those problems is the creation of the smutty tabloid.  Multi-layered and smart, "L.A. Confidential" will be the greatest survivor of the films released in 1997. 5 out of 5 stars.   ', u'0.407722', u'Although this movie \'flopped\' at the box office at $53 million, this just may be one the smartest movies you haven\'t seen. With great performances from an ensemble all-star cast and a clever script, the dramatic tension of this modern film-noir classic is an absolute must-see! Told through a variation on the theme of "good cop, bad cop" with an overarching corruption angle, this film cleverly deals with issues of racism, social justice and ethics in a non-discriminatory manner. Character development is well-done and the dramatic tension is superb. If you are a fan of crime-drama and detective stories, you won\'t be disappointed!', u'0.971434', u'When a film evokes an era as well as L.A. Confidential does, people take notice. It could be argued that it is easier to replicate the recent past than the distant on film,  and in a sense this is true. Costumes, language, and the necessary absence of the modern in "period pieces" make them expensive and difficult to film. But couldn\'t it be argued that it is just as difficult to make a film about more recent periods? I have no knowledge of how a Victorian era table was set, or what a knight really spoke like; we are subject to the directors view of reality. But what if a good deal of your audience lived through the time you are portraying, as in the case of the 1950\'s? I can even envision my grandfather coming back from WW2 to a booming economy, and living in the world Curtis Hanson created.\n\nThe real genus of this film is that it creates not only a physical world, but one with all the politics, corruption, racism and inequity of the time. As a result we feel the characters motivations and understand their faults all  the better; Bud White, Ed Exley, Lynn Bracken and Lana Turner all live here. \n\nThis film, like others that make us believe we are there for two hours (and  $7.50), will endure. I was thinking a  perfect double feature would be with Chinatown, another film that will stand the test of time.', u'0.170007', u"\nL.A. Confidential is the most classy, intriguing, thought provoking and sexiest detective movie ever to be made in the history of detective films.  \n\n\nWhen you look back at it and see that Russell Crowe, Kevin Spacey and Guy Pearce actually appeared in the same film back in 97 then you wouldn't have believed it since they have all gone on to better things but before that we had L.A. Confidential which was Crowe's and Pearce's ticket into Hollywood.  Spacey had already made it with his Best Supporting Actor nod for The Usual Suspects but what puzzles me is how everybody apart from Kim Basinger didn't get any acting nominations at the Oscars.   James Cromwell is the most chilled out villain you'll ever going to see in a film like this and has been criminally ignored by the Academy.   Curtis Hanson was also someone who had made some good films but no masterpieces till this came along.  \n\n\nThey all must have sold their souls to make this because when you get big cast get together to make a Hollywood film then you become a bit intrigued by it because if the cast is big then is the story any good?  In L.A. Confidential's case it had both and a lot more to say the least.\n\nI still think that this is Spacey's, Crowe's and Pearce's best film of there career.  Russell Crowe as tough guy but sentimental towards women Bud White is flawless and is quite like the real Russell Crowe which is scary.  Guy Pearce as the quick witted but dumb looking Ed Exley is someone one you either love or you hate as the annoying rookie.   Kevin Spacey is just as cool as anything that Bogart and Mitchium could have pulled off as Jack Vincennes and there is the movie along with a great script by Brain Heagland of Mystic River fame and Curtis Hanson himself who put together a great script from James Elroy's novel.    \n\nKim Basinger is as sexy as she is going to get and her acting is very good and well deserving of her Oscar if the boys were robbed.   I liked how we had three different stories and one case that all had something to do with another but were all separate anyway till the end.   It was like watching a movie with three stories based on a trio of detectives.   L.A. Confidential was a treat as far as storytelling goes because it enthrals you into the film straight away as well as it being more exciting than a night out in Vegas.\n\nWe don't see Detective films like this so we should be grateful that this came along when it did. \n", u'0.290407', u"\nThis is the ultimate movie on the corruptness of the police force during the 1950's.  No one is going to make a better movie than LA Confidential, the cast is perfect, the direction is superb, the screenplay is amazing, the choice of music, the graphic brutality, the not so fine line between good and evil.\n\nWhen I saw this in the theatres, I came out of the theatre and couldn't say anything because I was awed. And I was amazed by how wonderful Russell Crowe and Guy Pearce were, I had never heard of them before, so I didn't know what to expect, but now I have two new favorite actors.  And I couldn't believe that Russell was a New Zealander and Guy was an Aussie.  They had great American accents.  And of course Kevin Spacey was superb as always.\n\nAny way, this is an awesome movie, go rent it if you have not seen it.", u'0.516034', u"\nHands-down my favourite American film of the nineties. Curtis Hanson shocked the world by proving to be not only a great director but an auteur with this unbeatable adaptation of James Ellroy's terrifying novel about corruption and crime among members of the LAPD in the 1950s. The hard-boiled detective story angle is brought to life so beautifully, mostly because Jeannine Claudia Oppewall's production design recreates the dark underside of the 50s to such perfection that not even a Coke bottle label is missed. Add to that Dante Spinotti's stunning lighting that rides the fine line between artistic and believable comfortably (as all period camerawork should), Ruth Myers' costume designing and a script by Hanson and The Postman scribe Brian Helgeland (I know, I don't get it either) that pares down Ellroy's mammoth plot about a multiple murder in a local diner involving a policeman with suspicious ties without sacrificing the density of the story or the spiderweb of events involved with it, and you have the best movie of 1997, not to mention the most fascinating detective film ever made since Orson Welles' Touch of Evil. The cast is all brilliant, most notably Kim Basinger as a wordly prostitute who has not only a heart of gold but a mind of steel--Basinger is so strong in her character's every nuance you'll find yourself forgetting she's even acting--and Kevin Spacey as a Dean Martin-esque detective who not only solves an important part of the puzzle, he even discovers he possesses a soul beneath his flashy suits. I just can't get enough of this film.\n", u'0.348634', u"Give a collection of great actors a great story to work with and you are likely to end up with something rather special. Such is the case with L.A. Confidential. The boldface names jump off the page...Kevin Spacey, Russell Crowe, Kim Basinger, Danny DeVito, James Cromwell and, in his first big-time role, Guy Pearce. And none of these big names are just mailing it in, here to collect a paycheck. They're all on top of their games, undoubtedly helped to no small extent by the wonderfully nuanced and utterly intriguing story.\n\nThis story takes place in 1950s Los Angeles but this is a side of L.A. most people don't get to see. Behind all the Hollywood glamour L.A. has a seamy side which will be the focus of this tale. At the heart of the movie are three cops who ostensibly are supposed to be working together but who go about the business of dispensing justice in very different ways. Crowe plays aggressive hothead Bud White. Spacey is Jack Vincennes, who takes more pride in his work as an adviser on a popular television cop drama than he does in his actual police work. And Pearce plays Edmund Exley, a young up-and-comer in the department who plays things by the book. As we will soon see Exley is rather unique in an LAPD which believes in doing whatever is necessary to bring the guilty to justice. Even if it means becoming a little guilty themselves.\n\nThe movie really begins to move forward with a massacre at a coffee shop. It seems a pretty cut and dried case but initial appearances can be deceiving. Soon White, Vincennes and Exley will find themselves caught up in a maze of lies, deception and mystery. It will be a great test for these very different men as it appears they may well need each other's unique talents to solve this puzzle. And quite the elaborate puzzle it is. One important piece is Lynn Bracken, a high class call girl played by Basinger. Tying together many of this complex story's strands is gossip writer Sid Hudgens who is played with appropriate sleaziness by DeVito. And in the background the whole time is the somewhat mysterious Captain Dudley Smith, played by Cromwell. Here is a man who believes in bringing the guilty to justice by any means necessary. That's all well and good if you know who the guilty are but in L.A. Confidential you're never quite sure who to believe. The viewer is guessing right along with the investigators on the screen. And in the end it all comes together and pays off brilliantly.\n\nL.A. Confidential is first and foremost a great story, with many fascinating twists and turns along the way. The film also serves as a showcase for some of this generation's finest acting talents. Each of the main characters is wonderfully unique and each of the actors involved does a terrific job in bringing those characters to life. These are complex characters in a complex tale. It's so involved that the acting had to be stellar if this film was going to work and none of the stars disappoint. Terrific storytelling brought to life by a collection of inspired performances makes L.A. Confidential an absolute winner.", u'0.200253', u'\n   Truly, one of the greatest mistake the Academy has made is not awarding  this film the Best Picture award. For months, I argued that while "Titanic"  was a nice spectacle with great special effects, the script, the directing  and the acting was all rather mediocre. However, here we have "L.A.  Confidential." Perfection in script. Perfection in directing. Perfection in  cast. Obviously, because Russell Crowe, Guy Pearce and Kevin Spacey all  gave Oscar worthy performances, the voting was split, and therefore, none  got enough votes for a nomination. \n\n   Crowe gave an invigorating performance and Bud White, a man who knows  that he is not very smart and has instead relied on pure brawn all his  life. But as the film progresses, you watch him yearn to put his strength  aside and become self-reliant, instead of being purely muscle for the cause  of justice, which has become obscured as he has had to resort to violent  and debatably immoral method to preserve peace in Los Angeles. And yet,  while he does make us question whether he is going to end up on the side of  good or evil by the end of the film uncertain, we do empathize enough with  him to hope that he does redeem himself by the end. \n\n   Pearce delivers Ed Exley as a man who is wholly set on the purest means  of justice. While he follows his father into the same profession, his goals  are unique; to uphold the law without having to bend or break it. And yet,  his good aspiration are certainly out of place in the corrupt organization  of the police of that time. He slowly becomes drawn into the graft. He  becomes glory-hungry, pulling whatever strings he has to in order to be  promoted or be seen in a good light by the press. And yet, he does begin to  find himself giving into exactly the cause he fought against. And so,  throughout the film, he struggles to overcome the instinctive nature of man  to achieve power and glory. He has to be a better man than that. And so,  the audience can quickly see the nobility in that. He is not perfect. But  at least he tries to be.\n\n   And probably the best performance in the film comes from Spacey. Here we  see what Exley might have become in a few years if he wasn\'t careful.  Jack  Vincennes has succumb to the call of money and celebrity status. He does  not care in the least about duty or about justice. It\'s all become simply a  matter of vanity. And yet, he begins to see through his own fault. Spacey\'s  performance is undoubtable the best, because he is one of those actors who  doesn\'t have to try to communicate his emotions in order to communicate  them (or, at least, he is good enough not to show the strings). I had to  watch this film several times to really take in the impact of his role, and  fully absorb his character. His key moments within the middle of the film  are absolutely unforgettable. When he stares into the mirror of the bar  after receiving the hundred dollar bill, that scene is a turning point for  the character. And he was able to convey the message of that scene without  saying a thing. And also, when asked why he became a cop, the delivery of  that next line, just that, was Oscar worthy on its own.\n\n   Even aside from those three performances, it would have been totally  respectable if James Cromwell or Danny DeVito  had received a nomination.  Truly, this film had one of the greatest ensemble casts ever captured on  screen.', u'0.072878', u"LA Confidential is a sprawling epic tale of crime, corruption and justice in Hollywood and the LAPD, with a cast to match. A truly gripping crime saga exposing the seedy underbelly of the City of Angels, where cops never let the truth get in the way of justice, and everyone knows everyone else's dirty secrets.\n\nCriminally overlooked at both the box office and the Academy thanks to the all-conquering and over-achieving Titanic, LA Confidential will far more likely stand the test of time to be thought of as one of the best films of the 90s, and possibly the best cop film ever.\n\nAfter cops give a number of inmates a beating in retaliation for two of their own being put in hospital, the career-minded Ed Exley (Guy Pearce) agrees to testify to what he saw, turning in his fellow officers. When one of the cops forced out turns up dead as a result of a shooting, Exley, hothead detective Bud White (Russell Crowe) and fame-obsessed Sergeant Jack Vincennes (Kevin Spacey) all work to find the answers. However, as they uncover the truth, it leads to more questions, of corruption, blackmail, bribery and conspiracy.\n\nThe film superbly portrays the dual nature of Hollywood; glamorous parties and beautiful people, and the seemingly ever-present crime and corruption, even in the police. Danny Devito's opening monologue perfectly sums it up - 'There's trouble in paradise'. This is not the city at the end of the rainbow, the city where dreams come true.\n\nA series of stellar performances from an all-star cast makes it impossible to pick the star, although Kim Basinger richly deserved her Best Supporting Actress. Kevin Spacey is terrific as ever, while Russell Crowe shows that Gladiator wasn't his first muscles-with-a-heart role. But the real standout is probably Guy Pearce in a career-making performance as the one officer determined to what is right and just, regardless of the potentially disastrous consequences for him. However, LA Confidential is a true ensemble piece, and everybody holds their own among the starry cast. Few will have made many better films, before or since.\n\nCurtis Hanson directs in a career-defining role, the sweeping direction echoing the sprawling nature of both the story and the city. The story is a slow-burner, gradually unraveling all the twists, but instead of clearing up the mystery, the waters become muddier as the trio of officers are forced to work together. Hanson masterfully commands the James Ellroy's source material, weaving it into a gripping multi-layered tale. The characters are extremely well developed, all three-dimensional, with no clear-cut heroes and villains. White (Crowe) in particular is the classic film noir anti-hero, the violent cop with a heart-breaking story, thinking with his muscles rather than his brain. LA Confidential is a classic 50s noir film told for the 90s, and keeps you guessing right up to the final scene as to how high the corruption goes. The two-hour running time is never felt.\n\nA superb thriller and the perfect antidote to the rash of mindless action-comedies that frequently come out of Hollywood today, LA Confidential harks back to how film-making used to be \x96 all about telling a story. And what a story it is. One of, if not the best film of the 90s.", u'0.391632', u'Reading the comments, I find few viewers seemed to have read James Ellroy\'s LA Trilogy, on which LA Confidential is based. The Big Nowhere, LA Confidential and White Jazz comprise the Dudley Smith story; Smith is the only constant in all three. None of the heroes are in Nowhere, Buzz Meeks being gunned down by Dudley while trying to escape, having hidden the heroin. Buzz White survives Confidential along with Exley, and White does go off to Arizona, but Smith still lives and rides high. In Jazz, Ed Exley~~Guy Pearce~~and Smith do battle for the soul of David Klein, who in the end brings down Smith. Of the three, Confidential is surely the most complicated since with the heroin out there somewhere, many more players are involved.\n\nHanson\'s genius is to shorten the story, eliminating Nowhere entirely, and bringing Dudley his retribution without Dave Klein being involved. He eliminates so many back stories: Exley\'s father is alive in the book, and a powerful politico to boot and this is just one difference, but in clarifying and making the story shorter, he almost makes it better. The murder of Vincennes is a brilliant touch, along with the code name Rollo Tomassi.\n\nBoth the books and the film are pulse pounders, intense to the core. My late wife, who could never sit through any film without getting up for a cigarette, was immobilized, and by the end was screaming "Kill him" as Exley watched Smith depart. If I had one slight criticism, it would be the cleaning up of some of the language about the original suspects in the Nite Owl killings, but make no mistake about it, this is the film for the 90\'s, and the only 1997 Oscar nominee worth watching. Hurrah for Curtis Hanson.', u'-0.0110266', u"\nIn the gritty LA of the 1950's, stardom is the boom industry and all is about appearance and visual image.  However under the surface drug use is rife, prostitution is rampant and the police officers are violent thugs.  In the middle of this are three officers with different aims.  Ed Exley is an ambitious young officer who will do anything to climb the ranks, Bud White is a muscle man and gets the job done while Jack Vincennes is only concerned with celebrity busts and getting his face in the paper.  When the three come together on a coffee shop killing that brings in elements of cases they are following they solve it together.  However each has suspicions that something is not right.\n\nI'm sorry to say that I didn't pick up on this at the cinema and it wasn't until the Oscars brought it to my attention that I first saw it.  Since then I have seen it several times and have enjoyed it every time.  The plot is slightly complex (although maybe not by the genre's standards) and it isn't simplified for the audiences sake \x96 it respects the audience enough to trust us to keep up with it's pace.  The film is split into three strands dictated by the characters, they are not quite distinct but are mostly intertwined the whole way through \x96 coming together in the final hour to great effect.\n\nThe pace of the telling is great; it has moments of drama, of tension and great action.  Hanson has done a great job with the direction, he has a great sense of place and time to his 50's Hollywood \x96 whether it be the stars' lives or the black suburbs \x96 but he directs each scene with a sense of tension and urgency that the material deserves.  The final twist is OK if not great but it is more the telling of the story that is enjoyable, not just the denouncement.\n\nThe casting did a great job of getting growth names and established qualities but no one huge star who could dominate the film.  It is the Australian stars that stand out here.  Pearce is excellent with a subtly changing character but it is Crowe that sticks in the memory with a very strong character and a performance to match.  Spacey is as quality as he ever is (or at least, was for a few years either side of this film) and the support cast is as good with De Vito, Basinger, Cromwell, Rifkin, Strathairn and Guilfoyle.\n\nThere is nothing I really dislike about this film.  The longer than average running time is not a problem as it easily fills it without dragging at any point.  The film oozes class and has a great tough plot from Ellroy where nothing is as simple as right/wrong and everything comes together at the end.  A real classy film with brains and brawn which continues to be one of my favourites of recent years.", u'0.280528', u'"Rollo Tomasi" is a name that anyone had seen this movie should remember for the rest of his life or at least be aware of the existence of the name, because this is the key to the spirit of this whole story. Due to the setting of this clue, there is no doubt one great movie had become a classic! \n\nAs a Taiwanese, I saw a lot of Hong Kong movies about police and gangsters while I was a child, and they were all very impressive. Therefore, the particularly genre has been promoted to such high levels in my mind that I can hardly be pleased. Fortunately, "L.A. Confidential" satisfies me not only with its thoughtful scenario, but also with several great actors\' performances. More specifically, the story is not just about justice versus evil, there are also many elements such as passion, wisdom, greed, friendship and of course love which all made this movie more than fun to watch. In other words, you might feel angry at this moment, shocked latter, and finally moved by their insistence on doing the right things which made us believe there are still several police worth our trust.\n\nGuy Pearce was one big surprise in the movie not because he played the leading role of the movie, but for his courage and wisdom, and most important of all, his slightly pride that caused admiration accompanied by hostility at the same time. Because the complexity he showed, we couldn\'t help but be deeply attracted, and that\'s when we built connections with the character inside the frame. Secondly, Kevin Spacey was not the one who would gain our trust at first, but no one ought to disagree with his contribution after the shocked "Rollo Tomasi" scene. Likewise, Russell Crowe twisted his role impressions only after his cooperation with Guy Pearce, but he really needed to adjust his tempers for his own sake. Such a crew made this great movie never out-of-date, not even after similar stories keep brainwashing our minds.\n\nHow lucky I am to see such a classical film. As a matter of fact, I haven\'t found one movie that reaches the same level as it did, at least not in the genre. Thus, I just have to repeat watching the film again and again, and I believe many people are doing the same thing I do.', u'0.282127'], u'tt0180093': [u'\nI\'m not going to waste space with a synopsis, as every second or third review provides one. A good indication of a challenging and original film is the number of 1/10 and 10/10 reviews, where the 1/10 reviews consist of just a few lines.  A pretty sure sign that those folks weren\'t able or willing to watch with an open mind.  Which is a good sign for casual viewers to give this film a wide berth.\n\nI wish everyone I care about would see Requiem for a Dream.  Not because they will like it, or that it will teach them something they did not already know, but that it\'s a rare piece of work that will challenge and probably change them.  It\'s a film that has never been made before, with nothing to compare to it - a rarity these days.  I often find myself recommending films to people that I am unable to briefly describe.  These are usually the most involving and affecting ones. I\'d like my family to see this, but can\'t *recommend* it to them.  I\'ve recommended it to two friends, and they both had the same reaction:  I am glad I watched it, but I doubt I\'ll be in the frame of mind to watch it again, knowing what you feel.\n\nAs I sat watching the credits roll, I began crying, but I\'m still not sure why.  Partly in reaction to the devastatingly tragic ending, partly the beauty (yes) of the film, partly my gratitude for good things in my life. I\nwatched it again the same night with my girlfriend, not because I wanted to upset her, but I felt that I had to share it. After the credits rolled, we both were silent for a good ten minutes.  I found that I had thoughts I wanted to express, but could find no words.  This is one of the few films that are painful to experience, but I feel compelled to share with people I\ncare about.  Some others in that short list include The Thin Red Line, Happiness, River\'s Edge,and The Deer Hunter.\n\nThese films all share a quality that\'s difficult to name.  No one likes feeling disturbed or shattered by a film, a work of art, a piece of music, but I feel experiencing these emotions and being asked to think, not just be entertained, is important now and then.\n\n"Favorite" does not apply to this for me - this isn\'t about entertainment. One of the most devastating and beautiful experiences I\'ve had watching a film.  One of the top five films I\'ve ever seen.\n\n', u'0.034371', u'\nYou will not so much as want to take a sip of wine after watching this mesmerizing film about the horrors of drug addiction.  I was not a fan of director Darren Aronofsky\'s debut film "Pi," but with this movie he proves to be a filmmaker of unlimited vision and style.  Four characters in Brighton Beach, Brooklyn are all driven to despair due to their drug abuse, the saddest being Ellen Burstyn as a nice Jewish widow who unwittingly becomes addicted to prescription diet pills that help her lose weight but drag her into a world of hallucinations and paranoia.  Burstyn is superb. It is so refreshing to see such a great veteran like her in such a challenging leading role, one in which she goes through a hell worse than that in "The Exorcist."\n\nBut this is a director\'s film if there ever was one.  Aronofsky knows how to tell a story in a way that is dazzling in its use of sound, editing, and cinematography.  The score by the Kronos Quartet and Clint Mansell is the most striking movie music I have heard in a very long time.\n\n"Requiem for a Dream" is not a movie for everyone.  It is the essence of independent filmmaking, a daring, engrossing, artful film that stays with you long after you leave the theater.  Hollywood bubblegum this ain\'t.\n\n\n', u'0.305288', u"\nThis ranks up there as one of the three most powerful movies I have ever seen in my lifetime (Full Metal Jacket and Grave of The Fireflies being the other two).  This movie shows the brutal honest side of addiction and over-indulgence.  Not just drugs, although it heavily shows drug addiction. Also shows how one addiction can lead to another and how damaging it can be for you.  I watched this alone, and felt so stunned afterwards, I had to call a friend just to calm my nerves.  Seriously, this is a brutal (one more time)  BRUTAL film.  The acting is wonderful - Ellyn Burnstyn and Jenniffer Connely are just wonderful in this movie, and Marlon Wayons was such a shocker in a serious role.  Everyone must watch it, for it's entertainment value, and more importantly, it's educational value.  But it leaves chills down your spine for it's honesty and unforgiving lessons.", u'0.382164', u'\nOften hype about films lead to disappointment and after waiting 14 months after release for my local cinema to show this film, I was done thinking about it. Thank goodness too, rather than challenge my brain (not hard to do unfortunately) this film went straight for the heart, ripped it out and kicked it around the floor for 90 minutes. As the addictions plunged further into the depths of Hell, I felt myself more and more arrested by the film. I\'ve never left a film shaking or feeling physically ill- not including Pearl Harbour, of course :)  You want to look away, but cannot.\n\nThis movie is by no means flawless, but then again I would like to hope that the flaws add to the gritty reality of the film. The ending was truly the most frightening thing I have ever seen in film- forget the cheap scares of The Exorcist, Psycho and the endless bile of the \'slasher flick\', this stuff is REAL.\n\nIn a country amid a \'war against drugs\' this is a powerful film which could do more to turn kids away from drugs than any measly government "task-force" or classroom lecture. ', u'-0.317763', u"\nI just saw Requiem For A Dream and I have to say, I was blown away. Not since 1995's The Basketball Diaries, has a film so accurately portrayed the craving and depravity of a person dealing with(or succumbing to) addiction. It is a beautifully articulated piece of artwork, intricately presented on a silver platter. Director Darren Aronofsky shines in his brilliant direction and style, in this depiction of the downward spiral of the lives of four people, living with their respective addictions.\n\nJared Leto, gives an excellent, solid performance as Harry Goldfarb, a man living an inch from his life, always in search of a fix. In an emotional powerhouse of a performance, he proves to audiences that he can shine through in a major role as opposed to previous smaller roles in Fight Club and American Psycho. However, it appears to be a Hollywood in-joke of sorts in that it seems he has a penchant for mutilation or at least the roles he seems to take on seem to have for him. In Fight Club, he had his face rearranged and in American Psycho, his head cut off. In Requiem however, it is the mutilation of his life, his whole character, that takes centerstage, ending in a satisfying climax of gargantuan proportions in which he gives the audience more than their money's worth in his power-packed performance.\n\nHowever, the real star of the film lies in the talent of Ellen Burstyn. Audiences will wonder at her appearance at the beginning of the film, not really knowing if it is, in fact, her. Her performance as a television, sugar and eventually, diet pill-addicted mother of Harry shows that she's still got it after all these years. If you want to make a comparison of her thespian skills throughout the years, watch the revived version of The Exorcist. She can only get better. She takes on the role of Sarah Goldfarb with gusto, never backing down for a second. Totally throwing herself into the role, you tend to forget how she really looks like, given only fleeting moments in the film which suggest her real appearance. I have to say, she's got guts. How many female actresses her age would dare to have a camera strapped to her person(as Aronofsky so creatively did), an inch away from her face with a wide angle lens? She definately deserves her Oscar nomination, if not, the Oscar itself, for her tour-de-force performance.\n\nThe other characters themselves hold their own with the two abovementioned powerhouses. Jennifer Connelly and Marlon Wayans both realistically portray their respective roles as Marion Silver, Harry's girlfriend and rebellious suburbanite chick, who degenerates to prostitution for her fix and Tyrone C. Love, Harry's best friend and fellow pusher. Here, Wayans shows that he can lose his comic edge if needed, to portray a boy trapped in a man's body, just yearning for his mother's approval but seeking it instead, in drugs. Connelly as well, who has been taking on smaller roles and projects over the last few years, is finally given enough room to play with her character and gives a winning performance in Requiem.\n\nThe cinematography of Matthew Libatique gives total light on the chracterizations of the people in habiting Aronofsky's sick world, from the sliently flickering sick-green flourescents to the exaggerated wide angle shots and the beautifully sad and haunting Coney Island picturesque of the pier which suggests a certain beauty amidst all the sadness and depravity. A Downer Picturesque, as portrayed by the photographs of Robert Frank and the Frank influenced cinematography of Darius Khondji in Seven. In my books, Matthew Libatique has just joined those ranks.\n\nJay Rabinowitz' editing stands out as well, with in-your-face smash title cards(emphasising the downward crash of the character's lives through the seasons), as well as the close-up constructions of the drug taking process. The latter sequences, edited so tightly and seamlessly, make the moment so beautiful but so fleeting, as is the case with drugs. The sequences are almost like a drug, making you crave for more of them, a fix which you get, whenever the characters get their own fix in the film. Lots of people might misinterpret this as glamourising the drug culture but these moments are so fleeting that they're over before you even know it, and then it's back to Harry, Marion, Sarah and Tyrone's sick and depraved search for the next fix, which very accurately portrays the twisted quest of a true and sincere addiction.\n\nThe film is also superbly scored by Clint Mansell and hauntingly performed by the Kronos Quartet. A series of hauntingly shocking, yet mind-numbingly beautiful pieces which linger in your head long after you've left the cinema.\n\nLastly, the direction of Aronofsky, brilliant, beautiful, empathic. There are not enough words to describe his direction or this film and I think the best way to say it is that I am speechless. Aronofsky has shown me that, jaded by so many films, something can still prompt me to sit up and take notice. To see something that I have never seen before or learn something I\ndon't already know. The ending, is sheer power. A masterpiece of all the elements of what filmmaking is about, mixed together in some sick souffle and thrown into your face, burning hot and scalding. The film leaves a deep impression, in fact, a huge scar. And it is a scar I am proud to wear.\n", u'0.173134', u"\nIt's difficult to know what to say about Requiem For A Dream. I first saw it in the cinema when it was released in England and I have never seen an audience react to a film like this one. The climactic sequence, where the protagonists are effectively destroyed by their addictions, seemed to trigger a bout of heavy breathing in the audience. As it was ending I heard a few people crying. My girlfriend and I didn't say a single word to each other on the bus home.\n\nI bought the film on DVD the day it came out, but it took me around six months to watch it again. And only then because a friend of mine was curious. If anything, the impact was heavier than the first time I watched it and I've vowed never to watch it ever again.\n\nYet I have still awarded a rating of 10 on imdb and would definitely assert that it's one of the three greatest films I have ever seen. Why? The acting is just amazing. Jennifer Connolly gives the best performance of her career (not too tricky considering the movies she's been in) and remains stunningly beautiful (in a haggard sort of a way) and noble even when she's roped into a gang bang to fund her heroin habit. Jared Leto annoyed me intensely in Fight Club but he's perfect as hapless junky Harry - forever exuding an air of kindly incompetence that endears him to the audience but that will ultimately destroy him. Marlon Wayans is equally brilliant - wearing a beaming smile for the first half of the film and a compelling look of confusion and betrayal for the rest of it.\n\nAs for Ellen Burstyn... never has an actress been so unfairly cheated out of an Oscar (and I've seen the atrocity that won Marcia Gay Harden that Oscar for). She is just the picture of sadness the whole film through - a heartbreaking example of what loneliness can do to vulnerable people. The scene where she complains to Harry about being old is honestly one of the most tragic things I've ever seen and it makes me want to break down just thinking about it.\n\nAs such, I can only recommend this incredibly important movie with certain reservations. If your favourite film is 'You've Got Mail' steer well clear. If 'Snow Dogs' has been your most thrilling cinematic experience of this year then put this film back on the shelf. Trust me, it'll save the costs incurred by those expensive therapy sessions.\n\nHowever, if you believe that cinema is an important tool in helping us understand ourselves and that we will only achieve self awareness by plumbing the absolute depths of despair and self-destruction then you must watch Requiem For a Dream.      ", u'0.07492', u"\nI went to this movie hearing plenty of buzz about how graphic the content was. Over the course of the movie you see just how Aronofsky wants to send his message to the audience. The characters start off with somewhat mild addictions and then next thing you know the four main characters are living in hell. I couldn't believe how low they all fell. This movie may be the greatest anti-drug message of all time. I dare anybody to watch this and to not be touched and frightened by these characters. Before the movie started I noticed the audience was quite loud and garrulous, but as it ended and the credits rolled the whole place was stone cold silent. It was amazing.\n\nAs a whole I felt the movie was excellent. The visuals were well done and the editing was outstanding. The actors really put themselves into their roles. Jared Leto and Jennifer Connelly had very good chemistry, while Marlon Wayans showed he is a talented actor and not just a talented comic. Ellen Burstyn. Wow! She was amazing. I can't believe an older woman would allow herself to be filmed like that. She has some serious guts. Hands down the best female performance I've watched this year, not even close.  I was totally amazed by her.\n\nAll in all, I would say Requiem For a Dream is a great movie. It had a profound impact on me and I haven't been able to stop thinking about it since I watched it on opening night. I definitely recommend this movie to anyone. This is a movie everyone should see, but unfortunately not enough will.", u'0.0569204', u"\nbeing someone who had a history with drugs, i found this movie to be slightly more than ground-breaking. i saw this film in the midst of a downward spiral, and it turned me right around! having friends with the same plans, such as sell drugs to buy more drugs..it made me look at my life and theirs and see exactly what the future had in store. \n\nnow, every time i see this movie since escaping that life, i cry. i cry for my past and those who still live in it. this movie has more to say to people my age than any drug education movie we were afforded in school. honestly, i wonder when the school systems will wisen up to what is really going to get kid's attention; movies that show that pros as well as the cons of drugs, or a movie that shows the complete and utter devastation drugs will bring to your life, and the lives of those around you. honestly, had i seen this film before my sophomore year of high school, i would have never even dreamed of taking more than the prescribed dose of advil. \n\ngranted, my little summary or comment of this movie does not entail anything informative about the movie itself, i must say, i feel this is the best way i know to express my views.\n", u'0.427718', u'\nI had been looking forward to Aronofsky\'s follow-up to his critically acclaimed art-house film, Pi, of a few years back and when it did finally open in 1 theatre in Toronto, I gathered a bunch of friends to go down and see it.  Some have never even heard of Pi before.  For others, this would be their first Independent film experience.  However, coming out of the movie, we all agreed that it was one of most powerful piece of contemporary cinema that anyone has seen.\n\n"Requiem for a Dream" tells the story of 4 people, connected either through blood or some kind of personal relationship, whether it be family, girlfriend, or business partner.  Although the characters lived far from what you and I would consider to be normal lifestyles, they shared something in common with each and every member of the audience; hopes, aspirations, dreams.  Sara Goldfarb (played so wonderfully by Ellen Burstyn) dreams of one day being on a TV show, and one day, gets her chance.  She fantasizes about how she could wear her favourite red dress, that she wore to her sun\'s graduation, on television.  However, upon trying to wear the red dress, Sara discovers that she has gained some weight over the years and tries desperately to lose her weight, eventually resorting to medication.  All of the characters have drugs (the bad kind) affect their lives, which eventually take over their lives.  The movie documents how for each of the 4\npeople are effected and eroded by drugs.\n\nThe look of the film is extremely  stylized, but justifiably so. Aronofsky uses surreal imagery as a vehicle for realism, something that really works when done well, and done well it was.  By using a combination of slow and fast motion shots, extreme close-ups and more edits than you can shake a stick at, Aronofsky successfully brings the audience into the world and mind of someone with a drug problem.  The audience visually experiences first-hand what it is like to be \'scared\' or \'high\' - all this in 3rd person; all this in the comfort of the theatre chair.\n\nOf course, all of this effort would be in vain if it didn\'t mean anything at the end.  The film leads the audience down a spiral of addiction until the grand finale, which features a montage of graphically intense scenes and images with more edits per second than any film.  The pacing at the end, when compared to earlier parts of the movie, was so fast I started to find it hard to keep up, and literally took my breath away as the credits came up.  All in all, the effect was amazing, and something that I have not personally experienced when watching any film before.\n\nAs the title indicates, "Requiem for a Dream" does not contain a happy ending.  It is in no way optimistic, and only gives the audience faint pieces of hope and happiness.  However, It does show what desperate people are willing to do, and how desperation will change someone\'s life to its entirety.  It is in the recognition of desperation where hope lies.\n', u'0.14411', u'Oh my, where shall I begin? Experimental film making bursts into mainstream in this dramatic tail of 4 people who find themselves spiraling down the abyss, after experiencing a rendez-vous with the inevitable consequences attributed to drug use and the ill effect it has on its addicts. This one has no happy ending. There\'s no sugar coating here. Albeit this film packs a harsh, blunt, and sometimes overwhelmingly genuine depiction of the havoc drug addiction can reap on its victims. Despite the disturbing message of the film, I never the less couldn\'t help but remain fascinated with it\'s experimental/avant-guard visual style: A smooth, elaborate and languid progression of cinematic eye candy orchestrated to almost resemble a shockumentary, complemented by an impressive and well composed soundtrack. Some of the visual techniques were similar to the ones Aronofsky used in his directorial debut "Pi", such as split-screen shots and the use of body cameras filmed at varying speeds. At times, the film seemed more like an acid trip than a feature film. A cry for help is clearly felt throughout the film, from its innocent and promising start, to its hauntingly chilling conclusion. The one scene that really blew me away was the scene where Marion (played by Jennifer Connelley) had just sold her body off for a bag of heroin...As she walks out the door of the apartment, along the corridor, into the elevator, down to the street: one can\'t help but feel the characters disgust with herself, filthy to the core, what it must feel like at..."ZERO". The acting performances, especially by both Ellyn Burstyn and Marlon Wayans are simply breakthrough performances that earned critical acclaim across the board. Enough said. If this review alone does not compel you to experience the Film, I will just have to spell it out: PLEASE EXPERIENCE THIS FILM - it may cause an uneasy stomach, but is well worth it - YOU WILL NOT BE DISAPPOINTED!!! 11 out of 10.', u'0.260902', u'\nI respect and admire this movie, even though (and perhaps because) it is complex, occasionally irritating and often very hard to take.  Frankly, I avoided seeing it for a long time, but now am glad I did.  To complain that the film fails as a realistic portrayal of addiction is, I think, to miss the point.  Far from being the mere depiction of a collective downward spiral fueled by drugs, the movie is in fact a meditation on loneliness, greed, corruption, desperation, and the pervasiveness/banality of media, among many other things.\n\nThe subtleties of the text are communicated, first and foremost, by superb acting.  The performances of Ellen Burstyn, Jared Leto, Jennifer Connelly, and Marlon Wayans are all revelatory.  In particular, I was knocked out by Burstyn, who is almost comically pathetic in the beginning, but who manages by the end to convey her character\'s utter devastation in the truest, most heartbreaking manner imaginable.  The others are absolutely perfect as well; I was simply astonished by Leto and especially Wayans (may he eschew "scary movies" forevermore).  Connelly has perhaps the most difficult role in the film, with opportunity and motivation galore to go over the top, and she delivers not a single false note throughout.\n\nMy only real quibbles with the movie have to do with certain instances of the split-screen and jump-cut techniques, which struck me as somewhat gimmicky and repetitious, respectively.  That being said, overall the style of the film is impressive and appropriate.   The cinematography is beautifully conceived and executed, and the score is every bit as haunting as the performances (thanks largely to the work of the Kronos Quartet).\n\nIn sum, regardless of whether or not the subject matter itself shocks you, this movie will put the viewer through the proverbial wringer.  Give it a chance, and you will connect with the characters and then witness their destruction (spiritual and otherwise).  It is a punishing but unforgettable experience.  I\'m not sure whether I\'d necessarily recommend it or not; it all depends on your personal tolerance level with regard to an unflinching portrayal of human nature and behavior at their most extreme and, ultimately, tragic.  For my part, while I don\'t expect to watch this film very often in the future, I\'m sure glad it\'ll be on the shelf.', u'0.411968', u'I was tempted to title this "Drugs are bad, mm\'kay?" because "Requiem" was so sad I was desperate to inject some humor. Man, what a sad, scary, excellent, grim, disturbing, well-made movie. The more I read about RFAD and learned, the more fascinating it seemed. I\'m one of those people who, upon hearing a movie is extremely shocking, has a burning urge to see it as fast as possible to see if it shocks me (especially unrated or NC-17), since I\'m pretty jaded. So, I eagerly anticipated seeing it.\n\nUnfortunately, I read so much about the making of the movie that I knew a little too much about the plot going in, so there were few plot surprises. "Requiem" concerns four addicts. Jared Leto and Jennifer Connelly play a young loving couple, Harry and Marion, who dabble in heroin and plan to make a big sale with their friend Tyrone (Shawn Wayans) so they can be set for life and Marion can start her own business. Their recreational drug use turns into day-to-day addiction, and things start to get ugly. VERY ugly. Ellen Burstyn plays Harry\'s mother Sarah, a lonely widow who wants to lose weight to fit into a red dress to appear on her favorite TV show. She starts out addicted to TV and candy, but has the bad luck to visit a doctor who-in what I thought was the only unrealistic aspect-gives her an RX for \'diet pills\', that turn out to be speed. I say unrealistic because, as anyone who\'s ever worked in the medical profession knows, few doctors will write a new patient a huge prescription for extremely powerful, addictive controlled substances without even an exam.\n\nI found her story thread the most memorable and heartbreaking. Sarah takes her pills and starts losing weight, plus suddenly becoming energetic and chatty. Like any addictive drug, her happy blue pills stop working after prolonged use, so she ups her dose more...and more...and things slowly start getting very weird and scary. In one of the best scenes midway through, Harry visits her --the only visit where he doesn\'t openly steal her TV to pawn for dope. He\'s briefly riding high (in more ways than one) and announces he bought her a big-screen TV; he wanted to do something nice for her and figured out that "TV is her fix". He looks uneasy when she\'s babbling happily about how she has a reason to get up in the morning, then he hears her grinding her teeth, and figures it out ...the first time in the movie you see real fear in his eyes. Sarah soon starts having very scary strung-out hallucinations-starting out with subtle things like time woozily slowing down and speeding back up, and when her refrigerator suddenly starts moving on its own, the real nightmare begins. An aggressive fridge may sound Monty Python-esque now, but trust me, you won\'t be smiling by the end of the movie.\n\nOne review I read said that the movie not only pulls the rug out from under you, it drags you and the rug down a long flight of stairs into a very dark basement. Another reviewer compared the experience of watching the film to a drug, and that\'s not too far off the mark either. Whenever a character gets high, there\'s a slam-bang fast-cut montage of the same images over and over; a sigh, a pupil dilating, cells changing color. The description I probably agree with most came from Aronofsky himself; he compared the film to a jump from a plane without a parachute, and the movie ends three minutes after you hit the ground. The last few minutes that show the gruesome, depressing, worst-case-scenario fates of all four characters are just as intense, hard to watch, and nightmarish as I heard they were. I don\'t think I will ever forget Harry\'s mother\'s transformation from a harmless, plump, friendly older woman to someone so frightening looking that people cringe away in fear and revulsion at the sight of her.\n\nMy only complaints would be that I wished there was more time for character development. The film is divided into 3 segments, Summer (things going fine, having fun getting high) Fall (the beginning of the downhill slide) and Winter (end of the line). I would\'ve liked more scenes of what these people and their lives were like before addiction, as well as their relationships with each other. The cast is stellar- Wayans shows that he has the most range and talent of the Wayans bros- I laughed so hard at him in Don\'t Be A Menace that I ended up buying it, but here ...wow. I would\'ve liked to see more of his character. I never liked Leto much before, but he\'s excellent and also almost unrecognizable (he dropped 1/5 of his weight for the role and oh, it shows). Connelly I actively disliked before, but I was very impressed and now know she can act. Burstyn gives the performance of a lifetime- not only convincing, but dedicated enough to let the filmmakers make her look like absolute and total hell; few actresses over 55 would probably be as fearless.\n\nNot recommended if you\'re easily shocked, squeamish, or upset. If you only like movies that take you to a happy place, stay away. Everyone who left the movie theater looked like they had just been hit over the head with a very large board, and we all who knew what we were getting into. Recommended for those who want to see a movie that will completely overtake you and involve you emotionally. In addition, this film should be required viewing for everyone in the fashion industry that supported/glorified that whole \'heroin chic\' crap. Also a good movie if you are having some problems in your life and want to put them in perspective VERY fast. 9 out of 10 stars. I\'ll probably never look at my fridge quite the same again...', u'-0.222584', u'\nWell, I\xb4ve seen "Pi" and was fascinated. Now, there\xb4s "Requiem for a dream" and my expectations were very, very high. That can be the downfall for a movie, but in this case I wasn\xb4t disappointed. Aronofsky proves not only that he can direct a "bigger" movie, he also shows how one can do so without selling out. To be more precise: "RFAD" is one of the most disturbing and depressing movies that came out of the US for a looooong time. From the opening scene to its final curtain it\xb4s...well, a requiem for the characters, who are all perfectly portrayed by their actors. Ellen Burstyn is unbelievable. The power of her performance can only be compared to that of Bj\xf6rk in "Dancer in the dark". Aronofskys direction is even more experimental than in "Pi" and some of his ideas, like his combination of sound and picture are really innovative and give his movie a musical feel -without creating a long music video. On the downside, you could say that this movie offers no hope, no solution - but then, this would\xb4ve been a lousy compromise.', u'0.109777', u"\nIt baffles me how Aronofsky has managed to fool audiences and critics to rave about not one but two nonsensical stories in the last few years. If you manage to keep your cool under the barrage of imagery thrown at you from frame one you should be able to spot plot holes in this film so large that they'll make Pi's nonsensical ending look like plausible narrative.\n\nWhat bothers me most with these, apart from the fact that they make this film essentially pointless, is that they are all there simply to justify some supposedly shocking visuals. I can't help it, I must provide a list.\n\n\nSPOILER SPACE (you shouldn't care, but it's the rules)\n\n* *\n* *\n* *\n\n1. Harry goes to a hospital to get his obviously gangrened arm cured. A doctor spots him as a drug addict and calls the police WITHOUT TENDING TO THE ARM FIRST. The weirdest thing about this is that the poor guy is later sent back to the hospital to have his arm cut off. The good part for Harry is that he should become a rich man in no time, after suing the doctor, the hospital and probably the police.\n\n2. A dealer won't sell heroin for money, but he will trade it for sex. He could hire all the hookers he wants with the money he'd earn selling the heroin, specially considering he's the only provider for the whole city at that time. Still, all he wants is to see some lesbian sex live. Apparently, this is in the movie only to create tension between the lead and his girlfriend. Well, and to show Jennifer Connelly naked.\n\n3. A previously healthy old lady is allowed to degenerate mentally to the point of being confined and given electroshocks without receiving any help, even though she's been shown previously socializing with many other people. For some reason the only person who realizes she's sick is his son, who doesn't care much for her anyway. Not that he does anything about it, either. Strangely enough, there's a shot of her friends waiting in the asylum looking worried while she receives electrical discharges without anesthetics.\n\n4. Even though heroin can be injected practically anywhere, the lead will do it always in the same place. Even when the spot becomes a purulent wound he'll still do it the exact same position. Not an inch above, not in the other arm, not in a leg. Right in the middle of the wound.\n\n* *\n* *\n*\n\nEND SPOILERS (but there are more of these, believe me)\n\nYou know, I wouldn't worry about plot holes that much if the filmmakers had set out to create just a series of disgusting images to show them around. The thing is they didn't. They made an attempt to create something vaguely resembling a storyline, they even had a shot at a subtext. They simply failed miserably. Let's see, this film seems to be about addiction. The points made about addiction in the film are:\n\na) Many people have addictions of different kinds.\n\nb) Addictions aren't good things.\n\nc) Disgusting things happen when people let their addictions go out of control.\n\nand maybe, just maybe...\n\nd) With addictions at first you'll feel good, but then you'll feel bad.\n\nSo much for depth.\n\nBut we might also have some character development, right? We could neglect story and subtext and still have strong, compelling characters.\n\nJust we don't.\n\nEven the best of the characters we're shown is one dimensional and flat. Everything the characters are or do is put there to be dismantled later, which makes it all feel like a cardboard building in a Godzilla movie. It's fake and cheap. Everything. The leads' love story, the mother-son relationship, friendship between Harry and Tyrone, and between Sarah and the other women. Nothing feels real because Aronofski only cares about the next cool shot.\n\nThis film might get you distracted enough the first time you watch it and make you to believe there's some depth behind that nauseous feeling in your stomach. In the end, it's just empty imagery planned to create a nauseous feeling in your stomach.\n\nIf you want imagery go and see the latest summer blockbuster. It might at least be some fun.", u'-0.412217', u"\nHarry and Tyrone are drug users who decide to try and make some money by cutting their cocaine and selling it on. This idea works very well and the pair start filling a shoe box with $20 bills \x96 Harry even buys his mother, Sara, a television to make up for all the times that he used to steal her old one to sell it for cash. Sara has her won good news, after years of being an ordinary lonely widow she has the chance to appear on a television show herself and is actively dieting to try and fit into her favourite dress for it. With Harry's girlfriend pregnant but happily high, things take a bad turn when rival dealers start a war and dramatically cut the availability and up the price \x96 forcing Harry and Tyrone to do whatever they can to get not only a fix but a supply to sell. Meanwhile, Sara's desire to lose weight sees her starting a regime of diet pills, morning, noon and night.\n\nI came to this film with not even the slightest idea of what it was about but only that it was supposed to be 'good'. I was not totally prepared for a story that grabbed me from the start and delivered an intense narrative at breakneck pace with great acting, amazingly stylish directing, editing and production. While this onslaught will not be to everyone's tastes, I defy pretty much anyone not to be astonished by this film although I expect many will find it to be a pretty hard ride. The story sees four characters each getting into addiction and having it cause their lives to spiral out of control \x96 and that's pretty much it. However it is not so much the story but the telling because it is the delivery that makes the film as amazing and compelling as it is; I don't want to oversell it but all aspects of this film come together perfectly. The writing is realistic and, although not containing the speeches that make a cast shine, is really well written and never strikes a bum note. The script writes highs and lows of addiction so very well that it is easy to forget that what you see in the film has come from a script and story boards.\n\nOf course without the delivery then this would have struggled but it is blessed not only with good actors giving great performances but also average actors giving great performances. Burstyn is amazing \x96 and I'm not overdoing that; hers is a fearless performance that is totally, totally convincing. Her descent is so tragic and involving that it is a major art of the story instead of the subplot it appeared it would be. Connelly is the next to stick in the mind, conveying a total peace and beauty when things are good but a terrible sweaty look of inner agony on her face as she degrades herself for drugs \x96 an amazing performance. Leto is not someone I'm that aware of but he was good here and held his own well beside the two actresses. However the actual surprise of the film came from Wayans; I'm so used to hating him in lazy performances that I forgot he can act and he is good here \x96 avoiding all the ethnic clich\xe9s that he usually does. McDonald is excellent in his cleverly used segments. It is easy to dismiss his performance as cheesy and easy but he does get it spot on (as the extras on the DVD show). Supporting roles for people of the recognisable likes of David, Baker, Weeks and Naidu only help.\n\nOf course the main impact of the film comes from the relentless direction that not only produces a stylish product but also draws the audience into the highs and lows the characters experience as well as the repetitive rituals of their lives. He also handles the hallucinations really well \x96 making them genuinely disturbing when they come have been silly. I cannot describe it very well but the direction really hits the nail on the head with heavy style and different techniques. Of course, some may feel that they have seen elements of it before and will say of Aronofsky that he has borrowed much of what we see \x96 certainly the front mounted camera on the characters harks back to Mean Streets and Spike Lee to name two, while others will look at the reference to Dark City (even though Aronofsky) or claim that the hyper direction is Trainspotting X10! However to accuse him of just stealing is lazy and nonsensical because he weaves it altogether for the whole running time; this is not a rip off or a fluke, this is a talented director spinning style and substance. The score by Mansell and the Kronos Quartet is perfect and is a wonderful compliment to the images, increasing their impact and making the film feel fast and exciting at times, tragic and moving at other times. These are just two examples but the film is technically impressive \x96 whether it be the different cameras, the make up, the editing, the use of mobile stop motion, it is all impressive.\n\nOverall this is an amazing film but it is not one that will appeal to all audiences. It is bleak, relentless and a hard watch but it is worth it because it grabs you and refuses to let you go until the very end. The film has a simple plot but a great script that is delivered by a collection of great performances \x96 in particular from Burstyn and Connelly. The direction only adds to Aronofsky's reputation and the original score is fantastic. I am rarely left breathless by a film but I was by this one and I honestly cannot believe that this escaped me for so many years.\n", u'0.205413'], u'tt0090605': [u"\nTHE sci-fi movie. It's nearly perfect in every way: storyline, characters,  menacing threat, suspense, action, direction, music, emotion, etc... It's  always been a favorite of mine and still is. To me this is not just a film,  it is an experience. The adrenaline pumps like in no other film and rarely  have we had the chance to see a heroine as compelling as Sigourney Weaver.  She can kick anyone's ass and still keep a heart and soul. (Why she didn't  win the Oscar back in 1986 is beyond me.) When the action starts, you're in  for the ride of your life. Truly a milestone in movie making. Now if they  could only release it on DVD...", u'0.266683', u'\nI rate Aliens a perfect 10.  This second installment in the Alien series evolves the original movie\'s horror/sci-fi genre into action-adventure/sci-fi, setting a standard which has not yet been matched. I like this movie because it paints a picture of the future which is realistic enough to suck you in during the beginning of the film and then quickly introduces you to interesting characters who you become concerned with; some you love and others you hate.....but none of them bore you.  By the time the action starts it\'s possible to forget you\'re watching a movie (at least the first couple of times).  The plot is filled with tension that is occasionally broken by some of the most memorable one-liners in history (especially by Private Hudson).  The special effects are remarkable, considering the fact that they were accomplished the "old fashioned way" prior to digital manipulation.  I can report that I now own the Director\'s Cut and rate this version a 10 also.  The extra footage will be extremely interesting to fans of the 1986 release.  Either version gives you great characters, suspense, action, firepower, sarcasm, and wit.  Aliens is an outstanding show!\n', u'0.290726', u"I am just going to add my voice to the chorus of praise for this movie. It is as near to being perfect as any I have ever seen. I will not say that it is much better than Alien - which is just about near to being perfect also. But I do love all the characters in this movie. I have rarely seen a movie where all the characters were so well developed. Even most serious dramas seldom develops each character so completely. None of these characters are stereotypes even Paul Reiser as Burke, although the slimy company/government man villain is a prerequisite in disaster type movies. I would almost say that my favorite is Michael Beihn as Hicks, just because I like his work & consider him to be underrated. But I also like Lance Henriksen as Bishop, William Hope as Lt. Gorman, Bill Paxton as Hudson, and of course, Jenette Goldstein as Vasquez. I liked all of these characters. I cared about their lives & deaths. The final scene for Gorman & Vasquez still chokes me up after seeing it many times. \n\nI am not ignoring Sigourney Weaver or Carrie Henn. Ripley is the template for the modern action heroine. In the 24 years since Alien, few have been able to measure up to Sigourney Weaver's Ripley. Even in Alien 3 & 4, Ripley was still powerful, despite the 3ed rate quality of the movies. As for Carrie Henn as Newt, she was the emotional heart of Aliens. Cameron's ability to develop well rounded characters does not detract from his ability to create great action scenes or to scare the audience out of a several years of growth.", u'0.172852', u'Series note: It is strongly advised that you watch this film only after seeing Alien (1979). This is a direct continuation of that story.\n\n57 years after the events of the first film, Ellen Ripley (Sigourney Weaver) is found and awakened from hyper sleep to discover that a terraforming colony has been set up on LV-426, the planet wherein she and her fellow crew of the mining cargo spaceship Nostromo first encountered the titular aliens. When Earth-based communications loses contact with LV-426, a band of marines are sent to investigate, taking Ripley and a representative from the company that financed the colony, Carter Burke (Paul Reiser) along for the ride.\n\nFor the difficult job of following up Ridley Scott\'s excellent Alien, director James Cameron decided to go a completely different route--to make a fast moving, slightly tongue-in-cheek, boisterous action extravaganza. Remarkably, he was able to do that while still maintaining a stylistic and literary continuity that melds Aliens seamlessly with the first film.\n\nRipley is much more fully developed in this film, although unfortunately, some of the most significant scenes were deleted from the theatrical release (if at all possible, watch the 2-hour and 37-minute director\'s cut instead). Cameron fashioned Aliens into a grand arc where Ripley\'s actions at the end of the film have much more meaning as she\'s not only fighting monsters, but also fighting to retain a semblance of something she lost due to her 57-year hyper sleep. As in the first film, she is still the most intelligent, courageous and resourceful member of the crew, but she has much more colorful company.\n\nThe marines accompanying Ripley back to LV-426 may be too cartoonish for some tastes (as for viewers of that opinion, most of the action and the film overall is likely to be too cartoonish), but for anyone more agreeable to that kind of caricatured exaggeration, it\'s a joy to watch. I\'m a big fan of both Bill Paxton and Lance Henriksen, and both turn in wonderfully over-the-top performances, at their diametrically opposed ends of the emotional spectrum--Paxton as the spastic surfer/redneck and Henriksen as the intense, moody sage, with a surprising reality and an even more surprising conscience to go along with it. We also get a cigar-chomping Sergeant, a crazy, butch Private, and a complex, pensive Corporal as main characters, and a mysterious, bright young girl (played in a terrific performance by Carrie Henn). Much of the center section of the film hinges on the interrelationships of these characters, despite the action trappings going on around them.\n\nCameron carries over the crypt/labyrinth motif of the first film, and adds a metaphorical descent into the bowels of hell in the climax. The action throughout is suspenseful. Aliens contains one of my favorite "cat fights" in any film. It\'s also worth noting the influence this film may have had on Paul Verhoeven\'s Starship Troopers (1997)--although admittedly, we could say that Cameron was influenced a bit by the Robert A. Heinlein book, as well. Throughout all of the varied action sequences, as well as the important early scenes of colonists on LV-426, Cameron is able to clearly convey the logistics of very complex sets, so that viewers remain on the edges of their seats.\n\nPart of what makes the monsters so effective is that we\'re not told too much about them. We only get glimpses into their physiology\'s, their behavioral patterns and their intelligence. Cameron gives us just enough to become wrapped up in the film, but not so much that we become overly familiar with the aliens, or start to question the logic behind the film. He also smartly carries over some devices from the first film that were abandoned to an extent, such as the acidic blood of the aliens, and he supplies answers to the few questions that the first film raised, such as why the blood doesn\'t corrode instruments and objects when a dead alien is examined.\n\nAliens is yet another example of a sequel that is just as good as an original film in a series. Just make sure you watch both in order, and try to watch the director\'s cuts.', u'0.187727', u"\nALIENS really does have it all.  Perfect direction.  Beautiful cinematography.  Intense characters.  Big guns.  Action.  Heroism. Courage.  Battles.  Friendship.  Bravery.  It is certainly the BEST sequel ever made in movie history, and one of the GREATEST MOVIES EVER MADE.\n\nAt its core is Lt. Ellen Ripley (played by the badass Sigourney Weaver), a warrant officer, and tough as nails.  Her character is one of the greatest heroines of all time.  Sigourney really does pull it off.  No one else could have done it like her.  Ripley's maternal connection with the young girl Newt is amazing to watch...but the ultimate scene is her final battle with the galaxy's most deadly creature - set to a pulsing military score (James Horner delivers in a big way!).  Quite possibly my favorite fight scene of all time.\n\nThere's not really much else to say - just go watch the movie on DVD, and you will not be let down.  You're in for a wild ride!!!\n\nALIENS:  THIS TIME, IT'S WAR\n\n", u'0.281965', u'\nThere are really good movies and then there\'s that select few that change your life.  For me movies like Jaws, Raiders of the Lost Ark, JFK, Titanic and Star Wars did that.  By viewing a movie you see life in a different light.  Aliens also did that to me.  I didn\'t think a movie could scare me as much as Halloween did but this one certainly did that and more.  The atmosphere in this movie, and the lighting and cinematography and of course the direction are top notch, and some of the scenes are some of the scariest I\'ve seen in my life time.  But what puts this movie over the top as one of the all time greatest films ever made is the casting.\n\nSigourney Weaver is terrific but it is her supporting cast that shines and makes you feel like you know the crew that is heading to that desolate planet.\n\nPaul Reiser is perfect as Burke,the slimy corporate kiss ass that cares about profit before human lives.  Lance Henriksen shines as Bishop, the cyborg with a heart.  Jeanette Goldstein is the rough around the edges female marine that more than holds her own with all the testosterone floating around and Michael Biehn ( another Cameron favourite )is the perfect quiet leader that leads by example and not so much a loud demonstrative voice.  But the show stopper in this flick ( just as he always is in any movie that he is in ) is Bill Paxton.\n\nPaxton and Cameron have worked on Terminator 1, True Lies, Titanic and Aliens and Bill is one of those actors that steals scenes from every actor and was always a recognizable face even before Titanic.  Here, his Hudson character is the comic relief but he is also perhaps one of the true characters that we can all identify with.  His tough exterior is nothing more than camouflage for his frightened fragile interior.  He realizes the dire situation that they are all in and he can\'t hide his fear.  When he finds out that they won\'t be rescued for at least seventeen days, his response is " Hey man, we\'re not going to survive 17 hours man!  Those things are going to come in here and they\'re going to get us and..... " ( Ripley ) This little girl survived longer than that with no weapons and no military training. " ( Hudson ) " Why don\'t ya put her in charge!!! "\n\nPaxton is a gift to any and every movie that he is in and this is his finest work.  He should have won a best supporting actor that year.  And if you haven\'t seen this movie, rush to see it if only for Bill Paxton.  He steals the show.  But if a tightly wound, brilliantly technical and unbelievably scary movie is your thing, then you can\'t go wrong here.  This is easily a ten out of ten, and one of the best ever made.  If Spielberg is the king is Hollywood, then Cameron is his heir apparent.  Oh, and one more thing, Paxton will win an Oscar one day.    ', u'0.21174', u'James Cameron is an extremely talented action director because not only does he know great action, but he always backs the action up with a great story and interesting characters. Aliens is his finest achievement, as far as I\'m concerned. Of course, I should specify: Aliens Special Edition is his finest achievement.\n\nIn 1986 several scenes were cut to keep the movie\'s run-time reasonable but there was one scene that was incredibly foolish to leave out. The scene I refer to is near the beginning where Ripley learns that her daughter has died while she was away in \'hypersleep\' for 57 years. "I promised her I\'d be home for her 11th birthday," cries Ripley. This is a very moving scene that adds a great deal the character\'s depth and makes more sense to why she cares for a little girl named Newt later in the film. She\'s seeking penance through Newt with her love and determination to keep her alive at all costs. The theatrical edition obviously doesn\'t elude to any of this, and even cheapens the relationship between Ripley and Newt- just a little bit. James Cameron has said that all of his movies are love stories, and Aliens is a story of parental love. He has also said that the special edition is his intended (if not definitive) version of the film. For about five years or so the Special Edition was the only version of Aliens you could get on DVD. It should have stayed that way.\n\nAliens is a unique film experience: it\'s genuinely thrilling and exciting, unlike a lot of movies where people shoot the evil monsters and there\'s disgusting blood and rapid gunfire, and it\'s really meaningless. In Aliens\' case, the aliens are very threatening and more than just target practice. We don\'t see any aliens for over an hour, but once we do, it\'s a huge payoff. By that time, we get to know some interesting characters: Hicks (Michael Beihn), a take-charge marine who also turns out to be sweet and sincere, Hudson (Bill Paxton), a braggart who turns out to be a coward and complains most of the time, Vasquez (Jeanette Goldstein), the iron-willed woman soldier who proves to be one of the bravest characters in the film, Bishop (Lance Henrikson), a robot that is very helpful for everyone\'s survival, Burke (Paul Rieser), the slimy company man who the audience loves to hate, and of course, the adorable little Newt (Carrie Henn), a girl who has survived unspeakable horror. Holding the whole film together is Ripley, played by Sigourney Weaver in her surprise-Oscar-nominated performance. I think the only reason why the audience cared for her in the first film is because she was the only person left and we wanted her to live. But for this film, James Cameron added so much to her. With all this investment in characters, we\'re really concerned for their well-being. We don\'t want those aliens to get them. Some die, and I\'m always truly bummed out when it happens.\n\nFilled with amazing performances and an abundance of thrills, Aliens is one of the greatest of any genre it attempts: whether it\'s action, sci-fi, horror, or even drama. I personally liked it better than the first film, but it\'s really like comparing apples and oranges. I prefer the special edition and don\'t see why anyone should view the other version instead.\n\nMy rating: 10/10', u'-0.0495462', u'\n"Aliens" is the best trapped-with-a-monster-right-behind-you movie of all time.  The weird part is that it\'s not the first of its kind.  Usually, the first of a genre is always the best but these kinds of movies were made decades-and-decades before 1986\'s "Aliens."  Still, through its strong story and characters, it elbows its way to the head of the class.\n\nRipley is a heroine like no other.  She thrills you.  Her powerful presence and unstoppable soul will always live on in the minds of movie-goers.  She and Newt form a surrogate mother-daughter relationship that is more touching than anything I\'ve seen before in this kind of a movie.  In this movie more than any other in the "Alien" series, Ripley\'s a woman who does what she can (and then some) to protect herself and the ones around her.  She\'s the perfect action hero.\n\nOn top of that, the pulsing music that plays while Bishop is speeding them away from the exploding compound and while Ripley is booting  the Queen Alien out into space is beyond comparison.\n\nNote:  If you LOVED this movie, it\'s probably best you don\'t see Alien 3. It, for some reason, turns the triumph of this film\'s conclusion into a depression deeper than the vastness of a hundred black holes.\n', u'0.320704', u"\n\nI have watched this movie when I was a pre-teen at the cinema, and MY! It completely blew me away. It has got my adrenalin pumping so hard that I almost wanted to slip back to my seat and take a breather! Although during that time I didn't quite understand most parts of it (too young to understand), I was deeply immersed into such rich story-telling and the fantastic alien creatures. The tensely build-up atmosphere and the space-ships, grips you so tightly it seems never to let go.\n\nThis movie rocks, scares you right on to your face, very mysterious, have tons of special effects (not quite CGI though, but the mechanical aliens looks just so threatening and scary). James Cameron is such a fabulous story-teller in this Sci-Fi stellar! The movie ran at more than 2 hours but I didn't feel that at all. Actually James has cut out a lot of scenes for this theatrical release back then, but you can still get those scenes back on the DVD (extra 17 minutes footage).\n\nThe acting is good especially from Sigourney Weaver, Paul Reiser and Lance Henriksen (as the robot). Sigourney's Ripley is such a strong-willed woman, that even put shame to men (somehow I feel this is quite unbelievable, because she has got so much energy, especially the scene where she gets back to the Queen's hatch to save Newt). I have watched other alien series (Alien legacy - All four parts), but I can say this part 2 of the series is my favourite, followed by Alien, then Alien:Resurrection, and lastly Alien3)\n\nI am quite happy to see this film stays high at one of the top Sci-Fi movies in IMDB)\n\nTill now as an adult, I still go back to watch this DVD occasionally and every time I watch it again, it brings in a completely new scare, and new thoughts, also the new meaning of what is a horror movie all about!\n\nHighly recommended if you haven't watched this yet. I give it an 8 out of 10! (Truly deserves the high IMDB rating at 8.2 to-date)\n\n", u'0.077838', u"What can I say that hasn't already been said? Every aspect of this movie is spot on, which I can only put down to James Cameron's obsessive attention to detail. The characters are distinct, memorable and believable. The plot builds slowly into the most tense, suspenseful roller-coaster ride I've ever experienced in the cinema. The special effects are good even by today's standards, and the sets are simply second to none. This is one of my top 10 favourite movies of all time.\n\nIf you like this kind of movie and haven't seen this yet, what are you waiting for? Twenty years on and the only other Sci Fi action movie in the same league is James Cameron's Terminator 2. I can only hope he returns to this genre in the future, he is the master.\n\nOh, and try to see the special extended edition if possible, the extra scenes make an amazing movie even better.", u'0.105882', u'\nSeven years after barely surviving events on board the Nostromo in Ridley Scott\'s classic sci-fi horror ALIEN, Sigourney Weaver reprised her role as Warrant Officer Ripley for one of the most compelling and critically-acclaimed sequels of all time.  Canadian director James Cameron had already struck gold with the Arnold Schwarzenegger starring vehicle THE TERMINATOR (1984), after his somewhat inauspicious feature film directorial debut with the long-forgotten, Dutch-backed PIRANHA II: THE SPAWNING 3 years earlier.  ALIENS would further cement Cameron\'s growing reputation as a first-rate director of high-tech, fast-paced, adrenaline-pumping action thrillers, from which there would normally be no let-up once they got going.\n\nWhen Ripley is rescued from drifting aimlessly through deep space, she is horrified to learn that not only has she been asleep for 57 years, but the planet on which she had encountered the original alien all that time ago has since been colonized.  At first no-one will heed her warnings or completely believe the story she gives at an official enquiry as to what happened to her and her fellow Nostromo crew members.  But then contact is lost with LV-426, and despite initially throwing Ripley "to the wolves" (as she herself puts in), The Company, through representative Carter J. Burke (Paul Reiser), suddenly finds itself in a position of having to ask Ripley for help, finally persuading her to return to the planet that still consumes her every nightmare, as an advisor to a motley group of very tough colonial marines expecting this to be just another run-of-the-mill "bug-hunt".  But how wrong that assumption turns out to be!\n\nI would argue that ALIENS far surpasses its celebrated predecessor in almost every aspect.  Obviously the sheer spectacle of what is basically a Vietnam war movie in space is particularly awe-inspiring - the impressive sets, the many excitingly-staged combat sequences, the aliens themselves (interestingly enough, although through fast cutting and appropriate camera placement it seems as though there are hundreds of aliens being blasted to kingdom come - or else picking off the gung-ho marines one by one - in reality no more than 6 aliens are ever seen in any one shot).  But the human drama element of this sequel is also greatly heightened, primarily by the introduction of "Newt" (wonderful little Carrie Henn, in her only film role), who turns out to be the sole survivor of recent events on LV-426, becoming a kind-of surrogate daughter to Ripley, which leads to several touching moments and gives the story a surprisingly effective emotional core in the midst of all the otherwise pre-eminent carnage.\n\nAmongst the talented supporting players are Cameron regulars Michael Biehn (THE TERMINATOR, THE ABYSS) and Bill Paxton (bit part in THE TERMINATOR, TRUE LIES, TITANIC), and Cameron\'s punchy dialogue includes such suitably macho wisecracks as - Hudson (Paxton): "Hey Vasquez, have you ever been mistaken for a man?"  Vasquez (a pumped-up Jenette Goldstein): "No, have you?"  Nominated for 7 Oscars, including Weaver as Best Actress (again this confirms the general class on display, as it is fairly rare for the Academy to recognize the acting qualities inherent in this type of predominantly action-driven movie), the film went on to win for Best Visual Effects and Best Sound Effects Editing.  Further, almost inevitable sequels followed in 1992 and 1997, but I prefer to think of the terrifying perils of Ellen Ripley as ending on this high note.', u'0.128221', u'Back in 1986, sequels had become very common (Superman, Star Wars, Indiana Jones), yet people were suspicious when they heard of a follow-up to Alien, Ridley Scott\'s acclaimed sci-fi horror from 1979. Most of the criticism was aimed at the fact that Scott had nothing to do with the new movie, which had been entrusted to an unknown (at the time) named James Cameron. Fortunately, Cameron had shown he knew the genre two years earlier with The Terminator, and by perfecting the skills he had developed on that film he delivered Aliens, which still stands out as one of the greatest science fiction flicks of all time.\n\nGiven how the first film ended (all characters but one died), Cameron wisely decided to radically separate his movie from the original, and he does so from the very beginning by having Ripley (Sigourney Weaver) wake up from her cryogenic sleep and make a shocking discovery: although she hasn\'t aged at all, 57 years have passed since she left the Nostromo, meaning everyone she knew is either dead or very old (in a particularly heartbreaking scene, she talks on the phone with her grown-up daughter, who is full of resentment for her "unjustified" absence). In addition, no one believes her story regarding the alien since, as she\'s told by scientist Carter Burke (Paul Reiser), the planet where these creatures allegedly lived has been successfully colonized. Suddenly, though, all communications with LV-426 are inexplicably interrupted. Thinking there might be some truth to Ripley\'s tale, Burke asks her to join him and a group of soldiers on a mission to uncover the mystery. And while most of the participants are in it just for the money, our heroine realizes this is her only chance of confronting her worst nightmare and overcoming it for good.\n\nThe main problem with Alien, some have said, was that, as great as it can be, the characterizations were reduced to the minimum (not that it really mattered, with Ridley Scott ensuring the film retained the right pace and suspense throughout). With Aliens, character development is the last thing fans should worry about, Cameron being fully aware of each individual\'s potential and exploiting it as much as he can. Ripley, who was just part of an ensemble in the original, is now allowed to carry the whole film, and boy, does she carry it: rarely has there been a more solid, compelling female role in a genre movie like this (the fact that Sigourney Weaver is the only actress, thus far, to have received an Oscar nomination for a science-fiction film is further testament to Aliens\' immortality). The supporting cast is equally good, with a multitude of different characters ranging from funny (regular Cameron collaborators Michael Biehn and Bill Paxton) to weird (Lance Henriksen\'s android Bishop) and bringing something extra to the movie\'s unique atmosphere.\n\nAh, the film\'s mood: that\'s the other aspect Cameron deserves all the credit in the world for. On a superficial level, it could be said Alien was a horror movie, while the follow-up is more action-oriented; that may be true, but one should also notice that every single spectacular battle scene actually oozes tension, never leaving the audience with a pause to breathe or relax. In fact, Cameron has succeeded where many other directors would have failed: he stayed faithful to the original\'s tone, but managed nonetheless to make the film undeniably his own.\n\nRelentlessly creepy, occasionally very violent and consistently compelling, Aliens is a pitch-perfect piece of adult science-fiction. Watch it on a double bill with Scott\'s version and you will get four hours of genre film-making at its finest.', u'0.1006', u"Aliens is one of many movies from my adolescent years that is just as good today as it was back then. It is an adrenaline filled ride filled with creepy locations, intense action, thrills, much circumstantial humor and one-liners that will never grow old (mostly thanks to Bill Paxton). It is, unapologetically, a man's movie, filled with everything except nudity (which it did not need).\n\nAll movies in the Alien series have a claustrophobic feel to them, and involve a relatively small cast of players. Aliens is no exception and really capitalizes on the fear potential of the locale. Cameron is not exactly known for injecting horror into his films, but provides enough here to satisfy.\n\nThe characters are very well cast and the actors have great chemistry. I especially grooved to the fact that, even though the soldiers are supposed to be tough marines, not all of them were completely gung-ho about their adventures. In fact, a few were downright cowardly and indecisive in the face of combat - something I'm certain would happen to many in such a situation. Bill Paxton stole the show as the wisecracking space marine. With all the likable characters involved, the stakes were very high. When they start dropping, we feel the loss.\n\nMovies like this just don't come around very often. The pacing is very tight, even when the action is absent. The characters and situations are interesting enough - when the action hits, it just serves to suck us in deeper. I have nothing bad to say about Aliens. It is simply an awesome movie with a well deserved reputation for being such. See for yourself.", u'0.0120441', u"When I first watched Alien i was really impressed and had to get Aliens. I wasn't sure if this could be as good because most sequels hardly ever surpass the first. But I thought this was a lot better. Don't get me wrong the first was brilliant but this was amazing. Everything was right. They had a brilliant cast, brilliant story, brilliant effects and brilliant acting.\n\nThe thing i was most impressed about was the design of it all. It looked amazing. They Made things look realistic and the aliens looked really good as well. The aliens home was put together brilliantly. For a 1986 film they made the effects look really good and the set. The king alien looked very good and the set of it's home was very good as well. Yet again Sigourney Weaver puts on a brilliant performance as like she did in the first one and Jennette Goldstien as Pvt Vaquez gave a great performance and is one of the best movie heroes ever.\n\nWith the first film it had a lot of parts that made you jump and had you on the edge of your seat. It was exactly the same with this one. There were lots of parts that made you jump and nearly the whole film had you on the edge of your seat wanting to know what was going to happened next and they had a lot more gore in this than the first which was good to see because i thought in the first it would be fairly gory but it weren't that much.\n\nIf you thought the first was good you must watch this. You will be blown away by the effects and design and the great action sequences they have with the aliens. It is one of the best films made and it will keep you entertained from start to finish.", u'0.543139', u"\nHaving been a fan of the Alien films for many years, I have recently been finding myself drawing comparisons between the first two films in the series, and not liking what I was thinking. I like both films a great deal, but find Alien a superior film in my books.\n\nThe overall plot of Alien is about a small group of people in isolated conditions. A dangerous alien gets loose amongst them. Everyone bar one person and a cat is killed. The lead goes back to rescue the cat. The survivors manage to barely escape at the last moment from a large mining ship going thermonuclear. Unbeknownst to the survivors, the alien sneaks on board, and after a brief struggle, it is blown out of an airlock into space, courtesy of Ripley. The survivors go into hypersleep, and the credits roll.\n\nAliens is about a larger group of people in isolated conditions. Many dangerous aliens gets loose amongst them. Everyone bar three plus an andriod are killed. The lead goes back to rescue a child. The survivors manage to barely escape at the last moment from a large mining colony going thermonuclear. Unbeknownst to the survivors, the big alien sneaks on board, and after a struggle, it is blown out of an airlock into space, courtesy of Ripley. The survivors go into hypersleep, and the credits roll.\n\nMore than just a few similarities here. The second one is basically a rehash of the first, on a larger scale (more people, more aliens, more noise, more explosions). The basic plot is not only the same, there are specific point of plot detail that are the same.\n\nI also find the story for Alien a lot more edgy, a true psychological horror / drama, where the alien was secondary in the story to the interaction between the crew of the Nostromo. Aliens is more of an action / horror film. This is of course a personal preference. However, I am finding myself getting increasingly annoyed with modern movies concentrating on loud noise, fast action, and great effects, while neglecting the story. And from what I can see, Cameron took the original story, and added loud noise and fast action. I feel the effects on the first were actually superior. Bigger is not necessarily better.\n\nSet / decoration / costume wise, both movies have aged very well. I do however get a little annoyed in Aliens when I continually see the video screens in the movie being standard 4:3 tv's, actually blackened down to 1.85:1 to make them look like a futuristic widescreen sets I guess. Pretty ironic, when I think about it, given how Cameron makes films (matted 1.66:1 Super 35). If he made Aliens now, he'd probably matt the tubes down to 2.35:1...\n\nAnd on a light-hearted note, I like cats. Anyone who'd risk their life to save their cat is true hero in my books. Add to this the fact that I don't like children, and Alien definitely gets my vote in this area too...\n", u'-0.0472351'], u'tt0042876': [u"\n'People forget the unpleasant things.  They only remember what they want to remember.'\n\nIn Rashomon the editing tells \xbd of the story.  It may feel experimental or unconventional, but Kurosawa perfects the concept second by second, directing and editing.  This film didn't need a big budget to come perfectly to the point.  It's a simple tale, but not a superficial tale.  Different points of view and selective memories ('It's true! I saw it!') don't only make the woods unsafe, but are one of the most universal topics of humanity.  'We humans are weak creatures. That's why we lie, even to ourselves' says it all actually: it's about what people want to hear and when they start being interested at all, apart from wishful thinking.  Selfish excuses vs trust in other people.\n\nRashomon gets masterful when in one instant there is literally a different point of view: the camera takes another position to shoot the same sequence, thereby forcing the audience to reconsider what they just saw.  That is the sort of storytelling that the supposed masters of cinema in our time yet have to equal, or try to copy when they fail.  Admitted 'Memento' (2000, Nolan) is a truly great one.  Still not THAT universal.  'Pulp Fiction' (1994) didn't come close,  'La Commare Secca' (1962) also didn't.  'Ghost dog: the way of the samurai' (1999) touched another border of the concept, or does it?\n\nThe use of (non-original) music in my opinion reveals a certain interest for western influence, not only in Rashomon, but also in Kurosawa's forthcoming films, and is probably why his films were so influential on western filmmakers too.\n\nThe cinematography is dynamic and changes scene by scene to emphasize exactly what is going on.  The shadows of leaves and branches, captured by cinematographer Kazuo Miyagawa, make you really feel 'in the woods', while the actors (Toshir\xf4 Mifune, Takashi Shimura) convince the remaining part of the audience (which adds up to 100% breathless viewers).  It may be after days that you first realize you saw an important film.  After weeks you realize that you must see it again to comprehend (despite it's only 85 min), and ironically that is just one of the crucial points that Kurosawa made. 10/10", u'0.11505', u'Akira Kurosawa was one of those directors, the first from the Eastern hemisphere, to develop the form and structure of cinema in ways it hadn\'t been. The story he used for Rashomon is now, like Seven Samurai, Hidden Fortress, and Yojimbo, a near archetype that at this point in the history of film has become formula and common knowledge for writers and directors. In that sense, Rashomon is as important and entertaining as a film as Citizen Kane, Battleship Potemkin, Rear Window, or Open City. Tee basic premise- Four different people give four different accounts on the rape and murder of a couple in the woods. A key ingredient to the success of Rashomon, is that the recollections given to the courts by the woman, the bandit, the as well as the four in discussion, is that their emotions reveal their humanity, even if their details reveal nothing, or everything. It\'s difficult to say whether character goes over story here, or if they have equal importance to understand Kurosawa\'s psychology with these people. \n\nThe opening shot of the house is a perfect representation of the mature of the picture, something that has fallen apart over time due to disasters that go beyond control of individuals. The man who heard the testimonies of the trial says "I don\'t understand". This has been a discussed line, since essentially he\'s saying the point right up front. All the information won\'t ease his puzzlement. The three who discuss the details of the crimes and confessions are crucial- they speak for us, what our opinions might be, and we listen to each version of the story, the characters, the fears, the pride, the shame, and the search for judgment and/or truth in the situation.\n\nAlong with being director and co-adapter, Kurosawa\'s mastery is revealed heavily in his use of editing- there are short, fleeting moments that hint, or rather pronounce, emotions and thoughts. For instance, when we first see Tajomaru, the bandit, played by action-legend Toshiro Mifune, he is looking up at the sky, bound in straps to keep him from moving, and for a second, or less than a second, there\'s a shot of what he sees in the sky, then back to his face which reveals an expression that borders on skeptical, and a bit crazed, or more. Mifune\'s part is of a barbarian, but all the more believable as a human barbarian since he acts as such with animal desires- he sees the woman in the woods, and knows he wants her, and while he reflects that he didn\'t have to have killed the man, he did as a last resort as a man with an urge. This is intensified by a sadistic flee with his actions. \n\nWhat\'s intriguing about that first description/recollection of the battle between him and the other man, is that it seems like it could be the truth, and to one viewer it could, and to another it seems like it could all be apart of his hyperactive and trapped imagination. And in the attack of the bandit on the woman, at first to him, it\'s like a game, then in later descriptions, he feels a little more un-easy, then later, it\'s of neither pleasure or discomfort, it just is. This kind of technique later happens with the woman who was victim (who has conviction, though is herself an archetype of Lifetime women), the presence who saw it "all", and with the man who in the beginning didn\'t understand. In each telling the expressions, the cut-aways, the lighting and movement by Kazuo Miyagawa, it\'s equally startling, exhilarating. \n\nThat the film gives off such a hypnotic aura isn\'t surprising, or perhaps it is for those in the grips of the emotion of it all- the dead man\'s story is like the hook ripping into a twelve foot bass. The final accouter of the tale proves the most accurate to the common observer, yet Kurosawa knows that\'s not the point- if he made it as such to be bold AND had a definite concrete point, the ending would be as poignant when revealed is the truth, or what one could believe as the closest thing to it is. We know why that last person didn\'t want to get involved with the courts with what he knows: his story is no more a revelation, of any comfort or consolation to the listeners, than the others. I highly recommend this to anyone, and to those who have distaste to foreign films should view it once anyway- it\'s certainly not a long movie, and it won\'t loose its grip on anyone willing to give itself to the tale(s). For me, it\'s another to add to my top 50 of all time.', u'-0.15745', u'"Rashomon" was Akira Kurosawa\'s first national hit (becoming, at the time, the highest-grossing foreign film in America) and even gained an Oscar for Best Foreign Film, but almost sixty years later it still hasn\'t lost any of its impact. It is widely revered as one of the most influential films of all-time, but unlike some other movies, it is not a film that feels dated. The revolutionary methods of Kurosawa are still effective and on-par with the cinema of today -- this isn\'t a movie where you say, "Yeah, fifty years ago it might have been different, but now it\'s done in all the movies." Kurosawa\'s techniques are still superior to most of his imitators. Look at the 2003 John McTiernan film, "Basic," which copies a good portion of "Rashomon\'s" concept. Which is the better film? It\'s not a hard choice.\n\nThe film begins under a structure which reads "Rashomon" on its exterior, in a small Japanese village. It\'s raining outside and a woodcutter (Takashi Shumura) and a priest (Minoru Chiaki) inadvertently find themselves in the company of a wandering commoner (Kichijiro Ueda), and as he asks them what is the matter they both begin to relay the most horrific story they claim to know -- of a brutal murder a few days prior.\n\nKurosawa then switches to flashback and we see three different versions of the exact same event -- the slaying of an innocent man (the murderer played by Kurosawa film regular Toshir\xf4 Mifune) in the woods outside the village. Was it because of lust? Betrayal? Envy? Or insanity? We hear from the murderer, the wife of the victim, and a woman channeling the spirit of the dead man.\n\n"Rashomon" is brilliant. Some people have complained that the ending is a cop-out and sentimental hogwash, but I think Kurosawa was fond of sentimentality to a point (he uses a good deal of it in "Ikiru") but the difference between what he does with sentimentality as opposed to many filmmakers of today is that he uses to to ENRICH the story, not provide an easy solution to all the problems.\n\nIs there resolution in the finale of "Rashomon"? To a degree. But, like "Ikiru," it also leaves an open answer to its audience -- this film questions us, and our humanity, and it says something about the human condition and our weaknesses as a species. Yet it also proposes that along with the evil is an inherent good, and in my opinion the message of "Rashomon" is just as important and effective as its film-making techniques and acting.', u'0.0670889', u"This fabulous work was years and years ahead of its time when it was made in 1950, being a work of art that engages the eyes and the ears, but most essentially, the brain. The film is both aesthetically beautiful, using amazing camera techniques, extensive periods of silence and a very limited cast to deliver the action, and the story is typically Japanese...ostensibly amazingly simple, but complex to the point of sending you cross-eyed!\n\nThe basic tale is this: a woman and her husband, a Samurai, are travelling through a forest when they meet a bandit. The bandit has sex with the woman and the Samurai ends up dead. That's it. This tale is related to us through the woodcutter and a monk who saw the protagonists give their evidence to the police (the dead Samurai through a medium), but unfortunately the three tales conflict with one another. Each confessor says that they killed the Samurai, and then we hear from the woodcutter who in fact witnessed the event, who gives us a version of events that borrows from each individual account, and is still less credible!\n\nThe conclusion presented by Kurosawa seems to be firstly that individuals see things from different perspectives, but secondly, and most importantly, that there is no objective truth. There is no answer as to what took place in the forest, and Kurosawa offers us no way of knowing what went on. Each story is as credible as the other, and so no conclusion about guilt can be reached. We even have to think at the end that as the whole thing is reported to us by the woodcutter and priest, was there any truth in anything we heard at all?\n\nThis film leads to an especially tricky conclusion for a movie-goer! Your eyes are supposed to show you objective truth, but they don't. The camera is supposed not to lie, but it does. I feel that the simple message is that subjectivity lies at the heart of life, and this subjectivity needs to be recognised before any attempt is made to understand events.", u'-0.245704', u'To have a film that holds the coveted title of being the reason that the "Best Foreign Film" category was created for the Oscars is one thing, but to be able to back up that myth with a powerful film that speaks both about humanity and the strength of truth is a whole new angle. Often we witness powerful foreign films that slip through the lines of cinema, regarded by so many as valuable assets to the film community, but never see the gold of Oscar. In the same sense, sometimes the most popular of those foreign films eventually become Oscar contenders, not because they are worthy enough, but because studios had the funds to allow bigger distribution to audiences, thus allowing popularity to do the rest. Rash\xf4mon is one of those few films that succeed in giving us both a quality film and the accolades to represent it. Rash\xf4mon is a rare breed of film. The Japanese filmmaker Akira Kurosawa took many bold steps with this film (pointing his camera at the sun, filming deep within the jungle, and the mockery of truth), that it is unlikely that you could go to a modern day Hollywood film without seeing one of these techniques being "borrowed". His bold storytelling, creative camera work, and powerful characters give us a unique story that should be included in everyone\'s film library.\n\nWhile the characters were strong, the direction was flawless, and the story was compelling, there is a theme that needs to be discussed while talking about Rash\xf4mon. This is the story of murder, betrayal, and rape and in any typical "courthouse" film you would have some spineless witness finally break down and confess the truth. At the end of these films the truth is discovered, but not in Rash\xf4mon. Kurosawa gives us the "black sheep" of themes by never really giving us what we really wanted from the beginning of this story. As I began this film, I thought I was going to get a clear-cut story with honesty and troubled souls, but instead I was handed no prize at the end. What I sought after the most is not handed to me in a Happy Meal container at the end, but instead trapped still within the film. Kurosawa gives us the meaning behind the story, that there possibly is no way of knowing the true "truth". Four different souls, seeing the same event all culminating to four different results means that the "truth" may never be known. Kurosawa has taken the story and provided us with the main character being truth, and like Kaiser Soze, the greatest trick it ever pulled was convincing us that "it didn\'t exist". Deep within Rash\xf4mon the truth is hidden, and it may never emerge, but that is what Kurosawa intended. A viewer could walk away from this film, after several viewings, and discover different truths about the characters and story. This is a constantly evolving film that will continually get better with time.\n\nOutside of these beautiful themes, Rash\xf4mon is a flawless film. From the execution of the actors to the simplicity of the direction, there is plenty in this film to keep your mind busy and your jaw nearly dragging on the floor. To begin, the performance by Toshiro Mifune ranks among the best in film history. In each of the stories he is portrayed differently (even in his own) and with precise execution he delivers every time. He is insane, passionate, loyal, and villainous all at the same time. While some may see his acting as eccentric or over-the-top, I found each of his portrayals as accurate and astute. When Mifune is on the screen his presence commands your eyes and you cannot help but become involved. Second to his performance is that of the troubled wife. While her characters is the most confusing/suspicious of them all, Masayuki Mori keeps us intertwined with the story by controlling her character with the greatest of ease. When it is time for her to be unleashed, the true drama of the story is thrown in your face with brilliance and expertise.\n\nOverall, I thought that this was a near perfect film. Kurosawa is intense, original, and adeptly secure about his stories. I have seen the same passion in Ran, and it cannot be denied. My only concern with this film is that if you are going to watch this movie, make sure that you can devote your entire mind to it. I found myself watching it three times because I could not stay focused (outside factors) enough to see those darkly hidden themes. I especially enjoyed the unearthed darkness of humanity, which is hinted on at the end. The fact that after hearing these stories of murder and rape, it doesn\'t stop one from continuing along a similar path. It is a powerful tale that should be enjoyed by all! \n\nGrade: **** out of *****', u'0.370553', u'"Rashomon" tells a very simple tale in a very complicated manner, presenting four \'versions\' of the truth, each from a party either witness to or involved in the incident depicted. It is not the film\'s intent to have you piece together a puzzle since that would be impossible based on how drastically the four tales differ. We know that lies don\'t enter the equation since the participating persons all claim to be guilty. "Rashomon" is not about choosing a version of the incident you believe is true; it is about human perspective and how it shapes what we see. Even if we truly believe what we have seen is true, is it really? \n\nThe film opens when a priest and woodcutter are encountered by a man who engages in a conversation about crime with them and subsequently learns that a samurai has been killed in the woods and his wife raped by a bandit. These two details are the basic, practically undisputed facts which make up the foundation of the four versions of the story we hear: the bandit\'s, the woman\'s, her husband\'s (through a medium), and the woodcutter\'s (the only presumably objective account, which still does not make sense in relation to the others). In many ways the best thing about "Rashomon" is that it never reveals what actually happens (or if any of the four accounts is in fact true), and although we are not meant to solve the mystery (the idea here is that there is no objective truth since humans are too selfish and dishonest to view anything without bias) the story structure is still brilliant and adds a lot of ambiance to the film. The narrative flow is strong and the method seems fresh and inventive today despite countless imitations (including one inexplicably popular one- "The Usual Suspects").\n\n"Rashomon" is very much a visual film. It would be reduced to unimportant and insignificant fare without the cinematography, which captures the mood and feel of the jungle perfectly, as does the score. The film achieves an epic feel very rare for films filmed in fullscreen, especially during the battle between the bandit and the samurai during the last telling of the story. Kurosawa was also wise enough to choose a location for the film that would accurately capture the eerie, slightly disturbing mood of the story. Just picture the events taking place anywhere other than a jungle.\n\n"Rashomon" is not without its (minor) flaws, however. While theatrical acting (Kurosawa was fascinated with silent film) worked perfectly with films like "Seven Samurai" and "Throne of Blood", it does nothing but take away from the realism of this oft claustrophobic human drama. Yes, Mifune (Tajomaru, the bandit) does provide an interesting spin on his character for each telling, and Takashi Shumura (the woodcutter) seems as honest and real as any character could possibly be, but nearly all of that effect is lost every time Machiko Kyo appears on screen. It is hard to take her seriously and during moments when I should have been close to tears I was much closer to laughter. I\'m not sure how much blame I would place on her as Kurosawa probably asked her to act exactly as she does. While discussing actors I have to (unconventionally) note Fumiko Honma as the medium, who brings a wonderfully eerie air to the film during its greatest scenes.\n\nI don\'t think "Rashomon" is Kurosawa\'s best or most important film, but it is still a masterful piece of cinema which is absolutely essential for any film lover. It\'s extraordinary how much Kurosawa accomplished at such an early stage in his career and without the benefit of the lavish budgets he was allotted for later projects. The film\'s main question is also still relevant and confusing today: is what we think we see really the truth, and to what extent does subjectivity affect perception? \n\n4.5/5', u'0.291322', u'\nThe more I watch and re-watch Kurosawa\'s films, the more I am sure that he will be remembered as the greatest director of the 20th century. Although I prefer "Ran" and "The Seven Samurai" for reasons of personal taste, I don\'t think I would argue very much with anyone who proposed that "Rashomon" was his best film. Made in 1950, it is so unusual and so far ahead of it\'s time that it takes your breath away.\n\nThe story itself deserves a mention: A husband & wife travelling through woods are attacked by a thief, who ties up the husband and rapes the wife. This is as much of the story as we can be sure of. The husband ends up dead of a stab wound. How did he die? Who was responsible? Each of the three give their accounts before a court (the dead husband through a medium!), and each account is entirely different. A woodcutter who witnessed the events gives a fourth, entirely different, account.\n\nEach flashback is an absolute gem in itself, and lives long in the mind. Toshiro Mifune as the thief exudes more raw masculinity and charisma that I think I have ever seen in ANY movie, and creates a totally believeable character. Machiko Kyo as the wife is superb in what are essentially four different roles, her own version being the highlight. The husband\'s character is the least well developed, but since he spends a lot of the time either tied up or dead, that\'s not really surprising.\n\nBecause the viewer knows that each flashback is highly personal to the teller, a vast amount of brainpower and concentration are required if you are going to try to work out what actually DID happen. Alternatively, watch the film twice back-to-back, once for the visuals and acting, and once for the detective work and philosophical implications.\n\nMy favourite shot in the movie is one which starts with the husband and wife kneeling, facing each other, a view of the wife over the shoulder of the husband; the camera then moves round to the side and simultaneously zooms in on the wife\'s profile; then pulls back behind the wife, ending with a view of the husband\'s face over the shoulder of the wife - a mirror image of the initial shot in the sequence. Absolutely awesome! And dating from 1950! Unbelievable!\n\nI normally try to keep my reviews a LOT shorter than this, but I make no apologies in this case. Indeed, there are lots of other points I would like to make (I haven\'t even mentioned the central importance of the dagger, or the relevance of the Rashomon gate itself). I could go on and on and on... however, a better use of your time would be to seek out and watch this film...NOW!\n', u'0.18403', u"As oppose to its commonplace plot, Rashomon as a concept is extraordinarily idiosyncratic and perhaps it is this striking attribute that makes it an undisputed masterpiece, howsoever improbable. It vividly limns the artistry of contrivance innate in the human psyche owing to the importunate desire of humans to placate their insatiable egos. This manipulation of facts has no limits and entirely depends upon the skill of imaginative improvisation of the individual along with his level of comfort at skullduggery. The ability to misinterpret comes naturally to the humans as a desperate ploy to counter the adversities of life and that's what makes it indispensable. As a direct consequence of contrivance, the concept of truth no longer remains universal but becomes rather subjective and a matter of individualistic perception. \n\nRashomon pioneered Kurosawa's dream tryst with perpetual brilliance and undoubtedly played a pivotal part in making his name a mark of excellence in the world of cinema. Rashomon is a well knitted tale about a supercilious samurai, his whimsical wife and a boorish bandit. The bandit inveigles the samurai into imprisonment and has his way with samurai's wife. The dead body of the samurai is later discovered under mysterious circumstances by a woodcutter. The bandit is captured and arraigned along with the deranged widow of the samurai. Their narrated versions seem such contrasting that a psychic is called upon to conjure up the dead samurai's spirit to record his testimony in order to corroborate the facts that seemed excessively manipulated. The samurai's version yet again differs considerably from the testimonies of the other two. Each version though different seemed to satiate the respective ego of the testifier. The woodcutter, who didn't want to get involved personally, later confesses to a priest to have actually witnessed the incident and comes up with a version of his own which falsifies the other three. The movie is ingenious as its actual motive has nothing to do with the revelation of truth as verity is merely a matter of lame perception, but rather is to highlight the discrepancies among the different versions as a medium to depict the irrational complexities associated with the human psyche. \n\nThe concept of Rashomon though well ahead of its time, sowed the seeds for creative innovation in the world of cinema and has served as the undisputed benchmark of innovative excellence for well over five decades. A quintessential Kurosawa classic, strongly recommended to the masses for its sheer brilliance and enigmatic charm. 10/10", u'0.49644', u'"Rashomon", Akira Kurosawa\'s 1950 film about a horrible crime and the various versions of the "truth" that come to fruition during the investigation is absolutely amazing, pure and simple. The story is told four different times, each time from the point of view of one of the participants. The basic story of the crime is that a bandit (Mifune) comes across a husband and wife traveling through the forest. The bandit, Tajomaru, seduces/assaults the Masako (Kyo) after tying up her husband Takehiro (Mori), and soon after, Takehiro is dead. What happens between the times Tajomaru encounters the couple and the discovery of Takehiro\'s body is what is left to be discovered. Masako, Tajomaru and even Takehiro (with the assistance of a medium) each tell their account of the story, each taking blame for Takehiro\'s death. The fourth telling is from a passer-by, and the audience is left to decide which is the true account.\n\nI absolutely loved this film. I had heard that Yimou Zhang\'s "Hero" had, if not as an homage, employed the same technique of storytelling and perspective, but seeing this great film was a real treat. The story is original and rich, and Kurosawa always is able to pull great performances from his actors. I found "Rashomon" to be extremely compelling from start to finish, and even managed to be really creeped out at one point. (The psychic medium is pure, unadulterated nightmare fuel) From the very little that I know of Japanese cinema of the 1950\'s & 1960\'s, I realize that Kurosawa was not the only director, but he certainly was the trailblazer and set the bar for the genre for decades to come. His peers were putting out material, it was just fairly primitive. (It is easy to forget that not every country\'s film industry was as opulent as America\'s) To see this kind of film, a film that is actually incredibly simple, but so ingeniously conceived of and executed makes me remember why I have been and always will be both a student of and lover of film. 8/10 --Shelly', u'0.260186', u"\nRashomon by Akira is probably one of his very best, from his storytelling to the visuals, the picture is amazing.\n\nThe film is about about the truth, and burying it because no one can handle it. People prefer to live a lie than admit the truth, very reminiscent of today's world. The characters are talking to us, we are the jury.\n\nThe performances are amazing, nothing acting is so good, blows away today's competition.\n\nThe film score is stunning as well, one of my favourites from a Japanese film.\n\nThe direction is breathtaking, the jungle is beautifully lit, it has a sense of horror to it. Black and white was the perfect choice.\n\nOverall, an amazing film from a genius!", u'0.761716', u"These are the opening words of Rash\xf4mon, and in a way that's also a summary of the entire film. It is the story of four testimonies of the same event that couldn't differ more. It is told by a priest and a woodcutter to a commoner, as they seek shelter from the rain under the Rashomon gate. The priest and the woodcutter were witnesses in a trial, and what they heard there made them puzzled, and after they told everything, the viewer is just as puzzled as these two. \n\nWhat happened? Takehiro, a samurai has been murdered and Masako, his wife has been raped, the suspect is Taj\xf4maru. And indeed, in court he confesses to have raped the woman and to have killed the samurai in duel. Masako however tells quite a different story: After Taj\xf4maru took advantage of her, he left and despair and pity made her kill her husband, but to commit suicide, just as she originally planned, she's to weak. Then the murdered samurai speaks, through the voice of a medium. In his story, he committed suicide because of disgust at his wife, who asked Tajomaru to kill him in order to accompany the robber. At the end, we hear even another story from the woodcutter, who was, as he reveals, an eyewitnesses. In his version, Taj\xf4maru killed the samurai in a duel (or rather: in a brawl) that was demanded by his wife. \n\nNow what did really happen? Why did at least three of these four people lie? The reason cannot be (as the commoner says at one point) that everyone told what was useful for him, since, except for the woodcutter, everyone told a story in which he was the killer. So do they all think their story is true? Do they all feel guilty for a reason or another? These questions will cause endless discussions once you watch this film. \n\nAnd the end, Kurosawa raises another question: If man keeps lying (to others as well as to himself), does that mean he is evil? This question is underlined by the crying baby the three men find in the Rash\xf4mon gate. Kurosawa's answer to this question is clearly a no: the woodcutter takes the baby to raise him and the priest realizes that he is a good man, even although he's a lier and a thief. \n\nBut if Kurosawa had only raised these questions, Rash\xf4mon wouldn't have become such a classic as it is considered today. He is telling his story with breathtaking images, as when he's holding his camera directly into the sun, when he uses the wood, light and shadow to create a dense atmosphere, or when he shows the trial scenes, where he makes the witnesses talk to the viewers to make them feel like the judges. The fight scenes are all terrifically shot, and the scene before Masako kills Takehiro can move you to tears. Rash\xf4mon also has some good acting, especially the breathtaking Toshir\xf4 Mifune in one of film history's most unforgettable performances as the wild robber Taj\xf4maru, always jumping around and seemingly untamable and unafraid. All this makes Rash\xf4mon a mind-boggling experience, that had me talk all night through with friends of mine, and still stirs me whenever i watch it.", u'-0.218472', u'\nIt\'s hard to tell just how striking "Rash\xf4mon" might have seemed to those who watched it in 1950, rather than seeing it after so many subsequent movies and other works have made use of its techniques and ideas. But it\'s clear that it is a technical and creative success. The story itself is not particularly satisfying, which was most likely by design, and the movie is carried by its structure and by the concept of the markedly different perspectives on the same series of events. The cast also deserve their share of credit for how well it works, and the photography is excellent, as it is in almost all of Kurosawa\'s films.\n\nKurosawa\'s expertise makes the interwoven sequences of past and present - essentially telling two different stories - not only work flawlessly, but fit together thematically. It\'s even more commendable when compared to some of the subsequent films that have tried to use similar ideas, only to come off as pretentious rather than creative or innovative. Kurosawa was also working with much less in terms of possible precedents.\n\nIn one sense, the choice of specific story material could seem a little odd.\n\nThe downbeat, rather sordid scenario makes the movie somewhat less enjoyable than several of Kurosawa\'s other pictures (which is, admittedly, a pretty high standard), and as a result "Rash\xf4mon" is more a film to respect and admire than one to enjoy and take pleasure from. Still, it does have significantly more substance to it than do most of the more recent pictures that have been deliberately downbeat or negative in their portrayals of humanity. Such stories are more trendy at present, and they often receive undue praise simply for so being.\n\nAt the same time, the lack of sympathetic characters and the paucity of hopeful developments bring out all the more its success in developing its ideas about narrative and about reality, ideas that are more fundamental and, in their way, perhaps at least as important as any specific story or events.\n', u'0.199767', u'\nKurosawa tells a story four times through different characters. The characters tell the story different four times. In flash-backs, all as the characters tell them, we see the stories. Are they lying, are they all telling their own truth or is there someone who tells THE truth? The way this is handled by Kurosawa is absolutely masterful.\n\nOf course, his direction is great. Together with cinematographer Kazuo Miyagawa they do a tremendous job with the atmosphere in the woods. With perfect light angles it looks beautiful.\n\nA real Japanese classic.', u'0.561353', u"Based on the stories, 'Roshomon' and 'In a Grove' by Ryunosuke Akutagawa, this is a masterpiece by the legendary Akira Kurosawa.\n\nHighly regarded for its philosophical undertones and its exploration of the unfathomable human psyche, 'Roshomon' is a brilliantly spun riddle. It is about the four people, who give four different versions of the testimonies at the court, on the recently occurred crime.\n\nThe story is set in ancient Japan, where three passers-by seek shelter from intense rain in the ruined temple called Roshomon. Two of the witnesses, a dumbfounded woodcutter (Takashi Shimura) and a priest (Minoru Chiaki), are narrating the crime trial to the commoner. More than the crime, they are astonished to witness the testimonies of three people, connected with the crime, which shatters their faith in humanity.\n\nA man (Masayuki Mori) has been murdered, and his wife (Machiko Kyo) was allegedly raped, while they were traveling in the woods. A notorious bandit (Toshiro Mifune) has been arrested, regarding this despicable act. As the trial starts, the fabricated lies resurface over truth. According to the bandit, he and the man waged a war after the rape, resulting in the man's death.\n\nBut the woman's version is that she was rejected by her husband, after being raped. So, with uncontrollable grief, she killed him. However, the dead man testifies, through the medium, that the bandit insisted to marry the woman after the rape, but the woman demanded the bandit should kill her husband first. The angry bandit left the place and the guilty-conscious man committed suicide. According to the woodcutter, the woman had manipulated the two men, who were finally pushed to gruesome fight that lead to the man's death.\n\nAll these testimonies are believably told to the viewers, making them the judges of this baffling trial\x85 At Oscars, the board of governors voted 'Roshomon' as the most outstanding foreign language film released in the US in 1951. This was an enormously challenging task for the artistes\x97 who had to enact in 3 different ways for the same story\x96 and they excel. Toshiro Mifune attained worldwide fame for enacting the clumsy bandit's role with insurmountable passion.\n\n'Roshomon' is not about analyzing the chronological facts or its relevance. It focuses on, how perspective distorts reality and makes the absolute truth unknowable. Eventually, this movie has been touted as the classic case study for the film students, connoisseurs and movie critics, all over the world.\n\nThis simple-looking tale, with its complex web of deceptive elements, remains as the finest cinematic riddle unsolved!", u'-0.121181', u"\nSpoilers herein.\n\nSuperficially about truth, this is more fundamentally about the nature of nested and floating narrative. \n\nKurosawa is one of three men who invented film, and this is his most influential one. Much is made of the construction of the story, which you can read elsewhere. I'd like to focus here on what I think is the rarest of Kurosawa'a abilities: the way he changes the eye of the camera -- and the composition of the world it creates for us -- for each of the narratives.\n\nSome are impressionistic; some flat and full of contrast; some deep. Some are composed around people, some around the environment with people in it, some around fleeting motion. Sometimes the words are the organizing principle, sometimes images.\n\nI know other directors who can do this once within a film: to twist the consciousness of the viewing eye to match the perspective of the narration, even some capable of a dual view within and without. But I know of no one else capable of doing so multiply within the same film and with such obvious link to the story.\n\nThe DVD is astonishingly clear. It has an introduction by Altman which says nothing interesting; but watch his hands. The DVD has a commentary which is horrid -- just the sort of talky vapidity about apparent insight the film criticizes! ", u'0.0169423'], u'tt0910970': [u'WALL-E, Pixar\'s latest film, is about a robot named WALL-E (or \'Waste Allocation Load Lifter, Earth-Class\'), who is the only thing left on earth with some sort of emotion. He meets another robot named EVE, and the trip begins.\n\nIt\'s hard to describe in words how incredible I personally find this film.\n\nThe animation is flawless. Absolutely flawless. Especially on earth and the robots. It looks real. Much of the time it\'s impossible to tell whether or not it is real. The few slightly-shaky styled shots that appear a few times in the film only makes the animation that much more amazing and realistic. The humans are really good, too, while not realistic in the sense of you seeing it right now in real life, but they do have a realistic feel to them. The thing with the humans, I believe, is that they were purposefully meant to have this slightly rounded, slightly unrealistic feeling. \n\nI believe the reason is to take a satirical look at humans, and what our goals for a future, perfect utopia, is. It questions what we want, and shows you what is a very, very likely outcome of our desires for a \'better\' world, showing both positive and negative effects. The animation for the humans, I believe, was made rounded and slightly more cartoonish to emphasize that that is how we will become. Fat, lazy, yet so perfect. At times, especially with that perspective on the humans, they actually do look very real.\n\nThe story is brilliant. There are many little things in the film that have so much meaning to them. There are things that will be nostalgic to older viewers, and things that younger viewers will love to look at. However, it does steer for the cheesy, clich\xe9 aspects of a child\'s film, yet still remaining a completely G-rated film.\n\nI don\'t call this a child\'s film at all. Not because it has adult material, because it doesn\'t. I say this because the film is perfect for everyone. Literally, everyone. There are things in it every person can enjoy, no matter who they are. It has obvious homages to Stanley Kubrick\'s "2001: A Space Odyssey", and any adult who remembers seeing that film will notice this.\n\nWALL-E is such a lovable character. I\'ve never felt so much emotion for one character. He will definitely go down in history as iconic as Darth Vader, or Indiana Jones. I was so close to crying at pivotal parts in the film, and although I didn\'t fully break out and cry, I have never felt so much emotion in my heart with any other film as I did with this one.\n\nEVE is very fun and interesting. One scene in particular, with her, was so beautiful, that my eyes got teary. Her chemistry with WALL-E is so oddly perfect. They are so different in appearance and personality, yet they work so well together.\n\nThe other robots are all lovable, except for the "enemy" robots, who still add much depth to the film. In particular, M-O was the cutest, obviously not counting WALL-E.\n\nPixar has always made great animation films. But this, without a doubt, tops all of their own films, and most other films. It restores faith in the animation films. It captures the magic and wonder as past Disney films, which is something I have not seen in most modern animation films.\n\nI would not be surprised at all if this won for best picture of the year. It deserves it more than anything.\n\nThis is one of greatest achievements in cinematic history, and I encourage everyone to see this.\n\n10/10', u'0.328598', u'Who says popular films are not and cannot be art? If anything is proof that popular films can be of a stunningly high quality, the beauty of the animation, writing, music, and sound design in "WALL\xb7E" is it. "WALL\xb7E" eclipses even Andrew Stanton\'s "Toy Story" and "Toy Story 2" in the Pixar pantheon, is perhaps Pixar\'s best film to date and, call me crazy as I\'ve just seen it, a contender for the title of best animated film, period.\n\n"WALL\xb7E" is everything we\'ve come to expect from Pixar and more- colorful, vibrant, imaginative, exciting, involving, beautiful, and most importantly a film with interesting, involving characters. Sure, WALL\xb7E is adorable, and as much credit as the animators get for that, this film would be nothing without Stanton\'s screenplay, which features very little dialogue but is still notably intelligent and surprisingly subtle, making a refreshing change from the \'go green\' campaigns we\'re all so used to. Does "WALL\xb7E" have a message? Sure, but it\'s an important message and it is delivered subtly and beautifully.\n\n"WALL\xb7E" operates on two levels (and works spectacularly well on both). It is a majestic science fiction epic like we haven\'t seen in a couple of decades and it is a genuinely touching and never cheap romance. "WALL\xb7E" will never get points for originality but it doesn\'t exactly need them because the homages to great films and figures of the past- Chaplin, Keaton, Tati, the Marx Brothers, "2001: A Space Odyssey" (this one is particularly spectacular), "Close Encounters of the Third Kind" are actually homages and not ripoffs. "WALL\xb7E" is a wonderful tribute to a bygone cinematic tradition (well, two or three of them actually). \n\nThe social commentary in "WALL\xb7E" is sobering because it\'s never overbearing and most importantly because we see the world through machines, machines who feel more about Earth and life than the humans do. The depiction of humans on the ship could have been incredibly offensive, cheap, and tasteless in concept but the execution here is absolutely perfect.\n\nWhat is most surprising about "WALL\xb7E" is how sad it is. Not even in the \'how will they get out of this, oh I feel so sorry for them\' way "Finding Nemo", a previous Stanton effort, is, but in a truly melancholy sense. The early portion of the film maintains all the playfulness of a Jacques Tati film but also evokes a striking and powerful feeling of loneliness. It\'s a brilliant introduction to WALL\xb7E, given that the rest of the film is too wacky to bother with long scenes focused entirely on character, and works beautifully with the ugly yet beautifully-rendered future Earth, a barren wasteland filled with nothing but garbage, a seriously resilient cockroach being WALL\xb7E\'s only companion before EVE shows up, but I won\'t go into the story- it\'s best you see it unfold for yourself.\n\nFrom the entertaining shorts shown before the film to the memorable characters, locations, and animation we have come to expect, Pixar films are now event cinema, and they have outdone themselves with "WALL\xb7E". This film is spectacular, majestic, touching, involving, and achingly beautiful. Most importantly, however, it is perfect entertainment. I may be saying this too soon, but I don\'t think I have ever seen an animated film that has satisfied me more than "WALL\xb7E", and 2008 is going to have to work hard to keep this from being the top film of the year, which it most certainly is at the moment.\n\n9.5/10', u'0.719428', u'I just returned from an advanced benefit screening of WALL*E, and I want to be careful not to spill too much regarding the movie. I had the added privilege of watching the film at Pixar, which in and of itself, was amazing.\n\nThis picture is not a cartoon; it is a film. In fact, it even has the LOOK of film. One of my complaints of more recent 3-D/CG animated films (not from Pixar) is that they all seem to look the same... clean lines, crisp colors, and very "virtual", for lack of a better term. WALL*E transcends the typical look of CG animation, and has a true to life "grit." The creators at Pixar are true artists, and are indeed masters of their craft. Not only are they masters of the technology, they are masters of telling a story. WALL*E is no exception.\n\nThe best way to describe the film is as a science fiction, comedy, dramatic love story. WALL*E, as a character, has dimension, personality, and heart... pretty impressive given that he is essentially a trash compactor. It is true that there is little dialogue in this feature, but I personally did not feel it detracted from the story at all.\n\nWALL*E is very much a different Pixar film from it\'s previous features. I will be curious to see how it is received by others, but in my opinion, I think Pixar has stayed true to itself, demonstrating a commitment to telling great stories and pushing the edge of technology to leave your jaw dropping! My most sincere compliments to Andrew Stanton, Jim Morris, John Lasseter, Ben Burtt, and all the creative forces at Pixar. Can\'t wait to see what the future brings...', u'0.471803', u"We went to the San Francisco Film Institute's first public screening at their campus in Emeryville. Everyone's sworn to secrecy, but for a film with little dialog, it carries more of an emotional punch and has a richer story than any live-action movie this year. The tone and style of the film is completely different for Pixar, and Disney haven't tried to override the darker thematic elements at all, making the story surprisingly three-dimensional.\n\nThis will end up being the animated film of the year and I had the same 'wow' feeling as after seeing Ratatouille. Considering that animated films have always played second-fiddle to live-action, and have been aimed at kids, it's ironic that once again Pixar produces a film that rivals any live action on every level. Bravo!", u'0.633186', u"I can't say enough about how good this movie, that you probably haven't read, so I'm going to keep this short.\n\nThis is the best thing out there in theater's right now, and might just be the best animated film of all time, whether you believe that or not, is your own opinion, but what Pixar has done here, can put companies like Dreamworks, Sony, and Blue sky to shame.\n\nWall E also may go down as the most lovable character ever to grace the movie screen, I praise Ben Burtt and Andrew Stanton, and the people at Pixar for what they did, and will continue to do.\n\nThis is why Pixar is the top studio in the world.\n\n10/10", u'0.00961398', u'Wall-E is the movie experience I\'ve been looking for. I haven\'t seen a new film this richly entertaining, thrilling, touching and satisfying since Spider-Man 2. It is truly the finest Pixar or animated CGI film to date. I can discuss it without spoilers easily because it\'s one of those films, like 2001: A Space Odyssey, that exists more as a pure experience of the heart and the senses than as a collection of events that we\'re supposed to keep track of intellectually. Wall-E rises above that kind of unnecessary complication into the same kind of space occupied by dreams and the imagination.\n\nThis film is beautifully animated, of course, to that magical Pixar point where even piles of what should be disgusting trash somehow look breathtakingly gorgeous and even fairly realistic-looking roaches look cute. But much more importantly, the heart, the emotion in this movie is unlike anything I\'ve experienced at the cinema since Forrest Gump. Certainly my tear ducts have not welled up while watching a movie this much since then. I fell in like with the character of Wall-E when I saw the trailer. Watching the movie, I fell in love with him within about 2 minutes. Shortly after that, I fell in love with the idea of Wall-E falling in love.\n\nMy previous favorite movie romance is Superman and Lois Lane in the original Superman films. The love story, or the love experience of Wall-E and Eve is perhaps the first I\'ve seen since then that operates at and succeeds on that same level. These couples create an uncomplicated, innocent, simple, yet deep and powerful bond. They capture the experience of love at first sight, writ large. They possess an instant chemistry that tells you they belong together from the first time they see one another and makes you root for their relationship throughout the film. Wall-E and Eve share moments together of real cinematic beauty, true hilarity, frightening sadness, frustrating difficulty and delightful satisfaction. It\'s a testament to the level of genius at which the Pixar storytellers are operating that we feel every beat of this relationship resonate every step of the way despite the fact that the characters are robots that are not modeled off of humans and speak no more than a handful of words throughout the movie (this animated movie is refreshingly free of obvious "guest star" voices or any over-the-top stand-up comedians trying to upstage the movie).\n\nJust like in the first Superman films, once you care about the characters as individuals and care about their relationship, it\'s almost impossible for the rest of the movie not to work. You\'re hooked at hello. Wall-E adds all the expected complications to keep the would-be lovers from getting together most of the time. There is a truly great "McGuffin" that keeps the heroes and villains busy for quite a while (the item in question is something outwardly simple that ends up holding the key to something more important than anything in the world). The pacing during most of these adventures is as breakneck as anything out of the Star Wars films and the action is always staged with crystal clarity. There are several scenes of peril for Wall-E that are reminiscent of that oddly powerful sequence in Short Circuit 2 when Johnny 5 is almost killed. The filmmakers pull absolutely no punches when it comes to running your heart through the ringer over characters you care about. It probably helps that you can do a lot more physical damage to a robot character than you can to a human character while keeping a G rating and still getting the audience dramatically worried about their survival.\n\nEven on top of the action, the emotion, the visuals and the humor, Wall-E goes the extra mile into thought-provoking thematic territory. The film never hits you over the head with anything preachy and doesn\'t really even outright tell you what its opinions on the subjects it raises are. It also doesn\'t explicitly lay out explanations for everything that exists in Wall-E\'s world (there are no "talking killer" scenes and very little verbal exposition). I think the bits of ambiguity work here because they add to the sense of mystery, helplessness and alienation that most of the characters in the movie feel to some degree.\n\nThere are human characters in this movie too, quite a few. I think that\'s necessary because if humans aren\'t shown in a robot world, you have to wonder what purpose were the robots designed to serve? That was a curiosity of the earlier CGI movie, Robots. Most of the humans in Wall-E aren\'t as developed as the robots, but I think that\'s because they exist more to represent the whole of humanity rather than particular individuals. We\'re asked to ponder the consequences of the choices they make as though the whole society was moving in that direction, not just one person. Wall-E and Eve are the heart of this movie but the humans are used to add some intellectual gravity for the audience to chew on.\n\nOther choices made in the movie might also leave room for debate, such as the integration of some live-action footage into the film. But because the movie as a whole is so audaciously stimulating and brilliantly satisfying, it\'s a plus that they left us with a few unresolved or unusual things to think about and question after getting off of the great emotional and visual roller-coaster experience. Wall-E truly serves up everything that I think an audience could want in a movie experience. It will be very easy for me to watch this one over and over again. It is a modern-day classic that I believe should earn a place in cinema history as the "2001" of CGI animated films, both of them movies of indisputable brilliance, unyielding imagination and unending entertainment.\n\nFootnote: The pre-movie short is an awesome, violent Looney Tunes/Roger Rabbit-esquire toon. It wants only to entertain and does.', u'0.353347', u'I just saw the screener in the theater and was amazed. I am the kind of person that has never liked science fiction movies. I have tried all the famous movies in this genre, like Star Wars, The Matrix and A Space Odyssey and hated all of them. Next to me in the theater were a couple of Sci-fi-lovers and they loved Wall-E beyond belief. I did too, however. Wall-E is: A) A great story B) Packed with fun and humor C) Built up with memorable characters D) Fun for all ages E) Revolutionary in animation techniques \n\nThe world Pixar creates is so credible, you forget it is animation. Thumbs up for Wall-E as well, he is such a cute and adorable character, you will fall in love with him immediately. I loved EVE as well.', u'0.473182', u'I\'m starting to wonder if there is bad Disney/Pixar film, I mean, normally when we think of the combo, it does equal gold, we automatically know that everyone is going to love this movie, it\'s just a matter of comparison to the other animation films. I\'m not just saying this because I had a good time when I was watching this, I\'m very serious, this is my favorite Disney/Pixar film. It\'s completely worth the ticket price, this couldn\'t have been a more perfect film. Everything about WALL\xb7E is just beyond great: the characters, the story, and the incredible animation. But the thing that I loved about WALL\xb7E is it\'s message, I know that it does go a little over board with the "jog or get fat", "throw your garbage away", and the "we\'ve become too dependent on machines" message, but I felt this was the most charming way to present it to the children who have to grow up in a world where they\'re going to have to worry about global warming, this may open their eyes a little.\n\nWALL\xb7E is a robot that is left all alone on Planet Earth, Earth is now covered with garbage. The humans have left onto a corporate ship and are living their lives care free and well, thought free. WALL\xb7E has been collecting little human pieces here and there and making them into his treasures, but the one thing he really wants is a friend. One day a ship lands with a female robot, Eve, who WALL\xb7E just adores, but Eve is on a mission to find a plant to bring back onto the human ship to show that Earth is safe. But when the ship grabs Eve, WALL\xb7E follows her and discovers the mutiny that is afoot on the ship. Everyone is overweight, can\'t walk, can\'t think for themselves, and let\'s all the robots do all the work for them. But WALL\xb7E and Eve are on the mission to get them back to Earth and give it a little love.\n\nWALL\xb7E is seriously the best movie I have seen this summer, I just adored this movie, it has great laughs, cute jokes and is entertaining for the whole family. Like I said before, when it\'s Disney/Pixar you just can\'t go wrong. WALL\xb7E is one of their most lovable characters ever and was like the robot version of Charlie Chaplin, he brought great slap stick to the story. This movie delivers everything you can imagine and much more, not to mention a great message. I highly recommend this movie for everyone, it\'s just a very wonderful movie that anyone can enjoy. The animation, I can\'t believe how far we\'ve come, but this was a beautifully made movie and couldn\'t have been better. I loved WALL\xb7E, this is a movie that will bring you plenty of laughs for your summer.\n\n10/10', u'0.362887', u"Not only it's Pixar's best film of all-time but it's the best movie of this year and one of the greatest imaginative, visually, moving & excellent animated films in years and surprisingly, one of the best sci-fi movies since E.T.!! Coming with high expectations, it definitely succeeded mines. It's so beautiful, moving, hilarious & sad at the same time. And for those who has been anticipating Thomas Newman's score for WALL-E, it's certainly one of his best right behind Finding Nemo in which I thought was his best score to date! Like I said it's Pixar best film so far, WALL-E knocked off Ratatouille of the top spot in which I thought it was their best film to date and officially, WALL-E is the best Pixar film i've ever seen with Ratatouille right behind and Finding Nemo, third. Pixar fan or non-Pixar fan, you'll definitely enjoy this one. WALL-E will forever be remembered as one of the most lovable characters ever created on film!!!", u'0.895303', u'Just got back from a special sneak peek/advance screening of this movie, and I must say, Pixar continues to amaze. They just can\'t seem to make a bad move. Heck, they can\'t even make a mediocre movie. Now, I will admit, there have been a couple that I would classify as my "least favorite" of theirs, but even they were actually very, very good. This one, though...it just may take the cake. Ranks up there with the absolute best they have produced. Hysterical, emotional, meaningful -- this movie succeeds on every front! I am not going to get into spoilers or specific plot aspects, but I will say that I am almost definitely going to see this one again in the theater..and it will be worth every dime. Come Friday, be in line to see Wall-E. You don\'t want to miss it!', u'0.198411', u'This truly is one beautiful, touching animated sci-fi film....I cannot stress this enough. It\'s a unique cinema experience that you must enjoy firsthand.\n\nThe tale is set in the 22th century , Earth has become a lifeless wasteland full of garbage, that the human race evacuated nearly a millennium ago....Lifeless, that is with the two exceptions being the "artifical" life form "WALL-E" & his pet cockroach.\n\nWALL-E is a squat humble trash-compacting robot who while continuing to fulfill the duties he was programmed for ( even though it\'s pointless considering there are no more humans on the planet ) collects certain leftover nicknacks, novelty items and even old films that he can still play. He mentally stimulates himself and enjoys fragments of the culture that is now gone ( that of the human race ). Though, WALL-E has imprinted on his little cockroach & vice versa, the little robot longs for more companionship.\n\nHe receives it in the form of a beautiful, sleek, defensive "fembot fatale" "EVE "....In their own little forms of robotic communication ( repeating each other\'s names in various connotations depending on moods ; "WAAAALLL-E," "EEEEEEEE-VAH!" ) and WALL-E\'s Chaplin-esquire clumsiness that amuses EVE, the pair imprint on each other and enjoy each other\'s company.\n\nSadly, EVE has located a small plant and must return it to her mother ship and leave WALL-E forever...But WALLL-E hops aboard the ship in pursuit of his darling "EEEEEE-VAH".\n\nAnd yes this film has very little dialog, but guess what, IT DON\'T NEED NO STINKIN\' DIALIOUGUE!....The brilliance and beauty of the film is in the interactions and responses of the little robots : a great representation of what "artificial intelligence" really is and what it may actually be one day! \n\nAnd how ironic it is that in this film the organic HUMAN RACE has become soulless, mirthless, artless, jaded, self-centered cogs in a machine of blind consumerism, yet the mechanical artificial beings still respond to their surroundings like a toddler or pet : with curiosity, wonder, and delight in communication & learning.\n\nAnd yes there is plenty of comic relief ( albeit sans dialouge ) so no this movie is NOT BORING....It\'s beautiful, it even made me a little bit misty-eyed.\n\nSo yeah if you\'re an a fan of animated films, sci-fi films, and romance you should definitely check out this movie.\n\nObviously, it is going to win a very well-deserved Oscar for "Best Animated Film".', u'0.265709', u"Pixar has produced some of the best animation in the past decade with its computer-generated features (Toy Story, Monsters Inc., and Finding Nemo) that have been marked by strong story lines and vivid characters. The tradition continues in an impressive way with Wall-E. This deceptively simple tale is transformed by the emotional content told almost entirely through visuals. \n\nA polluted Earth has become uninhabitable for 700 years, and one of its only residents is Wall-E, a small robot whose solitary mission is to be a mobile, trash compactor. In his work, he also finds and collects trivial, odd artifacts of mankind's past such as a Rubik's cube. He comforts himself with an old video, Hello Dolly, and as he learns about humans and his yearning for love, it becomes his idyllic vision of happiness amid an insulated, dull existence. Along his travels, he comes across a unique find, a live plant! One day a spaceship lands and deposits a robot probe. Fascinated by this kindred machine, Wall-E follows and eventually befriends this unit known as Eve. Eve has a directive that will hopefully return humans to Earth if only it can sustain life, and Wall-E's plant figures immeasurably. Eve is returned to her mother ship with Wall-E frantically chasing after his newly found love. On a spaceship acting as a living city for its machine-dependent, overweight humans, little robots are not only the caregivers, but in control. Wall-E and Eve must figure a way to return the humans to earth and find happiness even if it means making the ultimate sacrifice.\n\nWall-E's innocence and childlike wonder (think E.T.), as exemplified by how he introduces himself to everyone he meets, could almost have sprung from Steven Spielberg's imagination. It's in the small details that enrich Wall-E as a character. He brings to mind an amalgam of past robots like Star Wars' R2-D2 and the little robots in Silent Running, and his fears and joys are expressed through body language and squeals. When he shuts down each night to sleep, he rocks himself as a child would. He is clumsy around Eve, and when he takes her to his makeshift home of robot parts and paraphernalia, he is like a little kid. Ironically, he is the catalyst to bring the humans back home. \n\nWriter and director, Andrew Stanton (Finding Nemo), takes a huge risk by basing the film's premise almost entirely on a song from Hello Dolly. I can't think of an animated film that relied so much on visual storytelling. Even Fantasia and Allegro Non Troppo were collections of musical sequences not narrative features. In a way, this film is almost too sophisticated in its display and execution for little kids but is just right for adults. Remarkably, this is a tale with nary a spoken word by the principals. One has to think of silent films to approach this achievement. The operative word here is pathos like the best of Charlie Chaplin's little tramp and, amazingly, this film earns its stripes by emoting body language, action, and sound effects. Yet most of the characters aren't even human! \n\nFred Willard has an amusing small role as the corporate president. Sigourney Weaver, as the ship's computer voice, is an inspired choice since, like Eve, she was a female hero (in the Alien movies) and had to deal with computer voices in those films. The animation is almost 3-D in its rich detail and simulated, fluid camera-work. The interior of the mother ship, the Axiom, is a futuristic view of a commercialized (think Blade Runner) city in space. \n\nYes, it is a thinly veiled message for all those 'save the earth' and 'think green' people, but that never detracts from the main theme of saving humanity amid a touching love story. There are moments when you think a scene could have played out a bit better, but that is minor. It is likely that Wall-E's reputation will grow over time as a shining example of stretching the art form by challenging and trusting its audience. Bravo to the folks at Pixar for taking a chance and for entertaining and moving us.", u'0.36074', u'Robots falling in love. There is a lot to like about the new Pixar film Wall-E. The animation goes without saying\x97better than anything out there. The glares, the environments, everything is rendered spectacularly, right down to the flame of a Zippo lighter. As for the story, leave it to these wizards for creating a tale that hits on a gut level, letting our simplest emotions come to the surface in order speak to our hearts and souls. With fewer words than Arnold Swartzenegger had to speak in Terminator 2, this movie relies on its visuals and on the movements and actions of the characters. It is appropriate that we are shown clips from older musicals to show humanity before Earth was abandoned. If we harken back to them for the joys of people, why not go to silent era style in order to portray communication between beings that cannot speak? Wall-E, his crush EVE, and all the other robots involved can say little than their name, however, we understand exactly what they mean throughout. The entire film speaks on a level that most people might have forgotten. In an age of Hollywood spoon-feeding the masses by having actors preach the obvious, Pixar has shown their originality again by getting an audience to partake in a film that makes them pay attention and work a little; something that the message of the piece is trying to have come across for humanity in general.\n\nI credit the filmmakers for showcasing a world that has been left unlivable due to pollution and excess, yet never stooping to the level of liberal propaganda to soapbox an environmental agenda. No, the idea of "going green" or "stop global warming" never comes out blatantly, but instead we are shown the message of how technology is making us gluttons and sloths, reliant for everything and unable to even see what is going on right in front of our faces. Humanity, drifting on a space station for 700 years being waited on hand and foot, has become a giant mass of inactive waste. Watching their awakening at the hands of a little waste removal machine, seeing love, life, and beauty as if for the first time ever is a wonderful thing. Sure the homage to 2001: A Space Odyssey is fantastic, but these moments work on another level altogether\x97that of truth. Consumer culture and materialism has destroyed our society to the point that social status depends on the car you drive and the trinkets you can collect rather than the job you do and the work you put in. To see the Captain of the vessel, housing what has become of the human race, slowly open his eyes to what could be is mind-blowingly simple, yet also so necessary for children these days to see what burying their heads in the computer and cell phone is doing to the societal structure of the world. We need to stop being lemmings, droning along without purpose. There is a reason for life, things to strive for and love is one of them, something very prevalent here.\n\nThe robots themselves become more human than the humans, showing the emotion and compassion that people have left by the wayside. Curiosity takes center stage as Wall-E finds treasures amongst the trash he has been programmed to clean up for a return of life to Earth. Stacking his compacted boxes of refuse into skyscrapers taller than those left behind, he finds shelter in an abandoned tractor where he keeps spare parts and objects to play with during his solitude. Never expecting a visitor, or the impact that finding a small sapling of greenery could cause, a sophisticated robot named EVE arrives and changes his world forever. Not only does she become the woman of his dreams, but she also causes him to leave Earth and discover the spaceship, which has been trying to find his home for way too long.\n\nMaybe it is funny to say, but the chemistry between these two machines is quite palpable and real, as they discover feelings that they shouldn\'t have due to programming and such, but they have evolved into sentient creatures. They fight for freedom against the spaceship\'s auto-pilot and take a stand to end the tyranny that has been subtly and effectively beating the humans into submission. Of course they may not be doing it for the humans per se, there is a matter of needing to go back for spare parts, but you\'ll understand once you see. Sure the Captain does his part to see the hero that Wall-E becomes to his stagnant race and being voiced by the hilarious Jeff Garlin definitely helps. When he starts viewing the history of Earth and just exudes wonderment and joy, you really enjoy the ride as he attempts to reverse his sloth and actually stand on his two legs for possibly the first time ever.\n\nWhere I do have a problem with the film is the pacing. Yes, I know there is very little dialogue\x97and I whole-heartedly praise the film for it\x97but the beginning does have a tendency to drag. Maybe some of that has to do with it being an extended version of the trailer, but it just gets a little tedious as we wait for EVE to arrive and end the cute monotony of Wall-E playing with his finds in ways they aren\'t supposed to be used for, we\'ve seen it before in The Little Mermaid. Even once they are on the ship, the cat and mouse game gets a little prolonged to pad the runtime a bit. The story here isn\'t very complex and I just wish there had been more to it, or at least a bit faster paced of a plot progression. Otherwise, though, this is another solid film from Pixar, showing that they definitely have the creativity and storytelling ability to infuse heart back into cinema and try new things rather than regurgitate for a big paycheck.', u'0.0554157', u"Over the years I've become quite a sucker for Pixar movies and just love each and every one of them. While there are the states of the art animation and sound effects, the stories have heart. The characters are adorable yet real. It reminds one of those charming movies Disney used to make but Pixar films are very much a unique cinematic experience. \n\n'WALL-E' is quite unusual compared to the previous Pixar movies. There's hardly any dialogue between the two protagonists other than saying each other's name. In fact, barely a word is spoken in the entire first half hour but WALL-E and Eve's silent and playful love story is such a joy to watch. Even though of few words, both characters have strong personalities and the character development is wonderfully done. \n\nThe animation is colourful and vivid. Sound effect is amazing. The robot characters are cute and charming. The score deserve special mention as it's mesmerizing and beautiful. Andrew Stanton has done a terrific job as director and co-writer. The portrayal of WALL-E's loneliness and need for love is very well done and then the change that is brought within after the entrance of Eve and his eventual determination to rescue her is effectively shown. There are many genuinely funny and creative moments and it manages to stay away from being 'just plain silly'. The story is rich with humour, action, drama and adventure. \n\nBen Burtt and Elissa Knight do a fabulous job with the voice acting for WALL-E and Eve. John Ratzenberger, Kathy Najimy and Sigourney Weaver lend great support. While 'WALL-E' tells a magnificent love story it reminds us that Earth is our home and nothing can replace it. It's a joyous magical experience and another sure winner from Pixar.", u'0.79172', u"We live in a consumerist era. As any visit to a metropolitan area will prove, there is the unfaltering marriage of burgeoning commerce to a burgeoning population. Retail giants now provide services that would take more than a handful of independent stores to supply and this umbrella is continually widening. But how far can this consumerism go before it consumes us? This is where Wall-E begins, setting up the most scathing, yet perhaps most accurate futurist take on consumerism's affect on society in any animated film I've seen to date. In fact, I can't recall any film in the last several years that has taken this approach so seriously. Andrew Stanton once again throws us straight into a darkly themed film, but once again there are serious points to be had. At the outset of the film, we are introduced to a world where the skyscrapers that once housed the internal workings of business are dwarfed and surrounded by skyscrapers built of that very business' refuse. WALL-E spends his days continuously collecting and compacting the mountains of garbage that fill the streets of the city and adding it the trash skyscrapers, piece by piece. We learn very early on that this is the last functional bot of its kind, and perhaps, the only living machine on the planet. But there is something special about this surviving Wall-E; this robot performs its programmed tasks, but it has also become a curious being, collecting and organizing interesting items seen day by day. Wall-E is, essentially, the last bit of humanity left on Earth, since every other human being is either dead or living aboard the space cruise liner, the Axiom.\n\nBut things change once EVE arrives on Earth. In true fashion with his curious nature, the sight of EVE is enthralling to Wall-E. Here is something new from humanity, not just the garbage and trinkets left behind for Wall-E to sift through and compact. What begins here is the most innocent yet basic of love stories I have seen or read in many years. There is a purity to Wall-E's almost hypnotic and naive interest in EVE. I don't mean this in any religious terms, but rather in the vein that neither robot has prior knowledge of love or adoration, apart from Wall-E's surviving betamax tape of Hello Dolly! as his primary source of inspiration. Everything else is rooted in simple curiosity, but it is amazing how far just that can develop one's character.\n\nWall-E interacts with everything he finds in a very primal manner (the source of that curiosity), slowly learning about the things he finds by essentially playing with them until something happens. EVE is the dedicated but markedly emotional counterpart to Wall-E's primal self. She performs her tasks at the expense of taking notice of Wall-E. By the time she finally catches on to Wall-E's affection, the programmed side of herself sets off their exciting journey into space.\n\nOnce things set into full-swing, this film does not let go of you. EVE and Wall-E are quite a dynamic duo, although not the romantic pair envisioned in Wall-E's mind for most of the film. I won't go into any further analysis here, lest I spoil the fun for anyone wishing to go see it. But I must say that the fact that we see two robots, two human creations, act as the primary humanizing force is entirely effective and what makes me love this film so much. The overall message of the film emerges from the dark outset and even darker conclusion... The ending credits are a must-view for anyone who sees the film. There is a very emotional sequence of progressions that twice put me to tears for its poignancy and in light of the beginning of the film. The way this movie ends is the same way it begins: at the core it's all about WALL-E and the things we recognize in him as inherently human: his funny personality, his compulsion toward the good, his child-like curiosity and naivety, his sense of loneliness that he tries (and fails) at anesthetizing with psychological comforts and companion place-holders.\n\nOn other notes, the soundtrack is Newman's definitive work in cinema. I didn't think I would say this anytime post Finding Nemo, but it really is true. EVERY bit of music supports the film's imagery and tone while also helping shape it note by note. There is not a wasted note in this film.\n\nAlso, the visual imagery is utterly beautiful and affecting. Skyscrapers of compacted garbage, the collections in Wall-E's trailer, the outer heavens, the POV's of EVE and Wall-E... All are fantastic. The cinematography is also top-notch. They might have used the back to foreground focus a bit much, but just the fact that they had Roger Deakins consult on their almost perfected simulation cinematography as well as Stanton's directorial 'mindprint' of the film speaks volumes for the studio. It is all found and spoken for in the final print.\n\nThe thing about this movie is that is able to speak so much without much dialogue. Stanton has obviously learned a great deal in how to use the visual image as powerfully as possible.\n\nVerdict: Pixar gets another 10/10. They make films that speak to me in ways no other animation studio ever pulls off. The message may always be positive, but that doesn't mean the trials of Pixar characters are ever just plain and simple affairs. Stanton produced something very very special and endearing here. While the paint may be of a love story and two curious robots, he has captured nothing short of the core of our positive human nature in two inanimate objects. This is a meaningful and important film. How far can we let our lives be simplified before our own creations become more human than ourselves?", u'0.234689'], u'tt0082096': [u'\non modern "boats" life isn\'t easy- but compared to the living hell that the German U-Boats were, modern submariners have nothing to complain about. People in certain professions don\'t like to watch movies about those professions (Doctors and Nurses shy away from hospital dramas, for example). Submarine sailors are different. We love to watch every submarine movie ever made, from "Run Silent, Run Deep" and "Destination: Tokyo" to "The Hunt For Red October", "Crimson Tide" and "U-571". Why? Because we can always use a good laugh. For those in the know, submarine movies are usually absolutely hilarious. Except this one. After being in the Navy for four years, serving with around 350 different men, and being acquainted with a further 200-300, all of them submarine sailors, I think that I can state with absolute certainty that this film is the ONLY submarine movie that ALL submariners take seriously. And that is the highest praise a movie like this can possibly get.', u'0.110435', u'\nDas Boot is not just a great war film: it\'s a great film period. Maybe it is true that epic themes make the greatest novels and films.  Here is a movie that explores heroism, duty, patriotism, hope, fear and the futility of war--all grand themes--explored in the confined, and collapsing, spaces of a German u-boat.\n\nI saw this film when I was a freshman in college during a weekend that I later dubbed my "depressing movie festival." (The Wall and Apocalypse Now were the other weekend "entries.")  Of these films, it was Das Boot that haunted me--when I laid down at night, I saw Jurgen Proctow\'s pained blue eyes.  When I woke in the morning, I felt as if I were escaping through the hatch of the submarine.  I could not shake the images, and now some fifteen years later, I still remember how completely meaningless the movie made everything seem, and the nihilistic message stayed with me for a long, long time.  How few films are there which affect the viewers on this level.  To say this film is "powerful" seems so weak a description.\n\nPart of the "power" of the film comes, I think, from a certain restraint in the direction.  So often, films which aspire to move the audience quickly fall into melodrama, over-acting, and overblown images.  Too much.  These often succeed in the immediate response (usually crying) but fail to impact the viewer on anything more than a surface level.  Here, it is the small moments which fill the screen.  Everywhere, all around is War, but for these men as we witness them, war does not begin with a capital "W".  It is reality, not a grand concept.  The director lets the story shock and horrify the audience, not by forcing it, but by letting the story just tell itself.  Drama, tension and resolution occur naturally in Das Boot, which contributes to the very real impact of the film.\n\nStory is a 10, direction is a 10, acting is a 10 and the cinematography is a 10.  One of the all-time greatest films.', u'-0.00388049', u'What impresses me the most about the film, as the title makes apparent, is that it\'s a German made film about a German U-boat. Patriotism for my own country would tend to make me hate the crew on this ship by definition (especially if portrayed as typical mindless killing machine Nazis), but these characters are so well developed and played like human-beings facing difficult decisions that I find myself sympathizing with these guys.\n\nI love the flow and pacing of the Director\'s Cut; it takes its time, and does not feel like typical Hollywood formula "first major plot point at minute 12" cookie-cutter routine. Das Boot gives us plenty of time to know these characters, discover how they kill time while waiting for orders, how they feel about their job and each other. Then when the action finally starts: how they deal with the possibility of dying deep underwater, how they react to the sounds of a sub going deeper than it should, the look on their faces as a destroyer is heard pinging them, and dozens of little personality quirks--subtle details that bring the crew to life. It truly does feel like an epic about a submarine crew, and I\'m interested in some day viewing the 6 hour TV version.\n\nThe underwater battles somewhat remind me of Sergio Leone in that Wolfgang Peterson takes forever and a day to get the fights started. Unlike Leone, once the torpedos are launched and the depth charges dropped, the cat-and-mouse game is ongoing and relentless, but never boring.\n\nAnd despite the fact that most of the film takes place inside a cramped submarine, Das Boot is never boring to look at; in fact, it\'s a visually spectacular film (given the dated special effects, who hold up reasonably well and add to the old-school charm). And the freedom of the camera in those tight corridors came as an incredibly pleasant surprise. The color and composition of the shots in those tight quarters -- particularly upon approaching the first destroyer when we get the first real glimpse of the interior prepped for war -- it is both haunting and beautiful.\n\nJurgen Prochnow delivers the most believable performance of a ship captain I\'ve ever seen on film. All the emotions register on his face--his concern for his own life, ship, and crew; his hatred for the decisions he\'s forced to make; the disbelieving joy of beating the overwhelming odds--while simultaneously holding it back so the crew sees a strong unmoving man forever in control of the situation. His performance is, in a word, brilliant.\n\nThe rest of the cast also delivers amazingly believable performances, and trust me, I could write an entire review on the film\'s characters and their portrayals. It\'s both disappointing and satisfying that I\'m not given enough space to do so (I wish I could state that about a tenth of the films I\'ve reviewed here on IMDb.) I liked the entire crew of this U-boat, the war correspondent and his character arc as he realizes the truth behind these "heroes", the chief and his longing to return to his wife, Johann and the story of his redemption--all well cast, well acted, and believable.\n\nAnother aspect I adored about Das Boot - the controversial scenes simply rolled by with no more or less emphasis than any other statement the film makes. In fact, I saw the film before really reading anything or researching it and found myself somewhat shocked to hear about these "talked about" scenes. Granted, the film does pose some moral questions, but I felt the film handled it with grace and great subtlety, showing what it needs to get the point across and not a step further . . . unlike typical Hollywood where controversy gets bold print, italics, and a highlighter. Maybe I should move to Germany.\n\nI can go on for a long while: Over three hours of wonderful visuals and strong performances, a sparse but great score (this film\'s lack of music is quite appropriate, making the presence of music much more impactful in its key places). Realistic writing from people who lived the experience first hand. As I said, I can go on for awhile but I\'ll sum it up and end this review with one statement: Das Boot is the definitive submarine movie.', u'0.295513', u'\n"Das Boot" is a classic. This film couldn\'t be more intense and emotionally draining. It is a work of genius. Jurgen Prochnaw gives a spectacular performance as the German U-Boat Captain. The acting is first rate as the cast of characters is as realistic and believable as it gets. Don\'t watch this film unless you are absolutely prepared to immerse yourself into the drama of life as a crewman aboard a German submarine during war. This is a very rare portrayal of battle through the eyes of our enemy and will actually have you cheering for the "bad guys" at times. This is a one of a kind movie that must be seen to be believed. Words in a review cannot describe the experience of "Das Boot." A tremendous film! A 12 on a scale of 10!\n', u'0.750392', u'While it has been a very long time since I have seen this movie, it is one of the very few that I own. Wolfgang Petersen\'s magnificent accomplishment in "Das Boot" is reiterating the dictum that "war is hell", no matter which side you look at it from and no matter where the battlefield is located.\n\n*** Minor spoilers ***\n\nThe plot has been well described by other viewers so I won\'t rehash it again. But my personal observations, as an ex-submarine sailor, are that Petersen probably portrayed life on board the sub pretty accurately. I say "probably" because todays subs are hotels compared with the German U-boats and American submarines. The commonality between yesterday and today is how the crew deals with being closed up in a "sewer pipe" for weeks at a time. More importantly, you as a viewer become an invisible crew member as the crew lives in very cramped conditions (American WW2 subs used to be called "pig boats"), deals with an unfortunately believable political officer, deals with drills, actual torpedo firings, actual ships casualties, and deals, most frighteningly, with retribution from the "enemy". My own experience watching the depth charging of the U-boat was such that I was thinking "stop it, Stop It, STOP IT, STOPITSTOPITSTOPIT...!!!!!" That\'s how real it felt to me. For the rest of you, I feel certain you will too be dragged in and know what it is like to live on board a WW2 U-boat.\n\nThis movie also shows how leadership is so important in keeping the crew (and ultimately the sub) together. Petersen\'s direction for Captain Lehmann-Willenbrock was masterful because it didn\'t portray the captain as a god. It showed him as a man who knows how to lead, knows his submarine as if he were married to it (and in many ways he is) but isn\'t perfect at the job. It also shows that even with great leadership qualities, Captain Lehmann-Willenbrock can not do the job alone: he must have both officers and enlisted men who have the knowledge and skill to not just do their jobs, but to also advise the captain. Petersen also managed to give each member of the crew their own separate personalities instead of the predictable cookie-cutter personalities that Hollywood feels is needed.\n\nI could go on and on. So I will close by saying that with the plot, direction, cinematography, acting, sound, music, editing all being top notch, this is one of the few movies that I can truly rate a 10 out of 10. I also preferred the German version with subtitles.\n\n------------------------------------ \n\nI believe that this movie was either the first or one of the first to use Steadicam technology. It was truly amazing for me to see a camera zip its way through a submarine, specifically through the open watertight doors, without a break in the filming. Up until I heard what Steadicam was, I was always wondering how Petersen managed to hide the camera dolly track or the wires the camera hung from.\n\n(It turns out I was wrong: "Bound For Glory" was the first.)\n\nEDIT (12 OCT, 2006): I have been corrected by an observant viewer. Wikipedia has the following comment on what I thought was Steadicam usage:\n\n"Most of the interior shots were filmed using a hand-held Arriflex of cinematographer Jost Vacano\'s design to convey the claustrophobic atmosphere of the boat. It had a gyroscope to provide stability, a reinvention of the Steadicam on a smaller scale, so that it could be carried throughout the interior of the mock-up. Vacano wore full-body padding to minimize injury as he ran and the mock-up was rocked and shaken." \n\nSo, literally, a Steadicam was NOT used in the filming of "Das Boot". However, a camera that resembled Steadicam in function (in the way it gyroscopically leveled the filming platform) was used.\n\n------------------------------------ \n\nEven though todays submarines are far cleaner then their predecessors, and we have refrigerators, freezers, air conditioning, are able to take showers, etc., there is one aspect of living in an enclosed space that still lives on: the smell. While the smell of the "pig boats" of WW2 was truly atrocious, even with todays ability to clean the atmosphere, you can not escape the fact that any smell that is created, from burned toast in the galley, from the smell of the "sanitary gasses" (to be kind), to gasified hydraulic oil and diesel fuel, all these particulates will eventually become absorbed in your clothing. You, as a sailor, may get used to it, but when you get home, your wife will most likely declare that you smell like a submarine and demand that whatever you are wearing get thrown in the wash ... immediately!', u'0.126141', u"The first time I saw this film I could not take my eyes from it. I was mesmerized with the transition of a hearty young crew leaving port evolving as the sheer moments of terror (deep under water battles and personal struggles as well as the final scene) lead them all to rethink their actual cause, and their very own mortality (as well as our own in the perils of war!). I can't imagine another film actually displaying what it must have been like to be on one of Nazi Germany's U-boats - young nationalist boys being plucked from their mother's bosom and cast into the claustrophobic iron wolfs in the heat and height of the second world war, who begin to doubt the cause and victory of the fuhrer they've been taught to love and trust. Very colorful, contrasting characters and a script and plot thick with surprises and emotional drama/trauma. Top-notch direction, action, acting and sets. This is perhaps the greatest movie ever made in my opinion. Sorry I couldn't be more specific with the review, there is just too much to cover without spoiling anything for those yet to enjoy it, and thus I just highly recommend it to anybody, not just war movie buffs. I have seen both the regular version and the director's cut (which I own on DVD now) and I must say that the DC is superior. A masterpiece!", u'0.440349', u"\nDas Boot is one of the most emotionally involving movies I have ever seen. The characters are developed richly, without those awkward moments in movies when you realize that the director is doing so.  You sympathize with the crew, and FEEL their plight as they struggle, cramped in a rickety U-boat against the odds.  At times the movie grows slow and drawn out, but that is intentional- to make you feel like you are trapped in an underwater coffin with nothing to do, no where to go.  The directing is great, the sound is fabulous!  I've never heard faint noises tell a story like this before.\n", u'0.12812', u"War movies have been biases to one side or the other. This movie does not make hero's or enemies of the German U-boat sailors. Instead, it grips the viewer with realistic depictions of what it was like to be a U-boat sailor for the Gemans in WWII. It starts off with young (17 year old to 25 year old) who have been filled with propaganda about the war effort and glorious battle. After this young crew of immature sailors start to experience the true horrors of war, you can not only see, but experience with them the boredom, laughter, camaraderie, team work and death. In a world where you have no windows, where your ears have to be your eyes, where a cat and mouse game is played and the looser dies, these young men age 10 to 15 years It makes the viewer realize the horror of submarine warfare in WWII. The most realistic war movie I have ever seen.", u'-0.0555363', u"\nWhen you go to a liquor store to buy Vodka you can purchase one of several brands or you can purchase Stoli. That's what Das Boot is when it comes to Submarine films. You can watch any one of several or you can watch Das Boot. Like Stoli Vodka it's in a class by itself. Superb film either way you see it i.e. subtitles or the dubbed version. See the directors cut if you can. The German crew could be any nationality the film is so well done it doesn't matter. Andy Rooney once said that when you're in a war you live life at 100%. The opening scene of this film demonstrates that. The men are living life at 100%. I never saw any other war movie that captured that like Das Boot.\n", u'0.349654', u'\nUsing the term \'authenticity\' in connection with any kind of art is rather difficult and daring as well. Sometimes it looks posed or is by certain purposes manipulated. Referring to Petersen\xb4s "Das Boot" however, I consider it justified to call it authentic and true. I think this statement can be strengthened mainly by the fact that Lothar Gunther Buchheim was consulted. He composed the novel this breathtaking movie bases on and he himself was employed as a war correspondent in the Second World War.\n\nThe entire plot has no weak points. Starting at "Bar Royal" at the very night before the forces living journey of the submarine crew begins, the director fittingly manages to confront the audience with the protagonists and their way of dealing with the pounding uncertainty. Once put to sea, the character of the scenes changes abruptly. Every member of the crew and the audience as well comes into very close contact with the tightness of the action space. At this point it is necessary to underline the excellent work of the cameramen. The fast and partial hectic cuts draw an exact picture of the drama on board. Too do not forget the outstanding lighting. However besides this abundance of obvious suspense, there are also a number of moments going into in-depth psychology and thoughtfulness. To outline only a few of them: At "Bar Royal", when the chief engineer reflects about the uncertain fate of his family, or when the captain, with a kind of \'Weltschmerz\' in his eyes, is astound and proud of the unbelievable efforts of the crew. It would probably be too laborious to refer to the decisive symbols the director uses, therefore I recommend this movie to everybody, especially those who are interested in the Second World War.\n\nIt presumably sounds pretty weird, yet I suppose that mankind gladly participates on the misfortune of others, without being closely involved with it. This closing notion may account for the huge success of this movie.>', u'0.144793', u"I spent 17 years of my life in Royal Navy submarines. 'T' class, 'A' class and 'R' class. Das Boot is the only submarine movie that shows exactly how it was. It could be a documentary. Bouncing around in the Bay of Biscay with the sea too rough to be able to dive safely and get away from it. 'Goffers' pouring down the conning tower and the control room deck ankle deep in the green stuff. Going down backwards at 500ft and you know there is 10,000ft below you, with seawater pouring in through a burst cooling pipe and one main motor out of action. Existing for two weeks on kai or oxo because your stomach is rebelling against the elements. Laying in your bunk in ultra quiet routine with the sweat just dribbling down. When the sweat starts to dribble upwards you know it's a cockroach crawling up your body. And that Klaxon. 'Hunt for Red October', 'Crimson Tide'. They are just adventure films.", u'-0.244471', u'\nI\'ve decided not to review the 1981 dubbed cinematic release of DAS BOOT . Instead I\'ve decided to review Wolfgang Petersen\'s director\'s cut which is far closer to the miniseries version which most readers will be familiar with \n\nWhen someone makes an anti war statement it\'s important that they differentiate between being " anti war " and " anti military " . The Brits don\'t seem to know the difference and seem keen to make anti- military / anti - soldier self loathing war movies with Paul Greengrass\'s RESURRECTED a good example . Having suffered the tragedy of Vietnam the Americans finally made anti- war movies that were a million miles removed from the old John Wayne and Errol Flynn star vehicles where a man wipes out 30 enemy soldiers single handed without suffering a scratch . But when it comes to making anti - war movies that shows the horrors of war and the courage of men in battle the Germans are top of the league , heads and shoulders above everyone else . This is because present day Germans realize that the enemy isn\'t the other side - it\'s war itself that\'s the enemy and DAS BOOT is a great example of this thinking \n\nThe story starts slowly by introducing us to the crew via the war correspondent who are celebrating a last night ashore before they sail on their mission to sink British convoys sailing from America to Britain carrying vital supplies for the war effort against Nazi Germany . This is where DAS BOOT is superb , I really felt empathy for these crew man . Okay I didn\'t want them sinking British ships but I didn\'t want them to die either an opinion that shouldn\'t be taken lightly since my paternal grandfather was a merchant seaman during the war while my maternal grandfather was a crewman on a destroyer . The fact the crew of U-96 are presented as being utterly human and for this Brit hoping they make it home in one piece is a great achievement \n\nDAS BOOT was nominated for several Oscars and it\'s not difficult to see why. Watch it on widescreen television with stereo surround and you\'ll be amazed with the very clear sound effects and sound editing . Perhaps the best technical aspect is the cinematography where during moments of crisis the camera shoots along the length of the U- boat as it follows crewmen rushing about . When a foreign language movie is nominated for several Oscars you just know it\'s good\n\n!!!!! SLIGHT SPOILERS !!!!\n\nThis is a superb movie but it\'s not perfect . Being a German movie Nazis feature at one point but none of them are crew members , the only Nazis featured are the crew of a supply ship who have who have never seen a days fighting in their lives . It\'s understandable for German film makers to play down the courage of Nazi party members of the Second World War but it should also be remembered that the Waffan SS were exclusively composed of party members and they were the most feared fighting force of the conflict . CROSS OF IRON ( My favourite movie featuring WW 2 ) does make the valid point that because someone isn\'t a fan of the Nazis it doesn\'t necessarily make them a good person either . The screenplay also drags due to the fact that there\'s two subplots of U-96 being damaged and stuck on the Atlantic seabed when one subplot of sinking and then resurrecting the vessel would have sufficed\n\nBut the pros far outweigh the cons and I recommend this movie to people who have never seen a foreign language film in their life . It\'s placing in the IMDb top 250 is well earned . You may be shocked to know that director Wolgang Petersen later went onto to make Hollywood crap like OUTBREAK and A PERFECT STORM\n', u'0.0507536', u'One of the few movies that shows the war from a German perspective (the more recent "Downfall" is also unmissable) and makes for compelling viewing. \n\nYou identify with the despair, the youngsters\' need to "go home", the loves left behind, the fear of dying, the dawning enormity of their action as they recede from the survivors in the sea, the sheer fatigue of continuing when every nerve yearns to be free of the boat\'s confines - the pressures of war, and marvel at the courageous human will that keeps defying all odds and surviving.\n\nI found myself on edge for the entire movie, feeling as trapped inside the sub as the crew and even cheering as the boat surfaced in the end against all odds and then, mourning the futility of it all. \n\nThe movie succeeds in showing the war as a very human tragedy, forcing us to not hide behind anonymous "enemy" tags. \n\nAmong many tragic moments, especially poignant is the scene where the captain recants the incident of watching the survivors cry for help. You can almost see his eyes glistening. Almost.\n\nThe cast is superb but the captain is outstanding, his eyes brilliantly essaying his emotions.\n\nBest version is the director\'s cut in the original German with English subtitles.\n\nWhat I don\'t understand is why Das Boot never won any Oscars. Can anyone shed light on this? Was it a political decision? (Btw, I think Saving Private Ryan is highly over-rated as an all-time great war movie).', u'0.447309', u"\nI first saw this film on the BBC when it was aired in it's mini series format. I was 13 at the time and was totally blown away by it. Up until then, the only war films i had seen were gung-ho movies, with GI's firing tommy guns from the hip at hoardes of evil Nazis. \n\nTo see a film that showed 'the enemy' as human beings, with hopes, fears and dreams was something else to a 13 yr old kid. As i grew up i began to understand more about the second world war and was able to make up my own mind as to whether the 'evil Nazis' were all that the cinema portrayed them to be, but 'Das Boot' always stuck at the back of my mind as an outstanding example of how to show fighting men, from what ever side, in the best possible way.\n\nLots of people rave about 'Saving Private Ryan' being the ultimate WW2 film. Although good, it isn't a patch on Das Boot. The Boat has everything; Fine actors, an excellent script (which doesn't deviate from the Novel at all) and excellent hand-held camera work, supported by brilliant lighting, and 20 years before 'Private Ryan' too!\n\nDas Boot is an excellent example of how to depict the horrors of war without resorting to a blood and gore fest and it remains a film that everyone should see it it's entirity at least once.\n", u'0.462056', u'Thats right, not even saving private Ryan comes close, this film is a masterpiece! from beginning to end, non-stop action and suspense, never a dull moment!, it has these nail-biting scenes and moments like when the depth charges blow and the UDS (ultrasonic detection system) sounds, just chilling and gut-wrenching! and the scene where the chief is sharing his pictures of him and his wife are heart-warming, simply beautiful a 10 out of 10 rating,the soundtrack is also amazing, so beautiful I even bought the CD, this is a real WWII movie!, my hats of to Wolfgang Petersen!!!.\n\nA must see WWII film!', u'0.725355'], u'tt0119698': [u"\nI saw Mononoke Hime on its USA release back in late December 1999 under its U.S. title Princess Mononoke.  I had read quite a bit about this film and its director but was still totally overwhelmed by the beauty and brutality of this movie.  The complexity of this movie is something never seen in the United States in an animated movie and even exceeds that of most live action movies as well.  It combines love and hate, war and romance, nobility and deception in ways rarely seen in movies today.  Lines of good and evil are anything but clear cut and in the end is hope but no guarantees, no promises.  This is truly an adult movie but my children, ages 12 to 15 all loved it and talked about it for days later.  Even my wife who holds a strong prejudice against Japanese animation enjoyed this movie.\n\nGo and see this movie.  You won't be disappointed.", u'0.3789', u"\nPrincess Mononoke is, without a doubt, one of the best films I have ever witnessed. There has never been an animated film even close to this -- I kept thinking after I left the theater, how can Disney even have the guts to make another film after seeing this? Even live action movies pale in comparison to Princess Mononoke. There has never been a film to pay such close attention to details. Watch for the magnificent and subtle flying insects throughout the film, especially in the ancient forest, where bioluminescent dragonflies glide gently around the screen. There are thousands of subtleties such as this. You'd have to see it a dozen times to appreciate this film fully. Aside from it being the most beautiful film I've ever seen, it also has an enormously powerful script. The characters are some of the the most well rounded in all film. Ashitaka especially, the main character of the film, is so nuanced that he has become in my mind one of the great characters in film, up there with Charles Foster Kane and Jake LaMotta. I would compare him to Freder, the main character of Fritz Lang's Metropolis. His role in the film is a mediator between the forces of humans and the gods of nature. Both sides comment several times that Ashitaka must be on the other side, when he is trying desperately to convince everyone that there are no sides. Peace is the way. There is a little to be desired in the American voice talent. Claire Daines was certainly a wrong choice for San (Princess Mononoke), and Billy Bob Thornton just could not hide his southern accent, which made the character of Jigo seem more comical than he was probably supposed to be. Gillian Anderson's voice clashed with her character, the wolf god Moro, a bit. It hardly affected my passion. The film was so spectacular and beautiful that James Earl Jones could have voiced San and it would have detracted little. Definitely, though, I'm praying that they release the DVD with subtitle options. Anyway, Princess Mononoke is the best film of 1999, the best film of the 1990's, and, in my personal top ten list, no lower than #5, but closer to #2. 12 hours later and my heart is still beating with the power of Princess Mononoke! America: SEE IT!\n\n", u'0.150301', u'\nThis seems to be Miyazake\'s most personal work, clearly a serious design. It is set in an imaginary time which blends the time of the ancient gods (Shinto style, gods of place and nature) with the settlement of humans and the coming of metalworking and war.  The world is not in balance, and a distant conflict between industry and nature has wounded one of the gods of the forest, which is then killed by a sentry boy as it rampages into farmland he guards.  The evil controlling it transfers to him, beginning a\nslow takeover, and he must journey to the origin of the conflict to find a\nway to cure himself and incidentally, as he will learn, to try to restore balance.  But this is not a simplistic tale, he finds there are other characters in play, and there is good and evil in everyone, and no easy balance.  The Princess (Hime) of the story is a mysterious human who has been raised by wolves (which are themselves powerful forest gods, a little reminiscent of the Amerindian Coyote myth), who becomes both his ally and his enemy.  The story is not easy to understand.  It has many Japanese mythic elements but even then, it is a work of Miyazake\'s unique imagination, and is not intended to be simple or to have a clean resolution.\n\nThe animation is spectacular, and unusual, with new elements even for Miyazake and marks a new departure for style which you can see continued in his next film, Sen to Chihiro - more nature, more wild, more jamming on elements from Japanese myth and folklore.  And, continuing the trend to be more personal, concerned with ethics and character, and less sci-fi. There are at least half a dozen well developed characters threaded through the story, and their animation is wonderful in displaying subtle character.\n\nThe original Japanese soundtrack has some amazing singing and draws upon some of the best talent available for voices - in Japan, Miyazake is universally known and this was a masterpiece carefully crafted.  Japanese television documented a lot of the production.  The English translation drew on some good talent but they seem not to have "gotten it" quite so intensely as the Japanese crew.\n\nIf you haven\'t seen Miyazake, give it a try (but maybe look at Sen to Chihiro first, or even Laputa or Kiki\'s Delivery Service, for easier and lighter introduction to his work).  Some say he is the Japanese Disney, but I don\'t like that.  His work has a depth and sophistication that goes beyond Disney cute.  There is no other animation like it.  This is truly an adult work: children might like some of the visuals, but I doubt that many kids below teen age will have any idea what it is all about, and even adults will get more out of this each time you see it again.', u'-0.0345702', u'\nThe first time I saw Princess Mononoke I was completely moved and surprised. Since it was a Studio Ghibli film dubbed by Disney I liked the fact that it wasn\'t a "they all lived naively ever after" film. There were no complete "good" or "bad" guys. Even Lady Eboshi the most antagonist character in the movie had a reasonable motive for trying to get rid of the animal gods and cutting down the forest. Although it her actions were environmentally damaging and wrong in general, she did it to help her people survive which is what all the species on Earth strive for. Another wonderful aspect of the plot is that it sends a message - Protect the Earth and all will survive in peace - a message either discreetly or strongly portrayed in many of Miyazaki\'s films. Perhaps the portrayal of this message (and the tiny hint of San and Ashitaka\'s romance and Moro\'s views on nature) was what made the film so touching to me.\n\nLike many Miyazaki movies, the animation (as always) is wonderful and nicely detailed which is also another quality that genuine Disney films lack (thank goodness for Studio Ghibli). The music was beautiful and well suited to the movie.\n\nThe only predicament to the movie is that it is a bit downbeat and does not contain much happy laughter (oh well, I can watch My Neighbor Totoro - also a good movie - for happy laughter.).\n\n10/10 - And my favourite movie of all time.\n', u'0.455526', u"Fantastic film! It makes me speechlessly. Good dialogs, beautiful soundtrack,incredible animation effects (take a look at the rain, at the movement of the grass, hear the sounds of the steps) and interesting characters,who are everything but ordinary. Ashitaka is captivating (what a strength, what a heart, what a soul!); San (the Princess Mononoke herself) is intriguing; and Lady Eboshi is ambiguous -is she the villain? I don't think so. After all, who can blame her? Don't let the over exploration of themes related to ecology discourage you. Go ahead and watch Mononoke. It's a totally new way of treating the conflict between men and nature, which is far from its ending. Definitely, a jewel among the predictable animations of Disney and Pixar's also predictable jokes. There are no jokes here. TAKE A LOOK AT IT!", u'0.0236343', u"\nI saw this film in Japan, in Japanese with no sub-titles, I don't speak a word of the language and I was still enthralled!  It is Miyazaki most visually intense (surpassing, at long last, Nausicaa) and is alive with color and movement the like not yet seen in anime.\n\nThe story is complex, and after talking with Japanese friends, it is clear that much of it went over my head (particularly that relating to specific Japanese myths), but the important elements came through. Miyazaki's long infatuation with technology verses nature and man's relation to God (or gods) weave throughout the film as does his trend for strong women characters. \n\nEven with the language barrier, the film is of such intense emotion that it caries you through to the end. The change in dynamic between the crashing fight scenes and the quiet scenes of healing by the lake is so broad and so well paced that I can't remember a film where my emotional state was so expertly varied.\n\nIf you have a chance to see this film, in any language, I recommend you do.\n", u'0.533846', u'\nI have seen many many animated features, but none compare to the talent that is shown in this anime. After seeing this for the first time, I could see why so many animators (especially disney animators) consider Mr. Miazaki a GOD! His animation style has the best "flowing motion" I have ever seen.\n\nThe American dubbing team, whoever they are did an excellent job picking voices, they got top notch actors to do the job right (unlike most animes today). They even took on the hair-pulling task of RE-ANIMATING the mouth movements to match!\n\nThis is by far one of the best films I have ever seen.\n', u'0.248519', u'A few years ago I would have tossed this film into a collection of movies I like to call the rubbish pile. Recently, however, I have forced myself, with great difficulty, to open my mind and look at the entire picture. Instead of focusing on one or two aspects of the movie I do not like and formulating a biased opinion based on my hasty and clouded notions, I can now decipher both the good and bad points of a given flick. Upon watching Princess Mononoke, I must say I first thought it would be very difficult to look past the animation style and see it for what it was- a dynamic film directed be the highly acclaimed Hayao Miyazaki. After about ten minutes of dwelling on the follies (and there are, in my opinion, many) of the "anime" style of art, I became enthralled with the quickly unfolding plot and the subsequently dire fate bestowed upon Ashitaka, the protagonist of the film. After Ashitaka leaves his village to search for a treatment to remedy his affliction, I no longer cared that this was an animated feature; I was on the edge of my seat, wondering what would happen next. I no longer disliked that every character had abnormally large eyes (though not over-sized to the point of utter absurdity) or that the English overdubbing was a little choppy. In fact, I even began to enjoy the accomplished yet subtle computer generated effects interspersed throughout. By the last half hour I was hooked to the screen, eagerly awaiting the conclusion I wanted so badly to end the bitter conflict of the plot. By the end, I realized that this movie carried a powerful moral with it: man\'s continuous tampering with nature brings about as much savagery as it does progress, as much suffering as it does good, and that a sound compromise must be struck between nature and civilization. I do not harbor any negative feelings towards those who rated this movie poorly, as I used to be one of those people. All I have to say to them is this: look at a both the visual and symbolic attributes of a movie before rating it harshly. If, after observing all these features and idiosyncrasies, you still wholeheartedly hate the film, then by all means give it a one. After all, what would the world be like if we were all did not criticize or question our surroundings?', u'-0.233046', u"Im a Big fan of Miyazaki... This movie is Definitely in his top 3... \n\nPrincess Mononoke's story is very in depth and it grabs your attention. Time after time. You may have to watch it a couple times to catch everything but you will fall in love with the characters and story every time you sit down to watch it\n\nAs for the art... Its Visually stunning yet again. Everything is depicted so well in Miyazaki's artwork from the humans to the Forest gods and everything in between\n\nthis definitely worth watching.\n\nAnd if you like it you should definitely check out some of his others like Castle In The Sky, Howls Moving Castle and Spirited Away", u'0.811592', u'In its theatrical Japanese release of 1997, PRINCESS MONONOKE was the hugest box office grossing movie of all time in the land of the Rising Sun until it was overtaken by James Cameron\'s TITANIC, and, four years later, director Hayao Miyazaki\'s own SPIRITED AWAY. No wonder. This movie, like an earlier project of Miyazaki\'s, NAUSICAA OF THE VALLEY OF THE WIND, explores man\'s relationship with nature, hatred causing destruction, and, more importantly, real characters (in other words, no real "hero" or "villain") trying to get by in a world continually torn by war.\n\nThis is not a movie for young children, as there are disturbing shots of decapitations, amputations, and occasional blood spurts. Sometimes these elements of violence turn squeamish viewers away from Anime (especially when they\'re done gratuitously), but Hayao Miyazaki presents it not to sicken people but to show it for the horror that it is (plus, in this film, the violence is not overdone). Take, for example, the scene where the protagonist, Prince Ashitaka of the Emishi Tribe, possessed by a curse he received from killing a Demon God (in trying to protect his village), tries to stop samurai attacking innocent people, and in doing so shoots the arms off of one man, and, later, takes off a man\'s head with two arrows. The sight is horrifying to see, but the deed also increases Ashitaka\'s demon mark on his arm, which is slowly preparing to take his life. This is a truly horrible depiction about the dangers of violence.\n\nAlso worth noting is Princess Mononoke herself, a human girl named San raised by the Animal Gods, and her struggle against Lady Eboshi of Iron Town, who is destroying the forest merely for her people\'s own good (the folks are outcasts, including lepers and prostitutes). San distrusts and despises all humans, and is especially determined to destroy them all (particularly Eboshi)... or die trying. When she\'s rescued by Ashitaka, however, a conflict within her begins to surface: are *all* humans evil, or is there at least one who is trustworthy? If there is any character who could be considered a villain, it would be the monk, Jigo, who wants the head of the Spirit of the Forest to bring to the Emperor. Such a deed would destroy the entire forest (as we find out in the film\'s chilling climactic scenes) but even Jigo has his own motives, too. He is not so much evil as much as he is just "trying to get by". This pretty much sums up the conflicts between all our characters here.\n\nPRINCESS MONONOKE may not have enjoyed similar box office success here in America, but at least a lot of work and care went into the translation. As with Disney\'s other English language tracks for Miyazaki\'s films, this one is very, very well done. Acclaimed writer Neil Gaiman worked on the script, rewording it only to a) fit the mouth flaps, and b) make it understandable to a non-Japanese audience who would probably not comprehend a lot of the cultural nuances found in this film. Added to which, the voice cast includes a commendable list of stars; Billy Crudup is perfect as Ashitaka, eliciting just the right amount of warmth, kindness, compassion, wisdom, and courage, while Claire Danes delivers passionately angry, conflicted turmoil to San. (Folks said she was miscast, but I beg to differ; her character is *required* to be outraged and aggressive, and Danes does have a strong voice to carry such emotions.) The rest of the cast includes Billy Bob Thornton as Jigo (a grossly underrated performance; his Southern drawl adds to the character), Minnie Driver (elegant choice!) as Lady Eboshi, Gillian Anderson as the Wolf-Goddess Moro, and Jada Pinkett-Smith as the friendly (if no-nonsense style) worker Toki. The translation flows smoothly to those who are not familiar with Japanese folk tales, and the story succeeds in making its point, too.\n\nThis movie may not be for everybody, as it is the kind of film that may disturb young children, but older audiences will find themselves absorbed in the artwork, which showcases gorgeous, unmatched imagination, from the finely detailed forests to the cute little Tree Spirits who appear and disappear at will to the Forest Spirit itself -- a huge deer who makes plants grow with each step he takes. And at night he becomes a ghostly specter known as the Nightwalker, traveling higher than the trees. Such images warrant the purchase of this film. Better yet, its message is not too preachy, and rarely do animated movies (save those from Japan) showcase characters portrayed as, well, human beings.', u'-0.0229503', u'I just thought its just the another kid stuff before I saw that movie. But I am really in shock and all my attention sink to the movie when I watch it . I drop my mouth down and I really can\'t speak while I was watching this Mononoke and Ashitaka nightmare adventures until the end.\n\nAfter enjoy watching the movie, I got many thoughts, philos and knowledge of what we are living for and what we believe in. In this movie, for my point of view, nobody is a bad guy and a good guy.\n\nEveryone live on what they believe in and express on they are living for. All the characters have different strength and different way of living but they all are same in just one thing, its called "HOPE".\n\nThey live what they hope for and eager on what they believe. I would nearly cry as the climax is on way too high and after that this story of all meanings is about war and peace, love and hate, positive and negative. Its totally what its called "master-piece of ART" and many appreciate to everyone who create this.', u'-0.13473', u'Studio Ghibli has been Japan\'s leading anime Production Company since the 1980\'s, when legendary anime director Hayao Miyazaki released his first feature film "Nausica\xe4 of the Valley of Wind" (1984). From the very beginning, it was clear that the Japanese director had a fantastic flair for animated film, and the uncanny ability to engross his audiences beyond the normal movie-experience that makes him the King of Escapism. Over ten years later, it seems that Miyazaki is still just as good, if not better, as he invites the world into his latest visionary fantasy, the cult classic "Princess Mononoke".\n\nThe film is set in Japan, during the Muromachi Era, and begins in the quiet peaceful township of the Emishi tribe, when young Prince Ashitaka (Y\xf4ji Matsuda), the last of the Emishi royalty, is wounded slaying a demon in an unexpected attack. When the tribe\'s wise-woman tells Ashitaka that the wound is a curse of hatred that will eventually kill him, he sets out on a journey to the west to discover the origins of the demon. What he finds is a war being waged between the villagers of Iron town, an industrious Iron-works fort led by the ruthless Lady Eboshi (Y\xfbko Tanaka), and the beasts of the forest, represented by the beautiful Princess Mononoke (Yuriko Ishida), a human girl raised by wolves, with whom the cursed prince falls in love. Soon Ashitaka\'s efforts to make peace are put to the test by each side\'s bid for allegiance.\n\n"Princess Mononoke" is a fantastic work of art on many fronts, and arguably Miyazaki\'s best film to date. While some of his other projects have had the same enchantment and excitement, "Mononoke" has an intriguingly dark and infinitely more mature feel, established by the bloody battle-scenes and sensitive color treatment, and solidified by a complex plot and rich, interesting characters. The most obvious illustrative trait of the film is the ambiguity of the characters\' nature; the lack of distinction between good and bad. The ruthless lady Eboshi, while caring nothing for the forest or its inhabitants, is very compassionate towards the underdogs of her own community, such as the brothel girls and the lepers. And the wild wolf-princess, while desperate to defend her fellow forest-dwellers and protect the forest spirit, has a deep-seated mistrust of humans that even steeps into self-loathing at times. These interesting character traits make the film a lot more rewarding than many of Ghibli\'s other works, which were aimed mostly at children.\n\nOf course, all these intriguing themes and characters are only a part of the film\'s wonder, because Miyazaki\'s true gift lies in imagery. The detailed animation of "Princess Mononoke" is astounding, drawing its audience into its environments, from lush forest to open fields to crowded marketplace and more; the team of animators that poured their hearts and souls into this film should take utmost pride in their accomplishments. Using minimal and tasteful CGI, the movie stays very warm and inviting even when the subject matter and mood is less-than-friendly. This is also owed to the audio aspects of the picture; the voice talents involved are highly engaging and enjoyable, even in the English dubbed version, which features such big western names as Billy Bob Thornton, Minnie Driver, Billy Crudup, Clare Danes and Gillian Anderson. Joe Hisaishi\'s music is also a rather splendid complement to the film.\n\nOverwhelming success of the anime production in Japan alone stands as a testament to its fine quality. Breaking a 15 year record held by Spielberg\'s "E.T.", "Princess Mononoke" became Japan\'s No. 1 movie of all time in the year of its release, as well as taking the title of best-selling video/DVD of all time. It is also the most expensive animated Japanese feature in history, reaching a budget of 2.4 billion. Outside of its home-country, however, the film continues to inspire and engage audiences from all corners of the globe, taking a well-deserved place in the list of cult-favorites for film-lovers everywhere.', u'0.48606', u"This magnificent cartoon movie concerns Japanese legends , it begins when Ashikata, a prince warrior is wounded by a cursed giant boar . He attempts to encounter some way to heal incurable curse inflicted . Ashikata saddled in his red deer goes to the east, where finds the Iron Town , ruled by Lady Ebosi confronting Sam , the princess Mononoke, a human girl raised by wolves . Ashikata encounters in the middle of fighting among the forest animals : large wolves, giant boars and humans : emperor Mikado soldiers , Lady Ebosi soldiers and Shogun army . Furthermore, in the forest finds the deer god and spirits called Kodamas .\n\nThis wonderful film is plenty of fantasy , adventures, drama, spectacular combats and with ecological message . The picture is narrated with sensibility and sense of wonder and quite entertaining, though isn't apt for small kids but contains graphic violence . It's a deep critical about nature exploiting and killing the forests for the encroaching civilization represented by an iron mining town that cause a damage environment . This stunning film, though a bit too long, converted the first of any kind to gross over the box office in Japan and around the world. The motion picture was splendidly realized by Hayao Miyazaki , he personally corrected or redrew more than 80,000 of the film's 144,000 animation cels . Being accompanied by sensitive music score composed by his usual musician , Joe Hisaishi. Miyazaki also directed other excellent cartoon movies as \xa8Howl's moving castle\xa8 , \xa8Chihiro\xa8 , \xa8Porco Rosso\xa8 and \xa8My neighbour Tororo\xa8 . Rating : Sensational and fantastic , it's a masterpiece cartoon movie.", u'0.0945268', u'\nIf, like me, your heart sinks at the prospect of another pious, sanctimonious, tub-thumping eco-fable, give "Mononoke Hime" a chance all the same. It does have a distinct, and far from subtle, ecological message, of the "can\'t we just live together?" variety, but on the other hand it\'s far from clear that the answer the film suggests is "yes", and there are plenty of nuances and subtleties along the way. More to the point, there\'s a proper story, well-conceived and well told, there\'s a memorable, beautiful and violent world, credible characters and a good deal of charm.\n\nThe animation is mostly very fluent and careful, though not flashy in the way we\'re getting used to in this CG age. ("Mononoke" uses cgi, but subtly and with restraint, so that the feel remains that of a group of traditional craftsmen under one guiding hand). Quite often one finds that there are more static elements in a tableaux than you\'d expect in a Disney animated feature, but I think this is an aesthetic choice rather than a mere economy: it stylizes and formalizes, while focussing attention on the important elements in the frame. But there is occasional jerkiness, though not enough to detract seriously, and perhaps it wouldn\'t trouble audiences whose frame of reference isn\'t so western as mine - I\'m not sure.\n\nTalking of the western and eastern sensibilities, the Region 2 DVD which I\'m reviewing gives you a choice of English and Japanese dialogue, and though I\nwatched the American dub first, I\'d generally prefer the Japanese version, for the key roles of Ashitaka and San. Billy Crudup is appealing but too low-key, and Clare Danes strikes me as badly miscast: she sounds a bit too old, and altogether too urban to bring out the core of wildness or the steely sense of loyalty to her world. Like other reviewers, I have trouble with the Texas drawl of Billy Bob Thornton, which is just too regionally specific to match the look of the character (please understand that I\'m not suggesting the cast should all have done fake Japanese accents!). On the other hand, it\'s pretty much a toss-up between Yuko Tanaka and Minnie Driver (who\'s very closely attuned to the aesthetic of the original) as Eboshi, and Gillian Anderson and Jada Pinkett Smith are just right. Still, overall you get more vividness and conviction from the original voice cast.  Oddly, the lip-sync seems more approximate in the Japanese version, perhaps a fault in the synchronization on the R2 DVD.  The subtitles unfortunately but understandably come from Neil Gaiman\'s adaptation of the screenplay rather than re-translating the Japanese - one\'s aware, for example, that Gaiman has added bits of extra, explanatory dialogue.\n\nWith all that out of the way, let\'s concentrate on what makes the film work: it delineates a world that\'s at once mythological and believable, and refuses to sentimentalize or simplify (even if it occasionally allows itself to preach).  There are feuds and failures of trust not just between the humans and the animals, but within each world - and the animals seem as ready as the humans to exclude the other from their world. Indeed the conceit of the film seems to be that language, rather than being a product of distinctly human evolution, was originally shared among mammals at least, and it\'s as the war with the humans goes on that the animal kingdom becomes more brutish and less coherent. For all the prince\'s idealism and the delicate rapprochement some of the characters inch towards, one gets the impression that the logic of conflict will be hard to resist.\n\nPerhaps the most appealing and intriguing element in this world is the kodoma: the little, voiceless tree-spirits seem to be a cross-between a mushroom, a toddler and a rattle, and I defy anyone not to be captivated by them.\n', u'0.188879', u'This is one the best movies Hayao Miyazaki has ever made. Absolutely wonderful job. The plot was at first a bit confusing, this is a movie that you have to watch more than twice: Its hard to get at first.\n\nWith beautiful backgrounds, carefully chosen seiyuus, Mononkoe Hime entertains both adults and kids.\n\nThe first time I watched Princess Mononoke, I was a bit confused about the characters. I wasn\'t sure what was going on, and who was this movie about again, who is this "Mononoke Hime". But as I watched this movie over and over again, the plot started opening, and I began to understand and realize things I didn\'t notice before. \n\nI have always loved the way Miyazaki draws his characters expressions. Unlike some other anime movies I\'ve seen, Miyazakis characters are more easier to read. And this is where the difference of reality and cartoons steps in. Its easy to overdo your characters expressions, and so spoil the movie, and make it look stupid, even childish. This isn\'t a mistake that Miyazaki would do. A big bonus for that!\n\nMononkoe Hime surpasses even the famous "Nausicaa, the valley of the wind". Im totally impressed!', u'0.179588'], u'tt0045152': [u'\nI don\'t like musicals. They never made any sense to me. Don\'t get me wrong, I love music; it\'s an important part of my life. I love movies also, and while the two often compliment each other, sometimes I\'m repelled. It\'s probably the dancing. A person breaking into a complicated dance number, seemingly unaware of their surroundings, or worse yet, in complete synch with a complete stranger is like making fun of the movie, as if to say, "Please don\'t take us seriously, we like to sing and dance." Or even more ridiculous, "Let\'s not fight, let\'s settle this dispute with a song and dance." Forget about suspension of disbelief.\n\nThis film however, I manage to enjoy. I once was given the task of my film teacher to watch the film and keep track of all the cuts in the film. Well, sometime after ten minutes I lost track because I was so wrapped up in the story. It really is an interesting period in the history of cinema, told well, and with well placed song and dance numbers that at times drag on, but that seems to be more of an excuse to show off the technicolour than anything else. They build you up to it slowly. The first few numbers don\'t break out at an inappropriate time. It doesn\'t last though, but by then they\'ve got you.\n\nWith such memorable tunes as these, it\'s hard to imagine them going wrong. When Gene Kelly sings the title piece, somehow time stands still as you\'re swept up in one of the most memorable scenes in film history. Just reading the title in print has likely caused you to hum a few bars, or sing a few words. Or maybe, just maybe, walk out without an umbrella when you know it\'s raining. One thing\'s for sure, if all Gene Kelly did was choreograph the dance numbers, he more than deserves the co-directing credit he has.\n\nThey simply don\'t make films like this anymore. Which in some ways is a testament to the film\'s theme and narrative. The business of show is constantly in a state of evolution. The narrative portrays a time period when silent films were being replaced by "talkies" with sound, yet the musical genre itself has almost all but disappeared with the exception of animated films with musical numbers, and rare live-action pieces.\n\nOne might speculate that Hollywood overdid the musical. Personally, I can\'t get into them. Most of the time it seems like a drawn out affair, but this film is something special. Considering my feelings about musicals, it would have to take a film of this one\'s caliber to make me sit up and take notice.\n', u'-0.15597', u'Don Lockwood (Gene Kelly) and Lina Lamont (Jean Hagen) are a famed Hollywood duo, making films at the tail end of the silent era. The studio has been issuing PR suggesting that they\'re a romantic item. In reality, they can barely stand one another. One night, while on the town with his best friend Cosmo Brown (Donald O\' Connor), Lockwood has to run to escape fans who want a piece of him badly enough that they\'ll literally rip his clothes to shreds. He hops over a number of moving vehicles and ends up in the passenger seat of Kathy Selden\'s (Debbie Reynolds) car. Lockwood seems immediately taken with her, but she gives him the cold shoulder. She says she\'s an actress with a love of theater, and she looks down on film acting. Later, Lockwood discovers that she was inflating the truth a bit, as he sees Selden performing as a cute song & dance girl at an industry party he\'s attending. She runs out of the party and Lockwood chases after her, but he\'s too late. While he tries to track her down, he, Lamont and their studio have to deal with the changing nature of film in 1927--made much more difficult by the fact that Lamont may look glamorous, but she talks more like Fran Drescher in "The Nanny" (1993).\n\nAside from the more serious aspects of the plot, Singing in the Rain is a great success as a romance and a musical. It also has an astoundingly rich Technicolor look, and it is charmingly humorous. Kelly and Reynolds click on screen, even if offscreen Kelly, who also co-directed and co-choreographed, was famously difficult to work with--he drove Reynolds so hard (she was a much more inexperienced dancer) that her feet literally started bleeding at one point. The songs are great, they\'re worked into the story well--which is perhaps surprising given that most of them weren\'t written specifically for this film--and the choreography is impeccable, frequently jaw dropping and always aesthetically wondrous and sublime. If for nothing else, the film is worth a look for its often-athletic dance numbers, which can resemble Jackie Chan\'s showy martial arts stunts as much as dancing. It\'s also imperative viewing for cultural literacy in the realm of film.\n\nBut the more serious aspects of the plot are fascinating as well. In a significant way, Singing in the Rain is about film technology. Film technology is the hinge of the plot, after all. The climax and d\xe9nouement are decided by the advent of synchronized sound in the film industry. We see studio head R.F. Simpson (Millard Mitchell) demonstrating sound films at the party where Lockwood sees Selden for the second time, providing two big turning points at once. There are sequences of actors heading off to diction coaches, as happened in reality once sound entered the scene, and also in reality as in the film some actor\'s careers were jeopardized by having to suddenly master a new skill.\n\nBut Singing in the Rain is about technology on another level, too. Kelly and co-director Stanley Donen go to great lengths to ensure that the film is an exemplar of state-of-the-art film technology in 1952. For example, the beautiful Technicolor cinematography is emphasized by the fabulously colorful costumes and production design--they\'re showing off cutting edge color. The sound is as good as it could be in 1952, and the fact that this is a musical helps show that off. The sets and effects are complex and an attempt is made to show them off as well.\n\nDonen and Kelly often play up the artificiality of the sets and effects to emphasize artistry and technology. This is clearly shown in the "Make \'Em Laugh" sequence (and surrounding events) and the extended "Broadway Rhythm Ballet" sequence with Cyd Charisse. Showing off this artistry and technology also occurs very subtly, as with the rain in the "Singing in the Rain" sequence. Even today, rain machines are frequently employed in a way that it appears to be raining on film, but in reality, it\'s just enough coverage to produce the illusion. In the "Singing in the Rain" sequence, they make sure that you can see the whole area is getting flooded, and they use Gene Kelly\'s umbrella, as torrents of water bounce off of it, to emphasize that no matter where he goes, "rain" is pouring down on him.\n\nWhile there are many musicals I like as much as Singing in The Rain, this is one of the better-loved examples of that genre, and for good reason. Any musical lover has surely seen this already, and if not, they should run out now and pick it up on DVD. If you\'re relatively unfamiliar with classic Hollywood musicals, this is one of the best places to start.', u'0.355805', u"\nMany good things can be and have been said about this one and they're all true.  It's a great movie.  The title number gives us Don Lockwood (Kelly)...In love as no other person has ever been in love, no doubt.  He steps out the door and it's raining but he's oblivious to the rain.  Who needs an umbrella when you've got wings on your heart and on your feet? Not the incomparable Gene Kelly as he treats us to THE single finest moment in the history of cinema.  Do not miss this one.", u'0.299361', u'This isn\'t my all time favorite (that goes to "Meet me in St. Louis") but this is definitely in the top 10. This is a fictitous musical comedy of the 1920s when silent films became "talkies". It chronicles how it affects Don Lockwood (Gene Kelly), his leading lady Lina Lamont (Jean Hagen), best friend Cosmo (Donald O\'Connor) and Lockwood\'s new girlfriend Kathey Selden (Debbie Reynolds). Problem is Lina has a voice that can cut glass and doesn\'t like lockwood falling for Selden...\n\nThis movie has one highlight after another. Almost all the numbers are great--the title tune, "Make \'Em Laugh", "Beautiful Girl", "Good Morning" on and on. My two favorites are two short ones: "Fit as a Fiddle" which has incredible dancing from Kelly and O\'Connor and "Would You?" at the end. Kelly isn\'t that good acting (he never was) but his dancing is superb; Reynolds (only 19 when she did this) is beautiful, energetic and full of life; Hagen is uproarious as Lamont (she was nominated for an Academy Award--she should have won!) and O\'Connor is just great as Cosmo (his "Make Em\' Laugh" number has astounding dancing). It\'s hard to believe that Reynolds and O\'Connor hated working with Kelly (he was obnoxious, VERY demanding and a tyrant)--it\'s a credit to their acting that it never comes through.\n\nI only have one (small) complaint--the big, elaborate production number with Cyd Charisse in the middle. It LOOKS great and colorful--but it brings the film to a screeching halt and is way too long. After it ends I have trouble remembering where the film left off! Still, that\'s a small problem. This remains one of the 10 best movie musicals ever made. HIGHLY recommended!', u'0.138678', u"\nOne thing I noticed in reading the comments of this movie is that nobody recognized the screenplay by Betty Comden and Adolph Green. Without their screenplay the movie does not get made. It is a great script that was made better by Gene Kelly and Stanley Donens' fluid direction. Everything in this movie glides effortlessly. Throw in dancing by Donald O'connor, Debbie Reynolds, Cyd Charisse and of course Gene Kelly, Great songs and the willingness of producer Arthur Freed to let the creative people to do their thing and you have a classic.", u'0.262603', u'Singin\' in the Rain is one of the best movies ever made. The film is beautiful, tuneful, and loads of fun. While it pokes fun at Hollywood it also does so with great love. Little bits and pieces of Hollywood lore find their way into this great film and it\'s a pleasure to get the joke or recognize the real star they\'re referring to.\n\nThe star trio is just perfect: Gene Kelly give a funny performance as the hammy silent actor; Donald O\'Connor makes the most of his "second banana" role; Debbie Reynolds is perfect as the ing\xe9nue trying to break into films. \n\nThe three stars perform many memorable numbers, including Kelly\'s "Singin\' in the Rain" classic; all three in the "Good Mornin\'" number; O\'Connor\'s "Make \'Em Laugh"; and Kelly and Reynolds in "You Were Meant for Me." The masterpiece however may be the "Gotta Dance" production number with Kelly and Cyd Charisse\x97just perfect. Also great fun are O\'Connor and Kelly in "Fit as a Fiddle" and "Moses Supposes."\n\nThere are of course other production numbers, including the montage that shows Hollywood\'s race to transition to talkies, a scene that ends in the "Beautiful Girl" number featuring Jimmy Thompson. \n\nJean Hagen (as Lina Lamont) won an Oscar nomination and steals the film in a classic comedy performance. Also good are Millard Mitchell, Douglas Fowley, Rita Moreno, King Donovan, Kathleen Freeman, Mae Clarke, Julius Tannen, and Madge Blake.\n\nThe great trick to this film is that while Reynolds is supposedly "lip syncing" for Hagen, it\'s really Hagen\'s voice that Reynolds is miming to as in the "I Would, Would You" number. The final miming act is Hagen mouthing "Singin\' in the Rain" is really Reynolds. It gets so confusing you can\'t tell who is lip syncing whose voice.\n\nLots of Hollywood lore retold in this film. Hagen\'s Lamont character is a veiled reference to Norma Talmadge, who supposedly failed in talkies because of her New York accent. It\'s also a reference to Louise Brooks, whose talkie debut in The Canary Murder Case was all dubbed. When Kelly screams "I LOVE YOU" it\'s a reference to John Gilbert in is talkie debut flop. His Glorious Night. Kathleen Freeman\'s diction coach character is a reference to Constance Collier, who returned to Hollywood as a coach. And on it goes.\n\nA great film!', u'0.429402', u'\nGene Kelly and Stanley Donen have produced the best musical written directly for the screen. They have used the period in film history during the transition to sound movies and embroidered it with the wonderful songbook of Arthur Freed and Nacio Herb Brown. The icing on the cake, of course is the choreography of Kelly and Donen. From the first moment, the movie takes flight as Kelly relates the tale of his rise as a silent film star with his sidekick, the incomparable Donald O\'Connor. Watch the flying feet of O\'Connor and Kelly in the "Fit as a Fiddle" number. It doesn\'t get much better than this. Everyone is familiar with the classic "Singin\' in the Rain" sequence. Donald O\'Connor\'s hysterical "Make \'em Laugh" number is probably the funniest musical three minutes on film. Even the Broadway Ballet is a kaleidoscope of color and movement, with a minimum of the highbrow balletic choreography found in the later "An American in Paris."\n\nWhat makes "Singin\'" such an entertaining classic is its superb integration of comedy and music. Jean Hagen gives the performance of her life as the vocally challenged silent film star, Lena Lamont. Every scene she\'s in is a comic gem. Her "fingernails on a blackboard" voice and massacre of the English language make her a figure of ridicule. However, in the end when she finally gets her comeuppance, one can\'t help feeling a little sorry for her.\n\nThis delightful film has been given its due on video. On VHS it can be purchased with the complete remastered soundtrack on CD. The laserdisc versions include one with commentary by film historian Ronald Haver (Criterion) and the film-only version from MGM/UA Home Video with a restored Dolby Digital stereo soundtrack., Last,but not least,is a masterful rendering on DVD with, unfortunately, no supplementary material to speak of.\n\nThis is truly a film for all time that can be watched just for its entertainment value and studied as probably the apex of the Hollywood musical in its Golden Age.\n', u'0.353253', u'\nThis is my favorite movie musical with no stage forebear.\n\nConsider what\'s in the mix: A cachet of songs, all tried-and-true from other movies. A cast that was at the top of its form, all the way from Kelly himself to the supporting leads played by Rita Moreno and Millard Mitchell. A script that is, at once, romantic and exciting and sharp and funny.\n\nStir together with a generous heaping of MGM color and a dash of a director with a stellar pedigree and the result is, well, something like "Singin\' in the Rain."\n\nThere\'s not a misstep in the movie\'s entire 103-minute running time. I love the pokes at early filmmaking ("She never *did* figure out where that microphone was, boss!") and the sheer energy of the musical numbers ("Fit as a Fiddle," "Good Mornin\'").\n\nNot only that, but there\'s not a more romantic scene in all of filmdom that can compare with Reynolds and Kelly dancing to "You Were Meant for Me." Their side-by-side tap dancing says more about how they feel about each other than pages and pages of dialog.\n\nGreat stuff!\n\nIf you think this movie is just the sequence of Kelly splashing like a five-year-old in a puddle, you obviously haven\'t seen the entire film. Do so--now! You won\'t regret it!\n\nPS: In the "rent-this-too" category, if you\'ve seen and love "Singin\' in the Rain," check out "The Band Wagon." It skewers the world of theater in much the same way as this film roasts Hollywood!', u'0.634368', u'The transition from the silent film era to the newly arrived technique of the \'talkies\' proved to be the ruin for many well established stars that were great on the screen, but who had no professional training in the theater, or otherwise, and had horrible speaking voices. Thus, a star of the magnitude of Lina Lamont, suffers a hard blow to her career and ego.\n\nThat\'s the basis of one of the best movies about old Hollywood of all times: "Singin\' in the Rain". The film is one of the classics it is because of the marvelous direction of Gene Kelly and Stanley Donen, two men who knew a lot about musicals. The screen play is by one of the best people in the business, Betty Comden and Adolph Green.\n\nMGM was the studio that employed all the stars one sees in the film, and what a cast they put together: Gene Kelly, Donald O\'Connor, Debbie Reynolds, Jean Hagen, Cyd Charisse in a dancing part, Millard Mitchell and Rita Moreno. As if those names weren\'t big enough, there is the fantastic musical numbers that even, viewing them today, have kept their freshness because of the care in which this film was crafted.\n\n"Singin\' in the Rain" is one of the best musicals of all times. It\'s right up there with the best of them thanks to the vision of Gene Kelly and Stanley Donen and it will live forever as more people discover this wonderful example of entertainment.', u'0.333105', u'I\'m going to confine my comments about "Singin\' in the Rain" to the "Broadway Rhythm" sequence where Cyd Charisse steals the movie without saying a word. In my view, Charisse, who is still gorgeous at 83, was the quintessential movie dancer of the 1950s. Her height, elegance, aloofness and those impossibly long legs -- along with an uncanny ability to match her style to that of her partner -- makes watching her dance a mesmerizing experience.\n\nMany have said that the two numbers in "Singin\' in the Rain" that feature Charisse probably belong in another movie. I don\'t know\x85 as the flapper in jade, she sexes up Kelly\'s rube character to a steamy height unusual in movies of that era. In a dance full of wonderful moves, my favorite comes after she\'s left him with her cigarette holder. She sashays away from him, blowing on her nails in studied boredom. She\'s gotten some distance away, and as she tosses her right hand back, he throws down the cigarette holder, grabs her hand and brings her flying up to his chest, where she proceeds to slide down Kelly\'s thigh to the floor for one of several prone positions she takes during this duet, from which she returns to a standing position with amazing grace. I\'m not wild about dances that rely heavily on props, but this one does so very effectively: they\'re amusing and they reinforce character.\n\nAnd thank heaven for the artistic control that allowed Kelly to keep the "crazy veil" number in the picture. Charisse has discussed that dance, where she got to show off her early ballet training, most charmingly for a "Word of Mouth" feature on TCM. She and others have noted over the years that the wind machines required to keep that impossibly long veil moving and undulating between and above her and Kelly made filming a nightmare. But it looks effortless, on a set that is a subtle optical illusion\x97not as deep nor as sloped as it appears to be.\n\nBoth dances end the same way. Whether she\'s a cheap gangster\'s moll in garish green or a Grecian goddess in white, less obviously in a mobster\'s sway, Charisse is invariably lured back to reality by proffered baubles and menacingly tossed coins. But at the end of the crazy veil number, she\'s the one tossing the coins.\n\nWonderful.', u'0.164808', u'"Singin\' in the Rain" could be considered on the top of movie musicals... It is fresh, imaginative and enjoyable...\n\nArthur Freed wrote the lyrics to the songs and they were excellent, specially the title number "Singin\' in the Rain" which Stanley Kubrick repeated it in his black comedy "A Clockwork Orange," in 1971...\n\nBut the mysterious power of "Singin\' in the Rain" remains in the script, written by Betty Comden and Adolph Green whose sprightly adaptation were also shown in musicals like "On the Town," "It Always Fair Weather," and "Bells Are Ringing." The film is a brilliant musical, the best picture by far of Hollywood in transition...\n\nIt is a gentle satire on the movie modes and manners of the twenties, put together around the problem that faced several actors and studios in their transition from silent films to talkies... This transition is in reality horror and shock to several film stars who failed for not having enough way of speaking, effective word order between image and voice...\n\n"Singin\' in the Rain" is the story of a wildly funny sex goddess played by Jean Hagen who steals the classic as an aggressive no-talent squeaky-voiced silent-screen goddess forced to use blackmail to keep her star in the Hollywood sky\x85 Jean was in love with Kelly who wanted to substitute her by the talented chorus girl Debbie Reynolds.. \n\n"Singin\' in the Rain" is rich in the brilliant way in which it is written and done... Its three production numbers are extraordinary, illuminating the picture with different forms of entertainment and bright colors\x85 The big number \'Broadway Ballet,\' is a surrealistic extravaganza filled with magic, huge cast, spectacular use of light, color, costumes and sets, plus a marvelous ballet danced by Kelly and Cyd Charisse...\n\nGene Kelly became legendary as a choreographer and director... With Stanley Donen, in addition to "Singin\' in the Rain," he made "On the Town," and "It\'s Always Fair Weather." Taken all together, they are constituent element to surpass most of musical achievement...', u'0.35587', u"\nSpoilers herein.\n\nThis is a nearly perfect film from my perspective: It feels naturally improvised. Its episodes are radically discontinuous, but feel like fluid transitions. It has some great numbers, including the incomparable Cyd Charisse.\n\nBut what really puts this on my `must see' list is the deep self-reference. Superficially, it is a movie about a movie, but actually the folding is a whole lot more complex, even psychedelic. The narrative structure is flashbacks, flashforwards, about the movie, IS the movie, about the fooling behind the movie (oddly, Debbie's non-movie songs were dubbed by someone else!). It has nested abstractions, and encompassing ones. It has several manner of annotative features. And the internal movie itself grows while we watch to have internal nesting of different types: the original costume drama becomes a vision from a modern newcomer whacked on the head. And further, there is the Charisse number which is another abstraction.\n\n\nThere were precessors: `Kane' (41) introduced the use of many parallel narrative devices, `Children of Paradise' (45) had conflated reality and performance: `Red Shoes' (48) took it to dance, and those are must see as well. But here, the technique becomes visual jazz improvisations on reality. Thrilling.\n\nNone of the people involved ever came close on other projects. Odd.\n\nTed's evaluation: 4 of 4 -- Every visually literate person should experience this.", u'0.378968', u'This is one of those handful of films that is universally loved and respected and I have to join the crowd on that. For over 50 years it has been considered the best musical ever made and I can\'t argue with that, either, especially with the newly- restored DVD version that came out a short time ago. The film never looked and sounded better!\n\nIn a nutshell, the reason for the high praise, I would think would be: 1 - Likable lead characters (Debbie Reynolds, Gene Kelly, Donald O\'Connor); 2 - Excellent song-and-dance numbers, capped off by one of the most famous of all-time, the title song "Singin\' In the Rain," featuring Kelly; 3 - Very good humor throughout the film, aided by Jean Hagen\'s dumb blonde imitation, which may be the best ever put on film; 4 - Spectacular color (please get this latest 2-disc DVD), and 5 - of course, simply a very entertaining film start-to-finish.\n\nA few side comments: Kelly gets the legacy with his title song dance but O\'Connor\'s dancing in here is just as good. In fact, one of his solo routines reportedly exhausted him so much he could not work for five days. A nice bonus is seeing Cyd Charisse in here, showing off her dancing skills and great legs.', u'0.461186', u'Can you imagine? Me, a film lover since the age of six, hadn\'t seen "Singing In The Rain" until last night. I had read and heard so much about it over the years that I knew I was going to be disappointed. As a musical I\'ve never seen anything so perfectly "in tune" I can see how many directors have been influenced by the soul of this gorgeous movie. I\'ve seen even Federico Fellini here. The tap routine with Gene Kelly and Donald O\'Connor is so energizing that I wanted to see it again and again. The fantasy number with Gene Kelly and Cyd Charisse is breathtaking, breathtaking! How extraordinary to see Debiee Reynolds going through the contagious (Good morning!Good morning!) I had seen her a few nights before as Grace\'s mother in "Will and Grace" She hasn\'t lost her zest. I\'m sure I\'ll be seeing this movie many times and I intend to show it to very young people from the post MTV generation and I\'m betting with myself that they\'re going to love it. Greatness is timeless.', u'0.605732', u"Definitely one of the most genuinely feel-good films I've ever seen. For a musical, it did not fit the mold of being a bit on the corny side. And some musical films I've seen are a bit stale, but this one is far from that label. I was just beginning to see Gene Kelly's work (I had first seen An American in Paris--which is another gem) and I was captivated by his energy and how overall talented he is. Definitely a great dancer of his time. It was also the first film I saw of Debbie Reynolds' earlier work. It is very clear why it's considered one of the best films of all time. It's witty, romantic, charming, and contains beautiful musical numbers. I definitely recommend it to be an addition to anyones film collection.", u'0.555397'], u'tt0086879': [u'\nAmadeus is an extremely well written story, covering the last ten years of Mozart\'s massively prolific yet unusual life.  I have read much that it paints a rather inaccurate picture of the genius\'s life, and yet I am not dissuaded from ranking this film as one of the greatest made.  The historical problem should be addressed first, because it draws the most criticism.  I would advise anyone to shut out the self-righteous whining of those people who fancy themselves as Mozart experts, when they really have little solid evidence for their assertions.  History is only seen by us in fragments, be they documents or eye witness accounts.  These fragments certainly do not amount to a full picture of events, and so Milos Forman and Peter Schaeffer are perfectly entitled to form their own story of genius.\n\nThis issue aside, the picture is one of fantastic colour and scale, crammed with lavish costumes and wonderful architecture.  This keeps the eyes occupied, but the ears get the biggest reward.  The film uses a large amount of Mozart\'s music, and does so in a way which is carefully considered. For example, when the insane and enfeebled Antonio Salieri (F. Murray Abraham) reminisces on the sheer beauty of Mozart\'s compositions, we hear music to match his words, "And there... an oboe, high and unwavering... until a clarinet takes over, and forms a phrase of such longing..."  The effect is deeply moving.  Examples of this collaboration of music and picture are many; when Mozart (Tom Hulce) swaggers through the streets of Vienna taking swigs from a bottle of wine, we hear a jolly piano concerto; and he is hurled into a mass grave to the sorrowful Lacrimosa of his requiem mass. The music should move any viewer, however much they confess to hating anything classical.  If you haven\'t seen this film, watch, or rather listen, for the scene where Salieri inspects samples of Mozart\'s music.  The originality in switching the music as he turns the pages is profound. The acting is superb, particularly from Abraham.  Hulce\'s cackle provides comic relief, and his wonderfully child-like mannerisms are testament not only to his acting skills, but to Forman\'s exceptional direction and vision. On the other hand, we are shown two moments of antithesis, namely when he is composing at his billiards table (his face taking on a look of such mature concentration), and when he is dictating his Confutatis to Salieri. Yes, we do get to see Mozart compose, and talk about tonic, dominant, second measures, etc.  I would have preferred to have seen more of his thought processes though, because Forman\'s glimpse of how Mozart applied his genius is extremely exciting to watch, but short lived. Characterisations are brilliantly engineered.  Salieri is scheming and yet outwardly indifferent to Mozart.  We can see that he loves the music of his superior, and yet is torn apart by his own inadequacy.  Inadequacy is a fitting word for Salieri\'s skill as portrayed by Forman, who wanted to give the greatest contrast possible in terms of the virtuosity of the two men, without making Salieri look like a complete cretin.  He is, after all, known as maestro Salieri.  Constanze Mozart (Elizabeth Berridge) is on first appearances a giggling girl, and yet through the course of the film we are shown that she is very shrewd, and is ruthless when dealing with finance. Roy Dotrice\'s Leopold Mozart has a masterful air, and maintains an oppressive paternal hold over his son even after his death, the analogy being the use of an enveloping cloak.  The cloak is used as part of Leopold\'s street wear, but is also part of the costume of the statue in the first showing of Don Giovanni, where Salieri is certain that the imposing figure of the giant statue represents the recently deceased Leopold.  In short, Forman presents us with a marvelous psychological essay on weakness and power, both superficial and real.  This is obviously no average biographical motion picture, but a film conceived with an intelligence nearing that of it\'s subject. We are shown Mozart\'s virtuosity several times, which again provides wonderful excitement.  He not only plays variations of his music thought up on the spot (at the party scene) but plays them in the styles of other composers, upside down.  He infuriates Salieri by arranging a welcoming march actually written for Mozart (and taken to be wonderful by the Italian up to this point), showing off his outstanding skills whilst looking around at the assembled courtiers and cackling with glee.  Those who have watched this scene with me have either laughed or smiled in sheer wonderment at a majestic combination of music, acting and direction. This film is a gem, combining sometimes ridiculous comedy with deep tragedy.  On the negative side, it would benefit opera buffs more than concert goers, because opera is the dominant musical genre of the movie. (Specially designed opera productions have been woven into the film; greatly extending it\'s length but adding that extra colour and vibrancy).  The film becomes heavy and slow moving as it nears its astonishingly refreshing conclusion at the lunatic asylum, noticeable largely due to the contrast with a lighter beginning.  This may test the patience of some viewers, but once the credits roll, I guarantee that the majority of those who have watched Amadeus will be struck by the passing of such a wonderfully colourful and rewarding masterpiece, and will not want to move from their seats until the tranquil piano concerto fades away.  The film deserves all its eight Oscars, and I give it 9 out of 10.', u'0.349461', u'\nOH! This movie is WONDERFUL, this movie is BEAUTIFUL! I just love it, and not because of my fixation on Mozart, but because it is a beautifully made, completely moving work of art.\n\nWhat many people do not seem to understand is that the film is entirely Salieri\'s--it is NOT in any way about Mozart himself, nor is it a biography about the composer. It is about Salieri\'s madness and obsession WITH Mozart, and yet because the character of Mozart is played so unforgettably by Tom Hulce in such an unconventional performance, the viewer takes most notice of him and will think him the central figure. The film chooses to highlight the comparison of mediocrity versus genius; Mozart is obviously the better of the two composers, and Salieri can see his own mediocrity and recognize his inferiority to Mozart so well that he is driven insane. Watch the film again; while it is true much biographical information about Mozart\'s life is given while telling us relatively little on Salieri\'s, you will see that the purpose of this is only to highlight Mozart\'s genius, his natural and uncanny abilities that come so easily to him. We see how his life affects Salieri\'s directly and we see Salieri old in his wheelchair, long after Mozart has died, still being affected by it.\n\nOne might say "Then WHY is it called \'Amadeus?\'" as that is Mozart\'s middle name, and naming the film after him would certainly cause one to believe that the central figure would have the title (was not "Forrest Gump" about Forrest Gump?) But why, then, "Amadeus?" Why not "Mozart" or "Wolfgang," the only names he is referred to as in the movie? Look at the connotative meaning of the name "Amadeus:" In Latin it means "Loved by God." It\'s so perfect, so fitting that this should be the title; Peter Schaffer could not have asked for better! Not only does Salieri throughout the entirety of the movie express his disdain for Mozart, but he keeps coming back to God: "Why does God not give me talent? Why Mozart? Why does God love him, but not me?" Indeed, Mozart IS loved by God, if God\'s love is shown through gifts and abilities. "Amadeus" does not stand for Mozart himself, but for a major theme expressed throughout the film.\n\nOh, the themes, motifs, symbolism and hidden meanings! But what of the movie itself? The brilliant acting, the beautiful dresses and jackets, the unforgettable scenes? F. Murray Abraham is perfectly cast in this perfectly acted role; he grimaces and holds back hatred so perfectly, and nothing about his performance makes you think he is acting. Tom Hulce as Mozart is wonderful-most will remember his annoying laugh that bursts forth at the most inappropriate of times. The most memorable scene occurs at the end, when Mozart is on his deathbed, dictating his requiem to Salieri as Salieri struggles still to understand the brilliant notes flowing through Mozart\'s mind. The importance lies not in the fact that Mozart is dying (though his departure from the movie, for me, was quite traumatic) but in seeing how Salieri must have more of Mozart\'s work; he hates this man and yet he recognizes the brilliance of his music, a brilliance he will never posses. Some of the most enjoyable scenes depict productions of Mozart\'s operas; "The Abduction from the Seraglio" finale in the beginning is bright and joyous; "The Magic Flute" Queen of the Night aria scene is shown and contains of the most beautiful arias I have ever heard. Even if you don\'t like opera, you will be amazed at how high the soprano must sing.\n\nThis is just my absolute favorite movie, and I certainly did not analyze it like this the first time I saw it. I did not see everything either, the important themes and such, but every time I watched it I got more out of it. And it really is just so enjoyable, so funny, so perfect. The music, the actors-there is just something about them. Perhaps because none went on to be stars, and all you see is the movie, not the actors. I am basing everything on the original cut, not the new director\'s version, which I have seen, but I have entirely different things to say about it. The original is perfect as is. Watch it, you will see what I mean. You\'ll love it. I know I do!\n\n\n', u'0.272836', u'\nIn 1984, Saul Zaentz, Peter Shaffer and Milos Forman collaborated in bringing a truly remarkable life to the silver screen. The story of Wolfgang Amadeus Mozart, through the eyes of rival composer, Antonio Salieri. The film is complete with an insightful script (courtesy of Mr. Shaffer), magnificent acting, wondrous sets and costume designs, incredible choreography (thanks to Twyla Tharp), and, above all, the glorious music of Mozart himself.\n\nThe movie of Salieri\'s life, through which Mozart played an integral part, is told in flashback mode, beginning in around the year 1822. An old and perhaps emotionally disturbed Antonio Salieri attempts suicide, and in doing so, apologizes for killing Mozart some 31 years earlier. He survives and is admitted to an insane asylum, where he tells a young priest his tale of jealousy and mediocrity.\n\nThe priest is fascinated and alternately troubled by the lengthy and emotional story. Salieri tells of growing up in Italy with a father who did not care for music; and how he rejoiced for the chance to go to Vienna after his father\'s untimely death. He tells of how he first had met the young Mozart, and how immature and dirty minded Mozart was. He also tells of how "The Creature" had an intimate relationship with the girl that Salieri had cared for. Most importantly, however, he confided in the priest that he had learned to hate God for giving him a deep love of  music, only to deny him the talent to create truly memorable music. He thought God had given him Mozart to mock him. Salieri\'s heart filled with such rage, such hatred and such jealousy, that he had vowed to himself to make God an enemy and to kill the young Mozart.\n\nAs the movie moves along, carrying with it a deep sadness of the human condition, it also celebrates life by giving the audience joyous music, wonderful atmosphere and a general appreciation of humanity for not only eighteenth century Europe, but in any age where music speaks for our emotions.\n\nThe movie won eight Academy Awards in March of 1985. The only reason it did not win nine was that Tom Hulce was nominated for best actor instead of best supporting actor. He actually was in a supporting role, and in a strange twist of irony, F. Murray Abraham won the best actor statuette; citing probably the only time when Salieri beat out Mozart in anything.\n\nThe movie itself was shot in Prague where Milos Forman said "(It) is a gem because it\'s possible to pivot the camera a full three hundred and sixty degrees and never encounter a modern vision." Very few new sets had to be built, as the scenes and buildings they found were quite often apropos to their needs.\n\nAmadeus works well on virtually every cinematic plane that exists. It is a masterpiece that must be viewed multiple times to receive what the film has to offer. The emotions of humanity, through the eyes of the troubled Salieri, indeed speak for all of mediocrity. He is their champion and their king.', u'0.211663', u"\nOne of the greatest movies of all time. This is a movie that speaks for itself. Beautiful Cinematography and stellar performances by all especially F. Murray Abraham who carries the film. Tom Hulce was a terrific choice for this movie.  True this is historically incorrect but it doesn't matter this film works on so many different levels... the music ahhh the music. Mozart is pure genius and his music touches this film and everyone involved. You can just sense that Mozart's inspiration drove everyone on this film to perfection. A must see film for all!", u'0.664002', u"\nThe unseen star of this film is the Academy of St Martin's in the Field, London. Buy the soundtrack and you will be rewarded with some of the most stunning music you can hear. Mozart's music excells with brilliant treatment and dies with a bad performance. And that, after all, is what the film is about. Without his music, Mozart would be lost in time, a fate that the narrator of the story, the composer Salieri, saw as his own. Ironically, while Salieri has indeed been completely overshadowed by Mozart, his music still survives and has its followers.\n\nBut beyond the music this is an outstanding film. Set in the prettiest and most flamboyant century of the last millennium, it is visually stunning and the writer's portrayal of jealousy is perceptive. The casting of the Austrian King and courtiers, (indeed all the actors in this film) that Mozart needed to impress capture the gentility and courtesy of the time, and also subtly shows their growing indignation and impatience at Mozart's personality and behaviour; the presentation of Mozart as punk musician is probably the only failing in the film. As a theatrical device to show that genius can come in disastrous packages it succeeds well, but anyone with any historic sense of social ettiquette or manners will know that Mozart's sill y\nbehaviour would be well wide of the truth, as might, perhaps, be the concept of Salieri as murderer-in-chief. Only in the final scenes is Mozart's brilliance as a composer truly explored in what amounts to a deconstruction of his final composition - his moving, uncompleted and poignant Requiem mass.\n\nAnother unintended star in this film are the candle lit sets and theatres of the 18th Century; their operas and drama ooze a magic  that is lacking in the present world and which modern producers might well try to reintroduce; so lovely are these buildings with their flickering lights and theatrical techniques that one is left desperate to to seek out these rare theatres to experience them.\n\nThis film leaves one breathless from its visual beauty, its magnificent score and the choreography, indeed, of the two together. Mozart's life had the air of tragedy, and his undoubted genius speaks to us now and forever. This film is a monument to the skills of the writer, maker, performers and, of course, Mozart's music. If you have not yet done so, see it.", u'0.382095', u'\n"Amadeus", while historically inaccurate in numerous ways, is a brilliant film.  Its central character is not a man but an attribute of man at his most remarkable: genius.  Mozart\'s genius was at the highest level, on par with Shakespeare, Michelangelo and Balanchine.  Forman knew this when he undertook translating Peter Shaffer\'s play.  Although most of the acting is on a very high plane, the actors themselves are not top tier, not should they be.  A famous, easily recognizable actor would have detracted from the central thesis that genius is greater than the one on whom it has been entrusted.  Mozart was, of course, deeper than the character shown in the movie, but no personal life could equal the extent and depth of the musical genius that flowed from this little man.  The letters he sent to his father show a remarkable sensitivity and depth of understanding.  However, they are not paradigms of literary greatness.  The immense contribution of W. A. Mozart lay in some of the most sublime music ever written.  Fortunately, the film gave us snippets of some of the real gems in the Mozart canon: the great C Minor Mass, the Requiem and "Don Giovanni".  Forman realized that no human being will ever be great enough or have the background to pen such masterpieces without intervention from elsewhere.  This is certainly true of Shakespeare as well.  So what we have here, ultimately, is a celebration of genius, that great gift to mankind that nearly always proves to be too much for the person who is chosen to manifest it to the rest of us.  Many thanks to Milos Forman for the wisdom to keep out of the way and allow genius to shine through.  In that sense, "Amadeus" is an exercise in humility.  Few films come across as blessings for those who experience them.  "Amadeus" is one such film.\n', u'0.568322', u'Before I saw this movie, I respected Mozart\'s genius, but his music wasn\'t my cup of tea. Beethoven was more to my taste, I tended more toward heavier classics. But this movie moved me to tears, especially at the end when they did Mozart\'s REQUIEM while he was working on what was to be his last piece of music. Now, I\'m a Mozart fiend. This was a great movie. True, there are some historical inaccuracies. Anyone who has studied music history knows that Sallieri did not help Mozart with his Requiem. It was a student of his named Sussmayer. But it does make this story ironic, that the man who was so dedicated to the ruination of Mozart ended up helping him in the end. (I question the historical accuracy of that as well.) I recently bought the director\'s cut to this movie. Until I saw the director\'s cut, Sallieri seemed like a more sympathetic character, someone who just couldn\'t buy a break. Who can\'t identify with that? But after seeing the director\'s cut and seeing what I think is an important scene between Sallieri and Mozart\'s wife, he seemed more like a jerk. You also understand why Frau Mozart was so rude to Sallieri at the end of the movie, whereas before, you see the next to the last scene and you think, "Whoa! Where did this come from?" This was a great movie, for entertainment value only. If you want historical accuracy, watch a documentary or read a biography from the library or something. Because of this movie, I am now a rabid Mozart fan. If the movie can make Mozart converts, then it can\'t be bad at all.', u'0.0300879', u'\n"Amadeus" is a great film that is deep, thought-provoking, and overall exceptional.  The film deals with the last few months of Wolfgang Amadeus Mozart\'s (Oscar-nominee Tom Hulce) life, told in flashbacks by an old, washed-up musician named Antonio Salieri (Oscar-winner F. Murray Abraham).  Salieri tells of the genius, the ingenuity, and the insanity of the young musician who died mysteriously at the age of 35.  Salieri\'s jealousy may have led him to kill the young composer, but that is something that will never be known.  "Amadeus" is an interesting commentary that tries to fill holes in history and succeeds amazingly.  By mixing fact and probable fiction, the film-makers succeeded in creating a truly remarkable motion picture that is easily one of the best of the 1980s.  5 stars out of 5.\n', u'0.886316', u"\nAmadeus is one tremendous film. The acting was great. Tom Hulce did wonderful and I have only seen him once in a film and that was Animal House. The rest of the cast was great to like F. Murry Abraham did a terrific job in his performance. The music was brilliant, I have never seen a film with such great performances in their plays. I really did admire this movie, everything in it was very interesting and after I watched the film I did a little research on Mozart. The script and directing was superb and the cinematography was brilliant. I couldn't of asked for a better film than Amadeus. I'm glad I saw this film!\n\nHedeen's outlook: 10/10!! **** A+\n", u'0.566421', u"\nWhen the two worlds of Antonio Salieri and Wolfgang Amadeus Mozart collide in Milos Forman's Amadeus, it is anything but a symphony. As the court composer of the Emperor of Austria, all Salieri desires are fame and recognition as a composer; it is all he had wanted his whole life. When he learns that Mozart, whose name he had known as long as he can remember, is going to come to the court to play, Salieri cannot wait to meet the outstanding and righteous man that he knows he must be. However, when Salieri learns that Mozart is a young, crude, and unrefined young man, endowed with all the talent and ability that he ever wanted and strived for, it plants a seed of jealousy that soon grows into bitter resentment and hatred, not only for Mozart, but also towards God. Salieri's desire to get rid of him is seemingly boundless as he plots and schemes for Mozart's demise. It is no wonder why Amadeus won eight Academy Awards, including Best Picture, with 5-Star performances by F. Murry Abraham as Antonio Salieri and Tom Hulce as Mozart. Amadeus is an emotionally charged and tragic piece, a\nstory of the life of one of the world's most famous composers, as seen through the eyes of his worst enemy. ", u'0.421752', u"\nF. Murray Abraham portrays Salieri, a hard working but mediocre composer driven mad by the arrival of a ``natural'' talent, Mozart (played by Tom Hulce) in a highly political environment.  The movie provides some crucial insights into the motivations of the characters, and shows both a superficial image and reveals deeper truths (e.g. Mozart appears to party all the time, but is actually a very diligent worker). I am uncertain as to the historical accuracy, but this movie (i) was entertaining, (ii) inspired a greater love and knowledge of Mozart's Music, (iii) dramatized the undoing of a great talent by both external forces and his own weaknesses (iv) has great costumes and music and (v) has a great supporting cast.", u'0.665724', u"'Amadeus' won eight Academy Awards with its highly fictionalized account of the life of 18th-century composer Wolfgang Amadeus Mozart... The film explores the essence of our strength and weakness, our essay on love, our darker side as human beings... Both Mozart and Salieri were born with unusual talents, but were overcome by emotions of love, faith, hate, pride, rage, repugnance, envy and falseness...\n\nF. Murray Abraham gives a tremendous performance as Antonio Salieri, the forgotten composer of Vienna who unfairly compares his own skill to a better man in the field, harboring in his heart a violent and uncontrolled anger, causing the poison of his own malice... \n\nTom Hulce is remarkable as the over-excited genius, with a high-pitched giggle, whose unique music shows a continuous growth in expressive power...\n\nJeffrey Jones gives a delightful performance as the 'musical king' who does not censor things lightly...\n\nElizabeth Berridge is the perplexed and tempted woman who delivers the Court Composer a portfolio filled with her husband's manuscripts, and is horrified in hearing that 'some service deserves service in return.'\n\nChristine Ebersole is the young, high-spirited soprano, emotionally disturbed by Mozart's dramatic change...\n\nRichard Frank is the Chaplain, at the hospital, who hears Salieri's faults...\n\nRoy Dotrice is the menacing figure in a long, gray cape and dark gray hat...\n\nNicholas Kepros is the Prince-Archbishop of Salzburg who seems quite sure that Mozart has sold himself to Vienna...\n\nVincent Schiavelli is Salieri's valet who tries to tempt his master to open the door with a favorite dessert...\n\nCynthia Nixon is the young maid-servant who is invited to go to Mozart's house and offer her services... \n\nRoderick Cook is the harsh and highly correct Emperor's Chamberlain who makes certain to a passionate Mozart that a little modesty would suit him better... \n\nCharles Kay is the corpulent man, highly conscious of his position as Director of the Opera, who rips out several pages of Mozart's music...\n\nJonathan Moore is the kindly and educated Imperial Librarian who argues that opera is here to ennoble human spirits... \n\nSimon Callow is the impresario who asks the enchanted Amadeus to write for him a proper part with a couple of catchy songs, and he will guarantee him a 'luxurious triumph.'\n\nKenneth McMillan is the prosperous merchant who treats his dogs like his own children...\n\nOne of my favorite sequence is when a bewildered Mozart is received by the Emperor who is practicing a little March of Welcome composed by the illustrious Salieri... After some comments and remarks, Mozart, returns the manuscript back to the Emperor, and sits on the piano to play Salieri's musical composition demonstrating to the Emperor that he already had it in his head 'on one hearing only.' Mozart plays the first half of the march with great precision, then proceeds to modify the written score so that it turns out into a much better march... \n\nFilmed in Prague with a joyous music from Mozart's phenomenal repertoire, Milos Forman's 'Amadeus' is a masterpiece of drama intelligent and moving, handsomely filmed, competently directed, extremely well-acted, exquisitely mounted... The script gives a thought-provoking scenario that is clever, believable and interesting...", u'0.429834', u'\nWhat can I say that hasn\'t been said? Amadeus is a truly wonderful film, and as it is told from the point of view of an insane, elderly Salieri, I forgive it\'s historical inaccuracy. What I fail to understand is how the majority of people who watch this film and don\'t like it can say it\'s "stupid how Mozart dies". They seem to be under the impression that he died of working hard and stress, or just being driven mad. PAY ATTENTION PEOPLE! There are SO MANY scenes of Mozart drinking. There are scenes of him SNEAKING OUT to go drinking. There are scenes of his wife finding bottles littered around the house. Keep in mind that alcohol brewed in Vienna during Mozart\'s time was pretty potent stuff. History says Mozart died of an "unknown feverish illness", but it seems clear to me that the filmmaker was trying desperately to make the viewer see that his vision of Mozart drank himself to death BECAUSE of the stress. Observe Mozart\'s final hours. His skin, his eyes, his fever. How can the public at large, no matter HOW old you are, not recognize that this movie suggests Mozart dying of cirrhosis of the liver? Therein lies the brilliance of the movie. They never SAY this is the cause. Could it have been poison? Salieri doesn\'t remember it that way, but then, he could be omitting that detail. More likely it was Mozart\'s own drinking problem that killed him in this movie. Like so many geniuses, Mozart was his own killer. Legendary talent and fame that burns brightly always accompanies a life that winks out of existence quickly. The message of this movie would then seem to be that Salieri WAS blessed by God, and that Mozart was the cursed one. Salieri was blessed with long life, while Mozart died poor and young. The irony is that Salieri, being a true artist, recognizes that his long life of mediocrity will not- CAN not- measure up to Mozart\'s legend, despite his short life. Salieri would trade that long life for a short life that guaranteed him people knew his music forever... And in the end, he is forgotten like the rest of us. Is there a villain in this movie? No. There are only two victims, and a great amount of wonderful music and dialogue.', u'-0.157232', u'It is because of this movie that I began listening to Classical music. Up to the age of 20 I wouldn\'t listen to anything but rock, rap, hip hop, punk. Then I fell in love with Mozart. And because of this epiphany I went on to listen to other styles of music such as country (Patsy Cline, Loretta Lynn, Hank Williams), Edith Piaf, Al Jolson, and so on. This movie is breathtaking. A knockout and I wish I could see it on the big screen! Tom Hulce was wonderful as Mozart! Elizabeth Berridge who plays his wife Constanza looks eerily like the real Constanza judging from portraits of the great composer\'s wife. \n\nF. Murray Abraham deservedly won the Oscar for his outstanding turn as Mozart\'s arch enemy-fellow composer Antonio Salieri who was NOT a \'mediocrity\'! He was a brilliant composer in his own right. It is just that there are the fair, the good, the great-and then there are the gifted. \n\nWolfgang Amadeus Mozart was one of the gifted. When it comes to music even the un-trained ear can tell that God kissed the man right on the lips. \n\nAnd there was nothing Salieri could do about it. He could train in music for a million years and he still could not come close to the genius that was Mozart-who\'s "Eine Kleine Nachtmuzik" is recognizable today even to non-classical music fans.', u'0.480428', u'I\'d like to point out a few facts before I review the movie. First of all, Mozart died at home surrounded by his family, pupil and a priest. Secondly, the plot of Amadeus is not exactly original. Rimsky-Korsakov wrote a short opera called "Mozart and Salieri" with the bare bones of the story and the identical characterization of the two composers, and he used Pushkin\'s drama for the libretto. So, the rumor that Salieri killed Mozart has been around for almost a couple of centuries though we all know there isn\'t an iota of veracity in it.\n\nThat being said, Peter Shaffer\'s movie adaptation of his own play is still an astounding achievement. Have you ever seen a movie based on your favorite book and come out of the movie theater rather disappointed though the film version faithfully followed the storyline of the book? Amadeus is definitely not one of those movies. Shaffer clearly understands the difference between stage and film; the story is more elaborate in the movie, and some of the lengthy lines are replaced with more subtle images and close-ups.\n\nI\'m often surprised to find that people don\'t get that Amadeus is the story of the fictionalized character, Antonio Salieri, not the real one, who adored Mozart\'s music but hated everything else about him. In other words, the movie viewers are seeing Mozart through Salieri\'s eyes. Needless to say, his view is rather slanted. If you have read Shaffer\'s original play, you probably remember he describes Mozart\'s laugh \'grating.\' In the film, this annoying laugh becomes more symbolic. Though Salieri speaks in front of a Catholic priest, he is actually having a one-sided discourse with God. At one point, he declares, "One day, I will laugh at you. Before I leave this earth, I will laugh at you." But as he is wheeled out of his room by an aide at the asylum, what we hear is that screeching laugh of Mozart--or is it? It becomes obvious as we watch that this movie is called Amadeus because that\'s what Salieri wished to be--God\'s beloved.\n\nThe movie might give some viewers who don\'t know much about Mozart a wrong impression that he was a cad, and it gives incorrect information on some of his music (e.g.; the count in The Marriage of Figaro sings "Contessa perdono" AFTER he learns that the woman dressed in the maid\'s clothes is his own wife. There\'s no mistaken identity here. Read the title of the song--Countess, forgive me!), but these are minor offenses. Though I am a die-hard Mozart fan, I can laugh at tongue-in-cheek references to Amadeus in other movies. My favorite? In Guarding Tess, a secret service agent tells his partner, "He (Mozart)\'s a jerk. One day, a guy shows up with a mask, and he drops dead." \n\nWhat\'s not to like about Amadeus? The tale Peter Shaffer tells is gripping, the actors are first- rate, and, of course, there\'s music. The selection of Mozart\'s music in the movie is excellent; you can truly enjoy the beauty of his music no matter how much or how little you know about it. In case you are wondering, a little tune Mozart plays on his back and hands crossed as a penalty at a party is Viva Bacchus from The Abduction from the Seraglio, a duet for Pedrillo and Osmin. Pedrillo, while singing this song, is trying to get Osmin, the harem guard, drunk to help his master rescue his true love. No wonder Schikaneder calls it \'our song.\' And the improvised version of Salieri\'s welcome march is actually a famous song, Non piu andrai farfallone amoroso, from The Marriage of Figaro.\n\nAs I said, I\'m a huge Mozart fan, so my rating may be somewhat biased, but what the heck, I gladly give ten stars to Amadeus. I watched it close to a hundred times over the years, and it still gives me a great pleasure every time I see (and hear) it.', u'0.035315'], u'tt0338013': [u'How happy is the blameless vestal\'s lot! The world forgetting, by the world forgot. Eternal sunshine of the spotless mind! Each pray\'r accepted, and each wish resign\'d. -- Alexander Pope\n\n==> I confess to being an idealist and a romantic. This type of film appeals to people like me... the ones who believe in love at first sight, soul mates, destiny, yada yada yada. The Charlie Kaufman penned \'Eternal Sunshine of the Spotless Mind\' is as fresh and original as some of his other screenplays (Being John Malkovich, Human Nature, Adaptation), but adds a romantic depth that makes this one of the most complete film going experiences I have ever had.\n\nThere was an exchange during the film between our two leads, Joel and Clementine, played with poignancy and nuance by Jim Carrey and Kate Winslet, that echoed what I was feeling about the film.\n\nClementine: This is it Joel. It\'s going to be gone soon.\n\nJoel: I know.\n\nClementine: What do we do?\n\nJoel: Enjoy it.\n\nLuckily for me, I knew I was going to be able to revisit the film many times in my life. The depth of the film manifests itself in the fact that the soul mates, Joel and Clem, both know that their time is running out and that they will never be able to meet again.\n\nMost films might choose to highlight this type of heartbreak with the death of a loved one or a bittersweet farewell at a train station. But not Charlie Kaufman. He is bored by clich\xe9s. Rather, he chooses to dazzle us with the complexities of the human mind and all of its glorious possibilities. He is a master storyteller that is unlike any other I am aware of.\n\nJoel (Carrey) is socially inept. He has had girlfriends, but none that really meant anything. It is as if he has never had a significant relationship of any kind. But, one day, he meets Clementine. "Don\'t make any jokes about my name", she warns him. She is wild and kooky, changing her hair color from red to orange to blue to green depending on her current mood. She seems the polar opposite of Joel, but they click. They click in ways even they can\'t pinpoint. But from the moment they meet, they know there is something special there.\n\nHowever, after a silly argument breaks up their relationship, Clementine decides to visit Lacuna Inc., a company that specializes in wiping troubling memories away forever. She has decided to erase the memory of Joel. When Joel hears this from some friends, he angrily decides to do the same to Clementine, erasing her completely from his mind.\n\nThe erasing process involves a mapping of the memories and an all night process of erasure that is "technically brain damage", according to the doctor. The bulk of the film takes place during the process, inside Joel\'s mind. The most recent memories are first to go and we watch as they slowly disappear into nothingness. Those recent memories are bitter as we witness the arguments and the boredom of their relationship. But as the time rewinds, the memories get better. We travel backwards and watch Joel and Clem during their best moments, loving life and loving each other. As this happens, Joel desperately regrets his decision. He wants the inevitable erasure to stop, but he is completely powerless. Soon she will be gone and he won\'t even remember that he forgot her. The film focuses on his attempts to foil the process and retain some of her in the recesses of his mind.\n\n\'Eternal Sunshine\' is directed by Michel Gondry who also helmed \'Human Nature\'. He has a flare that accompanies Kaufman\'s words with perfect symmetry. This film bounces around on its timeline almost hysterically, but the director never lets us get lost. We always feel in control of our senses and our emotions. It is a tribute to Carrey and Winslet that they were able to do the same.\n\nJim Carrey has pulled off a rather remarkable transformation that I would have deemed impossible a decade ago. He is becoming a brilliant actor with qualities that resemble Jimmy Stewart and Tom Hanks. He is a fabulous everyman who is sympathetic and knowing, interesting and kind. He deserves tremendous praise for this role. Kate Winslet is consistently brilliant in every film. She is easily one of the very best actresses we have. Here she plays against type, and embodies a fascinating woman who craves attention but needs intimacy. Hers is a beautiful performance that will go overlooked. It is easy to understand why Joel falls in love with Clementine.\n\nI think fans of Charlie Kaufman will be thrilled with this brilliant entry in to his collection. I think the film will appeal to those who loved the recent masterpiece \'Lost in Translation\' or Tom Tykwer\'s recent beauty, \'Heaven\'. It is a romantic fantasy with real emotions and real characters that will resonate with the viewer who isn\'t entirely closed to sentiment. When Clementine whispers "Meet me in Montauk" into Joel\'s ear... it\'s hard to hold back a tear.\n\nThis will easily be one of the best films of 2004. It is the antithesis of the typical romantic Hollywood fare. I loved every minute of its refreshing originality. The film has passion and flare and brilliant wit, all framed by an intelligent script that deals in absurdity while managing to maintain an intimate realism. These characters feel real. You root for them. You want them to meet again and give it another chance. It is a film that will only get better over time, as our memory of it waxes and wanes its way into our hearts.\n\nTC CANDLER', u'0.126286', u'"How happy is the blameless vestal\'s lot! The world forgetting, by the world forgot. Eternal sunshine of the spotless mind! Each pray\'r accepted, and each wish resign\'d." - Alexander Pope\n\nMichel Gondry\'s "Eternal Sunshine of the Spotless Mind" is a bizarre but wonderful movie, a very strange and remarkably tender experience, which I suppose is only to be expected from screenwriter Charlie Kaufman, the man behind "Being John Malkovich."\n\nThe film was produced by Focus Features ("Lost in Translation," "21 Grams"), a company which strives to offer original, quality films to the true cinema lovers. If the company keeps producing films this good, they may become hugely successful in the future, if not already.\n\nThe previews portrayed the movie as a bouncy, cheery comedy in the vein of "Adaptation," the last film written for the big screen by Charlie Kaufman, when it is really a tender movie about love and romance. This is Jim Carrey\'s best performance to date, and may open the eyes of his prejudiced haters who have only imagined him as Ace Ventura and a certain cable guy for his entire career. No snippy quotes, outrageous humor or bizarre antics in "Sunshine" -- Carrey plays a true, realistic, three-dimensional character named Joel Barrish, who plans to have memories of his girlfriend, Clementine (Kate Winslet), erased by a new company called Lacuna, after he discovers that she herself has had the procedure performed only a week before. Joel meets with the company\'s founder, Dr. Howard Mierzwiak (Tom Wilkinson), and is informed that the procedure -- although "technically" brain damage -- is on par with a heavy night of drinking. "Nothing you\'ll miss much," he is told, as he plunges into a bizarre world of long forgotten memories.\n\nThe entire process of the operation is quite fascinating, really, if a bit reminiscent of an idea founded by none other than one of Kaufman\'s favorite writers, Philip K. Dick, who wrote the source short story for the Ah-nuld movie "Total Recall." All items relating to the person you want erased from your brain are assembled together, and the technicians at Lacuna (Mark Ruffalo and Elijah Wood) then "map" an outline of your memories, which are supposedly stemmed together. I have my doubts about the seriousness and remote possibility of such a procedure being performed, and the explanation is quite simply utter bull, but we don\'t care because the entire erasing of Joel\'s memories serves as a backdrop for a deeper meaning: If you could forget about past romances, would you really want to? And if so, would you be willing to sacrifice all the good ones, along with the bad ones?\n\nThe conclusion that "Sunshine" arrives at is, to be totally truthful, as honest as can be. During the procedure, Joel\'s subconscious realizes that it doesn\'t want to let go of its memories of Clementine, and so begins a strange labyrinth of fragmented memories, constantly changing surroundings, and mental materializations of Clementine. The movie is like a very bizarre dream, when you\'re trying to interact with people, but they\'re not responding, and you shout and try to get their attention but they don\'t seem to notice. Joel\'s entire odyssey of the interior of his mind makes "Being John Malkovich" look normal -- but as I didn\'t like "Malkovich" very much, and thought its strangeness was unjustified, it fits perfectly in "Sunshine" -- there are some great special effects, such as when Joel is wandering through his own memories, drifting in and out of sleep, hearing the voices of the technicians erasing his memories and watching as objects and areas around him vanish and deconstruct. It\'s so bizarre but yet also so beautiful. Gondry was a former music video director (his complete works are available on DVD) and he is the perfect candidate for this project, having worked with Kaufman before on the 2001 flop "Human Nature." It seems that he has finally found a unique directing style that ties in perfectly with the underlying themes of the movie.\n\nThere is a very deep message in "Sunshine," and it is arguably Kaufman\'s deepest film to date. Love and romance and memories of both have rarely been examined as thought-provokingly and tenderly as they are in this wonderful motion picture. The movie has a very profound message that all viewers should pay attention to. There are many small intricacies in the film, surely picked up on more thoroughly on repeat viewings, and the entire construction of the movie is completely enthralling and intelligent. I saw two people leave the rather empty theater during the screening I attended. It tanked in the US and I predict it will do the same in the UK, which is a shame, because this is the smartest film of 2004 and has the most to say about our lives than any other film this year. While everyone flocks to see the new Denzel Washington action movie, "Eternal Sunshine of the Spotless Mind" is forgotten, which is quite depressing -- people would rather spend their money on forgettable entertainment than view something unique that has something important at its core.\n\nI think what the movie finally asks us after its long, emotional journey, is would we want our own memories erased? And if so, what would the consequences be? A lesser film might examine this idea poorly -- "Sunshine" is not. It is perfect in almost every conceivable way, and anyone who complains that it is not original must be joking -- in my entire lifetime, this is one of the most unique film experiences I have ever had.\n\n"Eternal Sunshine of the Spotless Mind" is a beautiful movie, eloquently voiced by Gondry, firmly constructed and rooted in an eerie nightmarish fantasy land where anything is possible. It\'s beautiful, it\'s bizarre, it\'s exceptional, it\'s funny, it\'s lovely, it\'s touching, it\'s witty, and it\'s one of the best movies I have ever seen.', u'0.250096', u"\nIf you can relate to the underlying theme of love longed for, love given and received, and love lost, this is a great film. If you have come to understand that acceptance can -sometimes- be a great thing and not a compromise or a 'settle for' - this is a moving film.\n\nAs crazy and almost surreal as elements of this film are, it somehow remains honest and real. That seems like a contradiction... life is contradictory, isn't it?\n\nCarrey and Winslet both turn in superb performances, as do the supporting cast.  An incredible film that most of the people who 'get it' will love - but I suspect there will be more than a small percentage who won't understand it or can't relate to it and they will (understandably) dislike it.", u'0.336215', u'This movie gives us what we all secretly wish for-- a chance to forget something that\'s hurt us in the past. The viewer can almost live vicariously through the two dysfunctional characters that are remarkably just like ordinary people. The relationship problems are the same. The little fights and bickers are things we all can relate to. The acting was amazing- throughout the movie, I actually forgot that I was watching Mr. Ace Ventura himself. Carrey and Winslet pull off a great performance, both ditching the typecasts that they\'ve been shackled with. Not only did the film give us the opportunity to see what it was like if painful memories were erased, but it also gave us the opportunity to see that everything deserves a second chance. The way it ends leaves the viewer to imagine how the characters\' lives will end. The idealist may say that they lived happily ever after; the pessimist may say that they just reverted to disliking each other again. Either way, it leaves you to imagining your own ending; a characteristic many films leave out. Basically, this movie makes you think, "What if...?" It truly gives new meaning to the phrase "You never know what you\'ve got until it\'s gone."', u'-0.159761', u"It happens to both the best and worst of us at some time in our lives. Love . If you haven't experienced this yet just wait, you will. It is inevitable that at some time in our journey through life that we will come across someone that fascinates us so profoundly that we feel as though we could spend the rest of our lives with this magnetic individual. There is no exact science to the concept of love. Many believe that the idea of love goes beyond the reasonable or the logical to a more diverse level of the illogical, irrational, and the unreasonable. Why is it that we find ourselves attracted to people that, on the surface, seem as though they would never be compatible with our own lifestyle? Why is it that when we do fall in love with a certain individual and think at first that this is a perfect match, we find over time that less tolerable marks are more frequent on the surface? And why is it that we overlook some individuals that, although at first there is no real 'love connection' per say, we seem to have a somewhat pure liking for someone and that it takes us longer then it should to see that person for who they really are to us? Love is a complicated subject that can't be taught, it can only be experienced for what it is . utterly confusing and yet at the same time completely fulfilling.\n\nThe story is a twisted and complicated tale from the same man who brought movie-going audiences such award-savvy features as Being John Malkovich and Adaptation. Joel Barish seems like the average, normal guy who stays pretty isolated from communicating his true feelings to others and yet reveals spectacular insight only to the confines of his journal. He doesn't like going on impulses and gut feelings but rather relies more on common sense and the logical sense of self-direction. That is until he meets Clementine. They flirt with each other and eventually find themselves falling in love with one another . That is until one day Joel finds out that Clementine has undergone a radical procedure to have him erased from her memory because she was unhappy. So, in an act of self-gratification, Joel decides to undergo the procedure himself, erasing every argument, every embarrassment, every thought he has had involving Clementine. But as the procedure goes on, Joel begins to realize that beyond the quarrels and the less flattering incidents there were beautiful memories that he never wants to forget. So he does the unthinkable . Joel attempts to outrun the erasers through a dizzying chase through his mind. The story for Eternal Sunshine of the Spotless Mind is hauntingly brilliant and, in some cases, personally gratifying. The concepts and the feelings expressed behind the script of this film hit so hard to home that it feels as though we our seeing our own love lives played out on screen. Granted Sunshine does tend to veer off into the ridiculously absurd but when evaluating what one takes away from this film, it is pure genius.\n\nQuite amazingly this low budgeted independent feature showcases a surprising amount of A-list talent but manages to have those performers express well beyond their famous names. Jim Carrey, who has unsuccessfully attempted to make a mark in drama with lead performances in Man on the Moon and The Majestic, gives a thoroughly convincing and commanding performance in the role of Joel Barish. And Carrey's performance is only complimented by his interaction with Kate Winslet, who acts opposite of him as Clementine. Though the two give dramatically different personas to their characters and look as if they would never be quite compatible with each other based on surface actions, which is the idea the filmmakers are trying to express. It's not what is right in front of us that should define a relationship; it is the memories themselves and the experiences of the two individuals. Elijah Wood, in his first role outside the Lord of the Rings franchise which recently wrapped up in December, gives an effective performance as a man one can't help but despise for his methods of obtaining someone's affection but at the same time feel pity for his plight, which is that he feels love eludes him. And Kirsten Dunst performs well within the film despite her appearance that protrudes a sense of innocence that feels off-base or awkward that distracts from the actions of her character. Not to say that she doesn't perform well or that the character is a pointless one, not in the least, but perhaps it is the fact that her innocence, based on her name and the characters she has played, carries a stigma with her role.\n\nOverall, Sunshine, as awkward and thoroughly confusing at it may seem and is, manages to express, in the most informal of ways, the feelings and thoughts we should all have when examining a relationship, in that it is not the superficial features but the underlining memories that make it all worth while. When a relationship hits that unfortunate moment where it all seems to be breaking down, we, as human beings, seem to instantly draw ourselves to the negative aspects of that person, as Joel did early in the procedure, in an attempt of sorts to make everything right within our mind. What Eternal Sunshine successfully expresses is that when breaking down the relationship moment by moment, more often then not the happier events outweigh the bad and that should be our determining factor to keep the relationship going. Too many moments are wasted on gut-instincts and logic, when it comes to love one must live every moment for what it is because we only have one shot in this world and we might as well make it worthwhile. What happens if that relationship doesn't work? You pick yourself up, let the relationship go, and, in time, move on. If you try your best and nothing seems to work in that relationship then perhaps it will never work and you shouldn't play out a fantasy that you know will never be. We have all experienced moments where we feel as though there is opportunity to ask someone out or express how one feels for a certain individual but have chickened out due to nerves, 'gut-instincts', or views of superficial matters. Eternal Sunshine promotes the ideology of living within the present and letting the course of the matter play out as it may. If we all relied on nerves and logic, would anyone really fall in love?", u'-0.0486626', u'Michel Gondry, credited as the director and co-writer of Eternal Sunshine of the Spotless Mind, is only partly responsible for the success that the film achieves. He implements a awe-inspiring blend of style to a story that is perfectly non-linear. But then there is also the madman genius of the current screen writing plane- Charlie Kaufman- who has written three of the most ingenious, funny, and human of "little" Hollywood movies (Being John Malkovich, Adaptation, Confessions of a Dangerous Mind). \n\nHe understands, and perhaps likely experienced to a degree, what a relationship holds to- the truth, to understanding, and then when it ends, how out memory changes the relationship. Enter in the concept that makes \'Eternal Sunshine\' something of a un-official science fiction film - the Lacuna corporation, led by Tom Wilkinson\'s character, can erase just one person out of your memory, all of the experiences that you and the significant other had. So, when Joel (Jim Carrey) goes in to erase his memory of Clementine (Kate Winslet) after finding out she did just the same, he enters into a mind-warp. He goes through memories they had, happy ones, sad ones, some that are just what makes up what you have emotionally with the one you\'ve loved. And sometimes, and to the behest of the assistants of Lacuna (Kirsten Dunst, Elijah Wood, Mark Ruffalo), Joel doesn\'t want them all to be erased.\n\nAs I mentioned, the plot is non-linear, which could\'ve gone the wrong way if not done with skill. With a film like 21 Grams, which has a talented director and cast, the non-linear structure isn\'t necessary. But it\'s an asset that the story doesn\'t start from A to Z. To assist Gondry with this, he has the extraordinary Ellen Kuras as DP and Vald\xeds \xd3skarsd\xf3ttir, an editor from Iceland. Their collaboration is crucial with Gondry and Kaufman (and co-writer Pierre Bismuth), as they bring all of these un-real images a real quality. Quite simply, there isn\'t a finer example of surrealism crossbred with realism in any other American film so far this year. The usage of lights, cuts, and with the kinds of special effects not expected (i.e. no CGI), add to the effect it has on a viewer. That the characters of Joel and Clementine are as enveloping as they are is also a credit to Kaufman.\n\nBut then there\'s one more part that completes the success of the film - the acting. Jim Carrey, very simply, is at his very best. He finds a balance from certain scenes in being like people we see everyday, feeling low, not much of interest, inward. And then when the memory erases begin, we get to see him act funny, but not like the kind of humor he brought with Ace Ventura or Dumb and Dumber. This is Carrey knowing this character just well enough to play off his counterpart, played by Winslet. She, meanwhile, is perhaps at her best. Her character is eccentric, funny, insightful, and wanting. She pulls it off. As do the supporting actors.\n\nThere\'s not much more I can say about this film, except to say that even after seeing it three times, I feel like I could watch it over and over and see a new shot, a new sequence, and new set of emotions tied to things. It\'s one of the great romantic dramedies of the decade.', u'0.271751', u'this is my favorite movie of 2004 and definitely one of the top in my all-time favorite lists! \n\nEternal touched a certain part of you, your heart that most shows never did. or rather could never did. it shows the fragility of a relationship. people want to erase bad memories of a failed relationship yet at the same time, cant bear to part with the good ones! how so can that be done? how can you erase bad memories and saved good ones only? Carrey and Winslet did a perfect job acting as Joel and Clementine respectively. Arguably one of their career best so far. its a pleasant surprise to see the man behind "The Mask" playing such a quiet and introvert role. Kate, on the other hand, brought Clementine to new heights as the bubbly and brutally honest lass who you love and hate.\n\nEternal is a definite marvel, a feat in itself. its rich and flamboyant yet fragile. it brings the audience to such a personal level it hurts. especially when both cant seem to escape from the erasure.\n\nwell-done!', u'0.54282', u'\nAfter a lukewarm reception in 2001 with "Human Nature", Charlie Kaufman has teamed up with director, Michel Gondry again for this romatic fantasy. With a name like Jim Carrey, this second collaboration couldn\'t go wrong in terms of box office success, and nor should it as this film is quite simply brilliant.\n\n"Eternal Sunshine" centres around the life of Joel (Jim Carrey) a shy, mild mannered man who is heart broken after splitting from his feisty, impulsive girlfriend, Clementine (Kate Winslet). A short while after their split, he meets her again while she is working at a library and he is stunned to discover that she doesn\'t recognise him. He later finds out that the reason for this is that Clementine has had her memory of Joel wiped out completely. Dr Howard Mierwick (Tom Wilkinson) has performed an operation on her brain after Clementine visited his clinic to forget Joel. Much to Joel\'s distress, he decides to do the same, but during his operation he revisits memories of Clementine that he struggles to let go of.\n\nIf anyone was in doubt as to whether Jim Carrey can act, this is the film that will put all doubt out of the way. He performs with sensitivity and warmth, never once verging on the manic rubber faced lunacy to which he is most well known for. Out of all the perfomances where he has stepped into the dramtic role (The Truman Show, Man on the Moon, The Majestic), this has got to be his best yet. Kate Winslet is also brilliant as his unpredictable, adventurous girlfriend.\n\nKaufman\'s story of a man going into a surreal dream world is not too dissimilar from his earlier work, "Being John Malkovich". You have off the wall images such as Carrey re-enacting his 4 year old self along his journey in his head. The eccentricity of the story, which is Kaufman\'s trademark, once again works excellently. When watching this you generally care for Carrey and Winslet, in much the same way as Bill Murray and Scarlett Johansson in "Lost In Translation". Gondry\'s diection gives a bittersweet flavour to the tale.\n\nThe sub plots involving the supporting characters who are operating are ingenius. Tom Wilkinson once again proves that he is one of the best British actors of his generation and he is backed up by great performnces from Kirsten Dunst and a post-LOTR Elijah Wood.\n\nThis is a lovely film and if you like originality with a sense of fantasy with a love story, then I suggest you see it. It\'s one of those films you\'ll want to see twice. ', u'0.245944', u'\nOf all Kaufman\'s screenplays that delve into the interior landscapes of its characters, Eternal Sunshine is the most fully formed and moving story of the bunch, a rumination on the possibilities and consequences inherent in making the process of removing unwanted memories from your consciousness as easy as going for a checkup.  Kaufman here plays on our desire to forget the bad things that happen to us and what happens when we are given the power to forget those things permanently, and the conclusion he arrives at is that it ultimately creates as many - if not more - problems than it solves.  At the very least, it can result in making the same mistakes again ("Those who ignore history are doomed to repeat it"); at the worst, it eliminates the possibility of our ever reconciling and coming to terms with our life experiences, the way we relate to the people who help to shape our lives and whose lives we shape through ours.\n\nThe film explores these ideas in a novel and engaging way: by taking the audience inside the mind of Joel Barish (Jim Carrey), a man who, after breaking up with his girlfriend Clementine Kruczynski (Kate Winslett), discovers later that she has had her memory of him wiped clean from her mind.  He finds out how she had this procedure done and, despondent not only about the breakup but even more so about her having completely erased him from her mind, searches out the doctor who performed the procedure and signs up to have the same procedure done to him, so that he may also have no memory of her.  He is rendered unconscious for the procedure but his subconscious is still active.   Once the procedure is initiated and he becomes aware that his memories of the woman he loved - and still loves - are vanishing from his brain, he starts having second thoughts and wants the procedure stopped.  His challenge then becomes to figure out how to protect as much of his memory of her as he can, and to find a way stop the procedure despite the fact that he is in an unconscious state.\n\nThe manner in which he comes to realize and confront his dilemma is played out entirely within his interior landscape, a realm which (as anyone who remembers their dreams upon waking from sleep can attest) is a very surreal extension of our day-to-day experiences.  Michel Gondry\'s visual style and direction works exceptionally well here in conveying the slippery, chaotic unpredictability of the worlds we construct from our memories and experiences; the clever interplay between this interior world and the goings-on of the outside world helps keep the viewer off-balance just enough to illuminate the fuzzy line of demarcation separating the two worlds and the peculiar manner in which they play off one another.\n\nJim Carrey and Kate Winslett do an exceptional job of bringing this abstract story concept to life with characters that are endearing, poignant, believable and utterly human.  The supporting players are equally impressive: Tom Wilkinson as the mind-eraser doctor, Mark Ruffalo and Elijah Wood as the technicians, Kiersten Dunst as the receptionist all have relationships to the main protagonists and to one another that come to light as the story unfolds and help to propel the plot; as friends of Joel and Clementine, David Cross and Jane Adams are hilarious as a couple who seem to be stuck in the same rut that compelled the protagonists to break up and have each other erased from their respective minds.  Kaufman juggles all these relationships masterfully and in such a way as to ensure none of them are superfluous to the ideas he is trying to get across in this story.\n\nWhile there are elements of the plot that seem to place this movie in the realm of science fiction, the focus of the movie stays on the interior states, emotions and relationships between the characters.  As such, the film is more of a romantic comedy than anything - albeit unlike any other romantic comedy you\'re ever likely to see.  I saw a late showing of this movie with my girlfriend the day it was released at a local multiplex and there were only 20 or so people in the theater, yet at the film\'s conclusion everyone broke out in a spontaneous round of applause.  This gives an idea of how compelling this movie can be.  If you give this film a chance to creep under your skin, you will likely find yourself reflexively thinking about your feelings toward the important people in your life, as well how you relate to those feelings, as well as your memories and how you relate to them.  A thought provoking, moving and entertaining film - I can imagine that a working title of this film might have been "Warts And All."\n', u'0.138091', u"Here's the basic plot. Clemintine and Joel have a long, rocky relationship. Clemintine decides to get Joel erased from her memory, so Joel decides to do the same, only while Joel is in the process of the erasing, he comes back around to the really sweet, nice memories, and realizes that he wants out of the procedure. Now here's what I thought about it. \n\nThis movie is completely amazing. Totally original story and wonderful directing. Some of the best directing that i've seen in any movie. Some of the best original music too. This is in my top five favorites, and it also boosted Jim Carrey into one of my favorite actors. You know you have a good movie on your hands when the next day you're still thinking about parts of it, and you want to see those parts again. If you haven't seen this, I recommend that you check it out. It's different, in a really good way. There's not much more to tell you about it. If you want to see the Ace Ventura Jim Carrey, than you should absolutely skip this one. But if you want to see a side of him and Kate Winslet that you've never seen, or if you want to see a total original movie with wonderful cinematography and really great music, then by all means, you should absolutely see this one!", u'0.315494', u'There\'s only one way to describe "Eternal Sunshine Of The Spotless Mind": perfect. It\'s been one week since I saw the movie and I still cannot stop thinking about it. Was the ending happy or sad? I cannot tell, but it\'s deeply touching.\n\nCharlie Kaufman is incredible. How does he come up with all these original, flawless scripts? Finally there\'s someone who uses the possibilities of cinema to the fullest. I love the way Kaufman shows the fate of individuals and derives universally true rules from it. The content of his story is always highly philosophical without ever being smart alec.\n\nSome say "Eternal Sunshine..." was over-directed. I disagree. Having read the script, I know that Gondry deserves lots of credit for bringing this beautiful story to life. Sure, there are five creepy images per minute, but have you ever seen such an original, weird picture? Mind you, I\'m not saying that lots of effects automatically make for a good direction, but in this case it really helped to underline the story, not distracting from it.\n\nJim Carrey... wow! I\'ve always liked him as the hilarious Comedian he is, but I never thought that his performances in "The Truman Show" and "Man On The Moon" were that much of a departure from his funny-man side. As Joel, however, he is a completely different person. It\'s like Jim Carrey had a serious twin brother. Unbelievable. I bow to this performance! Give this man more chances to show his acting abilities, I say!\n\nFinally I have to mention Beck\'s cover of "Everybody\'s Gotta Learn Sometime", which fits perfectly into the movie and won\'t leave my CD-Player for the next months.\n\nA movie like "Eternal Sunshine..." really shows how much time and money Hollywood wastes on producing crap like "Bad Boys" or "The Fast & The Furious", and its box office result demonstrates how little people care about quality in movies. Personally, I have found my first contender for best motion picture of the year. I need to see the movie again, because I have a feeling that this one gets even better with each viewing. I can\'t wait until it\'s released on DVD.\n\nI feel the need to say more, but I can\'t put my feelings into (English) words. All I can say is: GO SEE THIS MOVIE! You won\'t regret it.', u'0.166311', u'Eternal Sunshine of the Spotless Mind is the most well written movie since Pulp Fiction, and the best movie since the turn of the century. It\'s originality is unprecedented, putting screenwriter Charlie Kaufman (Adaptation) up there with the greats. And every time you watch it, you will gain a new understanding of the characters and story.\n\nJust imagine, instead of dealing with the pain and suffering of your past, you can erase people and moments from your memory, and move on with your life, without giving it another thought. Imagine your bad relationships can disappear. You bad experiences obliterated. Your bad times gone. Dr. Howard Mierzwiak makes this all possible.\n\nMeet Joel Barish (Carrey), an archetypal lost American, a passive soul wandering through his own life in a cloud of dissatisfaction. One day, his shyness and antisocial tendencies led him to meet the free spirit Clementine (Winslet), changing his life forever.\n\nThey break up, and Clementine impulsively decides to "erase" Joel from her memory. Joel, upon hearing this, also signs up for the procedure. But midway through, he changes his mind. Then the chase begins, as Joel and Clementine try to outrun the erasers, hiding in his childhood and humiliation.\n\nMeanwhile, Kirsten Dunst, Elijah Wood, and Mark Ruffalo, the ones performing the procedure on Joel, have their own troubles with romance, memory erasure, and Clementine, all due to the procedure offered by Dr. Mierzwiak.\n\nAlthough Carrey spends most of the movie in an induced coma, his outstanding performance proves to us that his talents go far beyond his Ace Ventura days. And Winslet\'s spectacular performance didn\'t go unnoticed either, earning her another Oscar nod.\n\nTo say the least, Eternal Sunshine will change your life. Kaufman shows us that you must take the good along with the bad, because if you forget, you are destined to repeat your mistakes. Joel doesn\'t realize he made a mistake until he gets past their bad moments, and remembers all the good times he and Clementine had together. This movie gives a new meaning to "You never know what you\'ve got until it\'s gone."\n\nEternal Sunshine of the Spotless Mind is a brilliant work of originality. With all the crap Hollywood has been turning out in recent years, this will feel like a blast of fresh air. Kaufman\'s masterpiece is inspirational, and, unlike most Hollywood films, makes you think. It\'ll make you realize that at the end of the day, our memories are all we really have, and when they\'re gone, we\'re gone.', u'-0.181911', u'Joel (Jim Carrey) is a rather milquetoast man who meets up with free spirit Clementine (Kate Winslet), and they become romantically involved. However, they endure a messy breakup and Clementine goes to a business called Lacuna, Inc., where she has all of her memories of Joel erased. Not wanting to be left out, Joel also goes to have his memory erased. However, soon after it begins, Joel realizes that he wants to keep the memory of Clementine, so he tries to reverse the process.\n\nWell, if you\'re familiar with Kaufman\'s work, then you know what your getting yourself into. This is just as weird if not weirder than his previous work, Being John Malkovich. I knew what I was getting myself into, but 90% of the movie I was saying to myself "What the hell is going on?", but in a good way. It opens with Joel calling in sick for work and going on a different train, heading for Montauk. He meets Clementine and they hit it off. Now this is about 15 minutes into the movie, then out of nowhere come the opening credit sequence. I will admit, I thought it would be different, but I\'m glad that it is the way it is, the movie is 80% of the time in Joel\'s head.\n\nIf you think you know Carrey, think again. This movie is his best performance, better than Majestic, Truman show and all of his comedic roles (which is what I love him for). Just looking at his face from the second we see him, we feel his pain, then like that, we feel his joy, embarrassment and hate. Just awesome acting on his part, and Winslet was great as the free spirit who never seems satisfied. The supporting cast all work well in their small, yet important roles. Oscar nominations for Winslet and (crosses fingers) Carrey.\n\nBut if I were to bet any money on any Oscar nominations it would obviously be the writing, what a mess, but beautifully constructed. You think to yourself, is that scene really necessary? Then ten minutes later you think to yourself how brilliant it was, that\'s beautiful, crazy, give me whatever he\'s smoking kind of writing. Charlie Kaufman\'s writing is always clever, but this time he\'s one-upped himself by making something simultaneously bizarre and emotionally engaging. It seemed like his earlier movies were clever for the sake of cleverness, but \'Eternal Sunshine\' manages to dazzle you with it\'s originality and it\'s poignancy. The fact that this movie was able to wrap such profound loss, emotional tenderness, and hope in such a self-consciously stylized package illustrates the incredible talent of the people behind it.\n\nMichel Gondry\'s use of vibrant coloring and quick camera movement give the film a very involving first hand feeling. The constant use of the handy cam is very all involving for the viewer, and I suppose that this is exactly what is needed in such a personal movie. His work on the dream sequences is incredible as well. He decides to use more practical effects than what we see today with computers. \n\nEternal Sunshine is a tragic, yet beautiful film that sits at the top of my list of "Best of 2004".', u'0.17685', u'Very nicely crafted science fiction love story. More of an experience than a film.\n\nWhat? Sci Fi? Well yes. A simple science fiction device, memory erasure, is the vehicle for this beautifully shot, brilliantly edited and directed love fable. The fact that this is a good film does not disqualify it from the sci fi genre. In fact, would-be sci fi writers and film-makers should take note of this.\n\nBut Eternal Sunshine is a love story first and last, in all respects. The characters are what John Irving would call "L.A. dysfunctional", although they don\'t live in L.A. Carrey and Winslet are deeply insecure people with little going for them but good looks (which they try to disguise), fairly sweet dispositions, and a desire for companionship. They meet on Valentine\'s Day in Montauk, where they have both seemingly traveled \'on a lark\', and the entire experience of the film seems to derail from this point forward. Chronological, linear story-telling becomes impossible because the characters are having their memories erased in order to assuage the pain of their separation. No spoilers, so let me stop right there.\n\nIf I have made Eternal Sunshine seem like it might be too much of a challenge or too disturbing for an evening\'s light entertainment, be not afraid. Certainly there are occasional disturbing elements, and the characters themselves are all neurotic enough to have walked off the street and onto the screen. But the film is so artistically rendered, and so well thought-out that what could have been a nightmare really becomes a fantastic post-modern love fable. It\'s also one of those great films that becomes predictable after a while, but is so delightfully portrayed and satisfying that it does not matter.\n\nThe acting is exceptionally good. I would expect nothing else from this cast. Winslet is especially remarkable for her ability to play a young North East American better than most American actresses could. How this genius has been passed up in each of her 4 Oscar nominations to date is inexplicable. Carrey\'s talent is undeniable, though I dislike many of the films he chooses to take on. His performance here is easily as good as his award-worthy performances in the Truman Show, Bruce Almighty, and Man on the Moon.\n\nWe spend a lot of time inside people\'s heads in this film, yet the camera never becomes a member of the cast as it does in films like "Being John Malkovich". I can pay no higher compliment to the production team. This is a very difficult thing to accomplish, and it is done with flawless simplicity in Eternal Sunshine. This film has just joined Shakespeare in Love, Wild at Heart, and Brokeback Mountain among my favorite all-time love stories. This is the first Michel Gondry film I have seen. I am going to make sure it is not the last.', u'0.396104', u"That is the question underlying this entire movie, since two-thirds of it is the process of elimination of a man's memories in order to forget the person who caused him some hurt in the recent past.\n\nThis man is Joel Parish, played (or underplayed) by Jim Carrey who on a train ride to Long Island meets Clementine Krucyzinski (Kate Winslet). Both strike up an uneasy conversation: she being brash, aggressive, he being almost demure. There seems to be something there lingering between them, some connection even when they're totally different, and later we learn, when their affair ends, that she has decided to erase her memories of him and move on, which prompts Joel to do the same.\n\nExcept he decides he doesn't want to at the last minute.\n\nSo begins a roller-coaster ride where he tries to salvage anything he can as one by one his memories are being zapped away from him, and to see how he goes from one to the other, often with the surreal assistance of Winslet herself (as she is an integral part of his memories), we definitely get bombarded with frenetic images of Joel's mind literally coming apart at the seams, but we never forget that this is his heart that we're talking about, and in a small performance, Kirsten Dunst reveals just how heartless the procedure can be in a revelatory moment, one that makes us totally root for this odd couple right down to the last scene. One of the most original stories which hit theatres in 2004 and which deservedly won its Best Original Screenplay Oscar even if it lost in acting categories, this is the Movie of 2004.", u'-0.410031'], u'tt0114709': [u'I am a big fan of the animated movies coming from the Pixar Studios. They are always looking for the newest technological possibilities to use in their movies, creating movies that are more than just worth a watch, even when they were made a decade ago.\n\nThe movie is about toys that come to life when their owner is asleep or not in the same room. When the young boy\'s birthday is coming up, all the toys are nervous. They don\'t want to be ignored when the new one arrives. Woody the cowboy is their "leader" because he\'s the most popular one of them all. He\'s the only one that hasn\'t got to be afraid, but than a new favorite arrives ... Buzz Lightyear. He hates him and tries everything possible to get rid of him, but as the time passes by they learn to appreciate each other...\n\nWhen you see Toy Story, you may think that the different human like characters (Woody the cowboy for instance) aren\'t always as perfect as we are used to see in todays animated movies. Perhaps that\'s true, but if you keep in mind that all this was done in 1995, when computers weren\'t yet as strong and the technology for creating such movies was almost unknown, than you can only have a lot of respect for what the creators did. I loved the story and liked the animations a lot. I give it an 8.5/10.', u'0.442965', u"\nToy Story is not only the best Disney film because it has the best story and the best animation, but also because of the excellent actors chosen to provide the voices of the animals. The casting was perfect from top to bottom, and the movie provides an excellent adventure story about friendship and loyalty that keeps you engrossed until the nail-biting climax.\n\n\nTom Hanks and Tim Allen provided excellent voices for Woody and Buzz Lightyear -their performances alone are one of the biggest things that made this such a spectacular movie. Besides that, though, you have the excellent story that is not only noteworthy because it has never really been told from this perspective before, but also because it was just told so well. All of the characters in the film are very well developed and all have appropriate and effective actors chosen to provide their voices. \n\nAnd of course, who could forget the revolutionary animation! The computer animation used for this movie not only made it startlingly realistic but also opened up tons of possibilities, and thankfully the filmmakers chose to explore these possibilities. There are dozens of things that are hidden in the woodwork throughout the film, as well as in the songs \x96 note, for example, the subtle playing of the Indiana Jones theme song in the scene where Woody knocks Buzz out the window with the desk lamp.\n\n\nToy Story is by far the best Disney film ever made, it's pretty much perfect. It's adventurous, it's exciting, it's entertaining, it's good for the whole family, it's got great characters, story, and plot, and above all, it's fun.\n", u'0.784289', u"\nAndy's toys live a reasonable life of fun and peace, their only worries are birthdays and Christmases, when new toys could easily replace those already there.  One such birthday Andy's top toy, Woody the cowboy, finds himself in direct competition with Andy's new Buzz Lightyear doll.  When rivalries boil over Woody tries to hide Buzz down the side of the bed but accidentally pushes him out the window, the other tops expel Woody, and he leaves with no choice but to find Buzz and return him to the house.  But with only two days before Andy moves house, time is of the essence.\n\nGiven how often the same mix of animation, wit, jokes and kids humour has been used since Toy Story (Ice Age, Monsters Inc, Bugs Life) it is easy to forget how refreshing it was when it first came out.  I have just watched it again and it is dating a little in comparison to more recent twists on the formula.  It seems each one has to be sharper and have more references etc in the background.  However it is still very funny and deserves praise for being the first of a successful formula.\n\nThe plot is simple but effective and actually has genuine drama and excitement to it.  The main story is fun but the degree of character development is what really shores it up.  The conflict between Buzz and Woody is taken deeper than this and, when confronted by the truth of his status as a toy, Buzz's turmoil is very real as opposed to him being a cartoon character and nothing more.  Despite the two strong leads there is a real depth in the support cast.  They may not actually have that many lines, but they have all the funniest lines.  Most of the `adult' wit comes from the Potato Head, dinosaur, the pig and slinky dog.  They are funny and are very well used.  In fact the majority of this humour and plot will go right over kids heads.\n\nLooking back on it, I do feel a cynical edge on it in so much as this film must really have helped sales of the toy companies in the film.  It's hard not to see the marketing department standing behind this film rubbing their hands.  However the actual product is so wonderfully fun that I forgot this quickly.  The voice work is excellent and the characters match the actors.  Hanks is good as Woody and Allen has a good B-movie type voice for Buzz.  Varney, Ratzenberger, Ermey (doing his usual), Rickles and others are all really good in the support roles and, probably, come out as the favourite characters for adults.\n\nOverall this is a classic film that will appeal to adults as much as to kids (if not more).  A good plot and a really sharp script make the already short running time fly by.  The only downside is that your kids will want you to go out and buy the damn things!", u'0.329004', u'This is a very clever animated story that was a big hit, and justifiably so. It had a terrific sequel and if a third film came out, that would probably be a hit, too.\n\nWhen this came out, computer technology just was beginning to strut its stuff. Man, this looked awesome. Now, it\'s routine because animation, which took a giant leap with this movie, has made a lot more giant strides.\n\nThe humor in here, however, is what made this so popular. There are tons of funny lines, issued by characters voiced by Tom Hanks, Tim Allen, Jim Varney, Don Rickles, Wallace Shawn and John Ratzenberger, among others. As good as Hanks is as "Woody" and Allen as "Buzz Armstrong," I think the supporting characters just about stole the show: Mr. Potato Head, Slinky, Rex the dinosaur, etc.\n\nMultiple viewings don\'t diminish the entertainment, either. There are so many things to catch, audibly and visually, that you always seem to discover something new. The colors in here are beautiful, too. This is a guaranteed "winner" as is the sequel.', u'0.538989', u"Toy Story \x96 5/5 stars\n\nChildren play with toys. It is a known fact. At one time or another, we all played with toys, whether they were action figures, dolls, little green soldiers, etc\x85 But what if toys were real? What if they could talk?\n\nPixar and Disney serve us this theory in what was the first full-length computer-animated film ever, 'Toy Story,' chronicling the events in the life of a cowboy doll, Woody (voiced by Tom Hanks).\n\nWoody is the favorite toy of his owner, a small child named Andy. Andy brings Woody everywhere, and cherishes him, as we see in the beginning of the film. However, this all changes on Andy's birthday when Andy gets a new toy: a Buzz Lightyear doll (voiced by Tim Allen). Woody is suddenly forgotten, left with the rest of his friends: Mr. Potato Head (Don Rickles), Rex (Wallace Shawn), Slinky Dog (Jim Varney, better known as Ernest) and Ham (see if you can guess the voice of this one? I'll give you a hint: 'Cheers'). \n\nBut after Buzz accidentally gets knocked out an upstairs window, Woody is the prime suspect. Now, after Woody and Buzz end up next door, in toy killer Sid's house, Woody must prove his innocence by getting both Buzz and him back to Andy's house safely.\n\n'Toy Story' builds on an element we all shrug off carelessly and thoughtlessly. Much like they did last year with monsters under the bed, Pixar took the theory of live toys to a new level in 'Toy Story,' filling our minds with endless possibilities.\n\nWhat Pixar does is a strange thing. It doesn't just try to expand our mind, but also out world. I respect and enjoy that. In 'Monsters, Inc.,' Pixar managed to preach to us 'What if monsters under the bed are real, and what if they have a world much like ours, and have feelings like humans,' while never forgetting the equally important formula of humor. Much is the same with their earlier film 'Toy Story.' What if those wooden and plastic toys we all played with as kids are real? What if they have feelings, emotions, voices, and human qualities? An interesting idea by itself, but when mixed with a wicked sense of humor and reality, you've got yourself one of the best films ever.\n\nTom Hanks is perfect as Woody. Pixar must have modeled the doll's expressions and movements after Hanks, because after a while, I feel like I AM watching Hanks on screen, and NOT a computer-generated image. When you get to the point of not being able to tell animation from reality, you know that the voices are good.\n\nThe same goes for Tim Allen, though the body gestures were most likely not modeled after Allen's physical expressions (Buzz is a short, pot-bellied toy).\n\nThe rest of the cast is excellent, all very believable and entertaining. You begin to love each character for their distinguishing traits, and that is always refreshing.\n\nI can safely say that I have not enjoyed animated films quite so much over the years as I have enjoyed Pixar films. The only film they made that I named forgettable was 'A Bug's Life,' which was in and of it not horrible, but lacking the sense of humor the other Pixar films have and had.\n\nPixar makes very refreshing films. In an era of cheap, made-for-video Disney sequels, rip-off cartoons and television babysitters (i.e. 'The Jungle Book 2), Pixar holds true to the values that made Disney films so entertaining back in the 30's-60's: Respect for the audience's intelligence, humor, provocative ideas to base the film upon, and respect for the audience (not the exact same thing as the first element), all of which are forgotten in this day and age of money-makers. I respect Pixar very much, and after hearing how little Disney does in helping with their films, I feel that Disney is just trying to cash in on their ideas by having their name branded on the posters for Pixar films. Shame on you, Disney. Proof that Disney has no respect for audiences is the fact that they will not let another sequel be made \x96 something that fans like me would rather have than something like 'Finding Nemo.'\n\n'Toy Story' 1 & 2 are both on my 'favorite films' list. It may sound stupid, but if I made up a top 250 list like IMDb.com, both of those films would be on there; so would 'Monsters Inc.' After an unpromising trailer for Pixar's upcoming film 'Finding Nemo,' I think that after their licensing deal with Disney is disputed (they have to cough up five more ORIGINAL films \x96 not sequels \x96 by 2005), they should definitely try to make a 'Toy Story 3.' I'll be first in line for it, anyway.", u'0.217619', u"Though I am not a big fan of computer animation,I have to give the folks at Pixar credit.This brand of animation is nothing short of brilliant.The attention to detail,such as eye and body movement is quite remarkable.Computers allow them to make their characters as close to human like as possible,something we have never seen in traditional hand drawn animation,though the latter will always be the closest to my heart.Combine this excellence with a genuinely good story idea and a top notch voice cast and the result is good family entertainment.It's obvious that the people at Pixar are not only caring perfectionists when it comes to film making,but they care about our kids,something rarely seen today.Highly recommended for any home library.", u'0.751157', u'Toy Story is the film that started Pixar Animated Studios into its long string of never ending success. What Pixar does is not just absorb the younger demographic and keep the older ones mildly entertained. It completely absorbs everyone watching no matter the age or the level of maturity, films of Pixar, starting from Toy Story, have kept a certain magical touch around it with an unexpected amount of depth. Everyone as a child imagines their toys will come alive and go on their own adventures. One of the great things Pixar does is that it does not attract audiences with its overloaded superstar casts but rather with its material. The only superstar here is Tom Hanks and Tim Allen is the next most aforementioned voice over. Unlike what most people think their is an actually a method to casting for animated films as there is to a live-action one. As a result of this Pixar stays faithful to its material and creates a great genuine and warm feeling around the film and its characters.', u'0.312154', u'\nJust in case you were also wondering what happened to all the toys that went missing when you were a kid, the answer is clear: They escaped.\n\n"Toy Story" is the kind of children\'s movie adults can enjoy just as much, because it very cleverly mines deep deposits of nostalgia from the memory banks. That may be the reason the 1990s bedroom of young Andy is populated by playthings of the 1960s, 1970s, and 1980s. If Andy was a real boy of his time, there would be a computer and a TV/Nintendo, and not much else.\n\nThe voicings of the various toys add to the enjoyability. Tom Hanks was the biggest star of the moment when "Toy Story" came out, and he works with that likeability by creating a stable center as Woody the cowboy doll. Don Rickles has the screen role of his career (not that "Kelly\'s Heroes" was Oscar material) as a prickly Mr. Potato Head, while Jim Varney and R. Lee Ermey are standouts in the supporting cast.\n\nTim Allen gives the movie\'s best performance, as a newfangled toy that takes Woody\'s place in Andy\'s heart but can\'t bring himself to accept that he\'s just a plastic plaything. It\'s the role of the story that gives him the best lines ("I don\'t believe that man has ever been to medical school"), but Allen delivers them with real panache. He more than holds his own, and you kind of see where he took off with that note-perfect William Shatner parody he perfected on screen in the underrated "Galaxy Quest."\n\nWhile this movie\'s use of computer animation makes it a milestone, it neither represents the most innovative use of the technology or the cleverest Pixar-ated treatment of a story. "A Bug\'s Life" seems a more worthy apex; that story was funnier, worked better on its own merits, and used the animation to better effect. But given how novel all of this was in 1995, "Toy Story" could have been a lot less thought-through than it was, and still made gobs of money. The fact it is instead invested with real heart, and can be watched and enjoyed today just as easily as when it debuted nearly 10 years ago, is a tribute to the people behind it.\n\nI like Randy Newman\'s music, just not here, and while the animation textures are surprisingly lifelike, there are places, especially with Scud the dog but also with the baby\'s drool, where it falls short. The story itself gets kind of rote with repeat viewings, though the transition to Sid\'s bedroom and its sad mutilated toys is a genius moment. So too are the vending machine aliens, who gape in rapt wonder at the judgment of "the claw." If it reached for pathos a little less often, "Toy Story" would be an undeniable classic.\n\nAs it is, it is very, very good, the kind of film that\'s only good for children, even (especially?) the inner ones.\n', u'0.23747', u"\nToy Story is a sheer delight to view on the screen.  The characters are well done, the plot is exceptional, and the best thing of all, the film is entirely produced on the computer.  The animation is extraordinary in it's ability to bring such great entertainment to the screen.  The film also teaches some good lessons for the kids like friendship (mainly between Woody and Buzz Light-year).  Spectacular entertainment all around and one of the best films Disney has come with.", u'0.856312', u'Y\'know, I always suspected that my toys were coming to life when I wasn\'t looking! \n\nIn Andy\'s Room, his toys lead lives of noisy desperation come every birthday and Christmas - no one wants to be one-upped by a new addition to the toy box. Nominally led by Cowboy Woody (there\'s a Brokeback joke in there just waiting to happen), Mr. Potato Head, Rex the Dinosaur, Ham the piggybank, Bo Peep, Slinky the dog and a smattering of other playthings go about their toy business of playing checkers, hanging with the hometoys and "plastic corrosion awareness meetings," until Andy\'s birthday party, when they gather expectantly around a transistor radio, listening to the reports of their toy soldier troops "in the field" (downstairs watching Andy\'s gift-opening), hoping that no gift will be exciting enough to cause Andy to neglect *them.* There is. His name is Buzz Lightyear, Space Ranger.\n\nDirected by Pixar mainstay John Lasseter, with the voice talents of Tom Hanks (as Woody), Don Rickles, John Ratzenberger (forever Cliff from *Cheers*), R. Lee Ermey, Annie Potts, Jim Varney and Tim Allen (as Buzz), *Toy Story* is that *rara avis* that succeeds on all levels \x96 in its animation, storyline, character development, its messages of friendship and self-realization and, most importantly, its entertainment value. The fact that this is a cartoon (or animated feature \x96 just what DO we call this new wave of computer-generated movies?) is incidental. Which makes the slightly dodgy animation (of the "real people") irrelevant - it gets the point across with or without the technological finesse.\n\nThe "Disney Movie" has become synonymous with maudlin messages, redneck fundamentalism, anachronistic family values, boneheaded parents, smart-mouthing youngsters, too-hip-to-be-smart teens and insufferable pets. Though Disney\'s tyrannical umbrella overarches this film\'s production studio, Pixar Animation, *Toy Story* somehow avoided all trace of Disney\'s craven hand, which is doubly surprising, considering this is Pixar\'s first feature length film, after years of experimentation. Right outa the gate and right outa the field.\n\nSure, there are "messages," but they are heartfelt, rather than maudlin (Woody tells Buzz during Buzz\'s greatest depression that it matters not what Buzz thinks of himself, what makes him important is what his owner, Andy, thinks of him); there are emotional segments, which are truly heartbreaking, rather than cheesy (when Buzz\'s escape attempt lands him with a broken arm, proving he is Not A Flying Toy, the lyric, "Clearly I will go sailing no more," launches a thousand hankies); and the portrayal of Andy\'s family was Pixar\'s triumphal achievement. Boldly contravening Disney\'s *id\xe9e fixe* of the 1950\'s nuclear family and Norman Rockwell fantasies, one of the many incarnations of a modern-day family is presented: a single mother with two kids, who are neither geniuses nor monsters, just normal children; happy to visit Pizza Planet and disappointed when favorite toys are lost.\n\nBuzz \x96 who believes he is a real life space ranger on a mission to save the universe - become Andy\'s favorite toy over Woody. The funny thing is: though Buzz believes he is real, he still adheres to toy protocol of "playing inert" when humans are in the area. (Maybe it\'s instinct?) When he mentions saving a toy from Sid, the vicious boy next door, how does he propose to do it if he is to adhere to the inert protocol? Buzz\'s ingenuousness regarding his role as a toy infuriates Woody to the point of attempted toy-assassination. Through a concatenation of accidents, both he and Buzz become lost and must use teamwork, trust and ingenuity to beat their path back to Andy, which finds them ensconced in scorchingly funny vignettes (Buzz fastening himself in an over-sized seatbelt; both falling in with green, three-eyed aliens; Buzz hyperventilating as "Mrs. Nesbitt"). During a climactic rocket ride, the callback line, "This is not flying - this is falling with style," simply seals this movie\'s greatness.\n\nAt least I now have a plausible explanation as to why my toys always got lost: after going about their toy business, they would just go inert anywhere they happened to be, instead of paying attention to their master\'s infallible toy filing system\x85.', u'-0.103629', u"\nA very sweet and fun movie. TOY STORY has great computer animation. A simple yet well told story is also added as well. The voice overs are top notch and everyone gets a fair share in this movie. PIXAR has done a good job placing itself on the map.\n\nSet in Andy's room and before the family moves, his mother decides to throw a birthday party for the young lad. Andy's toys all have a conscience and are led by his favorite, Woody. But alas, the big new toy from the party unknowingly takes Woody's mantle.\n\nEnvy and jealousy are brought up well. So is the ignorance of Andy's toys and the loss of innocence from Buzz Lightyear. TOY STORY is well packaged exceeded only by its sequel. A good rent.", u'0.455614', u'"I believe that a filmmaker\'s entire work is contained within his first film; not that it can all be foreseen, but that it can afterwards be verified." \x96 Francois Truffaut (The Films In My Life) \n\nBuzz Lightyear, a glossy action figure with a sexy sheen, is not a mere toy. He\'s a Space Ranger, tasked with protecting the universe from the evil Emperor Zurg! His life has meaning, he is unique, his existence has grand purpose! \n\nWoody, a dated cowboy doll, thinks otherwise. He was once a youthful and exuberant toy, the favourite plaything of his owner Andy, but years of existence have shown him the truth: everyone is just a toy, soon to be forgotten and discarded. No one is unique. There is no grand purpose. No universe to save. Better to be a realist, seeing the world without its fake plastic facade and tacky ipod veneer.\n\nOf course Buzz thinks Woody is just a crazy old timer. Doesn\'t Woody realise that Buzz is a genuine Space Ranger?! That he\'s a member of the Elite Universe Protection Unit! That he alone has information that reveals Emperor Zurg\'s weakness! That stupid fool! \n\nNaturally, we the audience identify with Woody. Buzz seems like an idiot, brainwashed and in desperate need of identity and purpose. The Elite Universe Protection Unit merely elevates believers into a position of exaggerated importance. This is an idle fantasy, an other-worldly hope adopted by those who can\'t face the dour reality that is the "real world of toys".\n\nMidway in the film, our heroes stumble across a horde of green alien toys. These aliens worship a giant claw, a mechanical God which they believe will descend and pluck the "chosen ones", taking them to some kind of toy heaven. In reality, the claw chooses only deluded souls, and offers them to the devilish Cid Phillips, a sadistic child who mutilates toys. "Nirvana is coming!" the aliens whisper, watching as the "chosen ones" are airlifted to their deaths.\n\nBuzz Lightyear faces a similar scenario later in the film. Having witnessed a television commercial which advertises a vast range of Buzz Lightyear action figures, Buzz must confront the fact that he really is "just an ordinary toy" who "can not fly". "Flying" thus becomes a sort of Nietzschean metaphor, the ability to transcend the "flesh" (in this case, injection moulded plastic) and become "something more".\n\nBuzz\'s first reaction upon seeing the commercial is to seek refuge in denial. "I am not a toy!" he says to himself, before climbing to the top of a staircase. Seeking to validate himself by flying, by defying the laws of toy-dom, he takes a giant jump \x96 a literal leap of faith \x96 and of course falls promptly to the ground. He can\'t fly.\n\nCue the fastest existential crisis ever seen in a children\'s film, Buzz Lightyear promptly falling into a deep depression, his faith completely destroyed. His entire existence was based on a lie, a social framework which indoctrinated him into believing that the fate of the whole universe depended on his actions. How can he continue living? Why do anything? What\'s the point? And more importantly, how the hell did this become a kid\'s franchise? It\'s like a demented cartoon by Philip K. Dick ("Do Plastic Toys Dream of Suicide Switches?").\n\nThen comes the message of the film. Woody tells Buzz that being a Space Ranger doesn\'t define who he is. His value, status and worth can only be found within the community of toys, on ground level, and not "up in the skies". There is no purpose beyond ground zero and our importance lies solely in our ability to bring good to those immediately around us.\n\nBuzz heeds Woody\'s words and quickly gets over his loss of faith. He stages a daring rescue mission, straps a rocket to his back and flies spectacularly in the air, his newfound love for the "greater good of his family" quite literally giving him wings.\n\nIn true Zarathustran fashion, Buzz becomes a pint sized Ubermensch figure, a superman who reaches for the sky but is then brought depressingly back down to Earth. If he would just lower his sights, Woody then says, Buzz would find enough reasons to live. Set free of the "moral code" imprinted on him by his makers, Buzz thus adopts a new code which, though it puts limits upon him, negating some of his wild ambitions and reducing him, in an existential sense, to a chunk of plastic, still allows for a Nietzschean war cry. This cry, which Buzz yells every time he jumps across that dark abyss, sums up humanity best: "To Infinity and Beyond!" \n\n8.9/10 \x96 With its revolutionary visuals, consistent humour, genuine sense of adventure, memorable characters, slick camera work and a couple action/adventure scenes worthy of George Lucas, "Toy Story" is a milestone in cinema, and one of the most influential animated films since "Snow White".\n\nMost interesting, though, is in observing how Brad Bird reverses Lasseter\'s themes here with his first Pixar feature, "The Incredibles". Brad Bird seems to be the bad boy of Pixar, subverting them from within. Viva la Resistance. Worth multiple viewings.', u'-0.0838087', u'This was the very first computer animated film from Walt Disney Pictures and Pixar Animation, it is just excellent. It is showing what happens when the young Andy leaves his room, his toys come to life! Woody the cowboy is Andy\'s favourite toy, and looks after all the other toys (and he is a very good Tom Hanks voicing). Unfortunately on Andy\'s early birthday party he gets a new favourite toy, Buzz Lightyear the space ranger (voiced by Tim Allen). Woody obviously gets jealous and both him and Buzz end up lost, and then in evil Sid\'s room. For a kid, Sid is a good villain. Woody and Buzz are now trying to find a way to get back to their owner. Also starring Don Rickles as Mr. Potato Head, John Ratzenberger as Hamm, Wallace Shawn as Rex, Jim Varney as Slinky, Annie Potts as Bo Peep, John Morris as Andy, Scream 2\'s Laurie Metcalf as Andy\'s Mom, Full Metal Jacket\'s R. Lee Ermey as Army Sarge and Jeff Pidgeon as Green Aliens.With recognisable toys for every generation, and the Oscar and Golden Globe nominated song "You\'ve Got a Friend" and Oscar nominated music by Randy Newman, this is a great family film. It was nominated the Oscar for Best Writing, Screenplay Written Directly for the Screen and a Special Achievement Award (fior creation of a feature-length computer-animated film), it was nominated the BAFTA for Best Special Visual Effects, and it was nominated the Golden Globe for Best Motion Picture - Comedy/Musical. It was number 5 on The 100 Greatest Family Films, along with the sequel, both was number 4 on The 100 Greatest Cartoons, and it was number 40 on The 100 Greatest Films. Outstanding!', u'0.513098', u"When Toy Story came, in 1995,I was 9 years old and it was a remarkable animation;Pixar wasn't famous like today, and we didn't have movies like Shrek and Finding Nemo. But I have to say that even in the present days this movie is awesome and has great graphics. Only to start, the story: The toys have life of their own, and every time we humans are distant from them, they have their lives and their own plans. Woody, until Buzz LightYear comes up,was Andy's favorite toy and also the leader of all of them. Jealous of Buzz's fame, Woody tries to get a rid of him, and because of that is totally ignored by the others toys, who once were his friends and admired him. Looking what he did, Woody goes search Buzz and them many adventures happen.", u'0.235632', u'Disney and Pixar studios team up and brought us an imaginative adventure story about a little boy named Andy who loves playing with his toys, with his best friend being a cowboy doll named Woody. However, when Andy and not body else is looking, the toys come to life. Woody is the leader of the toys in Andy\'s room, which include a Mr. Potato Head, Slinky the Dog, Rex the Dinosaur, Hamm the Pig and Bo-Peep the girl doll. However, when Andy\'s get new toy space ranger Buzz Lightyear for his birthday, Buzz takes the place of Woody of being leader of the toys and Andy\'s new best friend. Brewing with jealously, Woody attempts to get rid of Buzz, but both ended up lost outside of Andy\'s house. As a result, they must find their way back to Andy\'s house before they move - first trying to get through Andy\'s weird neighbor and toy torturer Sid.\n\nThis is filmed in brilliant and colorful computer animation - very detailed and realistic. The story is full of surprises and adventure, from Woody and Buzz getting lost in a pizza shop to them trying to break loose out of Sid\'s house to get back to Andy\'s. The movie is also filled with comedy; you will have to watch the movie to appreciate and understand the humor only live toys could make. And, there are toe-tapping songs you would learn to love including Randy Newman\'s opening song "You\'ve Got a Friend in Me." While this movie\'s plot is full of non-stop fun and adventure, making every moment exciting and entertaining, the film also concentrates on friendship and teamwork and overcoming all odds. While I mostly enjoyed this movie, I wished that Woody was not made out to be hated on so much by the other toys after Woody\'s jealous behavior towards Buzz. I thought this takes away at Woody\'s hero status too much especially for his first movie.\n\nBut overall, this is one of Disney\'s best work, which will make you suspend your disbelief and expand your imagination. Also, hands down to a great voice cast: Tom Hanks, Tim Allen, Annie Potts and Jim Varney.\n\nGrade B+', u'0.322035'], u'tt0022100': [u'\nM / (1931) **** \n\n\t"M" is a cinematic masterpiece of visual drama. The stunning performances define the careers of exceptional actors such as Peter Lorre and Gustaf Grundgens. Director Fritz Lang gives depth and dimension to his production by distinctly capturing the ecstasy of the film\'s many characters and focusing accurately on individual situations. This is an intriguing journey into the mind of a psychotic child murderer, blending terror, complexity, and malignity in one amazing motion picture.\n\n\tScreenwriters Paul Falkenburg and Adlof Jansen construct the characters of "M" with distinctive personalities and three dimensional emotions. Many lesser filmmakers give their characters no creativity outside the confines of the script. In this movie each individual character has a mind of their own; they are free to roam the landscape of a inviting atmosphere.\n\n\tFabricating such an impressive atmosphere is some of the best cinematography and lighting effects that I can remember watching. This resplendent component creates the film\'s terrific moody ambiance. Suspense is one thing "M" contains in full context. The movie\'s third act is sheer peak-high tension.\n\n\tShot in black and white, "M" stars Peter Lorre as Peter-Hans Beckert, an extremely disturbed child murderer in the process of wreaking havoc on a neighborhood. Parents everywhere are living in fear of their children being kidnapped and abruptly annihilated. \n\n\tThis picture contains a brilliantly crafted setup. The visual setting creates a strongly developed opening. Every scene works to either complicate the initial problem or propels the story through a firm narrative through line.\n\n\tThe film captures the chaos of the town in terror perfectly. "M" is more about the results of a serial killer than an actual serial killer. Never do we directly witness a murder; the violent encounters are implied. This method of film making perhaps makes the movie\'s impact even greater. With an creative perspective through a third person point of view, the filmmakers repeatedly give us examples of a solid structure through characters and occurrences. \n\n\t"M" offers a unforgettable, challenging performance by Peter Lorre. This extraordinary actor is tormenting and disturbing without embracing in extreme violent conduct. He perspires with momentum and rapture. This productions closing scenes are so deeply penetrating they entirely captivate the viewer. Isn\'t this what movies are supposed to do?\n', u'0.257199', u"The economy, austerity and directness of the films of Fritz Lang made him one of the most profound, and precise filmmakers... \n\nLang, a master of the German expressionist film, shot his first talkie, a crime drama considered a landmark in the story of suspense movies... It was a shocking idea for its time, based on the real-life killer Peter Kurten, headlined as the Vampire of D\xfcsseldorf...\n\n'M' is about a terrorized city, and a plump little man with wide eyes (often chewing candy) who is a pathological child-killer, unable to control his urge for killing... \n\nThe film embodies several Lang themes: the duality between justice and revenge, mob hysteria, the menacing anticipation of watching a helplessly trapped individual trying fruitlessly to escape as greater forces move inexorably in, and, for probably the first time in the cinema, it adds a new dimension to suspense: pity... For the killer is clearly mentally sick... He cannot overcome the overwhelming compulsion of his murderous disease, and yet, we see him hunted down and almost lynched as a criminal, rather than treated as a sick man... \n\nEarly in the film, the killer is heard whistling the Grieg theme from 'In the Hall of the Mountain King'. This theme inexorably becomes imbued with menace... And when we see no more than a girl looking in a shop window, the melody on the sound-track told us chillingly that the murderer is there, just out of sight...\n\nThe Murderer is played by Peter Lorre in a virtuoso performance that has barely been matched in all the thrillers he has made since 'Casablanca,' 'The Maltese Falcon,' and 'The Mask of Dimitrios.' When the photographs of his victims, all little girls, are shown to him, he jumps back and twitches with horror...\n\nWith powerful visuals, Lang's motion picture is Lorre's first film... His performance as the corpulent, hunted psychopath is a masterpiece of mime and suggestion... Lorre is the archetypal outsider-outside the law and society because of his compulsive crimes, outside the balancing society of the underworld because he is not a professional criminal... He had only twelve lines of dialog...\n\nIn the most famous of all about a pathological killer - Alfred Hitchcock's 'Psycho' - Anthony Perkins lacked not only the threat of the tortured Peter Lorre, but also the dimension of invoking our incredulous sympathy... \n\n'Psycho' reeked with blood and horror, whereas the suspense of 'M' is subtle... A child's balloon without an owner, a rolling ball, are enough to tell us that another murder had been committed... The audience, trapped in its seats, torn by ambivalent feelings towards the killer, watched him trapped as the net is pulled tight...", u'-0.237291', u"\nThe opening scene of this movie is the first clue to its near perfection \x96 A mother preparing dinner for her child, waiting anxiously for her to return from school.  Her hope, and then distress as she hears people pass outside her door.  While down in the streets of Berlin, her daughter is receiving a balloon from a strange man in a long black coat.  We know what's going to happen, but it's still horrific to watch.\n\nFritz Lang, you cinematic god!  A simple story of the underworld, the police, and a single man holding an entire city hostage, and done with such precision and pre-noir darkness that is oozes creepy suspense from beginning to end.\n\nBut this movie is not so simple as the police inspectors trying to catch a devious murderer \x96 it's about the mob, employing its network of beggars and petty thieves also trying to bring the killer to their own brand of justice. Apparently, the police crackdown caused by the murders is bad for business \x96 so the mob begins to track him down as well.\n\nIt's not only a great crime story, and perhaps the first physiological thriller (the murderer is schizophrenic) but there's comments to be made here about the nature of justice, and who should best dispense it.\n\nIn all, not only a trail-blazing classic, but THE trail-blazing classic.\n", u'0.030021', u'The first time I saw M, by Fritz Lang, I almost didn\'t know what to make of it. I was overwhelmed by the power of the performances, the staging of the scenes, the locations, and the power that the simple story had with such complex circumstances. Then I saw it again, and a third time, and I know that this is one of the best films ever to come out of Germany- it\'s a powerful statement about protecting our children (if you\'re looking at it as a "message" movie), but in reality it is just a piece of cinema heaven. Thrillers today only wish they could draw a viewer into the mystery elements, and have such unconventionality of the times. Boiling down to this, M is about a child Killer - the legendary character actor Peter Lorre in his first major role - who snatches children when their parents don\'t watch, and continues on until an investigation goes underway. But as the police investigate overly thoroughly into the real criminal underworld, they know something is up, that this is someone far more gone than they could ever be, so they join in the hunt. This all leads to one of the supreme dramatic climaxes in any thriller.\n\nOn the first viewing I just went straight for the story, which is able to suck one in enough to make you feel dizzy. But on the multiple viewings it becomes even more interesting as one can study the intricacy, and indeed full-on artistry, of Lang\'s camera. He puts it in unusual places at times, and adds for good measure shades of dark and gray in many of the night scene (this is, by the way, a precursor to \'film-noir\', which Lang later became an important director in the 40\'s and 50\'s). On top of this, there is a very modern sense of style in the editing- I remember a couple of scenes that surprised me editing wise. One is where the cops (I think it was the cops) have an argument about the investigation- two of them get into a shouting match, and we get medium close-ups of them going back and forth. This is done quickly, with a kind of intensity that isn\'t even captured in today\'s thrillers. There is also the hunt for Lorre in the digging of the house, where Lang cuts around constantly, heightening the tension between the predators (the criminals) and the prey (Lorre), until it\'s almost too much to take.\n\nThe disturbing aspects of the story, of child abduction and murder, have become benchmarks of a number of today\'s thrillers, where the cop is usually the subject and the killer left more in the shadows, in cat & mouse style. This doesn\'t happen here, and because of it by the time we get to the final scene, with Lorre being interrogated and giving his "I can\'t help it" speech, it becomes something poetic, tragic, frightening. Lang doesn\'t leave his "message" so simplistically, he makes sure we know Lorre\'s side too, however twisted it has become, and the antagonist is shown as human as opposed to these present-day thriller where the killers are barely given one dimension let alone two. There were reports that during filming Lang put Lorre through torture, ultimately causing the two to never work together again. But nevertheless, out of this comes a towering performance of a small, wild-eyed criminal in the midst of an extremely well-told and unpredictable mystery story. In short, if you don\'t know what you\'re in for when you hear that whistle, those several infamous notes, you may not at all.', u'0.0196013', u"M is a monumental film and seriously should be watched by all. For a film like this to be made in 1931 is just shocking. Even if the film was released today it would still be nothing like we have seen before. In our modern age of film making there has been a considerable rise in the production of films about serial killers, their complexities and particularly about pathological ones. Yet, M is the first movie that comes to my mind when I think of the themes that have been in Psycho, Silence of the Lambs, Seven and not to mention countless more.\n\nThe film is lead by Peter Lorre in a transcending performance who plays the serial killer and rapist in which the film is centered around. In this performance Lorre is successful in something that at the very least is rare to see in any kind of film, compassion for a child killer and rapist. Lorre makes the viewer see, that he is not a criminal by choice but by a sickness of compulsion. Too often then not is our perception of a psychotic killer having that look that puts fear into his or hers victims' eyes. Lorre doesn't do that but rather displays a frightened man, a scared man. One in which his desperation leads to his hazardous behavior. His portrayal of a killer is not of a fearless one but of one consumed by fear. Something that even today we as a people cannot understand, let alone in 1931.\n\nThe direction and writing of Fritz Lang is beyond comprehensible as he taps into the mind of a serial killer and his complexities. He does so in such that we get an empathetic and compassionate illustration of all sides of the story. This in which by then end of the film all points of view are more then well delivered to the audience. Fritz Lang here, has simply created here a timeless masterpiece. One that excels in its technical aspects and enlightens the audience on a topic that other films still have not yet to match M in.\n\nI highly recommend this film for many obvious reasons and conclusions. This film was created by one of the all time great directors in Fritz Lang, Lang's command for the screen is mesmerizing and a joy to witness and so on and so forth. Yet much of this is mostly superficial and a waste of time to continuously state. M, as I mentioned before takes a strong and original stance on an issue that we as a society yet have not fully resolved. This film may not give you THE answer on this issue but it may sway that moral compass of yours that lies inside of all of us.", u'-0.0621845', u'Fritz Lang\'s highly influential career as a film director began in post World War I Germany, where he was a leading figure in the German Expressionist film movement, and ended in the United States in 1953 with the production of The Big Heat, a film noir classic. Perhaps his greatest film, M (Germany, 1931) forms an historical bridge between expressionism and film noir. Like the former it uses strange and disturbing compositions of light and dark in order to symbolize the inner workings of the human mind; like the latter it more realistically sets its story in a modern urban setting and blends in sociological issues along with the psychological and moral ones. \n\nEven though M was Lang\'s (and Germany\'s) first sound film, many historians cite it as the initial masterpiece of cinema to appear following the introduction of sound into films in the late 1920\'s. While most early "talkies" return films to their static, visually monotonous, stage- imitative beginnings and thus limit rather than expand the artistic possibilities of the medium, M avoids the failing by skillfully balancing asynchronous, off-screen sounds with the more limiting use of synchronous dialogue. The film\'s editing, particularly its elaborate use of parallel cutting, also contributes kinetic energy and fluidity to the storytelling. Of course, many of the film\'s sound effects are also imaginative and memorable, none more so than the compulsive whistling of the film\'s central character, the stalker and serial killer of little girls Hans Beckert (magnificently played by Peter Lorre). \n\nSound is also an important contributor to M\'s rich and influential use of off screen space. One famous example is the scene that introduces Beckert as a shadow against his own Wanted poster, creepily intoning to his next victim, Elsie Beckmann, "You have a very pretty ball." Not only is Beckert\'s shadow a bow toward Lang\'s expressionist artistic roots, but it ironically places the murderer in the implied space in front of the image - that is, among us, the human community of viewers of which he is an innocuous-appearing, albeit monstrous, member. Another example of Lang\'s use of off-screen space is the montage of shots whose common denominator is Elsie\'s absence from them: an empty chair at the Beckmann dinner table, the vertiginous stairwell down which Elsie\'s mother searches compulsively and futilely for signs of her daughter\'s arrival, the attic play area that awaits Elsie\'s return from school. Most memorable of all - and most often alluded to visually in other films - is the series of shots that indirectly record Beckert\'s assault and murder of the innocent child, representing these off screen events metonymically via the entry of Elsie\'s ball from bushes along on the right edge of the frame and the release of her balloon from telephone wires and off the left edge of the frame. Never in the history of cinema has something so terrible been communicated through such powerfully understated images.\n\nBeyond its technical brilliance, the keys to M\'s lasting impact are its psychologically convincing portrait of Hans Beckert\'s twisted compulsion and the still relevant ambivalence of his capture and "trial." Unlike contemporary cinematic examples of the serial killer, Beckert is not presented simply as a grotesque psychopath. Nor is the issue of how society should deal with him at all clear-cut. To be sure, the gut-reaction of most film audiences is to root on the underworld mobsters and petty thieves who, beating the established authorities to their mutual quarry, capture Beckert and bring him to a mock- formal trial whose conclusion is foregone. Like many in America today, Beckert\'s accusers are disinclined to listen to insanity pleas and would just as soon be rid of the "monster" in the surest way possible: a summary death penalty with as little fretting about legal rights as possible. \n\nConsidering the heinousness of Beckert\'s crimes and the imperfections of a legal/medical system that could well turn him loose to kill again, this emotional response is hard to resist. Yet M is by no means an endorsement of vigilantism - quite the contrary. Through the unlikely rhetorical persuasions of Beckert\'s unkempt "court appointed" defense attorney and Beckert\'s own impassioned monologue, Lang strongly implies that impatience with democratic judicial procedure and a paranoid eagerness to scapegoat others (guilty or not) in the name of order are symptomatic of the social hysteria breeding Nazism in 1930s Germany. That the ruthless killer who heads the underworld looks, dresses, and gestures like a Gestapo officer is no accident. Moreover, the letter "M" chalked on Beckert\'s back by one of his pursuers not only stands for "murderer" but also alludes to God\'s marking of Cain. While the popular misconception holds that the mark of Cain symbolizes his evil, it in fact represents God\'s warning to Cain\'s flawed fellow creatures not to mete out wrathful vengeance, but to leave justice in God\'s hands. Translated into secular terms (and literally entering the shot from the top of the frame), God\'s hands in M belong to the legitimate authorities that intervene at the last moment to arrest and try Hans Beckert "in the name of the Law."', u'-0.0454502', u'\nBeing a huge fan of German Expressionist art, I\'m naturally drawn to the films of Fritz Lang.  I recently was able to see the restored version of "Metropolis" on the big screen, and was delighted to see "M" on the Sundance channel - especially since it was the uncut version.  M follows the trail of a child killer (Peter Lorre), sought both by the police and the members of the underworld whose businesses are being effected by the investigation. \n\n\nThis film is ground-breaking for many reasons:  It is Fritz Lang\'s first talking picture, it is one of the first in the serial killer genre and it was overtly anti-Nazi.  This film was banned in Germany shortly after it premiered, and Fritz Lang and Peter Lorre, both Jews, soon fled the country.  It has superb acting (most notably, Peter Lorre\'s trial scene in the catacombs) and very stark yet at times gritty cinematography.  The story is indeed suspenseful and at times, very creepy (what whistling child killer isn\'t?).  The entire movie, however is extremely thought-provoking and challenging, much like the German Expressionist movement itself. \n\n\nThis is not a movie for everyone; some may find it boring, some may find it too abstract. It also has one of the most bizarre shots I\'ve ever seen in film - essentially it\'s a 30 second shot of the police inspector talking on the phone, but you\'re under his desk and looking up his pants leg.  It actually kind of baffled me and made me chuckle for a second, but it was avant garde if anything.\n\nTo those who appreciate early cinema that truly makes you think, both about the film and the subtext with which it was written and filmed, it is a must-see. \n\n--Shelly', u'0.273433', u'\nThis is one of those movies that will stay with you for the rest of your life.  The characters are ugly and disturbing, there is nothing "cute" in this movie.\n\nThere are constant parallelisms drawn between the police and the underworld and the common way in which they operate.\n\nWe also get to journey into the mind of the madman.  If you enjoyed "Silence of the Lambs", you should see this also.\n\nOf course you must be patient enough to deal with subtitles, and the fact that this is a very old movie - one of the first "talkies".  But most viewers will get something out of the dialogue even without knowing the German language.', u'0.143342', u"\nThis movie is definitely one of the scariest movies I've ever seen. It's about this childlike, pity evoking man (brilliantly played by Peter Lorre), who also happens to be a psychotic child killer. The city in which he lives is, of course, panicked by the mysterious child-killings, and both the criminals and the police starts to haunt the man down. I won't reveal more then this, but I will say this: Just because it's an old movie, don't let your guard down. This movie is one of those rare movies, which are so good that you'll never forget them. ", u'-0.026325', u'In an eerie propagandist fashion, the phrase "in the name of the Law" is repeated over the last two scenes of Fritz Lang\'s "M" as a child killer is brought to justice. If "L" represents the State and the Law, then "M" is meant to represent the Individual (who in this case is a Murderer). Lang boldly asked us way back in 1931, whose rights come first: the State or the Individual? A master of his craft, Lang leaves the question open-ended and let\'s the audience decide.\n\n"M" is shockingly contemporary in its psychological complexities. It explores the psychology of individualism vs. group think while showcasing how a state of fear can be inflicted upon a populace when a government fails to protect society from a single individual terrorizing the people. The story is fairly straightforward: An elusive citizen begins killing innocent children in a large nameless German city. The media fuels a paranoid frenzy that incites the public. The clueless police begin to raid "the underworld" after the populace is turned into a raving mob because of the failure to capture the killer. "The underworld" comes to a screeching halt as their business is ruined by the police and starts their own manhunt for the killer.\n\nUnlike a modern period piece that attempts to evoke a certain place and time, "M" WAS a certain place and time. Lang, in an almost prophetic sense, captured the state of mind of the German people in 1931 as the Weimar Republic was on the brink of collapse and the Nazi Regime was preparing to take over. When individuals live in a state of fear, as they do in "M", society collapses and the Individual is crushed. Only the State, it seems, can bring order.\n\n"M" is a also a masterpiece for its technical aspects. The way in which Lang uses his camera to move through windows, capture shadows, reflections, empty spaces, and shift points-of-view is staggering even by today\'s standards. He also played with the new technology of recorded sound with extensive voice-over narration and dialogue used to overlap and transition between scenes. Didn\'t critics recently praise "Michael Clayton" for utilizing just such a technique as if it was something revolutionary? One can also see a protean style the would eventually birth the Film Noir movement with the creation of tension and suspense in the use of shadows and camera angles.\n\nYet "M" is not perfect. It has some major flaws. There are no real "characters" in the film to speak of in the modern sense. The film is virtually all built around mood and plot. The only time Lang invites us to emotionally connect is in the opening and closing scenes with a mother of one of the victims, and in the classic scene of Peter Lorre giving his writhing and primal "I can\'t help it!" speech in front of the kangaroo court of criminals. The mother\'s grief and Lorre\'s madness are presented so sparsely and in such a raw form that it becomes too painful to want to connect with them. Another flaw that is often overstated about films from this time period is the slow pace of the early police procedural scenes. These inherent flaws combined with the inherent brilliance of Lang\'s vision make "M" one of the most challenging films a modern viewer could ever sit through.\n\nWhat impressed me most about "M" was the subtlety of the symbolism Lang created with his haunting images. As harrowing as the story is, none of the gruesomeness is shown on screen. It\'s all transmitted to the viewer through the power of suggestion. Is it any wonder Hitler wanted Fritz Lang for his propaganda machine, which thankfully led to Lang fleeing to America? I\'ll never forget the wide shots of the kangaroo court (and the looks on those people\'s faces as the killer is brought down the steps for trial) or the vast expanse of that empty warehouse. The scene of the ball rolling in the grass with no one to catch it, the balloon caught in the telephone wires, and the empty domestic spaces the mother has to inhabit after her child has been murdered are the types of scenes that tape into Jungian archetypes and shared fears. The look on Lorre\'s face as he confesses, the hand of the Law coming down to save Lorre from being lynched, and the ghastly plea from the mother in the final scene will stick with me for the rest of my life. \n\n"M" is a communal nightmare; one that from which we have yet to awake.', u'-0.14991', u'\nGreat story with incredible development of ideas and feelings while giving the audience an in-depth perspective for each side to an extremely difficult issue to resolve.  Every film lover should take the time to see this film for its ingenious style and execution of ideas.  Adds a little comedy in interesting ways to help entertain and engage the audience.  Acting is incredibly real and heart felt.  Dramatic and tender to fit to any interest.', u'0.799581', u"Watching Fritz Lang's M is watching the history of cinema unfold before one's eyes. Made in the transition period between the silent and sound film, this 1931 masterpiece remains fascinating for several reasons.\n\nFirst of all, the use of sound is impeccable. Suffice to say the killer in the movie is caught is through identifying his trademark whistling. But the use of voice-over narration was also new at the time and is used here very well: first when a mother calls, in panic, for her missing child, and her name echoes across several empty walls. Next in a scene in which two detectives elaborate on what they've done to apprehend the killer and everything they say is matched by an image.\n\nSecondly, few times has a serial killer been treated with such complexity, compassion and straightforwardness in cinema. Peter Lorre plays a child murder, a man who acts by impulse, possibly a schizophrenic. He simultaneously evokes horror and pity, and he's too distant from the super-cool and erudite serial killers of today. Lorre plays one Hans Beckert, a lonely man with a history of mental illness, an ordinary man without any qualities or amazing traits.\n\nThirdly, it's a powerful meditation on vigilantism and crime. The police is unable to capture the killer, so Berlin's underground decides to capture the criminal. The police raids are putting them out of business and they resent the fact that a child killer is being sought amidst their ranks. The absurdity of bank robbers and card cheaters with a sense of morals is not lost on the filmmakers. In a mock-trial at the end, these same criminals think they have the authority to sentence the child murder to death. But as he tells them, if they wanted, if they got jobs and worked honestly, they could leave their lives of crime; a man who's ordered by voices to kill can't just turn off him impulses.\n\nBut above all, M is a fascinating, exciting thriller. It's an intelligent crime story, that shows police and criminals working on different sides and with different means to achieve the same purpose. If one can laugh at the idea of a criminal union (realism should never be a criterion for judging art), one can't laugh at the policemen in this movie. Inspector Lohmann, played by Otto Wernicke, is one of most intelligent detectives ever to grace cinema. He's fat, he's cranky, he's an unlikely hero, but he's shrewd, he can read a person's personality at a glance, he's patient. Lang must have liked him too because he used the character (and actor) in his following crime epic, The Testament of Dr. Mabuse, in which Lohmann shows even greater skills.\n\nI knew (or at least highly expected) that M would be an amazing movie. But I didn't imagine a 80-year-old movie would hold up so well in terms of cinematography, sound, pacing, acting, structure. Few movies achieve such a synthesis of qualities. There is no doubt on my mind that M deserves the recognition it continues to receive from film historians.", u'0.0674084', u'This movie is so intense and enthralling, it doesn\'t have to hide from even the most amazing Action-movies. But unlike the most action-movies, it really has a story to tell with a very interesting conclusion at the end.\n\nWhen people talk about Fritz Lang they always talk about Metropolis, but I think this is his masterpiece. This movie MUST HAVE inspired pretty much every police movie or show ever made. \n\nRarely have I rated a movie a 10 with more confidence than this one.\n\nEND OF REVIEW\n\n....... so I don\'t have anymore lines, but they make me write "10 lines" apparently, so Im writing this. I know a joke ...ehm, well, its not a good one, so I will quote GEORGE BEST:"I spent a lot of money on booze, birds and fast cars. The rest I just squandered"', u'0.501655', u"This movie has it all! This is one of my all-time favorite movies. Many people have criticized it because it's from 1931 and I say: Who cares when you have such a great movie? Peter Lorre gives a 4 star performance as the child murderer, and may I say he is very very haunting. Fritz Lang's direction is superb; the cinematography is superb! The kangaroo court scene at the end is my favorite part, and it's brilliantly done. The plot is very well crafted. Even more amazing is the plot focuses around catching the murderer, but it is not boring for one second. Each scene flows beautifully into the next with some amazing chases, raids, and facial expressions. This is also a movie ahead of its time. This is definitely one of the all-time best movies!", u'0.780204', u'In my opinion this is just an OK film. Except for some little stylistic tricks there is nothing special. The story is OK, how it is told is rather weak, in some parts it\'s even ridiculous, the acting is mostly very weak except for Lorre who you don\'t see much of anyway, and the sound quality is horrible (something you can\'t blame it for, but I had to use HEADPHONES on full volume to even understand the words!) but switching from sound to silent all the time is very distracting and has no dramatic effect at all (even if some say so) - the opposite is the case, it seems very amateurish. The slow pacing is typical for it\'s time. And suspense? I don\'t think so. \n\nIn my opinion the main reasons why this film is so critically acclaimed are:\n\nA) Lorre\'s overacting. Whenever overacting has a purpose it\'s critically acclaimed. And his acting as a madman is very effective. \n\nB) I\'d call it "heavy look". The topic seems "heavy" and the plot and style seem all too heavy and important. You almost want the film to be successful so you search for it in Lorre\'s acting. As a justification so to say. \n\nI\'m sure you like the film for many other reasons too. Some more important reasons maybe. But that doesn\'t mean I\'m wrong. It\'s a film we want to like and where you don\'t want to look for the flaws. Well, long story short, I don\'t think the final result is a success. There is too much Average in it and the Great isn\'t all that great. \n\nMetropolis, Nosferatu, Caligari, Sunrise, I think, have all a more stunning look. All silent and all made before "M". Don\'t get me wrong, the cinematography is good and also inventive in little parts, but not THAT revolutionary that it deserves the reputation it has. \n\nProbably the flaws are too big for me to fully appreciate the rest. Like every time one said: "He doesn\'t leave any marks...blah, blah" I had to laugh. He talks with the kids in the middle of the day in the middle of the street, he walks along the streets with them, he goes into shops, buys stuff for them, he makes mad gestures in public. And then he also whistles this damn song all the time so loud you hear it from three streets away while everyone in the audience knows from beginning on that this will be his doom. \n\n6/10', u'-0.0702553'], u'tt0078748': [u'Back in early 20th century, Lumi\xe8re brothers didn\'t have a clue of what they were playing with. I\'m freaking sure that if somebody could have magically told them that thanks to their work, a movie like \'Alien\' would have been made in the future, they both would have died of a sudden, shocked by the consequences of their labor, like an honest scientist would if he was shown an evil use of his research. In that sense, but in the best way imaginable, \'Alien\' is the atomic bomb.\n\nIn my opinion, \'Alien\' is the only perfect movie in the history of cinema. Of course, this could be debatable, but of all the films I\'ve watched since I was born, this is the only one in which I haven\'t been able to find the slightest flaw. It gets a golden ten out of ten. Bright, solid and massive.\n\nI could go on with a panegyric, but I\'ll try to be short and accurate:\n\nThe direction is just perfect. Every shot is marvellous, every movement of the camera is breathtaking. There is absolutely nothing you could add or subtract. Touch it, and you spoil it. Seriously.\n\nThe acting is splendid. The performances build a credible world centuries away. I don\'t know about you, but this take on the future was unveliabably acceptable. Sigourney Weaver is more than a revelation, John Hurt is a master, and the rest are nothing short of marvellous.\n\nThe script is a work of art, the story is mesmerizing, well-constructed, well-developed, and free of absurd twists. Its simplicity and efectiveness are yet, 25 years after, to be matched.\n\nThe atmosphere is pure genius. Gothic, claustrophobic and sometimes baroque. The use of light and dark is beyond description, the use of sound is as creepy as it gets.\n\nThe FX are the best possible for 1979. In the time of the release, some scenes were stomach churning.\n\nThe score. Jerry Goldsmith\'s work matches the images so perfectly it seems to bleed from them. It is and will be the best soundtrack for a sci-fi flick in space ever.\n\nThe tagline. "In space, no one can hear you scream". THIS is a tagline.\n\nAnd, of course... the alien. The only alive creature that can steal Weaver the movie. Its design is the most innovative I\'ve seen. It has spawned dozens of disgraceful imitations. This is the real deal. Not only the look, but the complete design of a life form, including biological features. Acid instead of blood. Jaws inside jaws. What more could you possibly want? This is how a movie is done.\n\nA very good sign of a movie that has gone down in history is the amount of collectively well remembered scenes. Well, \'Alien\' has so many that I won\'t go into it. This movie contains so many iconic scenes that has become an icon itself.\n\nSo, what else? I urge all young directors to watch this movie a zillion times, as I\'ve already done, and take notes all along. But not in order to rip off from it, as many others have done, but to learn, learn, learn, learn and learn how a movie should be done. \'Casablanca\'? You must be joking.\n\nOh, I almost forget! There\'s a lovable cat in it.\n\nRATING: 10', u'0.192067', u"\nDirector Ridley Scott's well-honed talents of pacing and editing create a tense atmosphere that superbly conveys dread and fear of an unknown, unseen evil entity.  In 1979, the technology didn't exist to generate a computer image of a Being from another world, and thank God, because this film would have sucked just like all these post-Alien creature features do.  Everyone who loves this movie knows what I'm talking about.  Ridley Scott had to be extremely careful not to show a full shot of the Alien, except in very brief scenes, and not to reveal exactly how it moves, because then we would see that it is just some tall, skinny guy in a rubber suit.  Nowadays, some computer guy would whip up a really scary-looking, but nevertheless FAKE-looking (yes, computer guys, we can tell) Alien, and the director would not have to even think about trying to breathe life into H.R. Giger's hallucinations to make a successful picture.\n\nThe dark, cold beauty of this film will never be equaled.", u'-0.0194946', u'In "Alien" we follow a seven man crew en-route to earth on board the huge space freighter "Nostromo". The crew is in cryosleep, but the on board computer interrupts the journey when a foreign radio signal is picked up. It originates from an uninhabited planet and the crew lands to investigate. There they make contact with an alien life-form...\n\nWhat makes Alien so great is the constant feel of uneasiness. Right from the beginning you have a feeling that something is wrong. The crew is not particularly friendly towards each other, and you truly feel all the in-group tension. The ship itself is a huge worn out industrial-style maze of halls and corridors, and it feels more like a prison than a place to live. It is as if not only the alien but also the ship itself is against the humans. The Alien itself is the scariest monster in history because it is a ruthless, soul-less parasite completely devoid of any human or civilized traits. The design of the monster is a stroke of genius. Sure it has a humanoid form, but it has no facial traits or anything else which could give away emotions or intentions. Its actions reveals no weaknesses nor civilized intelligence. The Alien is more or less the opposite of everything human and civilized, plus the creature is more well-adapted to the inhumane interior of the ship than the humans who build it. To sum up, you then have a setting where the humans are caught in a web of in-group tensions, an inhospitable ship and the perfect killer which thrives in the ships intestines. You almost get the feel that the humans are the ones who are alienated to each other and to their own ship.\n\nRidley Scott tells the story with a perfectly synchronized blend of visuals and sounds. \n\nThe actors do a superb job, portraying their characters in a subtle but very realistic way. The seven man crew is not a bunch of Hollywood heroes. They are ordinary people with strengths and weaknesses, likes and dislikes. In this way they all seem so fragile when confronted with the enemy. \n\nAs mentioned the ship is very claustrophobic and Ridley Scott adds to the eeriness by using camera movement, lights and shadows in an effective way. The living quarters are bright and should be comfortable to the crew, but there is something sterile about it all. The rest of the ship is basically a huge basement. \n\nThe music by Jerry Goldsmith underlines the eeriness so well, and the movie wouldn\'t have worked without his score. Combined with the sounds of the ship it all adds to the uneasiness. \n\nThis is not a story about heroic people who boldly teams up against evil. It\'s a story about ordinary people facing true fear, which is the fear without a face. The fear we can\'t understand and can\'t negotiate with, because its only goal is to survive on the expense of us. It\'s a story where some people bravely fight back whilst others are destroyed by the terror. It\'s a story where people a killed in a completely random way. There is no higher-order justice behind who gets to live and who dies. All seven characters are just part of a race where the fittest - not necessarily the most righteous - will prevail, and all seven characters start the race on an equal footing. None of them are true heroes, and none of them are true villains. \n\nAll the above makes Alien so great as a horror movie. The terror isn\'t just the Alien itself, it\'s the entire atmosphere which gets so effectively under your skin, that you just can\'t shrug it off after the end credits like you can with so many other Hollywood horror movies. The title "Alien" doesn\'t just refer to the monster, it is the theme of the movie and it is the feeling you have during and after the movie. 9/10', u'-0.143653', u'\nThe further we go in special effects, the more movies show us and ignore the unseen, the more people will return to dark horrors like this one.\n\nIt\'s hard to look at this film without considering the sequels and knowing the alien itself, however when made the alien was mostly unseen and a mystery. It\'s difficult to forget what you\'ve seen, but it\'s important to approach this film first if possible rather than joining the series late.\n\nIt\'s amazing that this is over 20 years old - apart from the actors looking so young, the film doesn\'t feel dated at all. The sci-fi visions here are still bleak and futuristic as they were then - this is not the Star Trek vision of the future. The foreboding exists long before John Hurt spills his secret, Scott\'s direction is excellent throughout. Once the alien is "born" the tension is cranked up and the characters dispatched one by one (a formula we know oh-so well now!)\n\nHowever here the characters are not merely alien-food but have some dimension to them. Weaver is excellent, while the support cast is full of great support actors (Stanton, Kotto, Hurt, Skerritt, Holm), but of course the real star is the one we see least of.\n\nWe barely see the alien in full detail, most of the time it is set in shadows, moving with deadly intent.The alien here is not simply a killing machine as seen in later films but is cruel with it. Witness the alien trap a female crew member and slowly rub up her leg, moving with slow seductive movements before moving with terrifying speed to kill another crew member sneaking up behind it. The slow movements betray the alien\'s pure cruelty.\n\nThe film is a study in terror. It may not be as action packed as the other films in the series but it brings the claustrophobia of being hunted to a new level.\n\n\n', u'-0.129196', u'ALIEN received mixed reviews when it debuted in 1979--largely from science fiction critics, who accused it of being little more than a sort of Friday the 13th in Outer Space, a blood-and-gore horror flick given a futuristic twist via special effects. But while these accusations have more than a little truth, it has been an incredibly influential film--and even today, in the wake of CGI effects, it still holds up extremely, extremely well.\n\nThe story is well known: the crew of an interstellar craft responds to what seems a distress signal, only to encounter a remarkably lethal alien life form that boards their ship and sets about picking them off one by one. Some of the special effects are weak (the alien spacecraft and the android "revival" are fairly notorious). There is little in the way of character development, the film has a fairly slow pace, and the story itself is predictable; you can usually guess who is going to die next.\n\nBUT. The art designs are incredible: the entire look of the film, from the commercial nature of the spacecraft to the iconographic alien itself (brilliantly envisioned by Giger) is right on the money. Director Ridley Scott encouraged his cast to ad lib from the script, and the result is a shocking sense of realism--and the somewhat slow pace of the film and the predictability of the story gives it a sense of relentless and ever-mounting paranoia that is greatly enhanced by the tight sets and camera set-ups. With its odd mixture of womb-like organics and cold mechanics, ALIEN is a film calculated to send even the most slightly claustrophobic viewer into a fit of hysteria.\n\nThe entire cast, led by Tom Skerrit and Sigorney Weaver, is very, very good--and the film abounds with memorable images and scenes ranging from John Hurt\'s encounter with the alien egg to Skerrit\'s search of the ship air ducts to Weaver\'s terrifying race against time as the ship counts down to self-destruct. Seldom has any film been so consistent in design, cast, direction, and out-and-out fear factor, and although certain aspects of ALIEN are open to legitimate criticism the end result is powerful enough to bring it in at a full five stars. A word of warning, however: you\'ll need to send the kids to bed for this one. And you\'ll probably be up half the night afterward yourself! Recommended.\n\nGary F. Taylor, aka GFT, Amazon Reviewer', u'0.0221765', u"\nThe beginning of one of the greatest series of all time. This film will  always remain a classic. It's scary, influential and insanely entertaining.  Not just that but Ridley Scott actually has a great sense of style and mood  and he plays with that a lot, to make us shiver. There's also an  interesting mystery surrounding the Alien which we know practically nothing  about. Sigourney Weaver is just as powerful as usual and really brings  strength to the film; they make one. Last but not least, the musical score.  Wow! It's fantastic. I think the Alien series is known for that aspect as  well. Let's hope they'll continue the series and dang we need it all on DVD !", u'0.502203', u'"In space, no one can hear you scream." This remains my favourite tagline ever for a movie. When \'Alien\' was released in 1979, it caused almost as much talk as \'Star Wars\' did when released two years earlier. The science fiction genre was being revolutionized at this time and \'Alien\' had a horror characteristic to it which was psychological, visually striking and compelling with the type of strength in silence not seen since \'2001: A Space Odyssey\' in 1968. Definitely a big influence in blockbuster film making, \'Alien\' has spawned three sequels so far and is a great horror/science-fiction classic not to be missed. It is director Ridley Scott\'s best effort on the big screen for making fear the best character in the film.', u'0.318523', u'\n\'Alien\' while technically science fiction is also one of the greatest horror/suspense movies ever made. Ridley Scott is now one of the most well known and successful directors in Hollywood, but I don\'t think anything he\'s made in the last ten years is a patch on this perfect film, which is a near masterpiece in my opinion. In fact, on reflection there are only three Scott movies I genuinely like, those being his first three. The last of these \'Blade Runner\' was released twenty years ago now, so to me Scott is long past his use by date. Whatever, \'Alien\' itself is a brilliant piece of work, and is almost flawless. Scott\'s direction is superb and everything else about it is outstanding - a strong script from Dan O\'Bannon et al, an evocative score from Jerry Goldsmith, brilliant design and special effects, including the amazing contributions from H.R.Giger, all add up to an amazing movie experience. I also really liked how the cast were character actors and not "stars" so there was plenty of suspense generated as to who will live and who will die. This is something very few subsequent movies have done, \'Pitch Black\' being one of the exceptions. Sigourney Weaver may be an icon as Ripley now, but when the movie was first released she was virtually unknown, having had a small cameo in Woody Allen\'s \'Annie Hall\' and not much else. The rest of the cast are equally as good. I especially enjoyed Yaphet Kotto (\'Blue Collar\') and the legendary Harry Dean Stanton (\'Wise Blood\') as the wise cracking "below deck" crew. Many people seem to prefer James Cameron\'s sequel \'Aliens\' over this, but as I much prefer horror and suspense movies to action ones I think this is definitely the better movie, and still the strongest and most effective in the series. \'Alien\' is a horror classic and an absolutely unforgettable movie that I can\'t recommend highly enough. If you haven\'t seen it before watch it immediately!', u'0.608133', u"Three words perfectly describe ALIEN: Long, dark and ominous.\n\nYou know you're in for a good time when even the opening title gives you a shiver. The music plays perfectly as the word 'ALIEN' slowly appears, line by line. Then there are the establishing shots of the ship; poorly maintained, claustrophobic.\n\nAnd then there's basically forty minutes of people in a ship pondering and eating and getting along (or not). The film has one little thing that allows it to draw you along so slowly - a promise. A promise made by the advertisements and hype that this was going to kick your ass. You just had to wait.\n\nBut when it happens, it happens. Though the film doesn't speed up per se, there's a lot more happening in front of the screen to make it at least look like stuff's going on. The first half crawls almost depressingly, but the second half catches your eye and refuses to let go.\n\nI suggest everyone sees this film. Even if you skip through the beginning, you need to see this. It defined sci-fi and horror all in one.\n\nIt's perfect.", u'-0.0967553', u'This is one of the finest science fiction films ever made. Everything is so carefully and expertly constructed to the point that repeated viewings are just as good as the first. Also, the atmosphere, along with the amazing sets, is real shocker and few movies have managed to create the same kind eerie feeling.\n\nThe story starts with the crew of the cargo vessel "Nostromo" waking up before schedule. They soon realize their on-board computer has detected life on a nearby planet and they go to investigate. One of them unwillingly brings back an...ALIEN (!) which soon becomes a very unwanted passenger. The introduction of the title creature in the famous chest-burster scene is a real jolter. Especially if you watch it after dinner.\n\nThe music, too, must be mentioned and it moves the story along with unrelenting terror. However, the lack of music, in certain scenes, works just as well and this combination makes for one of the best musical montages to be put on film.\n\nThis is a classic film that spawned a series, which is good overall, and a bunch of copycats, many of which are just sad. "Alien" came first and it is easily one the best. 10/10\n\nRated R: violence/gore and profanity', u'0.208323', u"\nRidely Scott is such a minimalist in Alien that many sci-fi nuts find it slow and unexciting. So many people prefer Aliens, its sequel, to this one. I think Aliens, directed by James Cameron, is another sci-fi masterpiece (and maybe the best action film ever made), but I think Alien is much better. In fact, I would say that it is among the best films ever made, in sci-fi, only second to 2001. \n\nThe plot absolutely lacks contrivance. All the plot points develop how they would naturally. And there are great surprises throughout the film. Even if you haven't seen the film, you know about the chest-bursting scene. You probably saw it parodied dozens of times. But watch the scene where Ian Holm reveals his secret! That is one amazing scene! I actually saw the sequel first, so I kind of knew that secret, too, but it still shocked me. It was so well directed.\n\nNotice how the dialogue works. It never particularly draws attention to itself. It actually reminds me of Robert Altman, how he directed such movies as Nashville, where many characters are speaking at the same time, and nothing seems more or less important than anything else. It is just like real life. Alien is one of the most realistic, documentary-like sci-fi films ever made. \n\nAlso notice the setting. The Nostromo's design is so believable that I feel that I'm actually seeing a real space vehicle. The alien ship also beams with its spookiness.\n\nThe characters are also extremely believable. They are so well written that even the first character who dies is completely developed. If you get the DVD, they actually created dossiers about each of the crew members. It also has extra scenes which round out the characters even more. I think Ripley is one of the most endearing characters in film history. Even in the last two sequels, which were visually interesting but not very well written or directed, Ripley held my interest. I teared up when she died at the end of 3. If they made a fifth one, I would go, no matter how terrible I knew it would be. The acting is also top-notch. Ian Holm, a great actor, gives one of his best performances here. I love the last scene that he is in. Truly a master. And of course Sigourney Weaver could have just as easily been nominated for an Oscar for her performance here as she was for Aliens. I wish she would make more movies. She's so talented.\n\nThe most important part of a film, in my mind, is the mood. And boy, does Alien have one of the most genuinely spooky movies I've ever seen. Make sure you watch it after the sun has gone down. Also, watching it alone will help. The special effects are kind of cheap, but Scott knows this well enough. He only shows the alien for seconds at a time. Besides keeping us from seeing the shoddiness of those puppets, this technique makes the alien seem all the more creepy and mysterious. \n\n10/10, no doubt at all (BTW, the symbols all over the Nostromo are the same insignias as those of the Purina Dog Chow company)", u'0.197188', u'\nAs the credits of "Alien" open, the slowly paced opening titles and soft, eerie score give some indication of what viewers will experience when watching this film.  It starts off so unassumingly that first-time viewers are unlikely to be moved by the story or inspired by the slight character development in the film\'s first half.  It is in fact this lack of certainty that makes "Alien" work so well, for as the film hits it second half it shifts dramatically from slow space road movie to an intergalactic haunted house fright show.  This flip in drama, pace and tension makes for an unnerving ride into the unknown and results in one of the landmark sub-genre-sci-fi movies of the 20th century.\n\n The film is directed by Englishman Ridley Scott, who had a total of one feature and numerous commercials under his belt when he took control of proceedings.  Since the success of "Alien", Scott has had an uneven career with highlights like "Blade Runner", "Thelma and Louise", "Gladiator" and most recently "Black Hawk Down" and low points like "Legend", "G.I. Jane" and the bore-fest "1492".  "Alien" represents the overtly stylistic and slick approach Scott brings to his films, traits that are useful in science fiction but can sometimes seem out of place in more  realistic genres.\n\n Here Scott retires the glitz and glamour of "Star Wars", which had been released two years before "Alien".  Instead he portrays the spacecraft and crew as nothing more than a cargo ship and a rag tag bunch of intergalactic truckers.  This works very well, as the viewer gets the distinct sense of the tedium and oppressive vastness of space travel.  The way the crew are so nonchalant about visiting another planet makes the audience feel that yes, perhaps one day man will view space travel with a shrug.\n\n The opening scene shows us a huge spaceship, named the Nostromo, returning to earth with 20,000,000 tonnes of mineral ore on board.  The crew sleep in hibernation, until the onboard computer awakens them.  It seems the computer has picked up a possible distress signal on an alien planet.  Under the law of the nameless and faceless \'Company\', the crew are obliged to investigate.\n\n The waking scene is superbly filmed.  Kane (John Hurt) slowly rises, like a chick from and egg.  Squinting and only partially awake, slow dissolves from one angle of Kane to another emphasise his delirium and partial consciousness.  The final dissolve dissipates to the mess hall.  Here we meet the entire crew of the Nostromo for the first time.\n\n The ship is led by Dallas (Tom Skerrit), with Ripley (Sigourney Weaver) as the first officer.  Ash (Ian Holm) is the odd, skittish science officer, Kane (John Hurt) is weathered but adventurous, Lambert (Veronica Cartwright) is the whiny and weak navigation officer, and Parker (Yaphet Kotto) and Brett (Harry Dean Stanton) are the engineering grunts.  The ship is controlled by Mother, a mute version of HAL 9000 from 1968\'s "2001: A Space Odyssey".  Like "2001", the reasons for having humans on board is unknown; they almost seem pointless as the ship can basically control itself.  Are they simply pawns or guinea pigs awoken at the will of the computer?\n\n They respond to the distress signal after landing on the desolate planet. The beacon is tracked to a derelict spaceship, which Kane, Lambert and Dallas enter.  Curious and na\xefve, Kane wonders into a cavern of eggs. Stumbling on the slippery surface, he slips and comes into contact with the living contents of the egg.  With the parasite attached to his face, Dallas and Lambert rush Kane back to the ship.\n\n On board Ripley, who is now in command, demands that Kane be kept in quarantine for 24 hours.  Against her wishes, the odd Ash lets the three crew in.  Upon removing Kane\'s helmet they find a claw shaped being attached to his face.  It eventually falls off and dies and amazingly, Kane awakens, seemingly unscathed.\n\n At this stage the film remains slow and ponderous.  Intent on getting back to earth, they have one final meal before returning to hibernation.  As they eat Kane convulses violently and a creature bursts through his chest.  In utter disbelief the crew watch it skuttle away to the far reaches of the ship.\n\nFrom this point the film takes off.  Space and distance are enclosed as Scott uses a brilliant mix of close ups and wide angled shots to display the vastness of the Nostromo and the claustrophobia in the crew.\n\n The alien and set design are outstanding.  The massive sexual overtones of Swiss artist\'s H.R. Giger\'s alien and derelict ship are truly breathtaking, as is the futuristic-retro styling of Michael Seymour\'s sets.  Grubby yet cool, the production quality of "Alien" is something to admire.\n\n It took seven more years before a sequel was made and when James Cameron took over the directing chair he revolutionised the series by making it all out action over spooky sci-fi with "Aliens".  It may be a better movie, but the original remains a quality stand alone film and a landmark in the sci-fi horror sub genre that has not been matched by any other saga.\n\n', u'-0.066411', u'Seven members of a space mining cargo ship who are headed back to Earth are awakened from hypersleep when their ship detects a signal from an intelligent civilization on a small, uncharted planet. When they locate the source of the signal, they find more than they bargained for, and all of their lives are endangered.\n\nMy feelings about this first film in the Alien series have vacillated slightly over the years. I loved it when I first saw it as a young teenager in the theater back in 1979. Later, I wasn\'t as enamored with it, and had actually rated it as low as a 7 out of 10--at one point believing it to be my least favorite of the series. Now, however, my appreciation of the film has matured a bit, and I\'m back to thinking it\'s a solid 10 out of 10.\n\nThe film\'s strong points are rooted in director Ridley Scott\'s focused commitment to sustaining a desolate, dark atmosphere and gradually building suspense over the course of the film. Alien is unusual for its era in its pacing, its lack of comic relief, and its refusal to provide breaks from its growing tension. All three of these facts make it a somewhat "difficult film". It\'s not recommended for light viewing. It\'s not a "popcorn film". You have to be in the mood to sit down, slow down, concentrate, invest emotion, and let yourself be enveloped in the film\'s world.\n\nWith Alien, Scott has created a kind of bleak tribute to Stanley Kubrick\'s 2001: A Space Odyssey (1968). This is evident in many characteristics of the film, such as the graceful slowness of the cinematography, editing and much of the action in the first section of the film, including sustained pans across sterile-looking environments and wide external shots of (a) hulking but elegant spacecraft, the personification of the ship\'s computer, known as "Mother" here rather than Hal, a few subtle instances of classical music, the surprise discovery of a monumental structure on another celestial body, and so on. \n\nHowever, there are no instances of pleasant psychedelia here, no retreats into dreamworlds, no messages of hope, no benevolence from alien beings. Alien is strictly concerned with making its sci-fi an issue of classic horror. At a base level, it is about a malevolent monster, first encountered in a dark, Gothic environment and later chasing our heroes through a cross between a haunted house and crypt-like labyrinths.\n\nMuch has been said about visual artist H.R. Giger\'s alien and production design, and the film wouldn\'t be nearly as successful without it. Giger is largely responsible for the look of the beacon ship on the small planet, both its exterior and interior, the cocoon later encountered on the cargo ship, and the creatures. His work also inspired a lot of smaller elements, as can be seen in doorways, pipes, and other features of the cargo ship. Like most of his work, these features are a combination of metallic and organic, mechanical and biological, futuristic and Gothic. They complement the austere Kubrickian sensibility in a surprising but completely successful way.\n\nScott also uses simple effects like steam, as well as unique lighting and sound effects to help build the film\'s thick tension. These techniques gradually become more conspicuous as the film goes on, finally culminating in a claustrophobic symphony of flashing lights, constantly hissing pipes and hoses, and an incessant audio alarm.\n\nFinally, the last key to the excellence of the film is the cast. Although a somewhat stereotypical movie-world ragtag bunch, their characterizations provide more depth than the norm, with Sigourney Weaver as the standout, in perhaps the defining role of her career, and one of the more admirable filmic portrayals of a woman--she\'s the smartest, most sensible, strongest, and certainly most sexy of the bunch.', u'0.107478', u'Before gore, special effects, and the denouement of the alien itself in future sequels, this was the movie that revolutionized the concept of the "haunted house" and merged it in a seamless sieve with "body horror" and its ultimate intrusion into our own most intimate space.\n\nThe story had been done before, in different genres, never veering too far from its horror origins. Lovecraft (and others) had written about expeditions that had gone to "investigate" and "collect important data" only to find themselves being hunted down one by one, be it an unseen terror or their own fears.\n\nRidley Scott\'s ALIEN looks and feels like a science fiction movie. However, it is not. Everything in its look and tone suggests horror of a more cerebral kind. When three crew members come across what seems to be a large space-jockey with a thing attached to its face, dead, we feel our stomach turn. If something that small was able to take over a creature this large, they are in deep trouble here. The scene is masterful, restrained, but a classic in the horror-movie sense: it\'s as if we had been witness to terrible events which had taken place and decided to get to the bottom of it. Scott tightens the noose employing age-old tricks of the horror genre and only once shows blood and guts -- one which follows a calm dinner sequence. He never allows the viewer to get a true glimpse of this sadistic killer much like Spielberg in JAWS and this becomes nerve-wracking because again, fear of the unseen is more powerful than what comes into view. The theory dictates: "I was afraid of that thing? I thought it was bigger!" All we see of this alien are his teeth and in one memorable, twisted scene, his tail snaking up Lambert\'s (Veronica Cartwright) leg. Later on, as Ripley (Sigourney Weaver in her breakthrough role), the quintessential Final Girl, makes her escape, it is possible to hear Lambert shrieking. What the alien is doing to her we can only imagine and recoil.', u'-0.460579', u'Alien....the creature......the film.....the legend. The one that started it all, the one that led to one of the greatest sequels ever made, one that got a comic book mini-series and 2 cross-over films with "Predator". This is THE film. And without a doubt, the greatest horror film ever created, and this totally makes "Halloween" look like "Chicken Little". You can forget about all those rubbish "Friday the 13th" or "Nightmare on Elm Street" movies, \'cause "Alien" just takes horror up to so many levels! In "Alien", we find ourselves in the distant future with a crew just coming back from a haul of 20 million tons of ore back to Earth. But while the crew members are in stasis, their ship picks up an "SOS" from a nearby planet, and once the crew is awakened, they are forced by the "Company" regulations to follow that signal. And then when they land on the planet and it turns out that something terrifying is in store for them, when a hostile organism attaches itself to one of the crew members. And later on, it becomes clear that the crew member was being impregnated and then dies a horrible, violent death from a deadly breed of an other-worldly life-form. And now the rest of the crew must fight off the creature.\n\nAs other classic films should always have, "Alien" does great on the characters. And of course, the most recognizable one is the lead woman, Ellen Ripley who is played then-unknown Sigourney Weaver. She provides a very human face and you\'re gonna feel like you\'re actually watching a real-life woman in here, and it could be because of her accent, or her mannerisms. But as the film progresses, she develops into a more mentally tougher woman while combating the Alien. There are times when she totally keeps it cool, times when she\'s afraid, times when she\'s angry, and times when its just Ripley being Ripley. And thanks to Weavers acting talents, she can really dish out one hell of a character.\n\nThe rest of the supporting cast are nothing short of spectacular, Parker and Brett are the selfish, sarcastic men who only want to make a profit. And through most of the film, you can feel the tension that Ripley and Parker have. Lambert, who one of my favorites from here is the second woman who happens to be the opposite of Ripley, a total coward. Dallas, who the viewer might get the vibe that HE is the main character in the 1st 15 minutes or so, is pretty much the leader here. Kane, is the tired, dead-looking guy who is the one that carries the alien species inside of him. And finally, Ash is the one with the sinister purpose and you start to suspect that he\'s up to no good at some point. And movie characters need to have their own personalities and that\'s what "Alien" has.\n\nAnd as for the Alien itself, well what can i say? It is the most horrifying creature in the history of cinema, period. I mean, how could you stop it? It has acid for blood, and is very lethal to fight face-to-face. And the special effects were over 20 years ahead of its time. The face-hugger on Kane looked so freaking real, that you\'re gonna be scared just by looking at it, even it doesn\'t do anything except breathe most of the time. And the sets couldn\'t have been better, very futuristic, yet there\'s always something ominous and dark about them.\n\nThe suspense is impossible to resist as the sequences deliver the chills at times when you least expect it, and when you do expect something to happen, nothing happens. And "Alien" is one of the very few horror films that understands that you can\'t scare people by raking up the bodies and the blood, but you have to build up the suspense to do it. And director Ridley Scott is such a genius, and he shows that here, he absolutely knows how to make any kind of film, ones that can scare (Alien), one that can sadden (Thelma and Louise), and one that can excite/thrill (Gladiator). And Ridley really keeps up the dark atmosphere, especially in the beginning when there\'s no talking for the 1st 5 minutes or so, we get the feeling that something\'s not right all the time. Some parts are very quiet and very depressing and we feel exactly what we see.\n\nThis is the legend that I\'m talking about here, folks. Don\'t miss the chance to see this, because it will scare the living daylights outta you more than any other movie you\'re gonna see in your life. Take my word for it....I\'m practically a movie buff, so I know what I\'m talking about....', u'-0.088732'], u'tt1345836': [u'Not being a huge fan of superhero movies, I didn\'t have much expectations for Batman Begins. However viewing the 2005 Christopher Nolan production, I was pleasantly shocked. Then after my huge expectations for, "The Dark Knight", Christopher Nolan blew my expectations to the dust. Will the same happen with the 3rd and last film, "The Dark Knight Rises"? Quite simply, Yes! My big expectations were once again, blown away. What a production! This is a true cinematic experience, to behold. The movie exceeded my expectations in terms of action, and entertainment. The editing, sound, score, visuals, direction and action are all top notch. \n\nThe film contains a fine cast of talented actors. Christian Bale, of course still makes is a great Batman. Michael Cain is fantastic, as he always is. He gives such a powerful performance, he really ought to be considered for an Oscar nomination. Tom Hardy as Bane is utterly terrifying, at times, and completely ominous. Anne Hathaway as Catwoman/Selina Kyle is a scene stealer. She is completely engrossing. Everyone is so great, the dynamic scenes between the actors are so well done, so well written, and so well directed. The Dark Knight Rises is is emotionally riveting and amazing to view.\n\nAt a running time of almost 3 hours, the film never becomes dull, which is pretty impressive. The movie\'s action sequences are spectacularly well created and very intense. The dialogue between the character\'s are intelligent and highly believable. The movie\'s soundtrack is terrific and really exemplify\'s many of the movie\'s scenes. Extremely well editing and sound use really develop many of the movie\'s action scenes, so it\'s not just explosions and visuals like in many other movies. Nolan creates a grand, dirty, engrossing world, and his action sequences just hum. \n\nIn conclusion, this film is a gorgeous reminder that great writing and direction can enhance any movie-going experience, even superhero movies, which are usually thought of as mindless entertainment. I am wholly satisfied with Christopher Nolan\'s vision and thank all who worked on this film for bringing such an intricate interpretation of its very famous literary source. I cannot recommend this film anymore than I have, I just have to say everyone and anyone should see it. 10/10"', u'0.526045', u'Christopher Nolan has outdone himself with this one. At 3.30 in the morning, I was tired. Just getting out of it, I\'ve never been so awake. \n\nPerhaps what set this film apart from his other films was that it had a genuine emotional heartbeat. I felt that this was a flaw of Nolan\'s other films - the vision of emotion was there, but it was hollow. In this I bought it. I felt it, hero and villain alike.\n\nChristian Bale was typically brilliant as Batman, and I felt that Bruce Wayne was more heavily embraced in this final installment. Bale added emotional depth to the character - a plot point that I think went astray in The Dark Knight - picking up from the development made in Batman Begins.\n\nTom Hardy as Bane was quite simply, terrifying. No longer a dunderhead "enforcer", but one of the criminal masterminds behind "Gotham\'s Reckoning", coupled with a physical dominance strong enough to send shivers down your spine.\n\nAnne Hathaway as Selina Kyle defied my expectations. Hands up who was not entirely convinced that that girl from the Princess Diaries could handle an intensely physical role like Catwoman. But here I am, hugely impressed. She added immeasurably to the value of the film.\n\nMarion Cotillard fulfilled the role of Miranda Tate admirably, though I suspect this was the most underdeveloped character of the film - though after watching, I can see why.\n\nThe unsung hero of The Dark Knight Rises is Michael Caine as Alfred. A heartfelt performance that helps drive the emotional content of the film, helping Nolan sell his most well-rounded film to date. Caine\'s performance in both presence and absence.\n\nSpecial mention goes to Joseph Gordon Levitt, who is consistently proving himself to be a big player in the Hollywood game. His role as officer Blake felt like there could\'ve been more, but it may just have come all a bit much. It was a great performance, and Levitt sunk his teeth into role. \n\nIf you can, go see this in IMAX. If any film was to sell the format to skeptics, The Dark Knight Rises would be IT. I\'m happy Nolan stuck to his guns and shot in 2D. 3D would have been unnecessary. \n\nI suppose at this point, I have to turn my focus on Nolan. If he ever reads this... aspiring filmmaker to filmmaker, I\'ve never been so envious, jealous in all my life. It\'s a film that leaves me floundering, wondering what I could possibly do to get anywhere near this ballpark. Well done. I think an Oscar Nomination is in order.\n\nFrom here, I\'m not sure what to expect of the future. Does our imagination carry us forward, or do the studios? Time will tell.\n\n10/10', u'0.162561', u'What makes things worse, is that its predecessors were basically intricate works of genius, but TDKR lacks essentially everything that made The Dark Knight (particularly) one of the greatest superhero movies ever produced. On top of all this, everyone\'s bandwagoning on thinking it\'s great because it\'s "supposed" to be great, right?!?! How could Nolan\'s finale not be a masterpiece?! Well, I\'ll tell you...\n\nBruce Wayne acts out-of-character from not just the first two movies, but from the comic as well. Catwoman\'s motivation and place in the story is weak, flat, and forced. For a movie that\'s almost three hours long, you only get about 20 minutes of Batman in costume (if you\'re lucky). The movie jumps in weird time increments that are mildly confusing, but mostly forced to facilitate its wanna-be epic nature. \n\nAs for more heavily SPOILERY observations...\n\nCommissioner Gordon is barely in the movie, spending most his time injured in a hospital, while Joseph Gordon-Levitt\'s character comes out of the blue and does what you\'d expect the Commissioner to be doing... solution- COMBINE THE TWO CHARACTERS!!! \n\nThe two Batman vs. Bane fights are flat and boring as hell. Bane is a cardboard, unexplored (until a late-third act flashback... of all ridiculous clich\xe9 plot devices) character that reaches for sympathy in one of the most embarrassing, wanna-be-tender, totally out-of-place, extremely laughable scenes I\'ve ever seen in my life- HE FRIGGIN\' CRIES?!!?!? \n\nEvery single, yes EVERY SINGLE cop in Gotham marches down into the sewers on a tip that Bane\'s raising a secret army, only to have all the entrances blown up so they can be trapped down there... for like three months. Reread that last sentence and tell me what part of it makes sense.\n\nBane holds Gotham hostage with a 4 megaton nuclear device, after blowing up all but one bridge leading into and out of the city, for three months and the U.S. government does nothing. Seriously, nothing. It\'s said they negotiated a truce and had FEMA send in supplies for survival. Read that last paragraph and tell me what part of it makes sense.\n\nThe "real" villain reveals him/her self in an absurd Act 3 "twist" that\'s followed by a narrated flashback (the same one that leads to Bane CRYING), and throughout the entire monologue Batman sits there doing nothing after a knife has been thrust/held into his side.\n\nAfter the 2nd lame Bats/Bane fight, the bulk of the late Act 3rd "action sequence" consists of little more than Batman flying around in that weird-looking clunky flying thing that supposed to be the Bat Plane- half of which is of him outmaneuvering missiles that the bulky "plane" couldn\'t have possibly eluded.\n\nI really, really, really, really, really, really wanted to not just like this, but LOVE it, but as it progressed the enthusiasm cloud gradually cleared to the point of my being utterly flabberghasted in disappointment- mostly because I can\'t believe the director of The Dark Knight and the masterpiece that is Inception was responsible for this movie. It\'s lazy and uninspired to the point of being offensive to everyone who\'s ever been not just a Batman fan, but a fan of non- intelligence-insulting movies.', u'-0.206035', u'I don\'t get what all the 10\'s are about. I don\'t see how this movie is a 10, or rather even an 8. There are so many plot holes, the characters are so one dimensional, action sequences OK at best.\n\nWhere do I even begin. Banes voice. I admit, I didn\'t get what he was saying more than half the time, and even then I had to strain really hard. It was just awful. There were jokes about not understanding Bales growling, but this, this is something else. The movie would have been better without him talking.\n\nCatwoman! Suddenly she feels remorse and becomes goody goody at the end, Oh the lord, this was about as predictable as rain in Seattle(very, if you\'re unsure).\n\nTalia, what a big face-palm. Might as well have made a movie when the Batman woke up from a dream at that point. Can the plot get ANY more clich\xe9d? Thanks for popping up the MAIN criminal at the end of the movie, who apparently had the hots for Batman.\n\nBatman, his screen time is mostly groaning and screaming and getting beaten around in boxing by Bane. He becomes a superior fighter by jumping across the ledge? I think that\'s not how the body works. There isn\'t any Batman stuff at all. Just punching and kicking. Muhammad Ali would have been a better hero to fit that role (Yay, incoming dislikes from people who don\'t know who that is). Also, big copter no one can find, yea right.\n\nSheep followers wanting to get blown up. Ya, because getting evaporated by a nuclear bomb is so awesome that every "mercenary" wants to do it. Oh, but they didn\'t know that they\'d be blown up.\n\nAll policemen going underground like a herd of cows because they want to scout out the underground operations and therefore getting caught. Sigh.\n\nBig fight scenes. Police officers don\'t walk in formation with guns against a bunch of mercenaries on higher ground and they all don\'t start shooting at point blank range. No. That\'s not how police work. Or any modern force with guns. That ONLY works in Lord of the Rings, because they had SWORDS! Who wrote this script?\n\nThe other batman movies were good. The first one was great. The second was good too. This one is ridiculous. I don\'t know how people can be so blind to so many obvious flaws. Even with that, the best moments in this film are...unimpressive. Did I go into the theater with high hopes. Not at all. I expected average, I was disappointed to not find even that.\n\nWill be ever get another Prestige from these guys? I hope so.', u'-0.289642', u'I had the honor of watching TDKR during a screening and was completely blown away! Christopher Nolan\'s third film in his Batman trilogy doesn\'t disappoint. The movie is incredibly well made, its huge production is quite breathtaking to view. This is a true cinematic experience, to behold. The movie exceeded my expectations in terms of action, and entertainment. The movie\'s score high-lites many of its incredible scenes, and at times, it takes your breath away.\n\nThe film featured excellent performances, by all the cast. Christian Bale, as always is great as Batman. Anne Hathaway was completely engrossing, she became "Catwoman", just like Michele Pfeiffer did, although their interpretations were very different, both were equally effective. Tom Hardy was the main villain "Bane" completely shattered my expectations. One of the best superhero movie villains, I\'ve ever seen. The terror caused by him, is completely believable and quite menacing. Marlion Cotilliard, Michael Cane, Gary Oldman, and others all did well in their respective roles. Now I know most will miss Heath Ledger as the Joker.(I know I do) I hope people don\'t compare Tom Hardy\'s performance to Heath Ledger\'s, its completely unfair and the two characters are very different. Just read the comics.\n\nThe colossal size of the film is a spectacle to behold, but surprisingly you don\'t get lost with all the explosions and extravagant action scenes, like in other films,(AKA Transformers, or POTC.) If one were to gripe, and I suppose there will never be a film made that one cannot find a point at which to grip, it is painfully long running time here. I found myself more worried about the pain in my posterior than the emotional final minutes after almost 3 hours that I had spent in a cramped seat, but that\'s just how I am. However the ending is just fantastic, so emotional and bring the trilogy to a very satisfying end.\n\nSorry if I\'m being all fan-boyish and kissing this movie\'s behind, but I really admire it. It may not be among my personal favorites but generally this seems to be the movie event of this year. As a film though, this is amazing. A true lasting legacy in superhero story telling and summer-blockbusters.', u'0.362634', u"As this movie was the most awaited movie of the decade, I obviously wanted to watch it as soon as possible. My friend won some contest online and so, I got to watch it a few days earlier FOR FREE.\n\nThe movie is everything you want it to be. The story is very well told and there is enough of Nolan-kind twists. Tom Hardy has some powerful lines as Bane but the enhanced voice doesn't work at all. But, he still does his character justice and performs to his full potential. For the first time in the trilogy, Batman wasn't the strongest. This gave a chance to Christian Bale to show off his acting skills without the mask and he did a fine job. The veterans Gary Oldman, Morgan Freeman and Michael Caine went about their job as if it was just another day at the office. But, a major surprise was Joseph Gordon-Levitt who portrays an ordinary police officer and pulls of an unexpectedly awesome performance. \n\nThe special effects, sound and action were out of the world. Nolan spent a lot of money and he made it visible in the movie. The movie connects all the dots from the previous movies and provides a fitting end to the saga. Although, personally I liked The Dark Knight better. But, TDKR certainly came very close it.\n\nFinally, I would like to thank Christopher Nolan for portraying Batman in a way no one ever thought was possible and for making one the best trilogy of all time.", u'0.488998', u'I came out with slight disappointment after watching DKR for I had huge expectations from Nolan after an exceptional TDK.\n\nI am huge fan of first two installment of Batman Trilogy and I liked DKR. It\'s a good movie but it could have been much better. \n\nSo rather than discussing its merit, which are many, I am pointing out its shortcomings.\n\nIt\'s the weaker than other movies of trilogy and simple reason being it lacks strong characters. DKR is all about storytelling \x96 just like Nolan\'s Inception but not as efficient. And in doing so it fails where Batman Begins and The Dark Knight had succeeded.\n\nBatman Begins was all about fear, doubt, self-realization and redemption where Bruce Wayne discovers his destiny as Batman. BB had a story arc which set background for main characters \x96 Batman/ Wayne, Ra\'s al Ghul, Gordon (to some extent) and most importantly Gothom City and hence set stage for a fitting climax.\n\nThe Dark Knight explores the theme of chaos, morality and belief effortlessly and establishes characters of Joker, Harvey Dent/Two Face, Rachel etc. so effortlessly that people choose to ignore even some major plot holes. Heath Ledger\'s interpretation of Joker was so mesmerizing that it single handily carried TDK to path of greatness/ critical acclaim.\n\nBut Dark Knight Rises is all about story telling \x96 efficient but not exceptional. Bane, Miranda Tate, John Blake, Peter Folly (Deputy Commissioner), Selina Kyle \x96 characters are introduced but never explored/ expanded - they just start working on their part - just like cogs in the wheel. They are not so much part of the story itself but just the agents which move the story forward.\n\nBane\'s character is dull and single dimensional and do not evoke any fear or awe. He\'s meticulous, intelligent and strong and this is established quickly in movie but after that he slumps into a just another movie villain. Taila / Miranda character is never fully explored. Even Wayne/Batman is devoid of any emotions in this one and he feels so sure of himself that I start wondering if it\'s the same Batman that I saw in first two installments. Only new character which had some shades was that of Selina Kyle and Anne Hathaway did justice to it. Add to that helplessness of Alfred portrayed superbly by Caine. Other actors are good but there\'s not much for them to do.\n\nThere\'s no dilemma,doubt, love, choices, moral battles, hope, even no chaos/fear- things which make characters and plot interesting ( at least for me) and which made Batman Begins and The Dark Knight really good movies. Even the theme of "Occupy Wallstreet" is very weak and at best it\'s closer to London riots with its loot and arsoning. There\'s even perfect order in Bane\'s revolution. Movie moves effortlessly from one plot to another and to climax that it become at times predictable.\n\nBut maybe Dark Knight Rises was supposed to be like that only and Nolan had too much to deal with in 2.5 hours. And maybe that\'s the main problem with DKR \x96 too much is going on in the story that it seems crammed at times. And when there are too many characters and so many story arcs and it\'s tough to do justice to characters and story telling at the same time. And this is when you start looking for plot holes, slackness, predictability et al.\n\n-----------------some spoilers----------------------- \n\nSuch as Bane\'s plan \x96cement/explosive, Wayne- Miranda\'s romance, Blake guessing Wayne\'s personality, Miranda-Talia twist, Batman doing Angels & Demons stunt,Batman\'s escape from death, Blake as Robin (LOL) and Alfred in last scene.\n\n------------------spoilers end -------------------------\n\nAll movies have a style which depends on story and its story teller. And there\' no point of comparing different styles, say that of Starwars, Godfather, Transformers or story tellers say Tarantino, Cameron etc. Whatever maybe the style, good movies play to its strengths \x96 story/screenplay, characters, style, pace or all. Try to recall some good movies and think what you like the most.\n\nDark Knight Rises have a good story but lacks strong characters and relies Inception\'s style which incidentally differs from style of first two installments of Batman Trilogy. \n\nAnd for me, soul of Nolan\'s Batman Series is its strong characters, their underlying emotions and a theme which is much deeper and meaningful than all fight, gadgetry and style. And this is where DKR fails. \n\n7/10', u'-0.044582', u'My areas of disappointment : 1) Bane, 2) the threat on the city (nuclear), and 3) the Mr. Nolan\'s surprising lack of storytelling and bleak cinematic visual (even though he seemingly had the best filming tools to deliver so.). \n\n1) I only wished the Mr. Nolan did not abruptly reduce his newest villain, Bane, to something so insignificant and small. The menacing, intelligent, "brute force" was indeed a towering figure throughout the movie until he presents himself as secondary towards the end of the trilogy.\n\n2) And the threat on Gotham City, a nuclear one, was surprisingly unoriginal considering how innovative the poisonous vapor threat was in "Batman Begins" or how chaos forced the protagonists of Gotham to make extremely troubling decisions in "The Dark Knight." \n\n3) Something breathtaking was so suppose to happen in either the plot or in the IMAX grandeur. However, Mr. Nolan surprisingly failed to deliver in both areas. Mr. Nolan did not make us hold our breath like he did in the "Dark Knight" nor did he captivate our focus with his playful plots and mind bending cinematic visuals as he did in "Inception." In other words, I could not help but looking back at his past films while watching the "TDKR." \n\nThere were a few other things that caught my immediate, negative attention. But who cares. It is really over now. This was how Mr. Nolan decided to end this truly life defining story. With that said, I am simply stunned and truly hurt that the trilogy had to end . . . like this.\n\n\x96 davidwoongkim, Seoul', u'-0.213398', u'The best thing about this movie is how satisfying it is. It doesn\'t leave you frustrated or confused. You can\'t really complain that it didn\'t explore certain ideas or follow through. By deciding to have an official ending to this trilogy\'s story, the themes surrounding Batman are very fresh. We don\'t know where he\'ll end up. It\'s not the same old thing about whether he can continue to be Batman or not, which was already getting repetitive in Spider-man 2. The conclusions are not as important as the feelings they invoke as they come about. Nolan is especially good at capturing the complete tension of actually not knowing what will happen and deeply questioning what you *want* to happen and why.\n\nThis movie is bigger than the previous two, far more ambitious. There are no obvious annoying weaknesses that usually come with films in general, especially blockbuster action movies. All of Nolan\'s movies have deep psychological themes and this takes those in another new direction. I thought Inception was hugely original and insightful about the way people think. That level of abstraction and depth is present in this film. Bane bursts into it, his reputation is quickly established. Nolan uses people\'s expectations and anticipation to the fullest. We are left to wonder about what has happened in the 8 years since the events of The Dark Knight. Why have the characters become the way they are now?\n\nIn the latter half, it does seem like the movie is trying to pull off so many different plot points and connections, but they all work. The cast is very large and impressive. You don\'t see "good acting". You see fascinating characters. They\'re just playing their part in the grand story that\'s being crafted. There are many unfamiliar faces but they all have a strange, unique look to them. We often see a person\'s flaws and previous decisions coming back to haunt them. They find out the hard way what mistakes they have made. Where their limits are. Where they lose control.\n\nThe score is almost tribal, very raw and energetic. You don\'t get much chance to pay attention to it but many parts of the movie are pounding with excitement. There are countless quotable lines and disturbing slices of dialogue. They cut deep. The Joker was a great character and this is a very different movie but the themes are just as dark, only perhaps indirectly. Underneath, it\'s very sinister. Writing and efficiency appear to be among Nolan\'s greatest strengths. The story has many layers that interweave and apparently they came in under budget.\n\nPerhaps the most important thing about Catwoman is that she\'s completely believable. When she beats up men, you don\'t roll your eyes. She\'s feminine and powerful in her own way. She fits into the world and we completely understand her motivations. She doesn\'t have a huge role but a very important one.\n\nI didn\'t find myself moved but maybe I\'m too cynical. I was more affected psychologically. Curious about humanity and all the different sides of it you see in this movie. It goes to many extremes. I felt humbled by my complete lack of life experience. What do I know about anything? How could I possibly understand half of the characters? I haven\'t been through anything or achieved anything compared to most of them. Michael Caine gets a bigger role this time. He was always critical but this time he\'s very much the emotional core.\n\nI thought Christian Bale was overlooked in The Dark Knight especially. The movies hinge on him. Bruce Wayne\'s just a man but also incredibly inspirational. Bale\'s famous for completely committing to his roles and it pays off. Tom Hardy is impressive as Bane but I suppose that\'s no surprise. The rest of the leads are similarly awesome. There are many references to the earlier films. Very few questions are left unanswered. It\'s always nice when film-makers really think it through and make an actual decision and get all the details right.\n\nSo anyway, I\'ll miss Batman (since the trilogy has ended) but couldn\'t have hoped for a better, more epic and sincere finale to his story.', u'0.0647545', u"I'm not one for writing reviews, but the positive response this movie is getting makes me uneasy. I'm really worried about the general population. \n\nThe acting is just shocking. Michael Cain delivers a good performance, but because everyone else is so terribly 2 dimensional, his character seems almost comically overacted. \n\nThe story is clich\xe9, poorly written and the time-jumps are just bad. Why is Bane pushed aside in the last 15 minutes of the movie and an intelligent, interesting character turned into some girls thug (some girl we know, or care, nothing about). It's bad, I didn't know Nolan was capable of anything this poor. The movie would have been far better if Bane was a real person trying to incite a real revolution. And I find the glorification of the rich in this film interesting at a time when their is global social unrest towards them in real life. Is this propaganda or what?\n\nWhy don't the bad guys use their guns? Don't they know that just pointing them at batman doesn't do anything? And walking closer and closer to him until the gun is almost touching him also doesn't help? And then using their gun as bat instead of as a gun is also stupid? And the background combat is also lame. I saw way too many punches that actually didn't touch the face of their victim. It's just poor and unacceptable. \n\nWhy the hell do all the cops just walk towards the enemy in a big mass? Only the first line can fire? One grenade in the middle of them will destroy them? What kind of city sends all of their cops down a hole? Even if they somehow decided doing this was a good idea, they wouldn't send 10 thousand cops leaving the city unprotected. How about the army? When Batman tells robin (LOL) to get people off the Island, why does he go and grab 10 kids? Out of a city of millions? Where the hell is the cities population? Why don't we see anyone except Bane and a few of this thugs? How does Batman keep appearing exactly where he needs to be at exactly the right time without explanation? Who the hell is cat-women and why do we care? Why does the bad chick (who's Banes boss apparently) keep yabbering with her finger on the detonator, instead of just pressing the damn thing? It's not 1990, those things just aren't acceptable. \n\nOh god the prison scene, It's been a long time since I've wanted to vomit and kill myself at the same time, but this did it. Clich\xe9 to the maximum. And when Garry drops the bomb diffuser just out of fingers grasp, on the moving truck. Man, come on Nolan, were you even a part of this film or did you just pay others to do it for you and pick up the pay-check? Did anyone who's raving about how good this film is even watch it? Makes me depressed. \n\nI could go on and on but I can't be bothered and nobody is going to read it. This should be a 6 on IMDb, and that's generous. People are as stupid as the movie.", u'-0.504489', u"I have no Idea what to even start with about what was wrong with this movie. Apart from the obvious Richard Nixon voice Batman has had in every movie of this trilogy, now we also have a villain we can barely understand .\n\nThey sit there and expect us to believe that with all the time Bruce Wayne spent training and all the time he spent with Ra's Al Ghul he doesn't even know who his daughter is who is very high up in the League?\n\nThen they use the classic bomb going to blow up the city. The bomb that was built to be a fusion reactor. So why does it have a clear LED display of the time on it? And why after flying it in reality about 2 miles off the coast no one is hurt. There is no radiation. No title wave from the ocean. Just a cloud.\n\nThen lets look at the spare Batmobiles that the enemies have. I find it really hard to believe that I could blow up a batmobile with only one missile yet his is pretty much indestructible.\n\nThen when Bruce escapes prison he magically shows up in a town with only one bridge that is guarded by the military. There were so many aspects of the movie where things just happened. And we have no choice but to accept them.\n\nThe biggest problem of all though, Robin. Why the people in the movie I was in cheered when she said his name was Robin I'll never know. Let's see what the main parts they got wrong were. Obviously the name. His parents dying's back-story was nowhere near right. Robin was a trapeze artist not a detective. I don't know why people like this movie. Maybe because they are supposed to who knows. But if you are a true fan out there then you will most likely hate this film for the crap it is.\n\nThis movie didn't feel like a Batman movie to me. There was no gadgets, no detective work, no anything. Only thing that this movie taught me is that now I know for a fact. DC cannot do special effects and in the movie industry will always fall short to fans.", u'-0.367733', u'Don\'t waste your money, The Dark Knight was terribly awesome, every scene in that film as stand alone is better than this film. \n\nIt was overcrowded with characters, half of whom don\'t really add to the story, while taking up valuable screen time of the main characters. It missed Batman, this was essentially a film about Bruce Wayne and his problems. The story isn\'t just about good versus evil (which worked great in The Dark knight and helps focus the film\'s plot) but wants to explore all kinds of societies problems such as the stock market, evil bankers (\'I have my money under the mattress\' ("you evil bankster") and Occupy. Rather then exploring these themes thoroughly it just touches them and then moves on forgetting all about it. Further more, the action is really, really weak! This is a big issue for me since I love action movies, maybe other people will not care as much. But the fighting scenes between Batman and Bane are laughable. Just hitting each other in slow motion, my god, the guy threatens to kill 12 million people but Batman adheres to his code?? It worked great in The Dark Knight, since the Joker was essentially creating chaos, not direct annihilation of a city, but in this film it is totally out of context. That scene where 300 cops run into a fortified position of bad guys armed with AK-47\'s? OH REALLY?! Where were Batman\'s gadgets? Not the overblown helicopter thing (my god what an inconspicuous piece of engineering) but the subtle stuff, the smoke, the batclaw, whatever. Just like 007 missing Q, it just doesn\'t work. They had to repeat some amazing turn with his bike twice in the film just to show something reasonable interesting in the way of action, in Avengers this would have been in the background, once. Blurred. The stadium scene. Mehh, seen it already seventy times in the trailer. Oh.. The film drags on for an amazing 165 minutes! They would have had a better film cutting it with 60 minutes. It would have helped them focus and cut unnecessary scenes (alot you say? Yes!). \n\nBut the biggest problems with this film is the random stuff that completely sucks: \n\n- Openingscene: kidnap that doctor? OK. huh whats with the tube and the blood, ehm why do only Bane and that guy hang there after it crashes down when moments before there were like 6 bad guys in the plain on ropes? Huh oh never mind next scene! \n\n- Why why WHY does Bane hate batman so much? It is insinuated for most of the movie that Batman killed his father, but in the end it shows Bane has no real connection to Batman what so ever? Strange..\n\n- And that prison/dark pit, in which no sunlight ever shines? ITS LIT UP WITH THE SUN THE ENTIRE FILM! \n\n- Why do they keep talking on ice where everybody who steps foot on it falls through and dies? Thanks for saving me, lets continue the talk over there where we won\'t DIE? \n\n- Yeah let\'s kill the bad guy, not by batman but a support character, introduce the real villain, and kill her in a car crash 5 minutes later. And damnnnnn the acting in that scene deserves a razzie. \n\n- Better love story than twilight! \n\n- Yes Batman, everybody knows you are Bruce Wayne, you can start talking normal, saves you the cough the day after. \n\n- Bane.. ? Like three people SAY Bane is amazing big etc. But as a viewer, you don\'t see it, you just don\'t feel the menace, nothing. Because Bane isn\'t AT ALL MENACING OR BIG OR SCARY!! His voice, what a failure. Born in the Darkness! .. 140 minutes later, oh no, he wasn\'t? Or was he? No matter, he\'s dead. Let\'s not mention him again in the rest of the film. \n\n- Robin. Don\'t get me started. SAVE THE CITY! EXODUS! DRIVE A BUS WITH 15 CHILDREN TO THE BRIDGE AND FAIL IN GETTING THEM ACROSS HAHAHAHAHAHA! \n\n- Lucius Fox was in this movie?\n\n- Let\'s insinuate that Bane\'s goones are terrible and so committed and \'where does he get these guys?\' Oh lets not explain that, lets move on to some surgeon in a prison in a foreign country, whos story we don\'t CARE ABOUT! AT ALL! PEETIME! \n\n- Government does not negotiate with terrorists! Next scene, \'they made a deal!\' Sigh \n\n- Etc', u'-0.364643', u"After seeing and liking the first and the second part of this trilogy, the third came off as a disappointment. There are only a few things that actually work in this movie - Hathaway an Levitt gave very nice performances, and were convincing despite of the ludicrously clich\xe9 lines they were given. Before seeing the movie, I presumed that (based on the reviews I had read) they had only minor roles, but the two of them guide the plot. Also some action sequences were well executed. But only a minority of them. The majority was illogical and confusing. In comparison with the second movie which I found to be, in its core ( even with the occasional shabby lines), an intelligent and elegant movie, this one lacks action. Of course that a movie shouldn't be judged by the amount of action, but in lack of it there must be a good storyline. This movie has none. Its plot is full of gaps, frustratingly illogical. One of the things that induced from me a great snore was the jail and childwhoescaped subplot. The idea of the jail is absurd. Whose prison is it, why are there no guards? Oh, I know it's inescapable... but please. Its location is outside of some ancient city walls, but very near it, and a modern complex is build only yards away (you can see it on the edge of the screen when Bruce escapes \x96 but I will get to that). Bane (the Big Bad of the movie) escorted Bruce to the Asian jail himself, made all that way just to tell Bruce that he will torture his soul, and went back to Gotham, in the US, in the matter of hours. Why making that journey? It's impractical as hell. Furthermore, the man in prison, who are paid by Bane to keep Bruce alive (the man actually uttered the line \x96 I'm paid more to keep you alive, when Bruce asked for death), are helping him fix his dislocated spine (no, it's not broken) and escape. Why? After a few tries, Bruce manages to climb the well and emerges on the surface. He throws some big, fat rope back in the pit. Where did that rope come from? Was it left outside just in case someone climbed to freedom so he can free all the other prisoners? Bruce himself had no rope \x96 that was the whole point. Is the prisoners safety rope actually tied at the surface? If so, why no one climbed the rope itself? Hell, my brother with whom I watched the movie actually thought that he threw down the safety rope to make sure nobody else would escape. Then Bruce, with no money, no passport and no knowledge of the native language returns in the terrorist occupied and military guarded Gotham. He also, at the time, has no Batmobile, Batcopter or any other Bat-based vehicle. How did he get into the city? Fortunately, once in the city, he found his Bat-copter lying on the roof of a middle-height building, a huge thing covered only with a nett, and visible from air. With all the riots in the city, is it possible that nobody had stumbled upon it? Also, once in the Bat-copter, he encourages the not-long-ago buried police forces (who all have clean clothes and are clean-shaved after being underground for months) to attack the terrorists, but instead of helping them by shooting the enemy from air superiority, he lands the Bat-copter and seeks Bane for a fistfight. Is this not idiotic? The only action scene that was good was the one after the stock-market attack when Batman made a dashing escape. But, not even this scene can be compared with the ones from the second movie which were thrilling, masterfully directed and longer. They were also simpler, there was no atom bomb, there were just guns and explosives, but it worked better, it was more realistic, and darker. Unfortunately, what replaced action is load of parapsychology, the endlessly recycled story of the orphan Bruce, with many annoying flashbacks from previous films. You know the movie is not doing well when there are flashbacks involved. What got on my nerves a lot was also that all lectured Bruce, the man who sacrificed everything to help Gotham and do good. Alfred was particularly pathetic. Bane is truly a poorly done movie villain. The comic book character is said to have some intelligence. This was not present here. The opening scene, the delivery of the plan of doctor Pavel's abduction: Bane has executed a pointlessly expensive and complicated operation where he sacrificed unnecessarily three of his man, chopped up a plane and then used the already seen skyhook (The Dark Knight), when he easily could have attacked the plane on land. The romance between him and Coltirald's character is also redundant. His and Cotillard's background story could have been left unexplained. Even with it, both of them lack motivation. The rest of the movie Bane makes impressive entries. Actually a lot of the movie is about walking on the street, walking through the sewage, etc. And entering rooms. The romance between Bruce and Cotillard character was redundant and not probable (I accept this only if Bruce wanted a quick shag after a long time of drought). The explosion, beside the unnerving need of certain directors to explain in word what we understood in picture (someone actually had said Explosion! after we've have already seen the mushroom), was not realistic (no waves). But, as a whole, the movie is sufferable, just don't expect anything great. The thing I hated the most is that Batman is missing from this film. Bruce was more out of the suit, than in it. Seems to me that Nolan became a little bit too cocky with all the praise for the two previous movies. It's a shame because the movie could have been a lot better if he hadn't.", u'-0.463921', u'I honestly didn\'t like this movie very much, there were many things wrong with it that ruined the immersion and messed up something which could have been good.\n\n#1 where is batman? for the most part batman is a no show it\'s not until the final parts of the movie that you even really get to see him fight.\n\n#2 Can character development fail? I think this movie proved it can, many movies attribute failure to not accurately linking you to the characters having too limited development of the character, this movie is proof of the opposite in many scenes they spent far too much time focusing on Bruce Wayne. They did this to the extent of completely neglecting many other aspect of the movie, things that should have been delved into that weren\'t all because too much of the movie was focused on Wayne...\n\n#3 The villain makes the movie. Bane was not a good villain, his voice was difficult to understand in a large number of scenes and sometimes the background noise would override him. He just seemed more like a thug then a mastermind, and lacked believability. The so called "real" villain had no real character development only back story which to me is not enough to make her important. Also anyone who was a lover of the batman comics or TV show was probably also disappointed by the complete lack of the venom used to give bane his strength.\n\n#4 Music and sound effects make a movie right? There were many times during the movie where I found myself distracted by a completely inappropriate sound byte or music that didn\'t quite fit the scene.\n\n#5 abandonment of sub characters is a good thing? the butler leaving Bruce, and the lack of the use of Morgan Freemans character to me detracted from the movie a lot.\n\n#6 batmans voice... something was just wrong with it it sounded like i was listening to one of those cheap voice changers you get at walmart. Was it just me or was it done much better in movie one?\n\nIn summary, I have to honestly say that it seems as if the focus of this movie was on two actors not on two characters. I couldn\'t find myself feeling for Bruce, or Robin, they were just... badly overdeveloped characters that instead of making me feel sad for them I just didn\'t care... Batman had 8 years to prepare and get ready for bane yet he wallows in self pity and lets his whole life go to pot over a girl? I just don\'t believe it. Batman is the definition of self hurt turned into helping others every time batman sinks deeper into the well of despair he hurts criminals more not less. he over came both of his parents dieing and leaving him alone as a child I just could not see him giving up because a girlfriend dies no matter how over developed they made his character.\n\nIf you like to think about things in a movie, I think you will find that there are too many "distractions" in this movie to allow for proper immersion and enjoyment.', u'-0.490779', u"The movie was so boring and lengthy that I considered to leave the cinema. The script was predictable at some points and the acting was so poor amongst some of the actors. Anne Hathaway was horrible, she was not convincing at all and her outfit looked like a cheap Halloween costume. Bane, the main villain of this movie was killed in a split second and everything was forgotten about him, that's it. It's like the script writers wanted this movie to end quickly as possible at this point. The actor playing Miranda who appears to be Ra's Al Ghul's daughter Talia should get the award for worst death presentation, it was some of the worst acting I have ever seen, you can tell that she is acting. It's like she is taking a nap for crying out loud. Blake who appears to be Robin gets access to the Batman cave and all the high tech stuff that is in there, but he didn't receive any training at all so he wouldn't know how to use it. Robin is just an ordinary cop in this movie with no combat skills, yet Bruce Wayne gives away the cave to him and settles down with the supposed Catwoman.", u'-0.77372'], u'tt0105236': [u'\nReservoir Dogs is a testament to the idea that "less is more." This doesn\'t apply to the violence, the film is extremely violent from beginning to end, but the details of the botched diamond heist, which the entire film is based on, are conveyed only in the dialogue, except for one scene where Mr. Pink (Steve Buscemi) recalls his escape. The whole film takes place after the failed robbery is over, and the mystery that unfolds among the criminal participants is amazing to watch. \n\nThis is not a normal crime film. The thing that really sets Reservoir Dogs apart from all of the others is that it is PURE. When you look at the screen, you\'re looking at reality. There are no Hollywood actors, there\'s no make-up to make them look pretty, there\'s little to no comic relief, and most important of all, there\'s no goofy romantic subplot clumsily thrown in, a detrimental trademark of so many action films, as well as  virtually all Jerry Bruckheimer films. Instead of all of that garbage, Tarantino decided to just present the film as simply and straightforwardly as possible, and by doing that he makes it seem that you\'re really looking at a bunch of criminals trying to figure out what to do after a suspiciously failed robbery. \n\nEven though most of the actors were known at the time this film was made, the film was delivered in such a way that you don\'t see the actors at all, you only see the brutal characters that they portray. It is genuinely frightening to imagine being in the same room with any of them, and this is a quality that is rarely achieved in any kind of film.\n\n\nMake no mistake, Reservoir Dogs is among the most violent films ever made, and some scenes are really painful to watch, but the way that reality is captured is something that justifies the violent excesses in this film. The violence is never glorified, nor is the criminal lifestyle. When films are overly violent, they usually get branded as such, but despite the extreme violence, Reservoir Dogs still manages to deliver an important overall message about the consequences of your actions. It remains high on the growing list of Tarantino\'s classic films, and it will not be soon forgotten.', u'0.051047', u'The first time I saw Reservoir Dogs, I was about 15, it had been banned in my country, and I heard it was extremely voilent. Naturally I did everything in my power to get my paws on a copy, and when I finally did see it, I was disappointed. I was just sitting there saying "Wheres all the violence", Anyway, I watched it till the end, and then I watched it again, and since then it has just grew on me.\n\nThis is one of the movies I don\'t get bored watching time and time again. I still watch it at least once a year, because its not the kind of movie you watch to unwind or to pass the time. You simply watch it for the sheer quality and originality of the movie. The one liners are classic: "Are you gonna bark all day...", "I\'ll make you my dog\'s bitch". Mr.Blonde is totally believable as a psycho. I mean who stops to get fries and soda just after committing a robbery? The fact that everything is ludicrous, but you don\'t know this because these guys, and the way they talk is so impossibly cool that you just accept it. This movie is all about the dialog. The violence is used sparingly, and to better effect. The way the film is edited is genius. Its almost like you forget the whole movie after you watch it, and the next time you watch it, there\'s a whole scene that you forgot was there. The storyline is unpredictable and thrilling. This is better that Pulp Fiction and in my opinion definitely Tarintino\'s best movie. I didn\'t care much for the "Kill Bill" movies, but who cares, I\'m not reviewing them.\n\nIf you haven\'t seen Reservoir Dogs, just rent it, buy it or steal it right now.', u'-0.0498896', u"\nThis is without a doubt one of the best movies I've ever seen and definately deserves its position on the Top 250. It's an acquired taste, but if you've been desensitised to violence (as i have), then you will want to watch this again from the minute it ends. Every single actor was perfectly fitted for its character. Steve Buscemi as the squirrely Mr. Pink, Harvey Keitel as the veteran Mr. White, and of course, Michael Madsen as the phsycotic Mr. Blonde. The list goes on and on.\n\nSome people said that the violence was unnecessary and didn't move the plot forward as it did with Pulp Fiction. I agree, but the violence was used to develop the character's personalities. It showed their disregard for human life and that our anti-heros saw killing a cop as being as stepping on a cockroach .\n\nI urge future viewers of this movie not to instantly compare it to Pulp Fiction and enjoy it as it's own film. An interesting thrill-ride crime drama from beginning to end, I give this film *****/*****", u'0.003258', u'\nFrom the opening moments of "Reservoir Dogs" you sense that you are watching a different kind of crime drama.  The style and dialog of this picture bestows a level of intelligence upon it\'s characters that defies the reality of their chosen profession.  Having said that,this movie is absolutely riveting in it\'s movements from the ordinary, to the grim, to the horrific aspects of a career criminal.  Quintin Tarantino has written a tale of an almost corporate order to constructing a crime gang.  The delight is in meeting these characters one by one.  The particular crime is no more crucial to the film than a 7-11 stick-up.  The crux of the movie is the portrayal of the rainbow of characters who find themselves involved in a life of crime.  Much has been made of the violence in the movie, but it only serves to point out that all men are different......even the crooked.  The director has included a number of very memorable scenes.  This is not a linear film.  The movie works more as a series of set pieces that weave together a story that is not as important as the individual parts that you have the pleasure of observing.  This movie may take more than one viewing to truly appreciate.  ', u'0.327422', u'\nA couple of weeks ago, I was blessed with a rare opportunity. one of the movie theaters in town did a midnight showing of this. Naturally, being a "Dogs" freak, I went down and saw it.\n\nTo say I was blown away would be an understatement. I have only seen two of Mr. Tarantino\'s films in the theater. This being one, and "Kill Bill" being the other. I only became a fan of his a year ago and have subsequently seen all of his films and own them all.\n\nIt really was a treat to be able to sit in the movie theater and watch this while eating grossly overpriced popcorn and drinking a grossly overpriced soda.\n\nFor those who don\'t know, the film involves a jewelry heist. Six strangers including Harvey Keitel, Michael Madsen, Steve Buscemi, Eddie Bunker, Tarantino himself, and Tim Roth are recruited by a crime boss named Joe Cabot, (Lawrence Tierney) and his son Eddie, whom everybody calls "Nice Guy" (Chris Penn). The six are almost all friends or associates of Cabot, particularly Keitel and Madsen. Cabot gives them colors for names (Mr. White, Mr. Blonde, Mr. Pink, Mr. Blue, etc.) And expressly forbids them to reveal anything about themselves to each other, so if anyone is caught, no one can inform on anybody. But the heist goes wrong, the cops seem to show up way to fast, some members of the group are killed, and the rest start returning to the rendesvous point to try to sort out what went wrong. After the arrival of Mr. Pink, They realize that one of the number is a police informer. The arrival of Mr. Blonde, and the present he has in his trunk, complicates things even more. Things are also complicated by the fact that since no one knows each other, discovering who the informer is is given added difficulty, since no one trusts each other.\n\nThis film, Tarantino\'s first, is one of the best, if not the best one he has ever done. but part of this credit has to go to his outstanding cast. Keitel is an old pro at this type of thing, he has the distinction of being the first older actor who\'s career seemed to be going into a slump and who has recovered thanks to Tarantino\'s casting. But Tarantino can\'t claim sole credit for that, because Keitel really got the ball rolling on the project and help him score his budget and the prominence to gain his cast. Buscemi IS Mr. Pink. Tarantino wrote the role for himself, and he would have been good, but Buscemi brings a type of weasly professionalism to the role that no one else could. Penn and Tierney are ideally cast as the father and son who are left to sort out the mess of the robbery, Bunker is only in a few scenes but livens up the proceedings. Tarantino gives himself the perfect monologue for his character (Like a Virgin is a metaphor for big d*cks), and Tim Roth gives a spectacular performance as Mr. Orange, who is relegated to bleeding on the floor for a large chunk of the movie. His scene in the car when he has just been shot is particulary outstanding. But then, of course, I have to throw out a special nod to my favorite character in the piece, Mr. Blonde, as portrayed by Michael Madsen. Blonde is the definition of "Bad*ss", and Madsen fits him like a glove. His first scene back at the warehouse is particularly memorable, as is the "Ear torture sequence". Without Madsen\'s portraying of Mr. Blonde, I don\'t think the "Ear" scene would have worked, Madsen just does something with it that nobody else can. Not only does Blonde have most of the coolest lines, he\'s fun to watch on screen, especially his reaction to a gun pointed in his face by Mr. White. Madsen rocks!\n\n"Dogs" Is one of the few movies where I don\'t think thae casting could have been any better. Part of the reason it works as well as it does has to go the the way the cast works with each other. No one seems to think that they are better than anyone else, and no one seemed to approach the project with the stuck up feeling of how bad it was that they were doing an indie film on a low budget and with an unknown director. Every single member of the cast gives everything he (or, to a much lesser extent, she) has. It\'s this mindset that, I think, has made "Dogs" the classic it is today. Little could be improved upon.\n\nAs a side note, This came out a year after "Thelma and Louise" which also stars Harvey Keitel and Michael Madsen. However, in "Dogs" They play ruthless characters. In "T&L" they play the only sympathetic Male characters in the entire movie. An ideal would be to watch "T&L" then "RD" and really see the difference. They are two great actors, and they deliver. And for those who enjoyed Madsen in this, I also recommend "Kill Me Again", made a few years earlier, and which also features a scene where he tortures someone.\n\n"Dogs" is a great film to watch. Not a date flick, but for a cops and robbers movie, it\'s perfect. Seeing it for the first time in a theater, it hasn\'t lost it\'s touch, and the "Stuck in the Middle with You"/Ear sequence has never been more intense or memorable.\n\n*****/***** !0/10 ', u'0.0282715', u'I watched this movie for the first time without knowing what the movie was about. I remember hearing about how cool this movie was and I saw people wearing shirts and listening to the soundtrack, but I had never seen it. So when it first came out on DVD, I bought it without ever watching it before. In Tarantino I trust. For good reason. This is a classic movie, a throwback. A movie about a jewel heist gone wrong and the consequences of working with strangers. This flick has a great cast, great script, and flawless direction. Taratino films are great because they stress the story more than anything else. In all of his movies, the script is strong enough to carry the movie. Now add good over the top acting and you have a hit. The realism of this movie is what grabs you. You really feel like you are in that abandoned warehouse. If felt privileged to have bought such a movie without watching it first. An instant classic. I love this movie!', u'0.577016', u'After watching this half a dozen times with a biased, anti-Tarantino, "what the heck is so great about this guy, anyway" view(which, as most anyone watching any film with that view and a fair bit of self-knowledge will tell you, is a rather fruitless practice in pointlessness... if you\'ve decided you\'re not going to like it, there\'s very little reason to think that you will, no matter how good it is; you need an open mind), I finally decided to give it a fair hearing... and I saw it for what it is. An unusual film, at least for its time. A stylish film full of cool dialog, cinematography, editing and music. The whole thing comes together perfectly and is very short of creating a sublime film experience. The plot is excellently written and told. The pace is perfect. I wasn\'t bored for a second, nor did I ever really want it to move faster or slower. The cinematography is magnificent, and incredibly well-integrated. Pans, dolly trips and, lest we forget, the stationary shots... all perfectly used. Very stylized. The acting is top-notch all-round. With most of the cast being name actors, this is no surprise, but they really do shine. Madsen, Buscemi, Keitel, Roth... all incredible. The one role that had less than good... well, let\'s be honest, it had rather awful acting. I\'m speaking, of course, of Tarantino\'s character. Now, don\'t get me wrong; in From Dusk Till Dawn, this man did great. But just about any other time I\'ve seen him act, he just doesn\'t seem to have the first clue. Being a film-maker myself(albeit on somewhat of a smaller scale than Quentin), I can relate to wanting to cast yourself in a role... but sometimes, you just need to face up to the facts, and admit it if you can\'t act. Still, that is a minor complaint. Another one might be that there are at least two fairly big characters that seem completely and entirely expendable... they had no real role in the action and could very, very easily have been cut with no real loss to the overall product. I won\'t name them here, but anyone who\'s seen the film will know who I\'m talking about. All the characters, however, are well-written and their actions credible. Tarantino knows his stuff when it comes to writing... something that also shows in the dialog, which, although somewhat drawn-out at times, is exceptional. Well-delivered, too. When it comes to direction, he shows how talented he is, as well. The film is very well put together. The editing is great, with the non-linear time-line telling the story far better than a "regular" film ever could. One of the many Tarantino-fans, in fact, the very person who originally talked me into watching this film, once told me that he had heard of someone editing films with such time-lines - this, Pulp Fiction, Memento, etc. - so that their time-lines were perfectly linear. I\'m sorry, I entirely respect their right to do such a thing... and I won\'t claim that their doing so has less artistic value than the original films in any way... but I refuse to watch that. A big part of this being so well-told lies in the time-line. Also, I\'m a firm believer of watching something the way the makers intended it. Don\'t edit, don\'t censor, don\'t make your own version and pass it off as anything but just that... your own version, and not the original. Sorry, rant over. Finally, I just need to comment on the music... the soundtrack of this is just great. Tarantino collected so many amazing 70\'s tunes for this film and used them great. All in all, just a really, really good film. Very little keeps this from being a perfect ten, most of which I\'ve covered here. I recommend this to anyone who can stomach the violence and who likes their films with a side of style. 8/10', u'0.346975', u'Four of six ruthless criminals await for their boss at an abandoned warehouse. After finding the diamond heist that they had all teamed up to accomplish was a trap, they realize that one of them is a police informant.\n\nThe movie is told through a series of flashbacks from each of the criminals. I have never seen this done so breathtakingly. "Dogs" is an absolute masterpiece. It may not be Tarantino\'s best but is definitely one of the greatest movies of all time. There is absolutely nothing between the satirical writing or the hard-to-watch murders that could possibly make the movie any more perfect. Overall, the movie is absolutely incredible and I do not wish to say anymore to give away any sense of the ending.\n\nI highly recommend this movie.', u'0.127494', u'\nIt\'s hard to get your head around the fact that \'Reservoir Dogs\' has been around for ten years. It\'s almost difficult to remember a time before Tarantino made such an enormous impact (good and bad) on movies, but I saw this movie first time round before the hype. All I knew was that, like another "dog" movie from the same era that I saw, \'Man Bites Dog\', that it was supposed to be violent, funny and disturbing, and that it starred a long time favourite of mine Harvey Keitel, and Tim Roth, who I mainly knew from Greenaway\'s \'The Cook The Thief His Wife & Her Lover\'. Okay, I hope it\'s good I thought as I waited in the cinema listening to some half remembered 70s A.M. pop and a strange conversation about Madonna\'s sex life (the cinema was playing the soundtrack album before the main feature, but what did we know). Then the movie itself, electrifying and fascinating from the word go. It\'s impossible to describe the impact of seeing this for the first time without knowing what to expect! Still one of my greatest movie memories. Ten years later I\'ve seen it countless times so the surprise has obviously worn off, but it is still a brilliant movie because beneath the violence and wise-cracks of Mr. Pink (Steve Buscemi - \'In The Soup\'), Mr. Blonde (Michael Madsen - \'Thelma & Louise\'), and Nice Guy Eddie (Chris Penn - \'At Close Range\'), there is a lot of  depth, that being the very human relationship between Mr. White (Keitel) and Mr.Orange (Roth). To me that is one of the things that elevates this above the many lame and unoriginal "Tarantinoesque" movies we\'ve had to endure since \'Pulp Fiction\'. His imitators just simply don\'t have a clue!\n\nSimply brilliant cinema, and a modern classic. This is absolutely essential viewing!\n\n', u'0.291772', u"\nCrime boss Joe Cabot brings together a group of criminals to perform a big one-off job.  To protect each other, they all use colour coded names. However on the day of the job, the police ambush the gang and each makes their own getaway.  As the gang comes together at their warehouse meeting point they realise that someone within the gang must have tipped the police or be an undercover.  The accusations and suspicions escalate into violence in the confines of the warehouse.\n\nWhen this film came out in the UK it caused an absolute firestorm of controversy over it's violence, even to the point that it was banned in the UK for a while.  I still find this absurd and am very glad we have moved to a more tolerant society where generally the BBFC protect vulnerable groups but let adults decide for themselves.  Looking at the media's adoring welcome for the ultra violent Kill Bill one can't help but marvel at how things have changed.  Looking at Reservoir Dogs now (or even then!) it simply isn't THAT violent.  However what it is is very sudden and all the more powerful for it.\n\nTarantino directs the film and writes the film in such a way that it was impossible to ignore him even if the film was only a cult hit.  The dialogue is both witty at points but, more importantly, very tough and loaded with testosterone.  It is the writing that makes us like these coffee shop jokers at the start before shocking us by suddenly throwing us into a backseat bloodbath.  The entire job happens off camera, and only occasionally do we actually see the immediate effect of violence - usually we get the aftermath.  It is incredibly tight and very tense throughout, I was about 16 when my father took me to see this film - it has stayed with me since and I\nstill considered it to be one of the best `job gone wrong' films of my generation.  It may not be original (there's a thin line between a homage and a rip off) but it is certainly effectively done.\n\nThe cast are excellent and turn the hardboiled dialogue into convincing scenes.  Keitel is wonderful.  His character is a father figure of sorts and he is wildly out of control at times and balanced at others.  Likewise Buscemi is wide-eyed and freaking out for much of the film, but he does it well.  Roth is more balanced but is still good for it; it is his job to carry the emotional weight of the film and he does it well, despite a wandering American accent at times.  Madsen is great, maybe not the best character but wildly out of control.  Tierney was a great piece of casting, as was Bunker.  Penn is good but not the best of the cast.\n\nTarantino mercifully has little acting to do, but it is his film as writer and director.  The flashbacks during the film was a brave way to do it but it really works well - mixing stories with flashbacks and so on.  No matter what the time of the scene, it all keeps moving tensely towards the climax. It may be a homage and not as original as some films but so what - it is tight and tense, macho, violent, funny and very enjoyable.", u'0.200625', u"\nReservoir Dogs will always go down as one of the most violent yet brilliant pieces of work ever to be shown on the silver screen. Tarrentino's script is brilliant and what is even more amazing is that it is his first movie. The acting is top grade , all the actors seem to come up with the performance of lives. There were calls when the film was released for it to be banned by the lilly livered liberals and while this is bloody and the language is coarse, for it to be banned would have deprived us of a classic Hollywood movie that oozes class as well as blood! 10 out of 10", u'0.198961', u'\n((((SPOILERS))))) I can think of nothing kind or good or positive to say about this truly repulsive motion picture. It is, quite simply, cruel. \n\nQuentin Tarantino\'s badly written script focuses on the events leading up to and the aftermath of a botched jewelry store heist. The heist itself is largely inconsequential to the story, as Tarantino\'s intent was apparently to create a character study of the participants. Yet, he has failed to give any of his characters anything resembling human personalities beyond phony macho posturing. The cast does little to add depth to the characters beyond the routine tough guy gambit of shouting their obscenity-laden dialogue at the top of their lungs. As such, they never raise their one-note performances above the level of brain dead savagery. But good, bad or indifferent, the actors have little to work with in the first place. Tarantino\'s much deified dialogue is insultingly dull-witted -- banal pop references peppered generously with tiresome profanity. The kindest thing to be said for Tarantino\'s ability to direct action is that it, at least, distracts from the emptiness of his written words. \n\nBut, it is the violence that pushes the film into the realm of the utterly contemptible. There have been films with more violence and with more explicit violence, but few revel in its violence to the extent of RESERVOIR DOGS. The film doesn\'t use violence to show cause and effect, or to make a social statement, or to reflect reality, or even for cheap shock effect. It is violence for the sake of violence. The violence in DOGS is purely sadistic; a sleazy, pornographic celebration of inhuman cruelty.\n\n\nHere and in his other violence-obsessed films, Tarantino embraces the infliction of pain as not just an act of power, but of an almost orgasmic display of gratification. Add to this the fact that the victims of the violence are usually bound, helpless, terrified, tortured, randomly selected and undeserving of such cruelty and the violence clearly becomes symbolic of rape. Worse, such savagery encourages the audience to identify with the perpetrator, not the victim, and Tarantino (all too effectively, I\'m afraid) tries to make the viewer complicit in his sadism.  \n\nOkay, if Tarantino wants to indulge in his little S&M fantasies, that is his business. What is disheartening is the way people -- filmgoers and professional critics alike -- have been seduced into not just tolerating Tarantino\'s sadism, but to applaud it as well? DOGS centerpiece is the totally unnecessary and illogical kidnapping of a young policeman who is subsequently beaten, tortured and mutilated, for no apparent reason other than because it amuses one of the psychotic characters -- and, one can presume, Tarantino himself. The director stages the torture sequence like a comic musical number, complete with rock background music and choreography; casually topping it all off with the young officer\'s murder being the punchline of a joke. "That\'s entertainment!" seems to be Tarantino\'s pathetically cruel message. \n\nThis killing should inspire anger or, at the very least, pity for the innocent man. Instead, it elicited raves by film viewers who see the scene as stylish, or worse, cool. What does it say about our society that not only do we condone the glorification of senseless violence as entertainment, but applaud it as art? Why have we become so obsessed with the matter of "style" that we can\'t see that beneath Tarantino\'s superficial technique there is sadism? \n\nRESERVOIR DOGS represents some sort of low point in the history of cinema. That it helped propel Tarantino to be considered one of the most influential directors of our time represents some sort of low point for society.\n', u'-0.593773', u'\nI remember watching this movie when it first came out and I did not know what to think. I mean, it was different. I could not remember seeing dialog like this before or a scene where a guy cuts another guy\'s ear off. It was unique in that regard. Mind you, it was different, but not really special. Moreover, some parts were very boring. Other parts were so "talky" and somewhat over the top, that they strained credibility. However, there were some funny lines as well. After having watched this again, some ten years later, I can say with all honesty, this film has not aged well. On second look, you see what looks like a first year film student project. It still has funny lines, but the story is paper thin. The actors tend to over act and the dialog is so full of Clint Eastwood wannabe one-liners, that you just roll your eyes. Michael Madsen cannot act, sorry. He is cool, but he cannot act. Tim Roth\'s attempt at an American accent makes him sound like Ralph Cramden from the HoneyMooners. I was just amazed at how bad this film really looked to a more mature person. The funny lines just don\'t cover that constant posturing of characters that have no real depth. The movie is cotton candy, it looks filling, but is far from it. Perhaps there will always be 14 year old boys around to give this "cool film" high marks, but I fear it will grow more ridiculous the older I get. However, Tarantino has this cult of personality going and I am sure the 10s will continue coming in for this film and a 10 might mean perfect in here, but that don\'t make it so.\n', u'-0.227909', u'...this is the whole damn meal. "Reservoir Dogs" is about a crime gone horridly awry, and it makes no apologies for its violence, slurs, and language.  It doesn\'t have to, because of its brilliant, gripping script and plot twists, acting that makes you think these people are real, and a flashy presentation of it all. Quentin Tarantino came on the scene not with a whimper but a bang with this story of a diamond heist which is foiled by an undercover cop--one of the criminals.   The story unfolds backwards, beginning with Quentin Tarantino waxing poetic on Madonna\'s "Like a Virgin", and manages to cover Tim Roth writhing around in Harvey Keitel\'s backseat with a bullet in his stomach, Michael Madsen with a straight razor and a bound & gagged cop, Chris Penn crying rape in his father Laurence Tierney\'s office, and other insane, violent, and/or hilarious plot lines leading to a dazzling end.  The soundtrack adds just the right amount of style and superiority, which you\'ll understand immediately when the Dogs walk in slo-mo to the tune of "Little Green Bag". This movie can only compare to "Pulp Fiction" with its brilliance, otherwise, it is completely and utterly a unique experience.', u'0.148972', u'When critics say that some films are pornographic because of the way they depict violence, they are referring to the type of violence that appears in "Reservoir Dogs." The film maker\'s artistic judgment seems to be clouded by a bloodthirsty hatred of police officers. I am thinking particularly of a scene in which a captive police officer is mutilated by his criminal captors. The feeling conveyed to me was one of sadistic joy in the victim\'s suffering, a sense that he deserved to be mutilated simply because he was a cop. I am sure that some misguided admirers of this film applauded the scene precisely for that reason. Unfortunately, a lot of people hate the police, and for them such a film functions as escapist "entertainment," but "Reservoir Dogs" seems to lack any redeeming value of another kind, like a snuff movie. \n\nThe only other time I\'ve seen such poor artistic and ethical judgment in a film was in "Caligula," by the producer Bob Guccione, where in one scene a Roman aristocrat forces a soldier to drink a gallon of wine and then cuts his belly open for the fun of seeing the liquid spill out of it. Some gullible members of the audience actually cheered when they saw that. Like Guccione, Tarantino, director of "Reservoir Dogs" may be a big fan of pornography and possibly he doesn\'t make the distinction between sex and violence. Certainly everything of his I\'ve seen looks like a porno film stylistically, but he focuses mainly on bloodshed and torture instead of lust and love. Unless you\'re in the mood for a tasteless exercise in violence, you would do much better to rent John Huston\'s "Asphalt Jungle," one of the best and most intelligently made caper gone wrong movies ever made.', u'-0.526481'], u'tt0081505': [u'\nWhen this film first came out in 1980, I remember going to see it on opening night. The sheer terror that I experienced in viewing "The Shining" was enough to make me go to bed with the lights turned ON every night for an entire summer. This movie just scared the life out of me, which is what still happens every time I rent the video for a re-watch. I have seen The Shining at least six or seven times, and I still believe it to be simultaneously and paradoxically one of the most frightening and yet funniest films I\'ve ever seen. Frightening because of the extraordinarily effective use of long shots to create feelings of isolation, convex lens shots to enhance surrealism, and meticulously scored music to bring tension levels to virtually unbearable levels. And "funny" because of Jack Nicholson\'s outrageous and in many cases ad-libbed onscreen antics. It never ceases to amaze me how The Shining is actually two films in one, both a comedy AND a horror flick. Ghostly apparitions of a strikingly menacing nature haunt much of the first half of the film, which gradually evolve into ever more serious physical threats as time progresses. Be that as it may, there is surprisingly little violence given the apparent intensity, but that is little comfort for the feint of heart as much of the terror is more implied than manifest. The Shining is a truly frightening movie that works symbolically on many levels, but is basically about human shortcomings and the way they can be exploited by unconscious forces combined with weakness of will. This film scares the most just by using suggestion to turn your own imagination against you. The Shining is a brilliant cinematic masterpiece, the likes of which have never been seen before or since. Highly, highly recommended. - Paul', u'0.240789', u"\n\nI can't praise this film long enough!\n\nThe Shining is, without doubt, one of Stanley Kubrick's undisputed masterpieces and a true classic in horror cinema. It is a film that, over the course of the years, has managed to scare the living hell out of its audiences (and still does). The film is an adaptation of Stepehen King's original novel, written in the late '70s, and although the film is not very loyal to the book, it still stands as a thing of its own.\n\nRight from the beginning, as we contemplate the car going to the hotel from those stunning aerial shots, deeply inside us we know that something in the film, somehow, sometime is going to go wrong. As we obtain that severe warning, an almost inaudible voice gently whispers to us 'sit tight', a sense of unexpectedness invades us all, and it is that very same feeling that makes our hair stand on end throughout out the entire movie.\n\n\n\n\nThe plot is simple: Jack Torrance (Jack Nicholson) becomes the caretaker of the Overlook Hotel in up in the secluded mountains of Colorado. Jack, being a family man, takes his wife (Shelley Duvall) and son (Danny Lloyd) to the hotel to keep him company throughout the long, isolated nights. During their stay, strange things occur when Jack's son Danny sees gruesome images powered by a force called 'the shining' and Jack is heavily affected by this. Along with writer's block and the demons of the hotel haunting him, Jack has a complete mental breakdown and the situation takes a sinister turn for the worse.\n\nThe film, unlike many horror-oriented films nowadays, doesn't only rely on stomach-churning and gory images (which it does contain, anyway) but on the incredibly scary music based on the works of B\xe9la Bart\xf3k and on the excellent cinematography (the Steadicam is superbly used, giving us a sense of ever-following evil), as well. The terrifying mood and atmosphere of the film is carefully and masterfully woven by Kubrick, who clearly knows how to really make a horror movie.\n\nJack Nicholson's powerful performance as the mad father and husband is as over the top as it is brilliant. Shelley Duvall, who plays the worrying wife who tries to help her son, is also a stand out; she shows a kind of trembling fear in many scenes and is able to display weakness and vulnerability in a very convincing way. Undoubtedly, The Shining is full of memorable moments (the elevator scene or the 'Heeeeeere's Johnny' one-liner for instance) and, simply put, it's flawlessly brilliant.\n\nStanley Kubrick's direction is pure excellence, giving the whole film a cold and atmospheric look, thus creating an unbearable sense of paranoia and terror. There are moments of sheer brilliance and exquisite perfection in this film; the horrifying maze chase is a perfect example. Every single shot is masterfully created and there are some genuinely scary scenes which will make you sit on the edge of your seat.\n\nThe Shining is, in my opinion, a special landmark in horror cinema which will always be regarded as one of the scariest movies in film history. Since I saw it last year, when I was 13, I have rarely been able to have a bath in my bathtub.Just in case, ya know. Overall, The Shining is incomparably the scariest film I've ever seen in my whole life (and I can tell you I've seen a great deal of horror films).\n\nIt is an unforgettable, chilling, majestic and truly, profoundly scary film crafted by an eccentric genius who wants to show that the impossible can be done. The Shining is a sublime, hauntingly intriguing and endlessly watchable film that shows Kubrick at his best.\n", u'0.366535', u"\nStephen King may have said the master director knew nothing about horror, but that simply is not true. That is a too biased opinion for anyone to go on given that he wrote the book, which Kubrick based his wonderful film ever so loosely on. And at any rate, faithful or not, KUBRICK's Shining-the BEST crafted genre film of the 80's- performs it's duty as a fright flick, and then some.\n\nThere are appropriately no words strong enough to convey the haunting beauty of the visuals showcased throughout the movie, from the drive to the Overlook to the final chase in the hedgemaze the movie is a feast for the eyes as it is for the mind. And it IS a feast for the mind as The Shining is as psychological as horror gets, toying relentlessly, and expertly with your emotions and expectations(some could even say SADISTICALLY), throwing something in that's completely out of left field and never, ever letting you catch your breath between the now classic shocks as the movie speeds toward it's memorable conclusion in the last half hour.\n\nKudos are in order for Kubrick, a director of the old school style, who builds an eerie atmosphere by exercising total control over the filmic environment, manipulating everything down to the tiniest detail to suit the needs of the picture, yet filming with a coldly detatched, objective eye, as though Kubrick were making a documentary about these events. This would account for the dialouge, which-thankfully-is not the typical phoney balloney Hollywood banter (Kubrick detractors/King purists usually bitch about this the most, having been weaned on the phony nature of 'Hollywood talk', which is usually nothing at all like real talk. Many of us speak 'on the nose', and do not try to convey subtext through use of carefully chosen words that articulate our state of being without being direct.) In this light, Shelley Duvall must be commended for her performance which is very naturalistic. It does not seem like acting at all. She is not concerned with glamour, nor does she clutter her performance with typical acting chops, but rather she is solely focussed on hitting the emotional highpoints of her character as 'Wendy' gradually comes to realize that her husband is a madman. And let's face it folks, how many of us would like a million bucks when placed in a situation like that? Who does NOT look like a blubbering idiot when they are hysterical? That's what I thought, so what did you expect? She was great. To say nothing of the rest of the cast.\n", u'0.091819', u"\nChilling, majestic piece of cinematic fright, this film combines all the great elements of an intellectual thriller, with the grand vision of a director who has the instinctual capacity to pace a moody horror flick within the realm of his filmmaking genius that includes an eye for the original shot, an ice-cold soundtrack and an overall sense of dehumanization. This movie cuts through all the typical horror movies like a\nred-poker through a human eye, as it allows the viewer to not only feel the violence and psychosis of its protagonist, but appreciate the seed from which the derangement stems. One of the scariest things for people to face is the unknown and this film presents its plotting with just that thought in mind. The setting is perfect, in a desolate winter hideaway. The quietness of the moment is a character in itself, as the fermenting aggressor in Jack Torrance's mind wallows in this idle time, and breeds the devil's new playground. I always felt like the presence of evil was dormant in all of our minds, with only the circumstances of the moment, and the reasons given therein, needed to wake its violent ass and pounce over its unsuspecting victims. This film is a perfect example of this very thought.\n\nAnd it is within this film's subtle touches of the canvas, the clackity-clacks of the young boy's big wheel riding along the empty hallways of the hotel, the labyrinthian garden representing the mind's fine line between sane and insane, Kubrick's purposely transfixed editing inconsistencies, continuity errors and set mis-arrangements, that we discover a world guided by the righteous and tangible, but coaxed away by the powerful and unknown. I have never read the book upon which the film is based, but without that as a comparison point, I am proud to say that this is one of the most terrifying films that I have ever seen. I thought that the runtime of the film could've been cut by a little bit, but then again, I\nam not one of the most acclaimed directors in the history of film, so maybe I should keep my two-cent criticisms over a superb film, to myself. All in all, this movie captures your attention with its grand form and vision, ropes you in with some terror and eccentric direction, and ties you down and stabs you in the heart with its cold-eyed view of the man's mind gone overboard, creepy atmosphere and the loss of humanity.\n\nRating: 9/10", u'0.404002', u'It\'s well know that Stephen King doesn\'t like Stanley Kubrick\'s version of The Shining (so much so that he scripted an abysmal TV movie version). According to him, Kubrick didn\'t understand the horror genre. Well, I think Kubrick did. I think he understood it only too well. He knew that it was a genre full of conventions, cheap tricks and tired clich\xe9s. Therefore Kubrick decided to throw all that nonsense out of the window and make a film based on atmosphere rather than predictable thrills. You don\'t get people here jumping out of the dark time after time. You don\'t get worthless shocks. Kubrick\'s version of The Shining is an insidious film. It gets under your skin. In other words, it isn\'t for Pavlovian dogs that have spent a lifetime being conditioned by cretinous nonsense.\n\nWhat runs deepest through The Shining is a frustration with family. Right from the beginning it\'s obvious that Jack isn\'t happy with his lot \x96 as he\'s being shown around the hotel he can\'t help but take a sneaky look at the backsides of a couple of women. Well, can you blame him? The poor man is married to a bug-eyed, bucktoothed Olive Oil look-a-like.\n\nThen there\'s Jack\'s quiet frustration with his son Danny. As he\'s driving to the hotel, he\'s bothered by requests for food. And then his son makes out that he\'s knowledgeable because he saw a programme on TV. Already he\'s slightly irked - he\'s got to spend months alone with these people; one who resembles Popeye\'s missus and one who talks to his finger.\n\nSo really the hotel brings out nothing that isn\'t already there. It merely brings everything to the surface \x96 Jack\'s resentment as regards his wife, his frustration as regards his lack of writing talent and his annoyance at having a troubled son. It\'s kind of like he\'s testing his family. Are they strong enough as a unit to survive being cooped up together?\n\nOne of the underlying themes in the film seems to be television. What happens in The Shining is what happens when someone stops watching the idiot box. With it, a person can find solace in mindless programming and retreat from the strictures of family life. Without it they\'re faced with all their problems and all the failings of their loved ones. Even the strongest family can be brought to its knees when there\'s no escape from each other\'s company. Therefore it\'s quite telling, when Jack loses the plot completely, that he spouts lines from TV: "Honey, I\'m home" and "Here\'s Johnny." Just watch some television, Jack.\n\nBut it\'s also the pain of writing that contributes to Jack\'s insanity. There\'s nothing quite as harrowing as an empty page. Plus there\'s nothing more annoying than being interrupted mid-flow. One of the best scenes in the film is when Jack tells his wife to get lost when she interrupts him. It\'s extremely violent in how cold Jack is towards Wendy. And because it\'s grounded in a reality, it\'s all the more effective.\n\nAlso rather unsettling is the scene where Jack talks to his son. He makes Danny sit on his lap and he proceeds to tell him how much he loves him and how he\'d never hurt him. It works so well because it\'s so cold and because there\'s such an obvious lack of affection. The words are just empty platitudes. They mean absolutely nothing.\n\nJack\'s true feelings are only revealed when he gets to talk to Lloyd. It\'s in this scene that you realise the marriage isn\'t all it\'s cracked up to be \x96 Wendy has never forgiven him for accidentally hurting his son. And it\'s also in this scene that you realise (as if you hadn\'t noticed earlier) that Jack is absolutely crackers. He\'s talking to ghosts. But they could also be figments of his imagination, for there are mirrors behind most of the ghosts he talks to. Effectively he\'s talking to himself. And I love this matter of fact way of dealing with the supernatural. There are no fancy tricks. Everything just seems unnaturally natural.\n\nIn fact, everything to do with the ghosts is superbly handled. The twins are spooky, Lloyd is amiable and Grady is out of his mind. And it\'s Grady who\'s probably the most chilling presence in the film. He starts off as a bumbling waiter but then quickly becomes a stone cold killer. Just the way he says \'corrected\' conveys more terror than a million slasher films. And Philip Stone\'s performance is a million times more subtle than Nicholson\'s. I mean, as much as I like Jack in the film, he does chew the scenery. But Kubrick likes his over the top performances, so that\'s the way he wanted it.\n\nAnd undoubtedly it\'s Kubrick\'s movie. He\'s the real star. And I love everything he brings to the film. I love his command of lighting \x96 just look at The Gold Room scenes. I love his use of music. I love the way that he turns the Room 237 scene, one that could have been a standard \'jump\' scene, into a comment on Jack\'s marriage \x96 his willingness to be unfaithful. I love the way that he leaves lots of unanswered questions. I love the shots of the blood coming out of the lift. I love the helicopter shots at the start. I love the way that pages and pages of typed words are the most frightening visual in the film. I love the maze. I love the fact that you see a ghost getting a blow-job from a ghost in a bear suit\x85 Man, I love absolutely everything about this film. It\'s horror for people who know that true horror isn\'t being stalked by a man in a mask, but being trapped alone with your family.', u'-0.01577', u"I was never a big fan of horror movies. They usually try cheap tricks to scare their audiences like loud noises and creepy children. They usually lack originality and contain overacting galore. The only horror movie i like was Stir of Echoes with Kevin Bacon. It was well-acted, and had a great story. But it has been joined and maybe even surpassed by Stanley Kubrick's The Shining, quite possibly the scariest movie ever.\n\nThe movie follows a writer (Jack Nicholson) and his family who agree to watch over a hotel while it is closed for the winter. There were rumors of the place being haunted and the last resident went crazy and murdered his family. But Jack is convinced it will be OK and he can use the quiet to overcome his writer's block. After months of solitude and silence however, Jack becomes a grumpy and later violent. Is it cabin fever or is there something in the hotel that is driving him mad?\n\nOne of the creepiest parts about the movie is the feeling of isolation that Kubrick makes. The hotel is very silent, and the rooms are huge, yet always empty. It is also eerily calm when Jack's son is riding his bike through the barren hallways. Jack Nicholson's performance is also one of his very best, scaring the hell out of me and making me sure to get out once in awhile. My favorite scene is when he is talking to a ghost from inside a walk-in refrigerator.\n\nThe Shining is tops for horror movies in my opinion, beating the snot out of crap like the Ring and The Blair Witch Project. It may be a oldie, but is definitely a goodie. 8/10", u'-0.0212075', u"\nWhen Jack Torrance (Nicholson) is offered a job as winter caretaker for the Overlook Hotel he accepts it as an opportunity to work on his novel in an isolated environment. He is told stories of the last caretaker going mad and butchering his family but isn't deterred. He arrives at the Overlook Hotel with his wife (Duvall) and child Danny (Lloyd) and is shown around the hotel by the cook (Scatman Crothers) who has the gift of perception. The cook warns Danny that the hotel can be of particular danger for those with the gift. It's only a matter of time before Jack begins to act increasingly erratic.\n\nThis is one of Jack Nicholson's finest roles, his increasingly unhinged character is amusing and terrifying in almost equal measures. Duvall plays the role of the terrorised wife quite well - she does look like she's genuinely filled with fear - but doesn't have much else to do. Lloyd is excellent as the boy, although he doesn't have too much emotion to express. However no doubt that this is Jack's show.\n\nThe story doesn't stick to King's novel and is better for it; this is Kubrick's Shining. The film has plenty of genuinely scary moments but manages to keep a creepy atmosphere all through - especially as the ghosts come out and Jack begins to move between his reality and the reality that is gradually claiming him.\n\nKubrick is excellent here, his cold direction adds to the overall creep factor of the film. It's one of the best examples of his masterful touch.\n\nOverall this is an excellent horror movie - because the focus is on horror and fear rather than gore alone (as with modern horrors). Jack is excellent in one of his best roles ever and the whole package is delivered in a cold creepy manner by a sadly lost director.", u'0.303846', u"\nOkay, okay, maybe not THE greatest. I mean, The Exorcist and Psycho and a few others are hard to pass up, but The Shining is way up there. It is, however, by far the best Stephen King story that has been made into a movie. It's better than The Stand, better than Pet Sematary (if not quite as scary), better than Cujo, better than The Green Mile, better the Dolores Claiborne, better than Stand By Me (just barely, though), and yes, it's better than The Shawshank Redemption (shut up, it's better), I don't care WHAT the IMDb Top 250 says.  \n\nI read that, a couple of decades ago, Stanley Kubrick was sorting through novels at his home trying to find one that might make a good movie, and from the other room, his wife would hear a pounding noise every half hour or so as he threw books against the wall in frustration. Finally, she didn't hear any noise for almost two hours, and when she went to check and see if he had died in his chair or something (I tell this with all due respect, of course), she found him concentrating on a book that he had in his hand, and the book was The Shining. And thank God, too, because he went on to convert that book into one of the best horror films ever.\n\nStephen King can be thanked for the complexity of the story, about a man who takes his wife and son up to a remote hotel to oversee it during the extremely isolated winter as he works on his writing. Jack Nicholson can be thanked for his dead-on performance as Jack Torrance (how many movies has Jack been in where he plays a character named Jack?), as well as his flawless delivery of several now-famous lines (`Heeeeeere's Johnny!!'). Shelley Duvall can be thanked for giving a performance that allows the audience to relate to Jack's desires to kill her. Stanley Kubrick can be thanked for giving this excellent story his very recognizable touch, and whoever the casting director was can be thanked for scrounging up the creepiest twins on the planet to play the part of the murdered girls.\n\n\nOne of the most significant aspects of this movie, necessary for the story as a whole to have its most significant effect, is the isolation, and it's presents flawlessly. The film starts off with a lengthy scene following Jack as he drives up to the old hotel for his interview for the job of the caretaker for the winter. This is soon followed by the same thing following Jack and his family as they drive up the windy mountain road to the hotel. This time the scene is intermixed with shots of Jack, Wendy, and Danny talking in the car, in which Kubrick managed to sneak in a quick suggestion about the evils of TV, as Wendy voices her concern about talking about cannibalism in front of Danny, who says that it's okay because he's already seen it on TV (`See? It's okay, he saw it on the television.').\n\n\nThe hotel itself is the perfect setting for a story like this to take place, and it's bloody past is made much more frightening by the huge, echoing rooms and the long hallways. These rooms with their echoes constantly emphasize the emptiness of the hotel, but it is the hallways that really created most of the scariness of this movie, and Kubrick's traditional tracking shots give the hallways a creepy three-dimensional feel. Early in the film, there is a famous tracking shot that follows Danny in a large circle as he rides around the halls on his Big Wheel (is that what those are called?), and his relative speed (as well as the clunking made by the wheels as he goes back and forth from the hardwood floors to the throw rugs) gives the feeling of not knowing what is around the corner. And being a Stephen King story, you EXPECT something to jump out at you. I think that the best scene in the halls (as well as one of the scariest in the film) is when Danny is playing on the floor, and a ball rolls slowly up to him. He looks up and sees the long empty hallway, and because the ball is something of a child's toy, you expect that it must have been those horrendously creepy twins that rolled it to him. Anyway, you get the point. The Shining is a damn scary movie.\n\nBesides having the rare quality of being a horror film that doesn't suck, The Shining has a very in depth story that really keeps you guessing and leaves you with a feeling that there was something that you missed. HAD Jack always been there, like Mr. Grady told him in the men's room? Was he really at that ball in 1921, or is that just someone who looks exactly like him? If he has always been the caretaker, as Mr. Grady also said, does that mean that it was HIM that went crazy and killed his wife and twin daughters, and not Mr. Grady, after all? It's one thing for a film to leave loose ends that should have been tied, that's just mediocre filmmaking. For example, The Amityville Horror, which obviously copied much of The Shining as far as its subject matter, did this. But it is entirely different when a film is presented in a way that really makes you think (as mostly all of Kubrick's movies are). One more thing that we can all thank Stanley Kubrick for, and we SHOULD thank him for, is for not throwing this book against the wall. That one toss would have been cinematic tragedy.\n", u'0.389855', u"\nWhat can I say about the scariest movie I have ever seen that has not already been said by others more articulate than yours truly?  Do not view this film expecting to see a screen version of the Stephen King novel. Rather, this is a Stanley Kubrick film, and to fully appreciate it one should judge it within the context of Kubrick's entire body of work as a serious filmmaker.  Thematically, THE SHINING relates most closely to 2001: A SPACE ODYSSEY, though flourishes of PATHS OF GLORY, A CLOCKWORK ORANGE and BARRY LYNDON do manage to figure prominently in the film's overall technique.\n\nIn a nutshell (no pun intended), Jack Nicholson and Shelly Duvall co-star with Oregon's Timberline Lodge - enlisted to portray the exterior of the Overlook Hotel - in a story that appears on the surface to be about ghosts and insanity, but deals with issues of child abuse, immortality and duality. \n\nWhat the film might lack initially in terms of coherence is more than made up for in technique.  Garrett Brown (the male voice in those old Molson Golden commercials), inventor of the Steadicam, chases young Danny Lloyd through hotel corridors and an amazing snow maze, providing magic-carpet-ride fluidity to scenes that ten years earlier would have been impossible to accomplish.  If the film starts off too slow, remember who the director is.  This man likes to take his time, and the results are well worth it: incredible aerial shots of the Overlook Hotel; horrific Diane Arbus-inspired twins staring directly at us; portentous room 237 and its treasure trove of terrible secrets; elevators that gush rivers of blood in slow-motion; Jack Torrance's immortality found via the hotel (akin to David Bowman's journey through the Space Gate); and some of the best use of pre-existing music ever assembled for a motion picture.\n\nIt would take a book to examine and defend the film's strong points and drawbacks.  If you've never seen it, you owe it to yourself to watch it alone with the lights off, with no interruptions, and make sure that it's raining.  This is a cinematic experience that changed my life at the age of 14.  Makes a great double feature with Robert Wise's 1963 thriller THE HAUNTING.\n", u'0.182995', u'Even though The Shining is over a quarter of a century old, I challenge anyone to not get freaked out by Jack Nicholson\'s descent into madness. This is a rare example of something so unique that no one has been able to rip it off; instead it has been referenced time and again in pop culture. The twins, the elevator of blood, RedRum, the crazy nonsense "writing"... this should be seen, if for nothing else, to understand all the allusions to it in daily life. The film is simultaneously scary, suspenseful, beautiful, and psychologically intriguing. It has the classic mystery of Hitchcock and the terror of a modern thriller. And it has what horror movies usually lack: a great script.', u'-0.032093', u'The Shining, you know what\'s weird about this movie? This is the movie that everyone, for people who claim to not like horror films, will always say that The Shining is a terrific film. This is Stanley Kubrick\'s classic vision of Stephen King\'s horror tale of madness and blood. This is just an incredible film and wither you have seen it or not, you have heard of it, know a few lines from it, and know some of the classic images. Who could forget Jack\'s "Here\'s Johnny!"? Who could forget "All Work and No Play Make Jack a Dull Boy"? Who could forget that chilling ending? This is the film that is unforgettable and honestly in my opinion is Kubrick\'s best work. I know there is a lot of argument in that department, a lot of people say it\'s 2001: A Space Odyssey or Clockwork Orange or even Dr. Strangelove, but if those film pioneered film making, then The Shining perfected it. This is the tale of isolation, madness, terrifying images, and the ultimate ghost story that will crawl underneath your skin. \n\nJack Torrance, Jack\'s son Danny, and Jack\'s wife, Wendy arrive at the Overlook Hotel on closing day. The elderly African-American chef, Dick Hallorann, surprises Danny by speaking to him telepathically and offering him some ice cream. He explains to Danny that he and his grandmother shared the gift; they called the communication "shining." Danny asks if there is anything to be afraid of in the hotel, particularly Room 237. Dick tells Danny that the hotel has a certain "shine" to it and many memories, not all of them good, and advises him to stay out of room 237 under all circumstances. Danny\'s curiosity about Room 237 finally gets the better of him when he sees the room has been opened. Danny shows up injured and visibly traumatized after Jack tells Wendy that he loves his family. Seeing this, Wendy thinks Jack has been abusing Danny. Jack wanders into the hotel\'s Gold Room where he meets a ghostly bartender named Lloyd. Danny starts calling out the word "redrum" frantically, and scribbling it on walls. He goes into a trance, and withdraws; he now says that he is Tony, his own "imaginary friend." Jack sabotages the hotel radio, cutting off communication from the outside world, but Hallorann has received Danny\'s telepathic cry for help and is on his way. Wendy discovers that Jack has been typing endless pages of manuscript repeating "All work and no play makes Jack a dull boy" formatted in various ways. Horrified, Jack threatens her and she knocks him unconscious with a baseball bat, locking him in a storage locker in the kitchen. Jack converses with Grady through the door of the locker, which then unlocks releasing him. Danny has written "REDRUM" in lipstick on the door of Wendy\'s bedroom. When she looks in the mirror, she sees that it is "Murder" spelled backwards. Jack picks up an axe and begins to chop through the door leading to his family\'s living quarters. "Here\'s Johnny!", and Jack\'s legendary image is born.\n\nThe Shining is one of those films that you seriously have to make time to see, this is an incredible film and still gives me nightmares. Jack Nicholson\'s performance is timeless and unforgettable. But one I also feel is extremely overlooked is Shelley Duvall, her scene of finding Jack\'s rant All Work\x85 is incredible, that\'s a look of horror and you can see that fear in her face after realizing her husband is mad. Also another incredible scene is when Jack sees a ghost woman in the bathtub, it\'s honestly one of the most terrifying scenes in horror cinema. The reason this film is so well known is because it\'s a film of perfection, it\'s been on The Simpsons, it\'s been shown in other films and it\'s a film that will forever stay with you when you see it, trust me.\n\n10/10', u'0.223317', u"Sometimes all good horror needs is a good idea. But sometimes, rarely indeed, a horror masterpiece will reach us by the hand of a Kubrick, with the adept, elusive touch of a great artist to guide the vision, and we know what separates it from all else.\n\nOkay, the story has enough promise that even a hired gun would have to try to fail. Heck, even Stephen King himself didn't fare so bad. It's how Kubrick perceives King's universe however, how he fills the frame with it, that renders THE SHINING a feast for the senses.\n\nHorror that will reach us through the mind and body alike, an assault as it were, tending eventually its pitch to a crescendo, yet curiously not without a delicate lull.\n\nKubrick's cinema is, as usually, a sight to behold. We get the adventurous camera that prowls through the lavish corridors of the Overlook Hotel like it is some kind of mystic labyrinth rife for exploration, linear tracking shots exposing impeccably decorated interiors in symmetric grandeur. The geometrical approach in how Kubrick perceives space reminds me very much of Japanese directors of some 10 years before. In that what is depicted in the frame, the elements of narrative, is borderline inconsequential to how they all balance and harmonize together.\n\nCertain images stand out in this. The first shot of Jack's typewriter, ominously accompanied by the off-screen thumps of a ball, drums of doom that seem to emanate from the very walls or the typewriter itself, an instrument of doom in itself as is later shown. A red river flowing through the hotel's elevators in a poetry of slow motions. Jack hitting the door with the axe, the camera moving along with him, tracking the action as it happens, as though it's the camera piercing through the door and not the axe. The ultra fast zoom in the kid's face violently thrusting us inside his head before we see the two dead girls from his POV. And of course, the epochal bathroom scene.\n\nMuch has been said of Jack Nicholson's obtrusive overacting. His mad is not entirely successful, because, well, he's Jack Nicholson. The guy looks half-mad anyway. Playing mad turns him into an exaggerated caricature of himself. Shelley Duvall on the other hand is one of the most inspired casting choices Kubrick ever made. Coming from a streak of fantastic performances for Robert Altman in the seventies (3 WOMEN, THIEVES LIKE US, NASHVILLE), she brings to her character the right amounts of swanlike fragility and emotional distress. A delicate, detached thing thrown in with the mad.", u'0.167605', u"I shall never, ever be able to understand the phenomenon known as Stanley Kubrick. When he was on, as with DR STRANGELOVE, he was brilliant. But when he was bad, he was awful.\n\nI saw THE SHINING in its first release in a packed movie house in New York City. I had read and loved Stephen King's novel; I am widely read in the horror genre and do not scare easily, but that book gave me the creeps for weeks.\n\nWell for all the people who have been raving what a masterpiece this film is, I can only tell you this. The crowd in the theatre started giggling the minute Jack Nicholson appeared on film, and by the time he chased Shelley Duvall up the stairs, the whole crowd was literally in stitches. And I was laughing right along with them. Maybe New York audiences are just jaded; I don't know.\n\nNot that this movie does not have some scary moments. Shelley Duvall is rather good when she is away from Nicholson and it starts to dawn on her that something evil is taking over her family and her life. Unfortunately, Miss Duvall plays Wendy Torrance, a strong, intelligent, and resourceful woman in the novel, as a pathetic, whiny ninny most of the time, and by the time Nicholson had her trapped in the bathroom, I am sure plenty of us were screaming for her head. It must be said that this is not the fault of Miss Duvall, a talented and intelligent actress who according to reports fought bitterly with Kubrick over his interpretation of Wendy.\n\nThe kid talking to his finger is another idiotic and unintentionally hilarious bit of business that was not in the original novel. Why Kubrick thought this was a good idea is beyond me.\n\nBut let's get down to the real problem: Jack Nicholson. In the right role, he can be very good, though he has never been among my top ten. Jack Torrance is totally the wrong role for him; for one thing, he does not look ordinary enough. But the worst thing is that Stephen King's story was about a man being SLOWLY AND INEXORABLY driven out of his mind. Nicholson goes nuts so early in the film that there is literally nowhere for him to take the character. And Kubrick was either in awe of Nicholson, who was still riding the post-Oscar high from CUCKOO'S NEST, or he just didn't care, or he thought it was scary when it was actually funny. I don't know.\n\nAs if all this were not bad enough, the whole mess drags on for two hours and twenty-two minutes; this movie practically cries out for a pair of scissors.\n\nSome people will feel that I have spat on an icon, I suppose, and they have that right. But Stephen King himself was not happy with this film, and when he finally got the opportunity to re-do it as a television miniseries in 1997, the results were much better. For the one thing that is missing in Kubrick's version is a heart.\n\nAnne Rivers Siddons, in discussing her excellent horror novel THE HOUSE NEXT DOOR, writes that the thing about horror is that it smashes people and relationships. Thus the best horror stories are at bottom also very sad (Brian De Palma's CARRIE gets this; Kubrick's film does not). And whatever your feelings about the miniseries format may be, the Torrance family created in 1997 were people you could care about. Director Mick Garris understands King better than Kubrick did, and Rebecca De Mornay, in particular, redeems the Wendy character in a spectacular tour-de-force towards the end. In 1980 the Torrances were figures of fun. Rather like the barbaric Victorian custom of laughing at the lunatics in Bedlam.\n\nAwful, awful, awful.", u'-0.137286', u'\n"The Shining" is one of the most chilling and memorable horror movies I`ve seen, and I have seen a lot of horror flicks. It may not be faithful to the Stephen King book, but it still manages to have an intensely eerie tone to, even though any traces of a plot are practically absent. Jack Nicholson gives a great performance as always, and his descent into sheer madness is one of the most entertaining things about the movie, especially when he finally snaps, and turns against his own wife and son. Stanley Krubick has been called mysterious, and there is no doubt about it in this movie, almost every scene has some sort of obscurity to it, some mystery, and it forces to the viewer to feel at least a little bit frightened. Krubick is actually quite brilliant in the way he transforms almost every seemingly normal thing into something menacing, such as the snow-bound atmosphere, a set of twin girls, and even some shots of hallways and rooms gave me chills! In a critical way, "The Shining" is not a great film, there isn`t much substance, clarity or depth, but at the same time, you can`t help but be engrossed by it`s strikingly different style and effect. "The Shining" may not hold up to close fault-finding, but it`s certainly one of the most exceptional horror movies ever made.', u'0.469593', u'How this film gained such high praise and notoriety completely escapes me. I have seen hundreds of films, and this is easily the most incoherent, bland, and lifeless piece of work I can recall seeing (especailly by such a renowned filmmaker). And yes, I hated "2001: A Space Odyssey" as well. Long, drawn-out, boring, lifeless film packed full of irrelevant imagery and symbolism that amounts to a filmmaker who doesn\'t know how to tell an intelligent story with solid characters and emotions. That is the same exact problem here.\n\nFirst off, Shelley DuVall added nothing of value to the film. She was blah from beginning to end. No endearing qualities whatsoever. The whole film was a failed experiment thinking that random creepy, irrelevant images coupled with an incoherent story progression devoid of any character arcs would be successful. Kubrick had no sense of scene transitions. He shows no ability to allow one scene to flow into another, to give it fluidity or convey that he has an overall, consistent vision. The inconsistency over what aspect ratio he intended for it is further proof that he had no concrete vision, in my honest opinion. A solid, competent, talented director knows what they want, and are very confident in their visions. They have a very clear idea of how they want things viewed by every audience, everywhere. That\'s why directors and DPs hate it when their films are put into the pan-and-scan format. Kubrick also fails to have his DP shoot or light 98% of the scenes intriguingly. Watching this, it was like watching an old TV-movie - dull, uninspired, and lifeless. Yeah, the steadi-cams and dolly shots are all impressive, but sometimes, scenes seem to exist just to show off the cool camera moves they can do. Scenes which contribute absolutely nothing to the overall film, in any aspect. Being a filmmaker myself, I am of the belief that every scene should have a purpose to either the plot or characters of the film. Anything else is a waste. And beyond those steadi-cam and dolly shots, it\'s essentially bland for nearly the entire film. Almost zero interesting angles, and amateurish editing skills. Yawn inducing cinema.\n\nGood story progression would show Jack Torrance starting out as a well adjusted, happy family man that gradually descends into complete psychosis and homicidal mania. Instead, Kubrick shows him as already a man dissatisfied with his life, marriage, son, and career. Then, Kubrick just flashes a title card on the screen saying \'One Month Later,\' and Jack is already deteriorated towards the verge of madness. That\'s shoddy storytelling, and a hack\'s idea of executing a character arc. No cause is given to why he becomes a homicidal maniac. There\'s also no correlation between all the surreal, nightmarish imagery. It\'s completely random, and doesn\'t evolve into revealing a story behind its origins. All this surrealism is just an excuse for it to be labeled \'horror\' as it doesn\'t serve an underlying purpose as to why anything is happening amongst the characters. They don\'t confront, deal, or resolve the reasons or purpose behind it all. It\'s just there to make the film bizarre.\n\nNow, I don\'t mind methodically paced films as long as there\'s a purpose to it all. Any talented editor could make this a much more effective film by chopping a good 35 minutes or more out of it. Horror films require momentum to equal good pacing, and good pacing is necessary for solid tension. Still, even if there was tension and good pacing, fact is, really, there are no endearing characters in this film for me to build any sympathy for. I don\'t care what happens to them because they\'re one dimensional, emotionless, weak-willed people. How this family could even co-exist for five minutes is beyond me, let alone how they survived a more than three hour drive up to the hotel in the first place.\n\nThis film is almost complete trash because it shows the filmmakers have no intelligence or coherence for the movie they were attempting to make. There are enormously better conceived and executed films from this time that proved far more effective. If you want isolation and paranoia, check out "John Carpenter\'s The Thing." If you want surrealism, go rent Don Coscarelli\'s original "Phantasm."', u'-0.350053'], u'tt0059578': [u'\nLeone\'s \'A Fistful Of Dollars\' is a bona fide western classic, but amazingly he managed to top himself with this "sequel". Yeah, I know it isn\'t REALLY a sequel. In fact Leone\'s "Dollars" trilogy actually have no connection with each other, and Eastwood\'s so-called "Man With No Name" actually has many! (In this movie Monco, in the previous one Joe). Most people seem go for \'The Good, The Bad And The Ugly\' as the best of the three movies, but I think \'For A Few Dollars More\' just beats it. Anyway, there\'s no argument that they are three brilliant films, Eastwood is super cool in all of them, Leone is on top form, particularly in this one, and Ennio Morricone\'s scores are amazing stuff. \'For A Few Dollars More\' is helped enormously by Lee Van Cleef playing Colonel Mortimer, and the scenes between him and Eastwood, and the ones between him and Klaus Kinski are pure gold. This is not only one of the best westerns ever made, but one of the best movies of any genre released in the 1960s. It was also a highly influential one. I can\'t imagine Peckinpah\'s \'The Wild Bunch\' for example existing without Leone. Words fail me praising movies as brilliant as this one. All I can say is WATCH IT NOW. Or if you\'ve already seen it WATCH IT AGAIN!', u'0.194259', u"As the second of the three films legendary filmmaker Sergio Leone collaborated on with Clint Eastwood (not to mention his first with Lee Van Cleef and his second with 'Fistful' actor Gian Maria Volonte), For a Few Dollars More gets well earned respect from the fans of the director and the groundbreaking star. And yet, occasionally there are those who'll not even know this film from Leone and Clint exists since it does sometimes get under the shadow of their two most infamous works, Fistful of Dollars (which for the most part introduced Clint and Leone to the public's awareness) and The Good, the Bad and the Ugly (which solidified Clint as a Western icon and gave Leone a similar status for film buffs). But taken as a film unto itself, aside from its place in the trilogy, this is a Western that simply delivers the goods, and it does so with a spectacular marriage of style and substance. \n\nThe story begins by introducing our two (anti) heroes, bounty hunters Douglas Mortimer (Cleef), former Colonel, and Monco (Eastwood), a drifter. They both set their sights on the leader of a gang of bandits named Indio (Volonte), who is plotting to go after over a million locked in a bank in El Paso. At first, Monco and Mortimer seem like their after Indio for the same reason- reward money- though there seems to be more than each man counted on with him and his gang. \n\nFrom the opening scenes with Cleef and Eastwood, to the scenes in El Paso, and then into the set pieces in the stone ruins in the Mexico desert(s), For a Few Dollars More displays the utmost skill by Leone in his storytelling, as well as in his use of the camera. Using Fistful's camera-man Massimo Dallamano, Leone does what he does best in his spaghetti westerns- he creates a perfectly in sync mood with his characters: each look in a scene, whether it's intense waiting for guns to be drawn, or just regular conversation, the look of the film draws the viewer in without over-doing it. Some points are made bold or repetitious (like Ennio Morricone's score, that keeps its whistling theme and serene watch theme completely in check), though it's not done to any degree of annoyance or by accident. \n\nIn fact, that's what makes his westerns such fun, is that you take them seriously as films, yet he always reminds you that it's all in the 'movie-world' just by the way Mortimer or Monco strikes up a match. As for the actors themselves, Eastwood and Cleef are total pros in this genre, so ever line of dialog comes out naturally, and the supporting actors (however dubbed over from original Italian) all contribute great notes as well. At the least, it can appeal to a new generation of kids looking back to older movies, which may look at this and consider it more modernly crafted than a John Ford oldie. A+", u'0.574442', u'\n"For a Few Dollars More" has become the template for which most Spaghetti Westerns derive. \n\nAs Leone went along, his films got more daring and complex, exploring new ideas and raising not only the bar for Spaghetti Westerns (which, contrary to popular belief, were around before "A Fistful of Dollars") but for Westerns in general. However, this exploration at times affected the quality of his films. Leone was a popcorn director - a visual stylist who always entertained first and maybe provoked a thought or two second. However, his films were never think pieces so when he tried to integrate depth into his films the results became uneven. \n\n"For a Few Dollars More" is his best film because it catches Leone in his most transitional period. At once the film is more complex and stylized than "A Fistful..." and more tight and efficient than "The Good, the Bad and The Ugly" (which is almost on par with "For a Few..."). The revenge sub-plot involving Colonel Mortimer is more compelling than the similar one in Leone\'s "Once Upon a Time in the West" because Mortimer is more developed as a character than the Harmonica Player (which is not to insult the great Charles Bronson). \n\nAnd hell, it has Lee Van Cleef as one of the biggest bad-asses of all time. The mere presence of Colonel Douglas Mortimer elevates the film to a new level. He steals the film from "Manco" completely. And Van Cleef\'s theft of the film is what makes it a cut above "A Fistful...". As a character, "The Man With No Name" (who in actuality has three: Joe, Manco and Blondie) isn\'t very interesting and there always needs to be a counterpoint to play off of him. That\'s why "A Fistful..." isn\'t nearly as good as this film or "The Good..." (which had the great Eli Wallach in one of the best scenery munching performances ever).\n\nSo in closing, "For a Few..." is a tight masterpiece of fluff Western entertainment. It\'s mean, violent and immoral, just the way any good Spaghetti Western should be. ', u'0.0783444', u'Italian director Sergio Leone changed the face of the Western genre in 1964 when he introduced what would be known as the "Spaghetti Western" with the brilliant "Per un Pugno di Dollari" ("A Fistful of Dollars"). Not only the films looked grittier, violent and realistic; the characters in Leone\'s westerns became complex men with complex and obscure moral codes, very far away from the classic clear moral opposites of previous westerns. "Per Qualche Dollaro in pi\xf9" ("For a few dollars more"), is the epitome of all this. It is a powerful, raw and ruthless masterpiece that transcended its genre and became one of the best movies of all-time.\n\n"For a Few Dollars More", the second in the so-called "Dollars trilogy" (a group of films by Leone with the same style), is the story of two different yet very similar men, Manco (Clint Eastwood) and the Colonel Douglas Mortimer (Lee Van Cleef) are two bounty hunters who are after the criminal named "El Indio" (Gian Maria Volont\xe8). An unlikely alliance occurs between the two lone wolves as they decide to cooperate and divide the reward, but are these two killers after "Indio" for the same reason? \n\nWritten by Fulvio Morsella and Sergio Leone himself, the film\'s main characteristic is the complex moral code the main characters follow. They are no longer the perfect clean heroes of classic westerns, both Manco and the Colonel have well-developed attitudes, motivations and purposes; they are neither completely good nor completely bad, they are just real. The story unfolds with a fine pace and good rhythm, it is probably the best structured of the "Trilogy" and the easiest to follow. It is also the one that represents the elements of the Spaghetti Western style the best.\n\nStylistically, the film follows closely the conventions established by Leone\'s previous film but it takes them to the next level. The excellent use of minimalistic cinematography and the superb musical score by Ennio Morricone complement Leone\'s realistic vision of Westerns and completely redefined the genre\'s conventions. "For a Few Dollars More" is a violent tale of two hunters, and visually the film transmits the same emotions the characters feel. No more myths, the Westerns never felt this real.\n\nClint Eastwood\'s super performance as Manco is very important for the success of the film, as he is the one that takes the audience through this brave new world, however, the star of the film is Lee Van Cleef as Colonel Mortimer. In one of his best performances ever, Van Cleef manages to be both menacing and interesting, giving life to Leone\'s brilliant script with great talent. Gian Maria Volont\xe8 as Indio complements the two big talents as the crazed criminal with a dark past, he is the perfect counterpart of the two lone wolves.\n\n"Per qualche dollaro in pi\xf9" is a near flawless movie, as every piece of the puzzle falls into the right place to create a marvelous and unforgettable picture. It\'s only minor problem may be the dubbing, but fortunately, it still is superior to the one heard in other Italian productions of the same time and it doesn\'t hurt the film. \n\nFans will always argue about which of the three films of the "trilogy" is the best, and while personally I prefer "The Good, the Bad and the Ugly" over this one, it is just a matter of personal taste as this film is as perfect as that one. A real classic that changed the face of Western as we knew it. 10/10', u'0.449679', u'\nExcellent fun with sadistic humor from Leone.  Eastwood\'s best performance in a Leone film.  Van Cleef is good in a role similar to Chuck Bronson\'s in "Once Upon a Time in the West".  He is menacing and sympathetic, whereas in "The Good, the Bad, and the Ugly" he is just campy and all "bad guy" (but still fun).  What makes both performances so memorable I think is that Van Cleef seems to be in touch with Leone\'s dark humor, where Eastwood is used as a straight man.  Volonte is also excellent in the bandito role Leone used (an example of a standard European character type who reminds the audience of earthiness and the basic ignorance and greed of man).  A much better film than most people who\'ve seen it on a Saturday afternoon on TV probably realize -- you have to see these movies in the theater to get the full hit.', u'0.52613', u'\n"For a Few Dollars More" is the middle film of Sergio Leone\'s classic western trilogy starring a then upstart Clint Eastwood. Sandwiched between "A Fistful of Dollars" and the finale, "The Good, the Bad, & the Ugly."  This film provides further insight into Eastwood\'s "Man with No Name."\n\n\nEastwood is a bounty killer who is in search of the feared bandit known as El Indio. Colonel Douglas Mortimer (played by Lee Van Cleef) is in a similar position, and the two cross paths many times in their pursuits of El Indio. The premise has similarities to that of the first, and in fact won\'t be all that surprising to most younger viewers. But at the time, the various plot turns and twists were unique and revolutionary. \n\nThe pace is both a pro and con at the same time. Unlike modern films, the usual western showdown scenes unfold very deliberately. Rather than simultaneously begin and end in a furious volley of bullets, the encounters are set up slowly. On the bright side, this gives both the characters and the viewers an opportunity to fully appreciate the choices made and the consequences that will follow. From a negative perspective (not mine), one might say that the gunfights are plain slow, and the action is too sparse. While I enjoyed the change of pace, I also understand why some will say otherwise. Others portions of "More" can hang with any western sequences ever put on film. Highlighting the action is a robbery scene, the creativity of which ranks with any modern heist out of "The Score" or "The Italian Job."\n\nThis trilogy catapulted Clint Eastwood to Hollywood fame, and one can see his star-making charisma ooze through the screen. Blending stoicism and machismo wonderfully, Eastwood produces the epitome of the tough and arrogant loner cowboy. In a role that could easily have been overshadowed, Van Cleef holds his own against Eastwood. His character was probably similar to Eastwood\'s in his youth, but Van Cleef accurately reflects the wisdom that would likely come with his character\'s age. The motley crew of baddies is filled with men who completely look their parts. That\'s about all that is asked of them, and they deliver. \n\nThe cinematography of "More" follows in the groundbreaking footsteps of "Fistful." While one might not notice anything revolutionary now, at the time shots like that had scarcely been seen. Shots like the low-angles utilized prior to a few shootouts, as well as the framing of space are all now staples of cinematic westerns, and they originated here.\n\n\nEnnio Morricone\'s score is also a classic. Whether serving as epic background music for sweeping crane shots or providing aural cues during action sequences, the music is always appropriate and often the best part of the film. \n\nBottom Line: While it might not seem as great now, so much of this movie was groundbreaking and remains classic that it merits 8 of 10.', u'0.385134', u'"For A Few Dollars More" sees the return of the Stranger, the Man With No Name, but this time he has a defined profession, as a bounty hunter\x85 He is searching for a drug-addicted murderer, known as El Indio\x85 \n\nThe film opens with another bounty hunter, Colonel Mortimer (Lee Van Cleef) arriving in the town of Tucumcari and with great coolness and precision killing one of his list of wanted men as the suspect attempts to flee\x85 Mortimer then goes to the saloon where he encounters No Name, who is calmly dispatching four men at a saloon\x85 No Name walks, in a leisurely manner, to the sheriff\'s office to collect the bounty on their heads\x85 Having established their mutual aims and equal talents, the two men decide to team up in pursuit of El Indio\x85 The murderer is portrayed as infinitely more evil than the two conscience-free professionals: he has a positive relish for killing\x85\n\nEI Indio is planning to rob the bank at El Paso, so the bounty hunters meet up there in order to waylay him\x85 During the discussion that leads up to the showdown, it is revealed in flashback that Mortimer has a personal score to settle with the villain\x85 Nothing is revealed about No Name\'s past in this conversation, and typically in keeping with the characterization, No Name infiltrates El Indio\'s gang\x85 \n\nThis continuing challenge to the Western myth of the perfect hero and the irredeemably evil villain was spelled out in words at the beginning of the film: \'Where life had no value, death, sometimes, had its price.\' \n\nWithin this mayhem, Leone tried to stick to his new morality. \'I wanted to show that most heroes do what they do for money. I also wanted to prove that bad guys can sometimes have their good side. Al Capone, for instance, had a certain kind of humanity.\'', u'-0.150007', u'\n"For a Few Dollars More," the middle installment of the iconic Sergio Leone/Clint Eastwood "Dollars" trilogy, is the most brutal of all three films. Throughout the movie, ruthless bounty hunters, all of who seem to have no respect for human life, often perform cold-blooded murders. The bounty hunters use the "wild west" as a free range: they track, they kill, and they collect.\n\nOne of these bounty hunters happens to be The Man with No Name (Eastwood), who returns to us now after his introduction in "A Fistful of Dollars," which was the first movie of the trilogy. (An interesting observation is that the "man with no name" actually does have a name in each installment -- here, his name is Manco, but this is a fact that is often forgotten.)\n\nThe Man with No Name/Manco is on a mission to find the criminal Indio (Gian Maria Volont\xe9), whose capture is worth a large sum of money. It is quickly set up that local law enforcement is weak. Sheriffs are cowards. Only the vicious bounty hunters know how to drag in the criminals: dead or alive. Along for the journey is a fellow bounty hunter named Mortimer (Lee Van Cleef), whose own reasons for seeking the man differ from Manco\'s. At first, the two killers go their own separate ways, and then decide to team up together and improve their chances of finding Indio -- despite the fact that their intentions for his capture are different.\n\nNot only are the two men\'s intentions different, but also their methods. Mortimer is a ruthless, cold-blooded murderer whose self-confidence is revealed through his barbaric actions. Manco, the hero, is less of a murderer and more of a law enforcer. Leone quickly sets this up through a sequence of shots: Mortimer\'s introduction, for example, begins with his search for a criminal, which finally comes to a finish as Mortimer confronts the man (who is hiding in a brothel). His foe manages to escape through a window, leaping onto a horse and galloping away through town. The images that follow reveal an insight into Mortimer\'s own self-confidence and startlingly calm nature.\n\nManco\'s appearance is even more dramatic. He tracks down his own victim, and corners him in a saloon, only to see three cowboys appear out of nowhere and block off all exits. In one quick motion he swings around and fires three successive shots, each bullet finding its target.\n\nHere it is established that Manco is an underdog; therefore, our story\'s hero. He isn\'t as ruthless as Mortimer (who mercilessly picks his prey off from a distance) and his actions are somewhat admirable. The cowboys who tried to kill him were the bad guys. Manco was the good guy.\n\nIts lesser admirers often describe the film as being "too long". It\'s true that the film contains some unnecessary scenes, and these are often dragged out for dramatic effect -- but that is the point. The movie, directed by one of cinema\'s most ambitious and visionary directors (Sergio Leone, 1929 - 1989), is all about long passages of close-ups and wide-lense shots. Along with its predecessor and particularly its sequel, the "Dollars" trilogy revolutionized the derogatory "spaghetti western" description. In the years to come, Hollywood would actually aim to create films similar to the "Dollars" movies -- all of which were inferior. The entire "Dollars" trilogy has such scope, and ambition, that its Hollywood counterparts pale in comparison.\n\nLeone\'s direction is magnificent and would later inspire -- of all people -- Quentin Tarantino (whose "Kill Bill" movies owe something to the "Dollars" trilogy). Long, wide lenses and extreme close-ups only accentuate the fear of the men. There is a particular sequence of shots that clips back and forth between Mortimer and a wanted notice pinned to the exterior of a building. Leone slowly builds up the back-and-forth shots until they burst into a pattern of super-speed images, distinctly closed with the sound of gunshots. It\'s this sort of blazing, distinct style that makes the film so infectious and enjoyable.\n\nThe acting cannot be criticized, although the English dubbing is sometimes rather laughable. Eastwood is one of the only actors whose voice is not dubbed -- but he rarely speaks. His face does all the talking. Lee Van Cleef (who was re-cast by Leone as a separate character in "The Good, the Bad and the Ugly") manages to turn Mortimer into one of the quintessential bad guys of cinema. Although the dubbing can occasionally detract from the flow of scenes and dialogue, the two lead performances by Eastwood and Van Cleef more than compensate for this slight flaw.\n\nHollywood was cautious about releasing "Dollars." Eastwood, known for his role in the television series "Rawhide," was the only marketable star. The director was an unknown Italian with no commercial successes. As its predecessor before it, "For a Few Dollars More" was delayed release in the States, where it was deemed "unworthy."\n\nHowever, the movie was a huge success in Italy, in particular; Clint Eastwood quickly gained a cult fan base overseas, but it was not until May 1967 -- after the US release of "The Good, the Bad and the Ugly" -- that "For a Few Dollars More" and its predecessor would open to critical accolade and deserved celebration in the United States. Now, almost forty years later, it\'s still a fascinating piece of classic cinema.', u'-0.23429', u"This movie is the second best western i have ever seen with The Good, The Bad, The Ugly being first. I disagree with someone who wrote that this movie is not as good as A Fistful of Dollars. This movie is way better than a fistful of dollars. The reason is (as i pointed out in my other post) is that Clint's role or character is better when he has a good supporting member because it gives Clint's character more depth as well as throw a wild card into the mix. Lee van clef is excellent in his role, i still have him labeled as the bad but it was surprising to see him play a good guy in this one. Both bounty hunters have their own styles which meshes really good on the screen. Gian had more depth to this one which played perfectly into Lee Van Clefs character. In a fistful of dollars Gian didn't have much depth at all and some of the characters were annoying. I like how leone tied all of the characters into each other in this one, having all of their stories somehow play a role in the other ones. If you haven't seen this movie i suggest you watch Leone's films in chronological order with A fistful of dollars first, this one second, and finish it off with the good the bad the ugly. You'll be glad you did.", u'0.0506613', u'\nOne of my favorite movie lines of all time as spoken by Klaus Kinski upon recognizing Lee Van Cleef in the little cantina as the one who used his (Klaus\') cheek to strike his match earlier in the movie.  When Kinski ask if he "remember me, amigo," Van Cleef just reply "uh uh."  To which he\'s asked to try that trick again, which prompts Van Cleef to utter another one of my all time lines - "I generally don\'t smoke \'til after I\'ve eaten; why don\'t you come back in five minutes."  Just typing this brings smiles to my face. I\'ve been a Lee Van Cleef fan since High Noon (with Robert Wilke) and Kansas City Confidential (with Jack Elam and Neville Brand!) and this was/is the movie that made him a star.  Granted it didn\'t last for long, but he did have his 15 minutes.  This is my favorite Spaghetti Western, it was also my first (didn\'t see "Fistful" until much later - and Good, Bad, Ugly was a major disappointment - I wanted Van Cleef to play the same role).  And the music, especially the pipe organ, just blows my mind.  Highly enjoyable; think I\'ll go and watch it again.', u'-0.0840105', u'\nWithout doubt among the best of the western genre, Clint Eastwood and Sergio Leone\'s Man With No Name trilogy, the unofficial launch of the "spaggetti western" subgenre, rewrote the rules, using the intangibles of cinematography, Ennio Morricone\'s haunting scores, and settings to extract engaging storytelling despite the less-than-flawless dubbing of character voices and the cheesy sound effects (the overused gunshot sound is straight out of Warner Brothers cartoons).  Combined with exciting shootouts, Leone\'s trilogy made movie history and remains compelling cinema.\n\nArguably the best of the Leone trilogy is this second installment, a sequel to A Fistful of Dollars.  Contrary to the nickname, Clint Eastwood\'s character does indeed have a name - identified as Joe in Fistful, here he is identified as Monco.  And he also has an equally ruthless and skilled rival in Colonel Douglas Mortimer (Lee Van Cleef in his finest performance).  Indeed, the theme of the film is the rivalry of the two bounty hunters turning to mutual respect and eventually to teamwork, shown in the climatic showdown with the villianous Indio, a brutal killer (perhaps a bit too brutal for the film\'s own good) with whom Mortimer has a score to settle, a score that becomes clear in the haunting chimes of the watches owned by both Mortimer and Indio.  \n\nPairing Eastwood and Van Cleef was a good idea even before shooting began, and pairing Joe Monco (The Man With No Name) with Douglas Mortimer proves it with the superb chemistry between the two bounty killers, a chemistry that elevates an engaging story to true masterwork.', u'0.428097', u'\n****Excellent\n\n***Good\n\n**Fair\n\n*Poor\n\n\nMy teacher once said that when you\'re starting your career it\'s great to imitate someone just as practice or to gain experience because if you can be as good as them you could be better! And that\'s exactly what happened to Sergio Leone. \n\nAfter the success of A Fistful of Dollars a sequel was underway and that gave Leone and Eastwood the opportunity to make this character into there own. Here Eastwood is a bounty hunter not a simple gunfighter like in the original. He teams up with another bounty hunter played by Lee Van Cleef who both are after Indio for two different reasons. \n\nIn this film Leone emerges as an artist. When this film was released times were changing. The new and old generation were in a battle. The vietnam war had just begun and hippies were taking over the country. By pairing the characters of Eastwood and Van Cleef there was bound to be conflicts.\n\n"They usually end up shooting themselves in the back."\n\nFrom their partnership they understood and learned from each other. Meaning there is something new to be learned from each generation.\n\nRATING: 4 STARS', u'0.34498', u"Completely defying the tried & tested Hollywood formula and introducing his own style of narration that was more character driven, glamorized violence & also added a new dimension of moral ambiguity into its characters' psyche, thus bringing both heroes & villains very much on the same level, Sergio Leone presented a whole new outlook of the Wild West in A Fistful of Dollars but with this second chapter, he further accelerates the inevitable rebirth of the western genre.\n\nThe second installment of Leone's Dollars trilogy is quite an improvement over its predecessor in almost all departments of filmmaking & gradually portrays the developing maturity in Leone's craftsmanship. Starring Clint Eastwood as a bounty hunter looking for a number of wanted suspects, who later partners with another bounty hunter looking for the same guys & make a deal of splitting the reward but in the end when it comes down to final showdown, one of them shows their real motive behind the hunt.\n\nFeaturing an improved direction from Sergio Leone, For A Few Dollars More presents the director in more control of his artistry & has a much stronger script to muster ahead with. The scope of camera-work, the precision of editing & overall production design also get their upgrades plus the performances from the recurring cast turn out to be better than the previous film with Clint Eastwood & new addition of Lee Van Cleef impressing the most.\n\nOn an overall scale, For A Few Dollars More is another huge step towards placing the coffin on traditional westerns & presents a significant evolution of every single aspect of its making when compared with A Fistful of Dollars. Ennio Morricone's music also leaves a bigger mark than before & it's exciting to observe how seamlessly it accompanies the drama. A rare sequel that improves upon the original, For A Few Dollars More is absolutely recommended.", u'0.696586', u'This is the second movie in Sergio Leone\'s trilogy, sandwiched between "For a Fistful of Dollars" and the classic "The Good, The Bad and The Ugly"...Eastwood (Man with No Name) and Lee Van Cleef (Colonel Douglas Mortimer) are two bounty killers who eventually team up to go after Indio and his gang of bandits...\n\nIf you don\'t like Spaghetti Westerns or don\'t "get" Spaghetti Westerns, then this movie is NOT for you, but if you do, there are many great lines, great scenes and great showdowns in "For a Few Dollars More"...And the best part of this movie, as is with most Leone movies, is the music by Ennio Morricone...\n\nThe scores from this movie, "The Good, The Bad and The Ugly" and "Once Upon a Time in The West" are three of Morricone\'s best (in my humble opinion) and music from the soundtrack of "A Few Dollars More" can be found on a cd called "The Legendary Italian Western Volume 2", by Ennio Morricone, where there are 31 tracks from several movies...Or there are many, many other cds where you can find spaghetti western music, just do a search on "Ennio Morricone, spaghetti western music"...', u'0.165322', u"Exceptional performances by three heavyweight actors, Gian Maria Volonte and Lee Van Cleef - both of whom, it's a shame, did not have all that many more opportunities to shine in quality films after this one - and Clint Eastwood, along with taut direction, editing, cinematography and gripping and unique music (by the great Ennio Morricone), make this movie a real standout. (The music's almost a major character in this film, in fact.) Stylistically iconic, this Sergio Leone opus has an endlessly fascinating and spellbinding story that surprises to the end. Plus, we really come to like the co-heroes, Van Cleef and Eastwood - we want to befriend them and emulate them. Volonte was priceless as a demonic villain - his facial expressions rich with narcissism and a strange kind of violence-fueled euphoria no one else has ever matched in film history, for my money. Though he clashed with director Leone and purportedly did not like the Western genre, Volonte's performance rises above the film's genre and could be favorably compared to the best portrayed villains of other more mainstream movies. Volonte brought a realism to his character and an intensity you don't see in many films. But so did Van Cleef, whose work in this film is incredible. You'd have thought other movie makers would have rushed to cast Van Cleef in important roles after this film, but no. Very strange. Though some might question the wanton violence in this film, the truth is that the real wild west was even more violent and the violence often much more capricious and random. Like all great artistic works, this film never grows old for me. I am always drawn to watch it again and again for it is of such a depth and complexity that it only reveals more of itself with each viewing.", u'0.329633'], u'tt0040522': [u'This movie changed my life. It changed it in the sense that after seeing it I developed a life-long passion for Italian films after first seeing it in 1955 when it appeared at a local movie theatre in a revival five years or so after its original appearance. I was only 13 at the time and somewhat of a precocious chooser of what films to go see. I have seen THE BICYCLE THIEF ("Bicycle Thieves" in England and plural as well in its original Italian title) hundreds of times since and never tire of it. The fact that the film has almost never been out of circulation since its making and is constantly shown in revivals, festivals and film classes attests to its endurance. Martin Scorsese does a glorious appreciation of it in his documentary on the Italian cinema, IL MIO VIAGGIO IN ITALIA. \n\nWhat makes it so enduring? What is so damn great about the movie? It is not its trenchant portrayal of post-war Italian poverty and misery. Lots of films did that even better. It is not in any sense of real drama, which is very schematic. Nor even the unforgettably truthful acting, that iconic face of pint-sized Enzo Staiola. We get truthful acting and iconic faces all over the place. It is, I believe, its sense of compassion, its sense of poetry. Those are rarer qualities. The movie is compassionate poetry. I don\'t know if writer Cesare Zavattini or director Vittorio De Sica would have appreciated that phrase. I feel they might have. I feel it is exactly the truth they were after. To be sure, the film is a story of father and little-boy in search of what is lost, a necessity yes, but also a lost dream. The endangered hope for a better life to come challenges this paternal/filial relationship. In that sense, this is a film-poem, God help me, about Everyfather and Everylittleboy. \n\nThe most chilling moment in the poem occurs when little Bruno sees his father steal, and a tearful horror glazes his face as a god seems to collapse. The most redemptive moment comes shortly thereafter when the boy slips his hand into his father\'s. That forgiveness is not cheap or facile. It is unassailable and all-comforting. It is a forgiving embrace of Virgilian dignity. For a magnificent instant the father, Antonio, has become the son; Bruno, the son, has become the father. At the end, when they walk off into the Roman crowd, they are as one. \n\nI have written many thoughts about this film over the years, including an extended exegesis for a local newspaper. I have programmed it in film series, shown it to film classes, Italian classes. I know the movie. Friends, the movie is not about stolen bicycles, indifferent police, bicycle chop-shop gargoyles, mouth-foaming lowlife, desperate actions by the desperate, or mere journalistic human interest that is gone with tomorrow\'s edition. Its worth resides in its lyric portrayal of the eternal curative power of love. No small thing.\n\nTwo addenda: the song being rehearsed at the workers\' club Antonio visits to see his friend is called "Ciccio Formaggio." The song being sung and played by the restaurant musicians when Antonio and his son eat together is "Tummuriata nera," about the mulatto offspring of an Italian woman and a black soldier. The lyrics for both songs, in Neapolitan dialect, can be found by Googling the titles. Recordings by Roberto Murolo of both songs are available.', u'0.20013', u'\nIn post-World War II Italy poverty is a dire reality for a large portion of the population. Work is scarce and the opportunities for employment are few and far between. "Ladri Di Biciclette" (translated "The Bicycle Thief") is quietly one of the finest films ever produced. It follows one economically distraught man (Lamberto Maggiorani) who is heading down a desperate path fast. Things look up when he gets a job putting posters on walls in town, but he must sell what few meager possessions he and his family have to buy a bicycle to uphold his end of the business bargain. Naturally tragedy strikes immediately as the title character shows up the very first day Maggiorani is on the job. The police are little help, believing the bicycle is not as important as it really is. Thus Maggiorani and young son Enzo Staiola take it upon themselves to look all over town to try and find the bicycle and bring the thief to justice. "The Bicycle Thief" was originally released in 1948 and won an Honorary Academy Award for Best Foreign Language film the following year (the movie was not released in the U.S. until 1949). It is still a production that strikes deep even today. The lengths and desperate measures that some go through is very evident here. Director Vittorio De Sica crafts a film that is much deeper than it appears on the surface. It examines the human condition and questions society, family, law enforcement, alliances and mental anguish perfectly. "The Bicycle Thief" is an excellent production that has aged well and allows the viewer to think about many subjects that go beyond ordinary cinematic depths. 5 stars out of 5.\n', u'0.106785', u'\nThe Italian neo-realist film movement began around the end of WWII with Roberto Rossellini\'s OPEN CITY in 1946.  It is defined and encapsulated by this striking film directed by Vittorio De Sica.  THE BICYCLE THIEF is the best of a group of films that depicted the hardship and despair that Europeans, specifically Italians, went through after the death and destruction of the war.  The economy was horrible, and the towns and cities were half-destroyed and decaying.  Rome is the location for THE BICYCLE THIEF and De Sica shoots the city in grainy black and white with non-professional actors to get a simple, yet unbearingly emotional point across.  A simple thing such as a bike can be someone\'s entire world at that time and losing it means doing something irrational or perhaps necessary.\n\nThe lead in the film is played by Lamberto Maggiorani who seems to be a very good actor.  He is not an actor, however, and maybe this is why the film hits its mark so well and comes across so realistically.  Maggiorani is of this difficult world and his brooding face is a clear indication of this. His job is to plaster film posters up on the walls of buildings all over Rome.  He even hangs a picture that symbolizes the absolute opposite of the misery surrounding him.  Rita Hayworth from GILDA is on the walls all over the city, a sign of joy to some, a representation of their own lowly status to others.\n\nWhen the bicycle is actually stolen, the "title" character is sought after by Maggiorani and his young son (Enzo Staiola), a little kid with so much acting ability, you swear this must be a documentary.  A grueling search throughout Rome has the essential parts of the movie, because we see up close the actual people and places the neo-realist film movement came to represent.  It is a small, sad world they live in and the bike has to be found so that they can live.  The father is put to the ultimate test in front of his son.  Will he do the honorable thing or will he do what his mind and heart know is only possible? These are the tense moments of the film\'s climax.\n\nThere is a lot of THE BICYCLE THIEF in Benigni\'s LIFE IS BEAUTIFUL and some obvious comparisons have been drawn because of the father-son relationship. They are worthy of comparison and have equal artistic prowess.  What is different about THIEF is the level of intensity maintained throughout.  I felt the key element was the music by Alessandro Cicognini, a simple horn that plays so tragically that it is a main character in the picture.  What De Sica does here, as well as other neo-realist directors (Rossellini, Fellini), is create for American audiences a powerful counterpoint to what we are used to.  An honest, non-corporate portrait of the struggle for life and self-respect.  THE BICYCLE THIEF is one of the finest films ever made.\n\nRATING: 10 of 10 ', u'0.175871', u"Vittorio De Sica's ground/heartbreaking motion picture, The Bicycle Thief, is based on a very simple ideal for a story- man against the elements. In this case the elements are of a society that is often cruel and unforgiving, and that a job in post-war Rome is looked on as the luckiest of good luck charms.\n\nSuch a man as presented by De Sica is Maggiorani (an actor who really is the type of actor right off the street), a father of a little boy who gets a job putting up movie posters along some walls in Rome. To do this he needs a bicycle, or the job will be lost, and he gets one following a pawning of linen sheets. Very soon though, the bicycle is stolen, and from there a sad downward spiral unravels for the man and his son as they scour the streets for the bicycle. \n\nWhile the score adds basic dramatic tension, everything else on the screen is done to such a pitch of neo-realism it's at times shattering, joyful (scene in the pizzeria the most note-worthy), and with a feeling of day-to-day resonance to those who may have not even felt at or below the poverty level in their lives. Credit due to all parties involved, though I don't think the boy Bruno, played by Staiola, gets nearly enough considering his role as a minor coming of age (that moment after the father and son leave the church nearly brought tears to my eyes). A++", u'0.355144', u"\nIt is post-war Rome and much of the city's residents are impoverished and desperate for work.  One man named Ricci who haunts the job lines day after day to provide for his wife and two children, when suddenly his name is called for a well-paying city job.  The only catch is that he needs a bicycle for the job, and he has just pawned his bicycle in order to feed his family.  Thus begins `The Bicycle Thief', Vittorio de Sica's gritty study in realism.  Ricci and his wife sell the sheets off of their beds to get the bicycle back, only to have the bicycle stolen on his first day on the job.  In order to keep the job, he and his young son walk around Rome, desperate to find the thief, and more importantly, the bicycle before his next day of work.  \n\nde Sica chose non-actors to portray the characters in the film, favoring a further realistic vision by casting amateurs.  The result is remarkable, because the pain and emotions conveyed are so true.  The relationship between father and son is also compelling and endearing, in that for the most part, Ricci treats his son as an equal, letting him in on his innermost thoughts and fears, until the end, when a particular event causes him to be ashamed, and the roles become defined once again.  \n\n`The Bicycle Thief' personifies the refreshing fact that European cinema was more daring and also true in their reaction to post-war life.  While America was trying to paint a heavy coat of rosy paint on the times by churning out the saccharine MGM musicals by the dozen, Europe was showing that the effects of a war fought on their home turf did not inspire moments of spontaneously breaking into song, or a choreographed dance number, rather life pretty much sucked, but survival, as difficult and ugly as it can be, is most important.  `The Bicycle Thief' has been a critical favorite for decades, and for good reason.  It is a must-see film for any cinephile.\n\n--Shelly\n", u'0.341624', u'....is the relationship of the father and son. \n\nWatch the film with your focus on the son, not the father. Watch what happens to the boy, what he sees, how he is influenced, his point of view. The father is so preoccupied with the bicycle he fails to see what is happening to his son. This is the strength of the film. Watch the boy.', u'0.0569671', u'Don\'t get me wrong, I have nothing against Lord of the Rings and I respect people\'s right to obsess over whatever they wish. Nonetheless, it does often irritate the cynic in me that we\'re teaching a generation of kids that there is a distinct borderline between \'good\' and \'evil\', between \'justice\' and \'injustice\', that there exists such a thing as a \'hero\', when in reality there is actually nothing of the sort.\n\nLadri di Biciclette is a shining example of a film that demonstrates this fact. There is no distinction between the \'good guys\' and the \'bad guys\'. At times we support one character, or the others. But there is never a line drawn between one side or the other because in reality, the only people we see here are simply human - flawed, corruptible and in this case, all suffering the same tragic fate. Our central character Antonio is obviously the protagonist, and he is obviously portrayed in such a way that our sympathies lie with him, but he is far from being a hero. He is simply used as the representation of the tragic misfortune that can befall mankind. This misfortune, also, is not depicted in any black-and-white sense. Antonio and his family\'s plight is not the only, or even necessarily the most desperate, in this film. In fact, with the exception of the family in the restaurant scene, practically every single character, major or minor, is portrayed as suffering in some way at the hands of capitalism.\n\nTherefore, as obviously tragic as Antonio\'s story is, the only real reason we side with him is because his particular tragedy is centrally focused. But, as has been discussed so often previously, he is an Everyman character. The bicycle in the film is simply used as an analogy for the loss, or lack of any essential element of life that leads to poverty and suffering. In very simple terms, the film\'s message is essentially that at some stage in life, we are all shouting "Give me back my bicycle!" \n\nBut I digress. This simplistic and amateurish film is far more real and far more true-to-life than practically anything that Hollywood has churned out in the past fifty years. For that reason, the realist in me believes that all those dreamers, people who believe in a happy ending or ideal status quo, could do with the sort of down-to-earth lesson that this film represents.\n\nYes, it\'s a distressing and bleak vision. But nevertheless, an utterly profound one.', u'-0.0913941', u"\nThe Bicycle Thief is without a doubt De Sica's masterpiece of Italian neorealism filmmaking. It is a true landmark in cinema history.\n\nA man who has been unemployed for months is finally given a chance at a job putting up posters. He and his family have been living in poverty for months, and are very exited to hear the news. The only requirement for the job is a bicycle. His wife pawns the sheets off of their own bed in order to buy the bicycle. And, as you can tell from the title, it is stolen on his first day of work. Now, without it, he and his son search the crowded streets of Rome for the only thing that can give him back his dignity as a man.\n\nThis is a simple, but very powerful film and I found the relationship between Bruno and his father especially touching. The final scene is a true captivating moment as Bruno witnesses the true nature of man and the world we have created for ourselves.\n\nDon't miss this film, to call it a classic would be an understatement.", u'0.493197', u'A film of real life, real emotions, real people. Bicycle Thieves was a \r film like no other because it was made like no other. With non actors, \r natural light, filmed on locations, the film captured the truth of \r Neorealism. The film is made up of a series of "small moments." The \r fact is, the entire movie is made up of pureness. It tackles issues of \r class, politics, and post war activities. Overall, the film is about \r life and hope. The unhappy ending only makes the film more real. If you \r are a son who loved his father and understood who he was and why he was \r the way he was........watch this movie.', u'0.191695', u'Semantically speaking, self-realization is a probable prelude to catharsis, but at a much higher echelon of cognition the two become virtually inseparable as attaining the former would automatically yield the latter. At this threshold of enlightenment, human spirit attains a sense of ephemeral divinity that would either drive the human crazy or would lead him to salvation. This enlightenment can seldom be attained through vicarious means. Even cinema, with its unparalleled potential to stimulate and satiate, mostly falls short of being cathartic, and only in the rarest of the rare cases does it manage to accomplish the incredible and the extraordinary. Undoubtedly, Bicycle Thieves is one such rare moment of triumph, wherein cinema becomes not only the tool but also the medium for the viewer to attain eternal salvation. \n\nBicycle Thieves is an Italian neo-realist film by Vittorio De Sica. Neo- realism, a naturalistic movement in Italian cinema of the 1940s, aimed at giving cinema a new degree of realism, which promoted the use of an amateur cast vis-\xe0-vis a professionally trained one and advocated shooting at real locations instead of the custom-built sets & studios. Keeping up with the spirit of the movement, Vittorio De Sica chose a factory fitter who had brought his son along for an audition as his male lead. His lead actress was a journalist who had approached him for an interview, while the young boy was filled by a child spotted in the crowd watching the filming. \n\nBicycle Thieves tells the story of a poor worker searching the streets of Rome for his stolen bicycle, which he needs to keep his job intact. The movie is an amalgam of contrasting human feelings of hope & despair, sacrifice & gratification, euphoria & melancholy, love & detestation, and malice & benevolence. Bicycle Thieves performs the central function of art, which is to discover the meaning of life. The movie brilliantly handles with utmost care and precision the tender and often painful relationship that universally exists between a father and a son. The later half of the movie presents cinema at its most vivid, vituperative and volatile culminating in one of the most impactful, melancholic and brutally humanistic finales ever filmed in cinematic history, the agony of which would keep the viewer contemplating for weeks, months, or even years. \n\nThe screenplay is simplistic, thought-provoking and at times nakedly brutal, while the cinematography is so effortless and magnificently beautiful that it appears as though a soul of a man has been filmed, and its true essence has been captured and preserved. The poignancy of the background score casts such a sustained spell that the movie experience is enhanced beyond imagination. American playwright Arthur Miller called it a lyrical masterpiece as it examines openly the destructive and draconian world man has made for himself. Marlon Brando once said, "Bicycle Thieves is the perfect example of what can be done in front of the motion picture camera and is so rarely done". Academy winner, Henry Fonda was so moved by the movie that he was tempted to write Vittorio De Sica a fan letter. The film is frequently on critics\' and directors\' lists of the best films ever made. It has captured every honor that the world of film can bestow including an Academy Honorary Award in 1950.\n\nAll these accolades and the ubiquitous acclaim cannot describe the actual experience of seeing this film and becoming a part of its emotional impact. It makes the viewer laugh, cry and experience a rainbow of emotions. Bicycle Thieves has withstood the test of time for over six decades, and is a film for anyone and everyone.\n\nPS. It is a cinematic magnum opus, which accentuates the true might of cinema, and is a must for everyone, irrespective of cast, color, creed or gender. It\'s an ageless cinema for people of all age groups. 10/10\n\nhttp://www.apotpourriofvestiges.com/', u'0.581989', u'Even if you are merely a moderate fan of cinema you will have at least heard of this film. It has been hailed as a masterpiece for just short of sixty years and has been routinely studied in film classes everywhere. In a sense, it is one of the recognized masterpieces of cinema. And yet, this is not a film in which to pick up obviously great shots like the 360 degree shot in the hotel room in "Vertigo" or cuts as good as the jump cut in "2001: A Space Odyssey" with which Kubrick transports you from prehistoric ages to an age in which space travel is common in barely a second. This is a subtle, realistic film, and though it looks terrific, it is not flashy. It exists not to excel technically or tell the story of humanity, but simply to tell a story. A simple story which may say more about human nature than any other film in existence.\n\n"Bicycle Thieves" is about a man in economically depressed post-World War II Italy who is lucky enough to find a job which requires him to use a bicycle as transportation while putting up posters around the city. It\'s relatively well-paying and almost too good to believe for his family. While on the job his bicycle is stolen, and the rest of the movie tells the story of him and his son attempting to recover the bicycle. \n\nIn the magnificent final scene Antonio Ricci (the lead character) finds himself tempted to steal a bicycle in order to be able to perform his job. Here we have our \'hero\' thinking about doing to someone else what was done to him. There is no black and white in the world, no good and evil. This film does a great job of stating that fact without moralizing and preaching like so many modern films do. This film does not insult your intelligence and I pity those who wanted a third act, or those who wanted more explanation. This film is beautiful and brilliant because it is completely understated. It\'s realistic. We feel Ricci\'s desperation and are transported into 1940\'s Rome as he makes his way through the city\'s crowded streets, alleyways, churches and brothels.\n\nI have no idea how much this film cost to make, but I would be surprised if it was made on a low budget. The location shooting throughout the city is impressive, as is the (again) understated cinematography. De Sica cast non-actors in the lead roles, and I find their performances to be among the most realistic and effective I\'ve ever seen. Alessandro Cigognini\'s score is a highlight of the film, and I consider the melancholy main theme one of the greatest musical cues I\'ve heard in any film.\n\nI enjoy theatricality as much as anyone and I certainly don\'t dislike Hollywood gloss, but "Bicycle Thieves" serves as a jarring reminder of how great a medium film can be. The jarring effect the film had on audiences upon its release (in particular American audiences) is easy to understand viewing the film in 2007 and it escapes my comprehension how anyone can\'t be completely captivated and enthralled by this masterwork.\n\n****/4', u'0.410774', u"Some films try to explain multiple aspects of a story or a character by showing several episodes from the character's life. Vittorio De Sica's masterful The Bicycle Thief relies on the power of simplicity to drive home its point. It is a very simple film, relying on film making at its basics. There are no professional actors for us to identify with, but there are plot lines, emotions, and thoughts that no one can help but relate to. Antonio Ricci (Lamberto Maggiorani) has been waiting for a job, but when one finally arrives, he must obtain a bicycle in order to be able to accept the position. His loving and caring wife, Maria (Lianella Carell), hocks the bed sheets in order to be able to afford a bicycle for Antonio. He reports to work as a poster hanger, but while on the job for only a short time, the bike is stolen by a young thief (Vittorio Antonucci). Desperate to get the vehicle back, Antonio seeks the aid of his friend, Baiocco (Gino Saltamerenda), and also receives the help of his devoted son, Bruno (Enzo Staiola). Bruno stays by Antonio's side, no matter what, determined to help his father get back the stolen property. It is a frustrating journey for the father and son, as they receive no help, except that of Baiocco. It seems that no matter what they do, Antonio is left with a fateful decision (shown in one of the most brutally honest scenes in any movie I've ever seen). He must ask himself just how far would he go to put food on the table for his family that he loves so much? There has been controversy over the ending of the film, which I am not going to go into, because it would be cheating you out of a brilliant ending to an extraordinary picture. However, I will say this much - When viewing The Bicycle Thief, ask yourself what you would do in Antonio's situation. What choices would you make? Some of the questions that rise from this film are some of the questions that help us to define ourselves as people, and the fact that this film provides such a clear and honest representation of so many facts of life is what makes it an undeniable masterpiece! This is a film to be cherished!", u'0.320759', u'\nThere\'s not much that can be said about "The Bicycle Thief" that hasn\'t already been expressed. It is considered a great work of the Italian cinema, and looking at it in its 1999 release version, one can see why.\n\n\nStructurally, it\'s a theme and variations, with such a simple, clearly stated main motif that one can identify and follow its mutations with no effort.  DeSica is clearly the fine craftsman here, directing every scene with a beautiful sense of control and balance. \n\nHis work with young Enzo Staiola (as Bruno) is especially commendable, and he allows then nonprofessionals Lamberto Maggiorani (as Antonio) and Lianella Carell (as Marie) to act in a model of naturalism. \n\n\nCarlo Montuori\'s photography is brilliant, and Antonio Traverso\'s production design is pungent and atmospheric. Like most "masterpieces," a film-classic score provides emotional depth in a subliminal way: here it\'s a romantic, Italianesque original composition by Aessandro Cicognini wraps up the entire production.\n\nDeSica\'s career is most impressive, being involved in nealy 200 films, 165 of them as an actor. This film remains one of his greatest achievements.  It seems to be standing the test of time very nicely, too.  It\'s been criticized, sometimes quite severely, and just continues to bounce back, winning new admirers with each reissue.  The public just won\'t let "The Bicycle Thief" fade away. That alone tends to override any negative factors. It looks like this film is going to be around for quite a while. ###\n', u'0.299947', u'\nWhen I first saw "Ladri di Biciclette" I was still infatuated with the idea that all the known movie masterpieces must be regarded as untouchable ideals, that the film is definitely "good" ->end of story! But while I was watching the movie("Ladri di Biciclette") the true sensibility of the characters and of the shooting technique astonished me! The plot is simple but touching, the actors react naturally. Although the times they are living are awful, Antonio and Bruno lift themselves over the daily cares (they do have strong characters) and the father and son relationship is more than believable!!! I\'ve never seen actors understanding each other better, and I don\'t mean it on a stage level! The looks on their faces when they should cry, but they don\'t, the famous take when father and son are standing on the sidewalk one thinking about the other, and what is left to be done! But what is most touching is the scene from the end, when Bruno\'s look actually saves his father from prison. The man who\'s bike was stolen shows that some people are human even in the darkest of times.\n\nThis is movie to be seen, a movie that will make you wonder about the boundaries of humanity, the power of a character and even dare you to think of the mistakes that society makes you commit in order to survive!!!\n', u'0.564305', u'\nItalian Neorealism has always  been one of my favorite film  movements, and The Bicycle Thief  appears to be one the finest  examples of this medium. While  people today might not understand  the power in the story, one has to  understand the nature state of Italy  after World War II. The country was  in ruins, and finding a good job was  difficult. Desperation took over more  often than reason, and this leads to  the eventual climax of self pity and  remorse. Quite a powerful film, for  it is the only foreign film I have on  my personal Top 25 list.', u'0.120096'], u'tt0053125': [u'\nFor Christmas this year, I received my first to-own DVD: Hitchcock\'s classic, NORTH BY NORTHWEST. After over 40 years, this rip-racing adventure-thriller still packs a punch and looks great on widescreen. This movie came along during a renaissance period for the Old Master, between masterpieces like VERTIGO and PSYCHO, but this excursion into the world of suspense is so different from anything else Hitchcock had created up to that point. Never did he challenge our endurance to keep still in our seats for such a long period of time, and yet the film\'s 135 minutes go by so fast it could only be explained by movie magic itself.\n\nCary Grant is one of those actors that a filmgoer either falls in love with or deeply envies. His debonair manner is displayed to the full in this film, even though the peril that his character goes through would cause any normal dude to break into a maddening sweat.  The dialogue Roger Thornhill delivers alongside Eve Kendall (Eva Marie Saint) in this film is sometimes too hilarious to be true, but wouldn\'t any woman fall for it? (I\'m merely guessing here)  Ernest Lehman\'s screenplay is so lighthearted and yet very ominous. With all the traps and pitfalls Grant goes through in this film, you would have to find comedy in it. Grant does and to great appeal. I absolutely love the sequence at the auction when Roger tries to get himself arrested by yelling out flaky bids and accusing the auctioneer of selling junk worth no more than $8.  I also admire the scenes with Saint on the train to Chicago; I was tempted to jot down some of his pick-up lines, but then I realized it\'s just a movie (or is it?)\n\nHitchcock was famous throughout his career of setting up death-defying sequences with major landmarks as backdrops. Here, Mount Rushmore will never be looked at the same again afterwards. We may never enter the United Nations again without peering behind our backs for a notorious knife-thrower. And, I dare say, I will never walk alongside a highway where a cropduster could swoop at any minute. I love the line during the Rushmore incident when Grant says his two ex-wives left him because he lived too dull a life. Go figure!\n\nIt has been said that Hitchcock\'s many films each contain a personal side of the director inside them. The archetypes of the Master of Suspense are here amid the chasing and running across the U.S. The mysterious blonde, played to a tee by Eva Marie Saint, is a common fixture of many Hitchcock jaunts. Saint joins Grace Kelly and Tippi Hedren in this feature. The protagonist is again awkward when faced with  the opposite sex, but unusually casual when wrapped up in danger. The hero has an attachment to his mother, continually under his nurturing wing. And of course, the macguffin has fun with us again (government secrets my foot!)\n\nWhenever I see action-packed epics today like "The Fugitive" or the James Bond series, they all seem to quiver in comparison to this film. It amazes me that Hitchcock is able to hold the audience in the palm of his hand throughout the whole length of the journey. We become Grant as he runs away from the police and the secret agents who have chosen him as their dupe. But throughout the squabble, we sense that Grant is getting off on the whole jaunt, just as we want the chase to continue, not looking at our watches for a minute. However, it\'s fascinating to note that Roger Thornhill is not a born adventurer, nor is he an archeologist with a flair for escaping impossible situations. We are experiencing the Cary Grant in all of us, running away from an enemy we do not know they are or what they want. Is this symbolism of some kind? I say who cares; just watch the film and have fun! ', u'0.26245', u'VERTIGO did nothing to advance Hitchcock\'s career in 1957 when he released it, and it\'s actually not a shame: the following year he decided to go completely against the slow-moving erotic thriller genre and do something shamelessly commercial, escapist and single-handedly create the spy movie. Ian Fleming, author of the James Bond novels, states he based his character on the physical characteristics and the suave personality of Cary Grant, as an added note. This could well amount to be the first James Bond film -- a dangerous villain complete with a sidekick, an alluring woman with a dubious nature and an enigmatic "boss," a dashing hero, lush locales setting the scene for powerful chases and escalating danger.\n\nNORTH BY NORTHWEST has one crucial difference to any James Bond film, though: Alfred Hitchcock. While the Bond films have been seen as quintessential action fluff (although fluff of the better kind until the franchise ran out of gas in the 80s), Hitchcock, always the master of subtext as well as suspense, creates memorable scenes that balance sexual tension, sexual innuendo, comedy, and mounting suspense seamlessly. There is never the feeling of being bored as there is too much going on, especially with the sizzling chemistry of Eva Marie Saint and Cary Grant, by now a Hitchcock veteran. When they\'re on screen, dialog crackles and so much more is said with so little gesture -- she closes the lid on her Ice Goddess role, but gives it a nice, cheeky, knowing wink. He of course evolves from the sort of man who while looking and being slightly clumsy and under his mother\'s thumb -- once it becomes clear he\'s been marked and is a target for a sinister plot that only later becomes clear -- becomes more assertive in taking matters into his own hands. A quintessential Hitchcock Everyman, Grant has his stamp all over his role. No one can imagine anyone else running away from that crop duster in one of the movies many standout sequences, or saying the reassuring last words to Eva Marie Saint as they cuddle together in the train. When one thinks of NORTH BY NORTHWEST, one thinks Cary Grant.\n\nEasily one of Hitchcock\'s best films, made while he was at the peak of his career in the bracket formed with THE MAN WHO KNEW TOO MUCH and MARNIE. Great supporting performances are all over the map, from Jesse Royce Landis as Grant\'s mother, James Mason as Phillip Vandamm, Martin Landau as Vandamm\'s prot\xe9g\xe9e who might be a little more than that, and Leo G Carroll as The Professor. Doreen Lang appears early in the movie as Grant\'s secretary; she would of course be remembered as the woman who shrieks at Tippi Hedren in THE BIRDS and gets slapped by her as the camera holds itself tight on her face.', u'0.611145', u'\nIts Hitch\'s most briskly entertaining movie, and one of his most comic, adventure-caper type movies, largely thanks to the persona of Cary Grant. But its also one of his most suspenseful - in the fact that Grant is being recognised as someone else, and that he may be put in jail for someone else\'s crime.\n\nI\'ve finally come to realise just how great North by Northwest is. The reason you should love Hitchcock is he put entertainment upfront.  Hitchcock was not interested in whether this or that would happen in real life: he was interested in what would make the most entertaining scene for the movie. North by Northwest is a peak in this regard. The dialogue and situations intentionally throw reality to the wind - the double-entendre dialogue in the love scenes is not supposed to be the way people talk!\n\nIf you said to Hitchcock "as if he\'d keep driving" or "as if she\'d do that" - he would just laugh at you and say you\'ve missed the point. This is 100% movieland, and once you get used to the fact, and that this is not a fault in the film, but done intentionally, you\'ll love it. Its expressionistic - everything happens in movie language: the people laughing at Grant in the elevator, the way he keeps driving drunk near the beginning, the way he grabs the knife and everyone stares at him after someone\'s been stabbed.\n\nIt flirts with the idea of identity. I thought it was interesting how Grant first is dismissing, then incredulous that people should be calling him by another name; then, as the tries to find out who this guy is, he enters the hotel room of this new identity, then he puts the suit on, and finally he identifies himself as George Kaplan.\n\nA succession of fantastic, memorable scenes, a great leading man in Grant, and one of Hermann\'s essential Hitch scores make for a movie i can put on at any time.\n\n10/10\n', u'0.448029', u'\nI saw this film for the first time when I was a freshman in college as part of an english class I took entitled "writing and the movies".  Little did I realize that I would be seeing a film that would stay with me to this day and in essence become one of my all time favorites.  Then, a few years ago, I caught it on the big screen at the Fine Arts theater in downtown Chicago.  I remember that it was a rainy, cold October day.  Perfect weather for a Hitchcock film I thought to myself.\n\nFor me, half of the fun of North by Northwest is its incredible story.  This film has something for everyone within it: a little comedy, a little romance, great snappy dialogue and more action than any Bruce Willis Die Hard film combined.  Hitchcock was a master at this and in North by Northwest he lets his genius shine through totally.  It seems to me that whenever I watch it, everyone who made this film from Cary Grant on down had nothing but sheer fun making it.  Perhaps my two favorite scenes are the infamous "crop-duster" sequence and the last twenty minutes or so at Mount Rushmore.  \n\nI must give special mention to Ernest Lehman who yet again managed to write a screenplay that totally knocks your socks off.  How he came up with the idea, I\'ve not a clue, but what an idea it is.  The screenplay itself was nominated for an Academy Award that year, but lost to Pillow Talk.  North by Northwest was also nominated for Best Set Decoration and Best Film Editing, but lost to Ben-Hur in both categories.\n\nAll in all, what a film. If you haven\'t seein it, do so ASAP. North by Northwest just reinforces my belief that Alfred Hitchcock was one of the greatest directors of all time. Period.\n\nMy rating: 4 stars', u'0.120901', u'North By Northwest is not an artistic masterpiece like Rear Window and Vertigo, but it is probably the most purely entertaining picture Hitchcock ever made. It\'s essentially a rehash of many of his earlier films, with a plot partially derived from The Thirty Nine Steps and the very similar Saboteur, while there are borrowings from Foreign Correspondent and Notorious, among others. However, it is all done with such style and confidence that it doesn\'t matter if it\'s essentially just a greatest hits package.\n\nVery few other films of this kind attain the near perfect tone of this one, precariously balanced between seriousness and silliness. Sometimes this film manages the very difficult trick of being both suspenseful and comical at the same time, as in the auction house scene, or the wonderful scene in the lift when the hero\'s mother turns to two heavies in a lift looking menacingly at the hero and says "you gentlemen are not REALLY trying to kill my son, are you?".\n\nOf course the famous crop dusting plane scene and the Mount Rushmore chase are terrific. The former is really more notable for the amount of time taken to build up to the action than the action itself, while the technical work on the latter still looks pretty good. In a totally different vein is the astonishingly frank seduction sequence on the train. Hitchcock takes his time here as with many of the other scenes, but the film is so crammed with memorable passages that one hardly notices it\'s 136 mins long.\n\nErnest Lehman\'s script is full of wonderful lines, many of them delivered so well by chief villain James Mason that at times we almost want to root for him. "Has any one ever told you tend to overplay your various roles Mr Kaplan....it seems to me you fellows could stand a little less training from the FBI and a little more from the Actor\'s Studio". Cary Grant is so smooth one almost forgets he\'s over 50, and of course there\'s also Bernard Herrmann\'s vibrant score.\n\nEndlessly enjoyable even with repeated viewings. How many of today\'s thrillers will be such fun in 25 years time?', u'0.474999', u'\nThe one famous gaffe people point out in this film is when a small boy can be seen plugging his ears just before Eva Marie Saint brings her caf\xe9 conversation with Cary Grant to a sudden end. Another gaffe, just as egregious and apparent but not nearly as commented on, is when Cary and Eva, clutching an incriminating statute, are rock-climbing around a quartet of famous presidential heads until a bad guy suddenly appears and leaps upon him. Whereupon the surprised, backward-falling Cary has the presence of mind to hand the statute to Eva, who takes his from him whilst in mid-scream. Do me a favor and read that last sentence again. What director today would allow such a scene past the editing room?\n\nBut it just doesn\'t matter: IMDB voters at this writing have placed the 44-year-old `North By Northwest\' ahead of all but 18 movies ever made, including 14 which have nothing to do with Frodo Baggins or Darth Vader. That\'s pretty damn impressive. What the hell were they thinking? The only Hitchcock movie they rate higher is "Rear Window;" I can think of at least seven or eight Hitchcocks I\'d rank over "North By Northwest." [None of them are "Rear Window."]\n\nThe truth is this film is so popular because it is so good. Not great, but very, very good, in a way that anticipates a lot of the direction of mass entertainment to come and thus speaks to people in a way `Vertigo\' or `Strangers On A Train\' do not. People talk about how forward thinking "Psycho" is, and it is, but more directors took note of the just-as-clever-but-more-mainstream approach of "North By Northwest." The last four decade have been chock full of flicks serving up suspense, sex, changing locales, and plot twists that play with viewers\' expectations, all the while keeping the laughs coming. It\'s not like "North By Northwest" invented this formula, but it perfected and distilled it into an essence that is imitated, with varying success, to this day.\n\nCary Grant plays slick adman Roger Thornhill, who gets mistaken for a fugitive named Kaplan and finds himself on the run from a slew of bad guys, led by James Mason at his smug and oily peak as Vandamme. Martin Landau makes his first memorable appearance as Mason\'s nastiest henchman Leonard (1959 was good to him, as "Plan Nine From Outer Space" premiered that year as well), suspicious, ruthless, and probably gay. Not that there\'s anything wrong with that, but it was 1959 and that was a little daring.\n\nDaring also is Eva Marie Saint\'s Eve Kendall, a woman who uses sex, as Thornhill puts it, "the way some people use a flyswatter." Her repartee with Thornhill shows just how erotic two people just talking to each other can be. It also provides further evidence Hitchcock\'s writers didn\'t go out on many dates. (Kendall: "I\'m a big girl." Thornhill: "Yeah, and in all the right places." And she KISSES him for it!)\n\nThe film does chug slowly at the outset, building suspense but also bugging you a bit as the plot gears grind while Thornhill is being pushed through his early paces, right until his moment at the UN. About the time we find ourselves with Thornhill in the cornfield, the picture starts to pick up a serious head of steam, and never loses it all the way to the final, famous tunnel shot. Actually, I like the penultimate scene between Grant and Saint, an elegant and witty way of resolving that most tried-and-true device, the cliffhanger.\n\nAs with most of Hitchcock\'s \x9150s fare, elegance is behind much of what makes this movie so great. `North By Northwest\' manifests an elegance in dress, decor, language, music, and lighting that represents the best of its era while giving the picture a timeless character all the same. Hitchcock\'s camera movements are very subtle yet brilliant, as during Mason\'s entrance and Grant\'s hide-and-seek game around the train. Everyone has perfect hair, lounges about in gowns and jackets, and you never think it should be otherwise.\n\nGrant isn\'t my favorite actor, but he\'s smooth enough for the central role when he\'s not doing that bad Foster Brooks impression behind the wheel of the car. [I docked the movie one point just for that.] His best scene may be at the auction, though he projects real fear in the cornfield. Saint is simply splendid, nailing every line as she walks a tightrope and plays her character\'s motives close to her d\xe9colletage. Hitchcock seemed to lose his ability to direct female actors, and not merely bask in them, with the advent of color, but Saint is one blonde bombshell that gives us a sense of brains and personality behind her mystery.\n\nThere\'s logic gaps in this movie, and bad process shots, but it\'s an amazing ride all the same, more amazing because it\'s done with smoke and mirrors and without apologies. You ask the questions and figure out the loopholes only after you walk away, because the movie doesn\'t let you up much while you are watching it. Hitchcock made other, more challenging movies that attested to his rare vision as an artist, but this is maybe his purest exercise in the craft of good filmmaking. That\'s why `North By Northwest\' has remained so high in people\'s estimations. Whatever the errors, it\'s hard not feeling good about that.\n', u'0.136017', u'\nI can\'t quite understand how anyone can dislike Alfred Hitchcock\'s films. Personally, he\'s one of the few old school talents I find interesting and watchable, even if his work is dated and set in its era (the era when most sets were hopelessly phony). I guess you have to appreciate his themes - dysfunctional relationships between a man and his mother, flawed by essentially innocent men caught up in a web of intrigue, beautiful blonds, comments of authority figures, black humor, etc - to really appreciate Hitchcock.\n\nInterestingly, James Stewart was Hitchcock\'s original choice for the role of Roger Thornhill, the hapless ad man who is mistaken for a spy who doesn\'t even exist to begin with and is chased half way across the country by villains and authorities for a murder he didn\'t commit. For one reason or another, Stewart was unavailable and the part went to Cary Grant instead. Grant seems better suited to the character and the situation than Stewart would have been, but I can easily picture Stewart being chased in the cornfield by the crop duster.\n\nLike all Hitchcock films, there are hundreds of things that aren\'t realistic though set in the real world and lots of highly improbable stuff going on everywhere, but if you give it a chance you\'ll enjoy it and won\'t care. Don\'t miss Eva Marie Saint having to dub over a then lewd line about love, a\nfull stomach and sex. The use of a crop duster may not be the most practical way to kill a man, but it\'s a great visual representation of the great Hitchcockian examination of "nowhere to run, nowhere to hide". The music and clinging to Mount Rushmore is also memorable. Did I mention the innuendo?', u'0.0330141', u'\nPossibly the greatest ever thriller, NbNW combines terrific acting, dialogue, cinematography, music and storyline. But the real standout is the editing. If there was ever a film that merited the clich\xe9 "a nonstop thrill ride", it\'s this one. The pace never slackens. I particularly like how it cuts straight from the Mt Rushmore face to the train bunkbed. I hate the anticlimactic, overlong, hokey endings of most thrillers. The final scene (scenelet) is very short, romantic d\xe9nouement, \xe0 la James Bond. How refreshing.\n\nOh, the champagne dialogue in this movie is simply premier cru, darlings! Eve: "You don\'t believe in marriage." - Thornhill [indignant]: "But I\'ve been married twice." - Eve: "See what I mean?" Or take this repartee... Vandamm: "Seems to me you fellows could stand a little less training from the FBI, and a little more from the Actors\' Studio." - Thornhill: "Apparently, the only performance that\'ll satisfy you is when I play dead." - Vandamm: "Your very next role. You\'ll be quite convincing, I assure you."\n\nThe dialogue is also very risqu\xe9 for a 1950s film in places. In the dining car, for example, Thornhill: "The moment I meet an attractive woman, I have to start pretending I have no desire to make love to her." This thinly-veiled propositioning of Eve/Eva for sex, which sounds banal these days, would have been outrageously shocking to its original 50s audience. Likewise, "I\'m a big girl." - "Yeah, and in all the right places, too." A clich\xe9 now, but imagine its impact then. "I\'ve heard nothing but innuendoes," says Vandamm at one stage. He\'s right; there are plenty in this movie\'s verbal and visual imagery.\n\nThis dialogue, and the general production design, conspire to create product that, unlike other Hitchcock thrillers like Rear Window and Psycho, doesn\'t appear dated now. The design is ultramodernist, which is reflected in the architecture of the locations like the NYC UN HQ and the Rushmore lodge.\n\nA convoluted plot is usually the result of bad scripting or an attempt to mask a movie\'s deficiencies in other areas. As usual, Hitchcock keeps the plot dead simple and doesn\'t complicate matters by trying to explain. It\'s just some kind of meaningless Cold War spy thing. This perfectly suffices, for it\'s quite incidental to the thrilling chase that forms the core of the film. What seem like hokey, incredible contrivances, such as Eve\'s coming on so strong to Thornhill in the dining car (when we think her unaware that he\'s not a real murderer) are soon enough fascinatingly demystified. (She\'s in cahoots with Vandamm, or, as we later find, an undercover agent trying to expose him!)\n\nFantastic performances from Cary Grant, James Mason, Eva-Marie Saint and a much-underused Martin Landau. If there\'s one criticism, it\'s that Cary Grant is preternaturally unflappable as the urban sophisticate plunged into a living nightmare. He always retains his self-assured, even arrogant, panache and never panics. In fact, with that ever-present twinkle in his eye, he seems to be getting perverse enjoyment from his own misfortunes. However, his modulated performance remains just the right side of comicality.\n\nEva-Marie Saint is camera-loved as the lethal seductress. She seems the perfect Bond girl. Had her star risen a few years later, I\'m sure she\'d have been captivating Connery. In fact, this movie shows that Hitchcock could have directed James Bond. It\'s no secret Bond\'s film incarnation was modelled to some extent on Cary Grant\'s supersuave persona in this film.\n\nA young-looking Martin Landau is effective as the menacing sidekick, although it\'s only in the final scene in the Rushmore lodge that he has any quality screen time or lines. James Mason underplays the role of the polished, oleaginous villain perfectly. His very British voice and demeanour conveys menace by suggestion, not overt declaration. He too, like Saint, would have been ideal in a Bond film. He doesn\'t sound ridiculous mouthing lines like, "A bit naughty, using real bullets!" [my paraphrase]\n\n[Continuity: In the scene in Eve\'s hotel room, Thornhill calls for the valet to sponge and press his suit. He\'s told it\'ll take 20 minutes and a guy comes to collect the suit a minute later. He pretends to take a shower, whilst Eve absconds. Thornhill leaves immediately, and he doesn\'t return to the hotel. However, in the next scene, we see him wearing the same suit, perfectly sponged and pressed. There\'s no way he could have returned to the hotel to collect the suit.]', u'0.160652', u"\nRoger Thornhill is an advertising man.  However when he is kidnapped it is clear that he has been mistaken for someone else.  When he tries to find out what's going he is framed for murder and sets out on a cross country run to survive.  Along the way he meets danger, adventure and beauty in the shape of the mysterious Eve Kendall.  However when he finds the truth he is drawn towards a final showdown with the dangerous Vandamm.\n\nRightly regarded as a classic and can more than compete with today's thrillers that too often rely on special effects to make up for the lack of genuine suspense.  Here the plot requires a great deal of faith, but it is brought off with such style and energy that it is totally absorbing.  The action is great and the several main scenes have become part of popular culture and are regularly spoofed on TV etc.  The romance works as well and Thornhill and Kendall exchange plenty of good scenes.\n\nThe dialogue is great and the direction is faultless from Hitchcock.  Many thrillers run over 2 hours - but only the good ones can stand up to repeated viewings.  Northwest can take back to back viewings it is so good.  The plot may have been put together as shooting went (as was the case with at least\n\none key scene) but it all stands together well.  The acting is also perfect, Grant's rebirth as a thriller man is brilliant and is one of Hitchcock's best everyman characters.  Marie-Saint is yet another dangerous blonde but is very good. James `The Voice' Mason is excellent, while Landau adds great homosexual subtext to his character.  The ever present Leo G Carroll IS Mr Waverly but is still enjoyable and even support roles like Landis as Thornhill's mother is perfection!\n\nOver 40 years on this film has barely dated. Hearing the music is enough to make me want to see it again, while the direction, set pieces, dialogue and performances are all pitch perfect.  A wonderful thriller for young and old - no sex, no swearing, all thrills.", u'0.598267', u'\n"North by Northwest" is my favorite of all Hitchcock films (a close shave with "Rear Window"), and it permanently occupies a slot in my Personal Top Ten Films of All Time.\n\nGrant is terrific--funny, sexy, angry, confused, exhausted, redeemed. It is a full-bodied performance. And speaking of bodies--Eva Marie Saint is *definitely* an asset here, not just for her looks (there\'s that cool, blond Hitch femme fatale again) but for showing off her acting chops as well.\n\nJames Mason is a consumate actor, and Hitch gives him a vehicle to enter one of his finest performances. Martin Landau, too, is appropriately chilling.\n\nFavorite scenes? The crop-dusting sequence is certainly a classic. But I love the scenes with Roger and his mother, dickering over his "drunkenness." And the auction is Hitch in his element: the scene plays tense and terse but also funny.\n\nI can quibble with this film: The blue-screening looks a bit cheesy nowadays. And the movie opens with a huge plot hole (when the page is searching for George Kaplan and Thornhill grabs his ear for a quick question, Mason et.al. believe Thornhill to be their man, setting off the entire plot. However, shouldn\'t the page have continued searching the room, calling for Mr. Kaplan? And shouldn\'t the villains have heard him continue to page, knowing that Thornhill wasn\'t who they assumed he was? Ahh, but that would blow the whole movie!).\n\nThis film also contains the best "naughty joke" Hitchcock ever devised. The final sequence is Eva Marie Saint and Grant pulling each other into bed. The jump cut is to a train entering a tunnel. You figure it out.', u'0.372464', u'Alfred Hitchcock\'s "North by Northwest" is one of the best films in his long and distinguished career. Part of the success of the movie lies in the screen play by Ernest Lehman, one of the best writers of that era. Also, the haunting music by Mr. Hitchcock\'s usual collaborator, Bernard Hermann, adds texture to what we are seeing. Together with all the above mentioned qualities, "North by Northwest" was photographed by Robert Burks and was edited by George Tomasini, both men did outstanding jobs to enhance a film that shows a mature and inspired Alfred Hitchcock.\n\nThe film works because of the witty dialog Mr. Lehman wrote. This has to be one of the riskiest projects undertaken by Mr. Hitchcock because of the sexiness Eva Kendall exudes throughout the film and the repartee between her and Roger Thornhill. The film mixes adventure and romance that aren\'t put ons, as one feels what one\'s watching to be really happening.\n\nMuch has been said in this forum as to the values of this classic, so we shall only add our pleasure in seeing this masterpiece any time it turns on cable. In fact, the film hasn\'t dated, the way some others of the same period have. The highlights of the film are the sequences involving the crop duster, the train ride to Chicago where Eve and Roger first meet, the auction, and the Mount Rushmore climax.\n\nThis is one of the best contributions by Cary Grant to any of his work with the director. Roger Thornhill is one of the best roles Mr. Grant played, during his long career. His chemistry with Eva Marie Saint is perfect. This young actress added class and elegance to the picture. James Mason and Martin Landau played villains convincingly. Jesse Royce Landis, Leo G. Carroll, and the rest of the supporting cast is excellent.\n\n"North by Northwest" is one of Alfred Hitchcock\'s best crafted films thanks to the brilliant people that came together to work in it.', u'0.739766', u'\nWith everything you expect from Hitchcock and more, "North By Northwest" is terrific entertainment from the master.  There are interesting characters, an exciting story with intrigue and suspense, lots of fine photography, and some of Hitchcock\'s best-known set pieces.  It\'s capped off by a fine Bernard Herrmann score that is almost as good as the one he wrote later for "Psycho".\n\nCary Grant may be the ideal Hitchcock actor, and he is a big part of making this such great fun.  As one of the man-on-the-run characters that Hitchcock loved to make movies about, Grant is entertaining and believable, maintaining good humor even as he tries to work his way out of a series of desperate situations.  The other stars, James Mason and Eva Marie Saint, also are very good, and the supporting roles are all filled by good character actors.\n\nThe story is one of Hitchcock\'s most exciting.  It\'s slightly longer than usual, and it occasionally stretches credibility, but it all goes by quickly because there is always something interesting going on, and there is also plenty to look at.  Whether using the famous landmarks or using more everyday settings, there is always lots of good detail, and the settings complement the story nicely.  At times the plot becomes somewhat fanciful, but probably deliberately so, for it only emphasizes Hitchcock\'s mastery of technique that he can have his characters do almost anything and make you believe it at the time.\n\nWith everything that characterizes Hitchcock at his very best, this fully deserves its reputation as one of the finest films by him or any other director.  You can watch it several times and still find it just as entertaining.', u'0.877624', u'Many feel this is Alfred Hitchcock\'s greatest American movie, and I agree! NORTH BY NORTHWEST is the Hitchcock film to end all Hitch films, with all his pet themes covered with maximum wit, panache, and suspense, as well as a romance between Cary Grant and a soign\xe9e Eva Marie Saint that\'s as tender as it is sexy. Grant has never been more engaging and dashing (literally and figuratively :-), though the smoothly villainous James Mason nearly out-suaves him. My husband and I have joked that if Mason had played Thornhill, the film would have been over in mere moments. With all due respect to Grant, if the imperious, unshakably confident Mason asked the Glen Cove police, "Do you honestly believe that this happened the way you think it did?" they would immediately reply, "No, sir, you must be right, you\'re free to go, sorry we bothered you." :-) Also boasts a great early performance by a reptilian young Martin Landau as Mason\'s possessive henchman, as well as one of Oscar nominee Ernest Lehman\'s best screenplays (in fact, he borrowed liberally from it for his script for the film version of THE PRIZE starring Paul Newman) and one of Bernard Herrmann\'s finest scores. Anybody who wants to write or direct a chase thriller should watch NORTH BY NORTHWEST first to see how it\'s done!', u'0.596933', u'Cary Grant handles the twisted expressions of his face, his astonished look, his impulsive smile with professional self-assurance and charm while taking us right in the middle of confusion on a breathless 2000-mile cross-country chase which has its gripping showdown across the giant faces of the presidents sculptured on Mount Rushmore high above Rapid City, South Dakota\x85 \n\nGrant plays Roger Thornhill, a stylish publicist, mistaken for a fictitious Federal agent, plunged into a world of crime and intrigue, hunted down by villains who want to eliminate him because he seems to be on their dishonest dealings\x85 \n\nWhen questioned by bland Phillip Vandamm (James Mason), Thornhill is unable to convince him that he is a victim of a mistaken identity\x85 His three thugs fill him with bourbon, and place him in a stolen car expecting him to have a drunken accident\x85 After narrowly escaping death, no one believes his story including, obviously, his skeptical mother (Jessie Royce Landis).\n\nIn an effort to discover the agent he is being confused with, and using the clues he collected, Thornhill returns to the United Nations Headquarter looking for George Kaplan\x85 There, somebody falls into his arms and unthinkingly, Thornhill draws the blade out of the victim\'s back and is photographed holding the weapon in mid-air\x85 And thus became a fugitive from justice, pursued by the cops and had to skip by boarding a train to Chicago\x85 \n\nWhile on the run, he is caught by a provocative platinum blonde (Eva Marie Saint), who comes out as a glamorous woman and a delightful charmer\x85 \n\nJames Mason, a polished mastermind spy showed too well to be threatening... His menacing henchman, Martin Landau is also convincingly hurtful...\n\nIn his fifth Hitchcock picture, Leo G. Carroll is suave and calm as the devoted intelligence chief\x85 \n\nDirected by a genius behind the camera, "North By Northwest" remains a genuinely exciting film for the dangerous world of spies and counterspies\x85', u'0.0672022', u"\nAs it is clearly demonstrated even in this forum, many, many people love this movie. I just finished viewing it myself for the first time, and frankly, I can't say that I agree. Am I nuts? Maybe. All I know is I'd like to put my two cents in, for what it's worth.\n\nFor an espionage tale like this, I would have preferred an approach  more based on grim realism. Instead, the narrative seemed a bit too convenient and contrived, as if Old Hitch was trying to make the ends meet at the last minute. Somehow, I never felt the `taut' tension of his other films that I've immensely enjoyed (Dial M for Murder, Rear Window, Psycho, The Wrong Man, Vertigo, to name but a few). It certainly doesn't help that the film contains too many scenes that verge on the `fantastical' level. For example, there's a scene in which a gun goes off in the living room of a house. Eva Marie Saint comes out of her room and asks, `What was that noise,' to which James Mason replies, `We were just wondering about that.' Martin Landau just gives a little shrug and all is forgotten. I mean, come on! I'd say it's pretty hard to mistake a gunshot for, say, somebody dropping a glass on the floor. As I mentioned, there are many more scenes like this during the course of the movie, and every single one of them acts as a \x91decelerator' of the narrative. Also, the overall performance of the cast struck me as rather underwhelming, especially when we're talking about some of the finest actors ever to grace the silver screen. James Mason, in particular, sleepwalks his way through, though I can't blame him, given the fact that his character was so painfully underwritten. The bit when Cary Grant acts like he's drunk was pretty difficult to sit through. Humor is fine when it works on, again, a believable level.\n\nI like the idea of having a normal Joe get tangled up in a case of mistaken identity/international espionage. Also, it does feature some memorable scenes, especially the famous crop field/airplane sequence (it really does deserve all the praise it has received) But again, it just proves to me that even a seemingly sure-fire combo like Ernest Lehman-Alfred Hitchcock can still come up short on the goods.\n\nThe second 007 adventure, `From Russia with Love', received some hounding because people thought it was basically a rip-off of this movie (there are some obvious similarities), but in this madman's humble opinion, `From Russia with Love' is the one that achieves a better telling of a spy story.\n", u'-0.194507'], u'tt0070735': [u"This film deserved every Oscar thrown at it. It looks good, it's funny, it's extremely complex but doesn't dwell on the fact for a moment: if you can spot the twists, you haven't got time to sit back smugly as they pop up - everything rushes on. The acting's good as is the story, one carrying the other. I can't think of a movie where people so obviously had as much fun - maybe (Soderbergh's) Ocean's Eleven, or even Some Like It Hot? The soundtrack is brilliant too, contemporaneous Joplin rags evoking the time and its contradictions artlessly.\n\nThe bit that raises this film the one notch higher though is a short, central sequence, in which the music plays as high profile a part as any character or narrative aside. It's the night before The Sting and Redford is drawn to the drugstore girl who's trying to leave town. Perfectly framed by the bittersweetest of the blues/rags he asks her out for a drink - revealing his vulnerability for the first time in a movie where everybody's pretending to be someone else: 'It's 2 o'clock in the morning and I don't know nobody.' Despite all the caper and thrill of grifting all he wants is what we all want. It's a rich, compassionate heart to a virtuosic piece of film-making. 9.5/10", u'0.0993853', u"A delicious wheeze from start to finish. Certainly a film that leaves you thinking that you'd like to have been in Henry's gang and played a part in separating Lonnegan from his dough. The editing is pin sharp and beautifully cast with a superb musical track to keep you company. The framing, the photography, the pace all dovetail exquisitely and if you feel left outside of the game plan in your first viewing, never fear, the second time of watching, you'll enjoy it just as much but it will mean more. Certainly it's a film you'll want to see a second time. At least. Oscars rightly by the handful and nominations are full deserved to combine for a winning performance by all concerned. Definitely in my top fifty of all time.", u'0.450136', u'The fix is in, the odds are set, and the boys are ready to play for the big time, both on the screen and behind the camera in this breezy, endlessly entertaining movie classic.\n\nRobert Redford is small-time hustler Johnny Hooker, happy to play the marks in Joliet until the murder of his mentor pushes him to go up against the nastiest mug in Chicago, Doyle Lonnegan (Robert Shaw.) Hooker\'d rather ice Lonnegan outright, but will settle for a big con with the help of a slightly wobbly but game scammer named Henry Gondorff, played as only Paul Newman can.\n\nNewman and Redford, along with director George Roy Hill, had a lot riding on this pony, given it was a follow-up to their earlier "Butch Cassidy And The Sundance Kid." To measure up, they had to produce nothing short of another classic. And so they did. "The Sting" won the Best Picture Oscar in 1973, and remains the sentimental favorite among many in choosing between the two films.\n\nComparing "The Sting" to "Butch Cassidy" is kind of overdone sport, and tempers, as Lonnegan would say, run hot. But you can see why "The Sting" worked as well as it did by looking at how the director and the stars played it differently within the same basic framework as "Butch Cassidy." Newman and Redford are again outlaws and underdogs. Period detail abounds here as it did with "Butch Cassidy," and there\'s another memorable score amid the proceedings, Scott Joplin rags modernized by Marvin Hamlisch. The score even produced another hit, "The Entertainer," to compare with "Raindrops Keep Falling On My Head."\n\nWhat\'s different about "The Sting," and what makes it such a classic in its own right, is the way the stars service the plot. In "Butch Cassidy," Newman and Redford\'s comradeship was the story. Here, the chemistry between the two actors is minimized in favor of spinning a yarn with enough red herrings to feed the Swedish navy. The tale here is better than "Butch Cassidy," which is a more elegiac film with grander cinematography and funnier set pieces. "The Sting" is an edge-of-your-seat caper flick from beginning to end.\n\nYou can\'t really call "The Sting" a comedy. Though there are many laughs, especially when Newman hooks Shaw during a poker game, Hill won\'t let the audience relax enough for that. What this is is a con game, played on the audience, designed not to cheat but entertain by means of clever hoodwinking and constant misdirection plays.\n\nYou\'ll get no spoilers from me. This is one worth sitting through with no expectations. Five gets you ten you\'ll enjoy Newman and Redford, and a terrific supporting cast (one advantage over "Butch Cassidy") that includes Charles Durning, Eileen Brennan, Dana Elcar, Harold Gould, and Mr. Hand himself, Ray Walston. There\'s another familiar face from "Butch Cassidy," Charles Dierkop, Flat Nose Curry in "Butch Cassidy" and Lonnegan\'s right hand here. The best performance may be Robert Shaw\'s; he exudes menace aplenty but some humanity, too, when he takes Hooker under his wing after learning he came from the same hard streets of Five Points Lonnegan sprang from.\n\nTerrific period detail, too. The dialogue is great and feels real in its Runyonesque way, while the cons are elaborate and logically played out. Watching this a second time is especially fun because once you know how the plot goes down, you find yourself catching clues you missed the first time, and enjoying the film even more for them.\n\nWhy didn\'t Newman and Redford team up again? Certainly there was another good movie for them to partner up in, but as Gondorff would have put it, only chumps don\'t quit when they\'re ahead.', u'0.286803', u"\nJohnny Hooker and Luther Coleman are `grifters' or confidence tricksters in 1930s Chicago. Unknown to them, however, one of their victims works for a vicious local gangster named Doyle Lonnegan, and when Lonnegan finds out what has happened he has Luther murdered. Hooker is not a violent man by nature and admits that he does not know much about killing, but nevertheless wishes to take revenge for his partner's death. He decides that the best way is to hurt Lonnegan's pride by relieving him of some of his wealth. He joins forces with another con man named Henry Gondorff, and together they come up with an elaborate plan, not only to cheat Lonnegan, but also to do it in such a way that he never realises that he has been cheated. The plot unfolds with great ingenuity; until the final denouement the audience are never quite sure which developments are for real and which are part of the elaborate scheme.\n\nCrime thrillers set during this period are normally associated with the classic `film noir' style, with its dark, brooding, cynical atmosphere. In `The Sting', however, George Roy Hill deliberately sets out to create a very different mood. The style is almost the exact opposite of film noir. The acting is heavily stylised (as is the scenery), and the division of the film into sections with titles such as `The Hook' or `The Line' is reminiscent of the formal division of a stage play into acts and scenes. The film is not in black-and-white but in bright colour, and the mood, far from being heavy and brooding, is light and cheerful. Scott Joplin's music, although written slightly earlier than the period in which the film is set, fits this mood perfectly. The major actors all play their parts perfectly- Robert Shaw as the glowering, menacing Lonnegan, Robert Redford as the young, idealistic Hooker (insofar as a con-man can be said to be an idealist), and Paul Newman as the older, more experienced and laid-back Gondorff. There are also good contributions from Charles Durning as the corrupt policement Lieutenant Snyder and Robert Earl Jones as Luther.\n\nDespite the cheerful mood, the film has serious undertones in keeping with its themes of revenge and murder. I am not usually a great admirer of what are known as `heist' or `caper' movies, as I feel that too often they glamourise crime and dishonesty. `The Sting', however, is different. Hooker and Gondorff live in a world where the moral order has broken down. The police are hopelessly corrupt- Snyder, the one representative we see of the forces of law and order, is on Lonnegan's payroll. There is no chance of Hooker getting justice for his friend's murder through the normal channels; the only way in which this can be achieved is to go outside the law. Where the police are crooked, only the criminals can execute justice. The emotional satisfaction we feel at the end of the film is because a sort of moral order has finally been restored and, moreover, because this has been done without anyone getting injured except Lonnegan's wallet. An excellent film, which well deserved its Academy Award. 9/10. ", u'0.11626', u'\nA magical plot, dead on art direction, brilliant supporting roles (most notably Robert Shaw, ya falla?), and the guiding hand of Redford/Newman chemistry make this one of the Hollywood\'s great films.  "The Sting" is a hallmark of the "Golden Age" of American film, and has molded not only countless films, but numerous genres, few of which have met the challenge of its master.\n', u'0.964609', u"THE STING is so full of twists and turns at every unexpected moment that it never stops drawing you into all of its traps. All of it is performed at a fast clip and the performances have all the nuances needed to keep you entertained and in suspense.\n\nSparked by perfect period detail, a Scott Joplin piano score courtesy of Marvin Hamlisch and grand performances, it is gritty and at all times entertaining--it deserves to be seen more than once to relish all the tricks you missed the first time.\n\nFor full enjoyment, a plot description is better left for the first time viewer to discover so I won't give any plot details here.\n\nThe three central performances are perfection--Robert Redford, so comfortable in a role he was obviously born to play, Paul Newman, the epitome of a confidence trickster and Robert Shaw as the man who falls hard for The Sting. Newman and Redford are even more at home here than they were as Butch Cassidy and the Sundance Kid.\n\nNo wonder it won so many '73 Oscars--including Best Picture. A film to relish again and again, with scenes that never lose their punch. The story is full of clever touches that will hook you into the 1930s atmosphere and have you waiting for the knockout ending.\n\nWatch for the scene of Redford and the waitress he seeks out at 2:00 a.m. It's the kind of acting that can melt your heart.", u'0.553401', u"\nSmall time conmen Johnny Hooker and Luther Coleman unwittingly scam a runner for Chicago main man Doyle Lonnegan.  When Luther is murdered, Hooker goes on the run and seeks out Luther's old friend Henry Gondorff to help him put together a major sting to take revenge on Lonnegan.  However with so much heat on Hooker and the stakes so high can they pull it off and get away clean?\n\nAlmost a follow up to Butch and Sundance, this film partners the stars of the day Newman and Redford to good effect.  The story is a little less fun but still very enjoyable to watch as it builds to a great finale.  The use of chapters ran the risk of fragmenting the film into bits but instead it really helps set it out and makes it more manageable.  Although it is not as light hearted and jovial as the theme music suggests it still manages to flow nicely with the slightly darker drama not spoiling anything but only serving to make it feel more grown up.\n\nThe cast are all very good and make the film easy to watch. Redford comes off the best in terms of characters and his role really suits both his carefree attitude (the start of the film) but also his more serious side (the rest of the film).  Newman has a lesser role that perhaps doesn't suit him quite as well, but he does have several really good scenes (the hustles) where he does very good work.  Shaw's accent is a little heavy at first but I got used to it and it worked for me and he was a really good foil for Redford/Newman.  The support cast including Durning, Walston, Gould, Jones and others all do good work.\n\nThe direction and use of music is really good and the sense of period is well crafted and doesn't just feel like it was painted on. I'm not sure if it deserved Best Picture or not because I don't know what the rest of the field was for that year but it is a really enjoyable film that is quite fun to watch several times even 30 years later \x96 and isn't that the main thing?", u'0.633268', u'Newman was again teamed with director George Roy Hill and Robert Redford, and the two stars again played outlaws who are basically easy-going and human, and whose criminal exploits are comically engaging\x85 \n\nHere the setting is Chicago in 1936\x85 Henry Gondorff (Newman), a well-known, slight1y aging con artist, is hiding from the law, but he comes out of retirement to teach small-time hustler Johnny Hooker (Redford) the "Big Con." With the assistance of a large group of amiable crooks, the two work out an elaborate scheme to cheat an important racketeer, Doyle Lonnegan (Robert Shaw), out of $500,000.\n\nUnlike "Butch Cassidy and the Sundance Kid," the film is inordinately complicated, and has many twists, turns and surprises\x85 It is actually one con game after another, with the audience tricked as well as the characters\x85 The steps in the swindle fall neatly into place in the manner of television\'s \'Mission: Impossible,\' although once we think about the plot, it makes little sense\x85 But we\'re not meant to think; "The Sting" is designed, and works extremely well, as clever entertainment\x85\n\nPerhaps it was the Newman-Redford team that made "The Sting" popular, and Newman alone may have difficulty drawing audiences, but one thing is certain: In fifty one years of film acting, Newman has become one of the screen\'s most magnetic stars\x85 Even today the very mention of his name evokes an aura of moody rebelliousness, rugged individualism, cool detachment and, above all, overpowering sex appeal\x85 And he has created more memorable characters than have most actors in much longer periods of time\x85 At least four\x97"The Hustler," "Hud," "Cool Hand Luke" and "Butch Cassidy"\x97are so well-known, so indelibly impressed on the public consciousness, that they stand among the immortals of the screen\x85\n\n"The Sting" received ten Academy Award nominations\x97more than any other Newman film\x85', u'0.639673', u"The Sting, evoking a bygone era of gangsters and con men, was the deserved Best Picture of 1973. The Sting won that Oscar plus a whole flock of technical awards. One award it didn't win was for Robert Redford as Best Actor.\n\nThat must have been tough for the Academy voters because to single out Redford as opposed to Paul Newman must have felt a bit unjust. For though Newman was nominated many times over his career and finally did win for The Color of Money, did not get a nomination for The Sting.\n\nRobert Redford is a small time grifter who while working a bait and switch street con takes off a numbers runner carrying the weekly take. The orders come down from the head man himself, Irish-American gangster Robert Shaw to kill those who did this as an example.\n\nRedford's mentor, Robert Earl Jones, is in fact killed, mainly because Redford starts spending a lot of that newly acquired loot that tips them off. Redford wants revenge so he looks up big time con man Paul Newman who himself is dodging law enforcement as is Redford also.\n\nThey work the big con on Shaw and it's a beauty. The scheme they have is something to behold. They also have to do a couple of improvisations on the fly that lend a few twists to the scheme.\n\nThe costumes and sets really do evoke Chicago of the Thirties and director George Roy Hill assembles a great cast to support Newman and Redford. My favorite in the whole group is Charles Durning, who plays the brutally corrupt, but essentially dumb cop from Joliet who nearly gums up the works and has to be dealt with.\n\nSpecial mention should also go to Robert Shaw. He's got a difficult part, maybe the most difficult in the film. He's not stupid, he would not have gotten to the top of the rackets if he was. But he also has to show that hint of human weakness that Newman, Redford, and the whole mob they assemble that makes him vulnerable to the con.\n\nDuring the sixties and seventies Robert Shaw was really coming into his own as a player, getting more and more acclaim for his work. His early death was a real tragedy, there was so much more he could have been doing.\n\nCan't also forget another co-star in this film, the ragtime music of Scott Joplin that was used to score The Sting. It probably is what most people remember about The Sting. Music from the Theodore Roosevelt era, scoring a film set in the Franklin Roosevelt era made while Nixon was president. Strange, but it actually works.\n\nThe Sting still works wonders today.", u'0.237897', u'\nGreat comedy-crime caper with giants Newman and Redford rekindling their "Butch & Sundance" flame to take down crime lord Robert Shaw (his finest role). Marvin Hamlisch beautifully recreates Scott Joplin\'s great music, while director George Roy Hill and screenwriter David S. Ward keep the film moving with snappy dialogue, wonderful art direction and editing and an excellent supporting cast. Followed by a sequel ten years later with Jackie Gleason.   ', u'0.926118', u'I agree 100 percent that this is a wonderful movie. I first saw it over 30 years ago, and it remains vivid in my mind while I can\'t remember zip about movies I saw last week which others have praised and I found wanting. I can\'t think of another film about double and triple crosses that deserves to be mentioned in the same sentence with "The Sting" (which doesn\'t mean that some of the others haven\'t been good). In addition to all the things that others have praised, one of the most memorable features of this film is the use of a Scott Joplin rag, which both lends a distinctive period touch and adds a sense of fast-paced motion to the action. I\'m not much for ranking films -- top five, top ten, top 250 -- but this is one of the best. If you haven\'t already seen it, drop everything and find the DVD. As pure entertainment, it can\'t be beat.', u'0.179549', u'\nAt first sight, THE STING appears to be nothing more than a television movie.  It is entirely plot-driven with no real stand out characters or personalities.  What makes the film work is excellent production design and a delightfully clever plot filled with many surprises.  The movie is feather-weight emotionally, but the depth of the "con" and the way it is fashioned by screenwriter David Ward leaves you with a pleasant experience.\n\nThis is more Redford\'s film than Newman\'s, who reunite with George Roy Hill, director of BUTCH CASSIDY AND THE SUNDANCE KID.  The legendary actors were more flesh and blood in that film, but here, they are merely players who carry the story along.  With lesser actors, THE STING may have been a forgettable piece of work.  Redford does all of the dirty work after Newman\'s initial "hook", but the omniscient presence of Newman, as big-time grifter "Henry Gondorff" exists throughout.  A mysterious gloved character, a crooked cop, the FBI, and a seemingly bigger con-man "Doyle Lonnegan" (played by the late, great Robert Shaw) are some of the players who are involved in some events that seem to be manipulated by an unseen force.  Is Newman as good as he claims in trying to clean out Shaw?  We\'ll see.\n\nThe film is shot simply by Hill.  No tricky angles or contrived camera movements are used.  The action takes place simply in front of us.  The production design by Henry Bumstead and James Payne recreates old-time Chicago through the use of built sets, matte paintings of a smaller sky-line, and some location shots.  It gives the film an almost artificial look which is fitting considering it is a direct homage to the 1930\'s and the gangster pictures that so dominated that decade.  The story is even furthered by title pages describing "the set-up, the hook, and the sting".  They are turned like pages in a book, adding a drop of elegance to a crooked world.  An iris is even employed in some scenes.\n\nTHE STING is definitely lightweight entertainment.  It does not provoke much thought or insight into what is happening on screen.  Fun is the word for this amusing little film that depicts a masterful plan for a big steal which would be impossible to pull off today.  Look out for Ray Walston in a hilarious role announcing horse races and their results as they are "happening" just after receiving word of the "real" race results from a back room in the betting house.  These are good con-men.\n\nRATING: ***', u'0.283002', u"Spoilers Ahead:\n\nThe cast alone is worth owning the movie for; try finding another movie with Newman, Redford, Robert Shaw, Charles Durning in the front cast. The back of the cast has greats also. The movie follows a group of criminals getting revenge on Crime Boss Lonnigan for killing Redford's criminal con man partner and mentor Luthor for conning a numbers runner of Lonnigan's. Lonnigan considers it bad advertising and dispatches two hoods who throw Luther out a window. Luther had pointed Hooker at Gondorf so Redford is instructed by Gondorf and his gang on how to put together a Sting on Lonnigan in retribution. One of the funniest scenes is where Gondorf feigns being drunk and cheats Lonnigan on the train at a poker game he has set up to rip off traveling suckers. Gondorf keeps mispronouncing Lonnigan's name, tells him he is playing out of his ass and generally earns his eternal hatred. This is 'the hook' which draws Lonnigan into the Sting: a phony horse racing shop complete with all the amenities including an announcer and betting board. Hooker pretends to be disgruntled with Gondorf and willing to betray him for the parlor. Meanwhile, Lonnigam sends a far more deadly hit woman, who fools Hooker, posing as a counter woman at the local greasy spoon. \n\nI will not spoil it, you can guess the rest. Is the movie perfect? No. The main flaw has always been its idealized depiction of criminality: please, how many criminals would not betray Hooker and Gondorf for a grilled cheese sandwich to the rich, powerful and deadly Lonnigan. The amity that is displayed between the criminals, they all know and love each other, is also pure fantasy. Yet, it remains a classic for the cast and the writing which have many twists and turns all realistic and well written. The repartee is gritty with a little very dark humor. The hit woman twist startled audiences and had popcorn flying when she almost shoots Hooker, after sleeping with him, the next day. The main twist will surprise you it is well written. The other flaw is trivial but annoying. Marvin Hamlisch who also wrecked The Spy Who Loved Me felt compelled to play a couple Scott Joplin tunes I loved until he played them 300 times. \n\nShaw steals the movie as the ruthless Lonnigan, like Jaws, even good actors were outshone by him. Do not go into the movie expecting gritty realism; the script is as idealized as the Hollywood sound stage, depression era, that the movie was filled on. Remember the Zeitgeist is always one of my reviewing credos. What is going on in America in 1973? Well, Watergate and The removal of our troops leaving Vietnam. Now you understand the idealization don't you? The depiction of a conspiracy this wide, involving this many crooks coupled with their all tapping their noses in acknowledgment of each other, is pure Walt Disney. Yet, warts and all, it remains an eternal classic of acting and writing. The twists are like freeway on ramps and unlike today they are completely logical and believable. The cops are not idealized with Durning as a cop determined on augmenting his income with Hooker his giant ATM machine. Still A Classic.", u'0.0498798', u'While the Sting was entertaining it is also astoundingly over-rated.\n\nThe music, while setting a fun mood, is incorrect as ragtime had fallen out of favor 20-25 years before the film is set. Likewise the costuming and set design are cartoony and create a sense of time and place that never existed and will only be recalled by viewer who have little to no experience with the actual time and place and simply view it as "old-timey". The sets in particular stand out as being obvious studio backlots and the requisite editing to make chases and the like seem seamless are glaringly obvious.\n\nMost films based on cons tend to share the characteristic of keeping something back from the audience in order to keep a level of suspense up that would otherwise be lacking (afterall, the viewer is in on the con already). There are a couple of such cases in this film, but they\'re all pretty obviously telegraphed and the ending feels a bit hollow as everything simply plays out before you just the way you thought it would. Even without knowing the details of some of the cons used they\'re all presented simply and obviously enough that it\'s no feat to tell what\'s going on. At times it feels like the film has intentionally set the bar a bit low so that the audience will feel special and clever for picking up on the supposed "twists".\n\nRedford and Newman both do a decent job, but (especially in Redford\'s case) neither seems to really inhabit their role. Instead it\'s just Redford playing the guy who\'s a conman rather than a legitimate character.\n\nAt the same time it\'s still a fun and enjoyable film. A good way to waste away a lazy weekend afternoon. It\'s cotton candy though, once you bite in there\'s nothing there and it\'s not going to stick with you for long.', u'0.0261072', u'The Sting (1973)\n\nA simple bold calculation that Rob Roy Hill directing two charming beautiful men in another period "buddy movie" would make big bucks was easy. The Sting was huge in its day. But lucky for all of us, it also made a wonderful if not great film, an entertaining film above all. And it gave us more time with Robert Redford and Paul Newman, which is never a bad thing.\n\nThe first film, Butch Cassidy and the Sundance Kid (1969) was sensationally popular and influential. And is and was a better movie. For one thing, The Sting avoids any real tragedy. For another, by the very nature of being left out of the main character\'s heads as they scheme away (to leave us in suspense), we are not drawn into their world, their worries, their characters. In a way, this is the big let down overall. We are made to watch the movie, not get absorbed into it. There is real romance. The Butch Cassidy "good friends who don\'t know each other after all" feeling, with its poignancy and humor, is missing here. And even their friendship, which is confusing on purpose on screen, is never for real. Everything, top to bottom, on the surface and deep, is for convenience, and for effect.\n\nThat\'s not necessarily a bad thing. But in a way, this is a return to the kind of early 1960s movie-making that the late 1960s have become so famous for upending, including Hill\'s own Butch Cassidy, which is more raw and alive and beautiful than The Sting by far. Yet, besides all the critical picking away, The Sting is a fast, layered, well done movie, with incredible period sets. The music is beautiful but odd (ragtime is a pre-1920s New Orleans style and the movie is post-1920s Chicago), but is maybe another example of how the director and team decided to go for sucking people in and having them enjoy themselves. And that\'s exactly what happens.', u'0.2301'], u'tt0032553': [u'..this movie has been done when Hitler ( and Mussolini who is as well in the movie) was at the top and many politics and even the Roman Church used to close eyes about brutality and evil of Nazism. Especially in USA there were many people who had not understood what was really going on in Germany and Europe ( Charles Lindenbergh for example ).It would be as today a big actor would made a parody of Berlusconi or Chirac. Chaplin maybe made a lot of mistakes in his life, but this is really a masterpiece of humanity and IMHO a great demonstration he was a courageous man. The movie is funny and deep, the final speech has a terrible strength and is still updated. I think this movie is one of the best ever done.    \n', u'0.564928', u'\nReleased in 1940, "The Great Dictator" was the first Hollywood film that denounced Hitler directly (albeit in the guise of Adenoid Hynkel), took a virulent stand against fascism, and directly addressed Anti-Semitism.\n\n\nOver-long, at times heavy-handed, it still has many wonderful sequences, including the famous dance with the globe, and all the scenes of Chaplin with Jack Oakie, each trying to out-do the other and prove his superiority.\n\nOne criticism that seems to occasionally rear its head is the implication that Chaplin\'s pre-World War II anti-fascism was somehow wrong-headed. The atrocities of the Holocaust weren\'t fully known to the world yet, so Chaplin\'s anti-Hitler diatribe is, in the minds of some, misguided. After the war this mindset would result in the debacle of the blacklist, when Chaplin, among others, were branded "pre-mature anti-fascists." In other words, it wasn\'t politically acceptable to be against Nazism until war broke out with the U.S. Hard to believe anyone could still see things that way now, but some do.\n\nThe film industry of the 1930s wanted no part of international politics, no matter how blatant the brutality of a given regime. Profits were at stake. It was little goyisha Charley Chaplin, playing a Jewish barber, who took a public stand.\n\nWhile "The Great Dictator" may not among Chaplin\'s finest films, it may, historically, be his finest hour.\n\n', u'-0.220501', u"I was surprised and impressed to find out this movie was released in 1940, before the United States entered World War II. On the surface, satirizing something as solemn and horrible as Nazi Germany could be misconstrued as rash. But Chaplin's brilliance isn't limited to making a joke out of everything. In fact, the seriousness of his message wouldn't have been nearly as valid if not for the excellent use of humor in this movie along with the moments of stark drama blended in. Drama alone wouldn't have had the bite and resonance that this film did. Laughing at someone (Adenoid Hynkel) can be the best way to attack them, while laughing with someone (the Jewish Barber) can be the best way to love them. In the Jewish Barber's final speech, I forgot for a moment that the war he was talking about happened more than half a century ago. They are words that have meaning now, and in any time of war. For this reason I believe the film did far greater good than harm, as it still has the same profound effect today.", u'0.0673295', u"\nThe Great Dictator is a beyond-excellent film.  Charlie Chaplin succeeds in being both extremely funny and witty and yet at the same time provides a strong statement in his satire against fascism.  The anti-Nazi speech by Chaplin at the end, with its values, is one of filmdom's great moments. Throughout this movie, I sensed there was some higher form of intelligence, beyond genuinely intelligent filmmaking, at work.\n", u'0.712892', u"\nAside from giving this film its proper socio-historical credit as one of only 2 U.S films which condemned Hitler, Naziism and the Holocaust prior to U.S. involvement in WWII, it's a great time as well.  Much of the humor remains visual, and some of the funniest (and most famous) scenes are done in the silent mode (e.g. the globe).  Although a bit more lacking in continuity and editing than many of Chaplin's earlier films, to do it credit simply as a passable first effort at a new medium is to damn it with faint praise.  It's unique.  No serious student of film can neglect to see and appreciate The Great Dictator as a classic amalgam of film talents.", u'0.324693', u"\nThis film entered production before WW2 began, but was not released until it was well under way. With significant fascist-sympathy in the US, and Chaplin himself being suspected as a communist sympathiser, The Great Dictator was a\nvery courageous endeavour. Such risks in film-making - thinly veiled political statements - would be almost inconceivable today. Imagine the fallout if someone were to make an equally satirical film today which criticised the USA's foreign policy?\n\nThis film is hilarious, poignant and tragic. The tragedy is that Chaplin makes a plea for the madness to end, but it is already to late - for him and for us. A must see if you have any interest whatsoever in history, film-making, politics or sattire as an art-form.", u'0.214232', u'"The Great Dictator" (United Artists, 1940), became the long awaited talking debut of silent film comedian, Charlie Chaplin (who also wrote and directed), in a political satire on Adolph Hitler, only the way Chaplin dared to do at the time. He plays a Jewish barber and Hynkel, dictator of Tomania. Some of the humor cannot really be absorbed at first glance, but after repeated viewing, it gets better. My personal classic moment occurs with Chaplin in the barber shop working on a bald-headed customer by giving him a shave while listening to a classical composition on the radio, never missing a beat. Co-starring opposite Chaplin for the second and final time is Paulette Goddard as Hannah. Goddard became the only Chaplin leading lady to ever make a success on her own while the others just drifted to "B" movies or faded away. Jack Oakie as Napaloni, the Dictator of Bacteria (a spoof on Mussolini), appears late in the story but shares with Chaplin some of its brilliant comedic moments. Both Chaplin and Oakie earned Academy Award nominations for their performances (Chaplin for Best Actor/Oakie for Best Supporting Actor), but no wins. Henry Daniell as Garbitsch and Reginald Gardiner as Schultz also share the spotlight. Aside from Chaplin\'s screenplay in poking fun of its then current issues on European invasion by the Nazis, "The Great Dictator" expertly blends satire with dramatic overtones. Its closing scene in which Chaplin makes a speech pleading for all people to follow the path of peace, brotherhood and democracy, is not to be missed. Whether this movie is above or beyond the Marx Brothers\' "Duck Soup" (Paramount, 1933) is anyone\'s matter of taste.', u'0.331732', u'Hynkel, dictator of Tomania, is a spoiled child who becomes angry when he cannot gets what he really wants... And what he simply wants is nothing less than the world...\n\nIn one of the extraordinary scenes of Chaplin art, Hynkel performs a ballet with the \'world\' which bursts when he thinks he has it in his grasp...\n\nChaplin also has some biting words on war and war films... In a scene at the beginning of the movie, which takes place during World War I, the Tomanian messenger crashes the plane and thinks... He is about to die... In a state of delirium, he begins to say ridiculous words... The empty double-talk continue ascending into a brilliant take off on all the heroic death scenes of War films...\n\nIn another scene when he becomes a fugitive in the Jewish ghetto and assumes command of the resistance fomenting rebellion among the old men, he plans to kill the dictator... One of the group must kill the ruthless conqueror of Austerlich... Whoever is chosen will naturally die, but his heroic death will be rewarded and his name will shine like a star in Tomanian history...\n\nThe sequence in which he and four other characters eat cream cakes containing coins to determine which shall sacrifice his life to murder the dictator is a bitter hilarity filled with great fear...\n\nFor all its disappointing shortcomings, "The Great Dictator" is still a significant movie for the ironic tones of the film adding something that neither Chaplin nor anymore else could have given it: the irony of history... The necessity to murder Hynkel presages the assassination attempt against Hitler by his generals... The force of the original satire is only surpassed by history\'s imitation of art...\n\nWith a splendid sequence like the duck-shooting accident which leads to the dictator being mistaken for the humbly Jewish barber and vice versa, "The Great Dictator" is Chaplin\'s first talking movie... This time \'Charles\' and not \'Charlie,\' wanting to say more through his movie and not through an amusing comedy, the last in which he uses his celebrated \'Tramp Character.\'', u'-0.274652', u"I agree that the final speech is powerful, and stirring. It made my heart hurt (in a good way ;-) But I also have to say that the comedy is first-rate. When the Charlie and the pilot are unknowingly upside down and chatting away...when the pilot is serenely reminiscing about his girlfriend back home even as the downed plane plows right into the ground...when Hynkel delivers this vitriolic diatribe about 'the Juden' and the blandly impassive translator says, 'the Phooey has just made reference to the Jewish people' and 'the Phooey's heart is full of love to all mankind,' ...when Hynkel strips his hapless henchman of all his beautiful medals, spitting and fussing a mile a minute...I could go on and on! I think no one else on earth could play Hynkel as hilariously as Chaplin, but it might be fun to imagine modern comedians trying. ;-)", u'0.417548', u"Here we have the inimitable Charlie Chaplin forsaking his slapstick past to tackle the serious subject of anti-Semitism, and intolerance in general. He portrays two characters - the sweet, innocent Jewish barber - a war veteran, and the raving and ruthless dictator, Adenoid Hynkel. The Jewish ghetto in this country is not safe for long, due to the whims of Hynkel and his armed thugs, who routinely rough up its residents, or leave them alone, dependent upon his mood that day or week. The barber is among them, but is befriended by his former commanding officer, Schultz (Reginald Gardner), who seems to keep things quiet for a while, until Hynkel condemns him to a concentration camp. He seeks refuge with the Jews in the ghetto, most specifically the barber, and the feisty young woman, Hannah (Paulette Goddard). The premise will be - who will be the one among these Jews to put their lives on the line to get rid of Hynkel and his cronies? We needn't guess too hard to know the answer; the barber is a dead ringer for the dictator, and he is outfitted in his image, accompanied by Schultz, also in full military gear. Hannah escapes with several of her ghetto friends to the country of Osterlich, where Mr Jaeckel's (Maurice Moscovich) cousin has a farm, and they can live peaceably for a while. At this point, Hynkel himself has been arrested by his armed forces, thinking him to be the notorious barber. The latter, meanwhile, has been escorted with Schultz to a podium, to make a speech announcing the conquest of Osterlich. The ensuing ten minutes is pure Chaplin himself, speaking from his heart of tolerance, love and freedom, and denigrating greed and hatred. Albeit Chaplin started production on the film in 1937, it can be forgiven some naivete. He was allegedly unaware of the gravity of this persecution and hatred, and said had he known the full extent, he would never have made the film, because he most likely believed it would have trivialized the situation. He has a marvelous supporting cast: Reginald Gardner, Henry Daniell as Garbitsch, his aide-de-camp, the always wonderful Billy Gilbert as the bumbling Herring, Paulette Goddard, Jack Oakie as the dictator Napaloni, his rival for conquest, veteran European actors David Gorcey (Leo's father), Maurice Moscovich, among others. The scene he choreographed with globe, with just a musical accompaniment is sheer, luminous inspiration, and luminous, as well, is Paulette Goddard at the film's end, smiling through her tears. I have seen this film before, but there is always something new in it for me. Last evening, when it finished, I sat there in tears. I defy anyone not to be moved by it.", u'-0.242705', u"\nBefore I saw this film I didn't really expect to much from it, although my friend advised otherwise. Due to this request from my friend I decided I was really going to watch this film. The minute I sat down to view the film I was absolutely blown away. From the credits I was falling of my seat; I just couldn't contain myself. The film is about Hitler in all the glory of comedy. Hynkel is the absolute double for the Jewish Barber, who comes back from fighting in the war. Due to the heroics of the barber, he manages to save one of the germans and by doing that gets a member of the enemy on board, which helps in the struggle which the jews had. But things went wrong and Stolz was arrested, but only then to escape to the confines of the Jewish surburb, 'The Ghetto'. Due to this escape, the german army began searching which meant that the Barber and Stolz got arrested but again they escaped, only to be mistaken for hynkel and consequently takes his poistion. *****THE SPEECH THAT CHAPLIN MAKES AT THE END IS FANTASTIC, IT COMPLIES THE MORALS WHICH SOCIETY COULD ONLY DREAM ABOUT. IN THE SPEECH IT CONTRADICTS THE WHOLE MEANING OF THE FILM BECAUSE OF THE SERIOUNESS AND SINCERENITY WHICH IT ENTAILED, AND IT DEFINATELY WORKS, BECAUSE I DID WALK OUT FEELING GUILTY ABOUT HOW WE LIVE OUR LIVES, LOOKING AT THE SMALLEST THING SUCH AS BEING IGNORANT TO SOMEONE TO THE BIGGEST, MOST PROMINENT THINGS SUCH AS WAR.\n", u'-0.204081', u"This ingenious and innovate comedy packs many moments priceless and great sense of pace, though overlong. Chaplin's satire with several classics scenes , he has dual role as a Jewish barber and dictator Hynkel, an offensive portrayal of Hitler . Then the barber is mistaken for the Hitlerian tyrant and happen bemusing events. Funny and extraordinaries acting of all casting, as the co-stars Jack Oakie as Napolini(Mussolini-alike), Henry Daniel as Gasbstich(Himmler-alike) and Billy Gilbert as Herring( Goering). Chaplin's first spoken film is brilliantly photographed by Karl Struss.This splendid film contains numerous amusing scenes, the funniest are the following : 1) The one when during the WWI the barber-soldier along with a co-pilot are flying in a turned plane without aware 2)Dictator Adenoid Hynkel doing overacting speeches including a twisted microphone 3)Hynkel playing with an enormous balloon of the world 4)The Jew-barber shaving a man fitting to Hungarian Dance number 5 of Brahms 5) when Hynkel and Napolini each try to keep his body higher than other in a barber's chair; among them.\n\nHitler banned movie exhibition to the Germans due to its satire of him, and put him in his death list after his proposed conquest of America.The movie is co-starred by Paulette Goddard, third of his four wives , they were married in 1936, although no announcement of the marriage was made later, one time finished The Great Dictator.The picture was released in 1940, when Chaplin had survived a moral scandal by a paternity suit but a brush with the House of Un-American Activities was the signal for the USA to refuse him re-entry from Britain and he fled to Switzerland.", u'0.0529367', u'The Great Dictator is Chaplin\'s parody about the Nazi Germany with scenes that make you laugh no matter in what mood you are.\n\nBeside this ,from my point of view the movie\'s best part is the superb speech by the Jewish Barber ,a speech\'s thoughts that if would existed a little bit in Hitler\'s mind too it would had a chance for the world too pas a second world war.\n\nThe Speech: "I\'m sorry but I don\'t want to be an emperor.\n\nThat\'s not my business.\n\nI don\'t want to rule or conquer anyone.\n\nI should like to help everyone: Jew, gentile, black man, white.\n\nWe all want to help one another.\n\nHuman beings are like that.\n\nWe want to live by each other\'s happiness, not misery.\n\nWe don\'t want to hate one another.\n\nIn this world, the good earth is rich and can provide for everyone.\n\nThe way of life can be free and beautiful but we have lost the way.\n\nGreed has poisoned men\'s souls, has barricaded the world with hate, has goose-stepped us into bloodshed.\n\nWe have developed speed but have shut ourselves in.\n\nMachinery has left us in want.\n\nOur knowledge has made us cynical, our cleverness, hard and unkind.\n\nWe think too much and feel too little.\n\nMore than machinery we need humanity.\n\nMore than cleverness we need kindness and gentleness.\n\nWithout these qualities, life will be violent and all will be lost...\n\nThe airplane and radio have brought us closer.\n\nThese inventions cry out for the goodness in man, cry out for universal brotherhood, for the unity of us all.\n\nEven now my voice is reaching millions, millions of despairing men, women and children, victims of a system that makes men torture and imprison innocent people.\n\nTo those who can hear me I say, do not despair.\n\nThe misery upon us is but the passing of greed, the bitterness of men who fear the way of human progress.\n\nThe hate of men will pass, and dictators die, and the power they took will return to the people.\n\nSo long as men die liberty will never perish.\n\nSoldiers, don\'t give yourselves to brutes, men who despise you, enslave you, regiment your lives, tell you what to think and feel, who drill you, treat you like cattle and use you as cannon fodder.\n\nDon\'t give yourselves to these men, machine men with machine minds and machine hearts.\n\nYou are not machines, you are not cattle, you are men! You have the love of humanity in you.\n\nDon\'t hate. Only the unloved and the unnatural hate.\n\nSoldiers, don\'t fight for slavery, fight for liberty! St Luke says, "The Kingdom of God is within man." Not in one man nor a group of men, but in all men. In you! You have the power to create machines, the power to create happiness.\n\nYou have the power to make this life free and beautiful, to make this life a wonderful adventure.\n\nIn the name of democracy, let us use that power.\n\nLet us all unite, let us fight for a new world, a world that will give men a chance to work, that will give youth a future and old age security.\n\nPromising these things, brutes have risen.\n\nBut they lie! They do not fulfill that promise. They never will! Dictators free themselves but they enslave the people.\n\nNow let us fight to fulfill that promise! Let us fight to free the world, to do away with national barriers, to do away with greed, with hate and intolerance.\n\nLet us fight for a world of reason, a world where science and progress will lead to the happiness of all.\n\nSoldiers, in the name of democracy, let us unite!"', u'-0.178067', u"\nI find this film remarkable. Here you have a man at the peak of his celebrity who has some moral responsibility. How rare! Imagine Michael Jordan risking all (and eventually losing all) in order to do the right thing. This film is a multidimensional risk: he is trying to master the talkie (though his talent is in the visual), he is trying to mix tragedy and comedy (always a hard mix, and nearly impossible when using current events) and he is trying to actually effect his audience, to counter evil in the land.\n\nOne must remember that when this was started, Hitler was generally admired in the US and essentially no one at all was standing up for the Jews. (In the film: `first we get the Jews, and then the brunettes.')\n\nI think he succeeds so far as the talkie, but he doesn't stand at the top of the heap, and several years before, the Marx brothers had made their own, superior, antiwar movie (Duck Soup). He succeeds in mixing comedy and tragedy only by alternating, and extending the length of the film.\n\nConcerning his effectiveness in countering evil: his impassioned speech at the end is powerful. But it appears to have had no effect whatsoever. This is the man that McCarthy and friends drove from the US! I think one of his mistakes was portraying the pogrom and invasions as the work of one man, rather than of a whole nation: Germans, not Nazis.", u'0.114276', u'\nSince enough plot elements have been discussed in previous reviews, suffice it to say that although I enjoyed this legendary Chaplin film, it is by no means a masterpiece. It\'s slow in getting started and then becomes a series of heavy-handed vignettes about life in the ghetto contrasted with the life of The Great Dictator, giving Chaplin a chance to emote in high style as both the tramp-like Jewish barber and as Adenoid Hynkel. His funniest bits are of course whenever he does a brilliant piece of "silent" acting with gestures timed to the background music--notably in the barbershop scene where a nervous customer gets a close shave. Unfortunately, none of the dialogue is as brilliant as his use of pantomime.\n\nIndeed, there is a heavy handedness about much of the story\'s pace and direction. It almost seems as though Chaplin told his actors to play against his comedy by keeping a sober straight face uppermost in mind--watch how Henry Daniell and Reginald Gardiner play their parts with that stiff upper lip approach. An exception is Jack Oakie as Napaloni, doing a brilliant take-off on Mussolini. As a poor Jewish waif, Paulette Goddard shows all the vivaciousness that made her a star in subsequent films throughout the \'40s. She adds warmth to all of her scenes with  Chaplin.\n\nSome of the gags are carried on at too great a length, outlasting their comic value. And criticism can be made of some of the sequences played against fake scenery when obviously a good deal of money was spent on the main sets. The station scene featuring Napaloni\'s arrival is staged on an obviously fake studio set where the painted scenery stands out like a sore thumb. Jack Oakie got his only Supporting Role Oscar nomination for this one and Chaplin won a Best Actor nomination.\n\nWhatever the shortcomings, it does manage to keep afloat with some very amusing sequences. Chaplin deserves credit for even attempting such a satire--especially considering this was near the outbreak of the U.S. entry into war. His scene with the globe shows off his rare comic timing.\n\nA final note: the six minute speech at the end seems improbable coming from the timid Jewish barber and strikes a false note because it\'s so out of character. Obviously, Chaplin intended it to give the film a personal message of hope.', u'0.0679817'], u'tt0053604': [u'Ohhh - after my 4th or 5th viewing, I think this may be one of the most remarkable blends of comedy and drama to have ever been filmed - THE APARTMENT - in subtle ways - rises well above the conventions of any genre. It was my introduction to the great Billy Wilder, and my fondness for Jack Lemmon (a remarkable and sorely missed actor) begins here as well.\n\n*SOME SPOILERS* \n\nThe cold take on the sex-and-money ethos to be found in many corporate environments hasn\'t dated one bit; it could be argued that THE APARTMENT stands a bit ahead of its\' time in the depiction of (what would appear to be) educated employees treated like (and feeling like) tools to be used in generation of someone else\'s income. Lemmon\'s character never forgets that he\'s disposable, even if the optimist in him hopes that something better may be found in his superiors. Deep down he knows this to be a pipe dream - the sexual adventurism of those same superiors betrays their utter lack of ethics. Of course, Lemmon\'s character isn\'t entirely above it all; he\'s been more than willing to hire out his own apartment as a place for his colleagues\' peccadilloes, in exchange for career advancement, which of course - as Wilder early on links amoral sexual conduct and professional/corporate/financial misconduct in a greater social critique - gets him into trouble.\n\nThe dialogue is - as is always true with Wilder - very finely crafted, yet seems natural - this film is a remarkable display of the kind of reactions any of us would offer in similar situations. Interestingly, our two protagonists are also wonderfully imperfect as human beings - Lemmon and MacLaine bear some responsibility for the very serious situations they\'ve gotten themselves into; they manage to realize this ("Be a mensch!" Lemmon\'s doctor neighbor exclaims) just in time to set things right. MacLaine in particular delivers a remarkable, complex performance - sweet and smart in her earliest scenes, bleak and emotionally ravaged in her climactic scene with MacMurray, naive elsewhere, sharp but hopeful at the end. The cinematography captures the entire cast beautifully - with minimal movement, abundant long takes, and a sleek lack of visual clutter, all of the principals are free to reveal their own best and worst impulses, within an environment that is stripped of artifice. The end result is a film filled with great moments one can easily identify with.', u'0.37274', u"\nWhat a wonderful way to spend an evening--dinner, Christmas and New Year's with CC Baxter (Jack Lemmon) and 'friends', accompanied by much champagne and laughter, and spaghetti and meatballs lovingly prepared by the host himself. There's even a game of gin rummy to get into that Baxter and Fran can't ever seem to finish--here's hoping it never does!\n\nTHE APARTMENT is one of those truly classic classic movies--for one thing, it has an absolutely top-notch cast, featuring Jack Lemmon (at his wryly humourous best); Shirley MacLaine (a glowing screen presence); Fred MacMurray (smarm personified); and a younger Ray Walston (still wisecracking, still hilarious). They also benefit from a clever, perceptive and timelessly relevant script by Billy Wilder, under his capable direction. Though there are plenty of brilliant one-liners, the best of the dialogue feels true and real, which adds to the feeling that you've known Baxter et al for years. I loved the score to the movie as well, artfully attributed to the Rickshaw Boys and used to great effect.\n\nThere are so many good moments scattered throughout the film (I can't even begin to enumerate them all here!). A lot of them are little touches that must have been added by the actors themselves (Jack Lemmon humming as he prepares the meatball sauce is just *so* funny!). I love the madness of the Christmas party scene, and when Baxter's doctor-neighbour takes charge of the situation with Fran, slapping her awake and marching her around the living room. I also love it when Baxter first starts playing gin rummy with Fran, and she reveals how she has a talent for falling for the wrong guy all the time. Best of all, Lemmon makes such a believable, sweet pushover that you often want to shake him and hug him at the same time--the things he would do for Fran! It makes his final scene with MacMurray that much more satisfying for the audience.\n\nIf you see this gem of a movie on a video store shelf, or (even better) playing in the cinema, don't let it pass you by. Join Baxter, Fran, Mr. Sheldrake and everyone else, and have a great time! ", u'0.462388', u"Written by the great filmmaker Billy Wilder, this is a serious, sardonic comedy for people who've known what's its like to feel the pressure of compromising your principles or your self- respect for the sake of getting ahead in life. And there are very few over the age of consent who haven't had to at one time or another. This isn't the laugh out loud comedy of Jim Carrey or the Farrelly brothers, but a subtle, nuanced comedy about two people who have both been jaded in love and yet continue to hope again and again that it will someday work out for them -- mainly because despite the unlikeable things they do, they are both basically decent, nice people. Flawed and even weak at times, but good people. This is a movie that doesn't just make it you laugh, it makes you think. A rare find indeed.", u'0.398169', u"\nBilly Wilder knew how to make a great movie. Of course it helps to have one of the greatest all-time actors, Jack Lemon, play in your movies, but Lemon aside, Wilder was a genius. His gift for the comedic moment showed brilliantly on screen and reached deep inside the audience.\n\nThe Apartment, the last of the great Black and White films, showed a bit darker side to comedy than some of his other romps such as the hilarious Some Like It Hot. Some Like It Hot is just as funny today as it was in 1959. It is pure fun. At no point in the film are we approached with anything that we would take seriously. Let's face it, most of us are not running from the mob disguised as a member from the opposite sex.\n\nThe Apartment, however, brings up much more human themes and issues. Wilder is an expert and at no time does he leave you worried that it will turn out badly. This is, after all, a comedy. One mistake in the script and the movie could quickly become a deep film about suicide, loneliness, and peer pressure, but Wilder balances the subjects on the edge of a knife and allows us to smile at what could otherwise be a very depressing movie.\n\nWilder and his films like The Apartment are very similar to Shakespeare's comedies. It can be said that the difference between a Shakespeare comedy and tragedy is often not the story, but the ending. In a comedy, everyone is married; in a tragedy, everyone dies. the same is true with The Apartment, it all hinges on the outcomes. If Kubelik dies or Baxter is left alone, the movie would be a tragedy. But since they prevail in the end, the movie comes off as a great comedic success, albeit a bit dark.\n", u'0.30665', u"\nAfter the first time I saw The Apartment, I admired it so much and placed it in my favorite  movies list. After watching it a second time on widescreen and digitally remastered DVD, my love for it just deepened. I was once again touched by Shirley MacLaine's portrayal of Miss Kubelik, a lovely but unlucky in love woman. I also laughed again at Jack Lemmon's perfect delivery of one-liners and other mannerisms. \n\nBilly Wilder made The Apartment right after the huge success of his last film, Some Like It Hot,  also with Jack Lemmon. The Apartment is not as funny, but it is more accomplished and deeper in meaning. Watching it in widescreen made me appreciate more the complexity of the story. Widescreen shots of C.C. Baxter's (Lemmon) apartment shows emptiness and loneliness. The shot of Baxter's office, which has employees in desks that seem to extend into eternity, shows that Baxter is just a faceless man in a populated world. \n\nC.C. Baxter is an ambitious employee in an insurance company. He tries to work himself to a promotion by allowing his philandering bosses to use his apartment as a perfect hideaway. As an exchange for the use of his apartment, his bosses put him in the top ten of the efficiency reports. After getting a promotion and successfully asking the elevator girl Fran Kubelik (Shirley MacLaine) on a date, everything was going well for Baxter. Until he finds out that Miss Kubelik is the mistress of his big boss J.D. Sheldrake (Fred MacMurray).\n\nMiss Kubelik and Sheldrake had a summer affair and Sheldrake wants Kubelik back admitting that he still loves her. Showing vulnerability, she agrees to get back together and ends up using Baxter's apartment twice a week. Naturally there will be problems. Sheldrake could not break up his marriage, and Kubelik does not like how the relationship is going but couldn't help being in love with him. Kubelik summed it up when she said `when you're in love with a married man, you shouldn't wear mascara.'\n\nFor Baxter, things couldn't be more complex. He wants to keep getting promotions but he might lose Kubelik in the process. He adores Kubelik but he doesn't want to be unemployed. Billy Wilder and I.A.L. Diamond's script couldn't have been better written. It ranks up there with the likes of great scripts of Casablanca and Citizen Kane. They filled it with small intricate details and such funny lines. The Apartment is very ingenious and inspirational. When I wasn't laughing, I was smiling. \n\nBilly Wilder perfected the style of satirical filmmaking. In The Apartment, he touches a lot of subjects. The movie deals with adultery, suicide, loneliness, and corporate cutthroats. The movie won five Academy Awards, including Best Picture, but surprisingly, no acting Oscars. I have seen many romantic comedies, and while many are good, most of them do not have the same heart and warmth as The Apartment. It is in my list of top ten favorite movies because it entertained me, inspired me, and showed me how to live\x85 human-wise. \n", u'0.334704', u'One of the finest examples of smart, satiric comedy-drama ever created for the screen. Jack Lemmon (in amazing comic form) plays a working stiff in Corporate America--via New York City--whose bachelor apartment inadvertently becomes a love-nest for amorous, married executives. The film is extremely modern for 1960 and features a non-stop barrage of funny, clever talk. Lemmon is a mad genius at frenzied (yet sympathetic) characterization, and "The Apartment" catches him at his professional peak in the movies. Working alongside huggable neurotic Shirley MacLaine (also at her peak) and shady Fred MacMurray (parlaying his slimeball role with curt persuasion), Lemmon creates a new kind of acting: screwball realism. **** from ****', u'0.587647', u'\nJack Lemmon is the man.\n\nThe Apartment really surprised me. The Best Picture winner starts off right in the middle of the action, but yet the first hour seems long and overrun. Too much time seems spent in trying to develop the characters (and oh so many of them) and not enough time is spent on just seeing what will happen. Just when I was about to lose faith, the film picks it up like I have never seen before. The whole sub-plot of the four guys wanting to use Lemmon\'s apartment for their evening tyrsts is dropped and Wilder smartly concentrates on Lemmon, MacLaine and MacMurray and the film creates true magic.\n\nThe Apartment is more of a drama than a comedy and balances the two elements perfectly. Just after one of the more dramatic moments of the film, we see Lemmon straining his pasta with a tennis racquet. The use of the doctor and his wife in supporting roles are completely there for comedy and yet add so much to the film. The ending also rates up there with the best of all time using an old device that doesn\'t seem at all cliched in this film. Some say that "Some like it hot" was Wilder\'s best, but now I have to disagree. The Apartment is better and surely would have made my top ten had the first hour not been so predictable.\n\nHow Jack Lemmon didn\'t win Best Actor is beyond me. His is a great performance, getting to act on more than one scale. MacMurray, another Wilder favourite is perfectly cast in the role of a family-wrecker. I wish they would have put a scene in which his wife confronts him with "The News". MacLaine glows on the screen even when she is sick and in bed.\n\nI fully recommend this film to all, it being Wilder\'s best makes it a must see.\n\n8/10 stars.', u'0.0339846', u"In the recent biography of Billy Wilder by Ed Sikov, it is mentioned that for the first time Wilder used as his protagonist a lovable loser. Think about it. In a whole lot of his previous films the main lead in Ace in the Hole, Double Indemnity, Stalag 17 are the people who are the takers as Shirley MacLaine describes Fred MacMurray here.\n\nIn The Apartment, it's the schnook that's took who the story focuses on. Jack Lemmon creates one of his immortal characters in C.C. Baxter, a minor cog in the machinery of the insurance company he works for.\n\nLemmon has maybe found a way to move up the corporate ladder, but it's driving him nuts. He lives on West 67 Street in Manhattan, a most convenient location for kanoodling. Only it isn't him that kanoodles. One time he allowed one of the middle level managers to use his apartment for a little nookie. One guy tells another and so on and so on and pretty soon Lemmon can't call his place his own.\n\nIn walks big boss Fred MacMurray to seemingly save the situation. But it turns out he only wants exclusive use for himself and he actually does vault Baxter several steps up the corporate ladder. And unfortunately MacMurray is currently kanoodling with elevator operator Shirley MacLaine who Lemmon has a thing for.\n\nThe Apartment was years ahead of its time in that it was one of the first major films to deal with sexual harassment. The whole group of middle executives Ray Walston, David Lewis, Willard Waterman, David White and the big cheese Fred MacMurray just look on that insurance company as one gigantic harem. As typical for 1960 note there are no women in any managerial positions at all.\n\nFred MacMurray almost didn't play Mr. Sheldrake. Paul Douglas was cast originally, but died suddenly just before shooting on The Apartment commenced. MacMurray stepped in and got great critical reviews for another effort with Billy Wilder as a heavy. MacMurray was also starting at this time a long run in the family comedy My Three Sons on television. There would be no more bad guys in his future.\n\nBilly Wilder held out in casting for Jack Kruschen as Doctor Dreyfus the next door neighbor who is available to save Shirley MacLaine's life. The folks at United Artists were ready to sign Groucho Marx for the part. Wilder's faith in Kruschen was justified, he got an Oscar nomination for Best Supporting Actor, but lost to Peter Ustinov for Spartacus. \n\nLemmon and MacLaine were also nominated for the leads, but failed to win. But The Apartment was chosen Best Film of 1960 and Billy Wilder was Best Director.\n\nAlso look out for a biting performance by Edie Adams who really makes her role count as MacMurray's secretary and former flame. During a Christmas party she tips off MacLaine to MacMurray's philandering ways and then later on brings the house of cards all around Fred.\n\nThe Apartment is so timeless in so many ways although women in the workplace have made great strides in the last 46 years. One thing though that does show how dated it is. It's mentioned that Lemmon pays $94.00 a month, presumably rent controlled, for a one bedroom apartment in the West Sixties in Manhattan.\n\nNow that is dated.", u'-0.0902811', u'Billy Wilder\'s "The Apartment" is a film which can produce some of the biggest laughs and at the same time... can bring many viewers to tears, Billy Wilder\'s quaint little tale about everyday people who get tangled up in love, jealousy and infidelity boasts a top-notch cast led by the trio of Lemmon, MacLaine and MacMurray who are tremendous. The plot revolves around C.C. (Lemmon) who unknowingly makes the unethical attempt of climbing the corporate ladder by \'loaning\' his apartment to members from his management chain to entertain their \'women on the side\'. Given the change of circumstances, this premise certainly could even hit home in the current office environment. Although the office party and secretarial gossip scenes could be viewed as dated, the power and attitude of the corporate executive, Mr. Sheldrake (MacMurray) is certainly symbolic. The character of Fran (MacLaine) for today\'s standards of course seems too submissive and vulnerable but the reward of her finding true, admirable, unconditional companionship is quite enriching and fulfilling to any who see this memorable film.', u'0.213532', u"A struggling office worker in a giant insurance company lends his apartment to higher ups in order to get a promotion. Set during the Holidays, the theme of infidelity turned a lot of viewers off. The Holiday setting however is what provides a lot of the film's best scenes, as in the fantastic office Christmas party where the secretaries are doing a CanCan on the table and couples are making out in the corner. The one-two punch of Jack Lemmon's classic performance and that of Fred MacMurray is fabulous, and the triangle of sorts that forms with Shirley McClaine makes this much more than the comedy that it is known for.", u'0.201218', u'In the beginning of The Apartment we see C. C. Baxter (Jack Lemmon) being lost in a sea of desks within a gigantic office room. He works for a huge New York insurance company employing over thirty thousand souls spread over twenty-seven floors. Sometimes he is working overtime; "It\'s not like I was overly ambitious..." Baxter tells us defensively. "You see, I have this little problem with my apartment\x85 I can\'t always get in when I want to." \n\nThe reason are several superiors, to whom he is lending his apartment for their extra-marital escapades. In exchange they promise to give his career a push by passing recommendations to the personnel manager, Mr. Sheldrake (Fred MacMurray). Although Buddy Boy (that\'s his disrespectful yet firmly established nickname) is daily surrounded by hundreds of people, he is drowning in lonesomeness. Apart from his mocking colleagues, there does not seem to be any family or close friends. In fact, the only decent person among his acquaintances is his neighbour, Dr. Dreyfuss (Jack Kruschen), ironically under the wrong impression that the man next door is a womanizing drunkard. \n\nSo Baxter meekly adapts to the mercilessness of corporate life, putting all hopes of happiness into his career. His free evenings consist of watching TV, preparing dinner or cleaning up after the occupants of his apartment. Yes, one could say that Baxter does not exactly lead a joyful life. \n\nYet, there is something, or rather somebody carrying light into the loner\'s gloominess when he falls in love with the pretty elevator girl Fran Kubelik (Shirley MacLaine). Although Fran likes him for his decency and kindness, she does not quite share the feelings of her ardent admirer. But Buddy Boy refuses to notice any signs of unrequited love and eventually talks her into going out with him. You can imagine how Baxter feels when she fails to turn up, and how things get significantly worse when he finds out that she is actually having intimate meetings with the personnel manager Mr. Sheldrake in HIS apartment. The image of purity Baxter had of Fran is gone. On Christmas Eve, he decides to drown his broken heart in a bar while his apartment is occupied by the cause of his misery. But Fran doesn\'t feel any happier than Baxter, and with the depressing effect Christmas can have on the lonesome and desperate, the story threatens to take a turn into tragedy... \n\nIt is hard to pin The Apartment on a single genre. The sharp, witty dialogue as well as Jack Lemmon\'s hilarious mimic would hint at a romantic comedy. Yet, one cannot overlook the tragic elements which let us dive into thoughtfulness, but never too deeply. Then again the film works on a satiric level, operating as cynical social commentary on corporate culture in the sixties (which is not very unlike today\'s business life). The remarkable thing about this film is that these three qualities merge perfectly into each other without ever losing the balance. The Apartment is a most entertaining picture, sometimes rushing from one hilarity to the next, and then suddenly slowing down to leave room for contemplation. Sometimes uplifting, sometimes depressing, sometimes both at the same time. Billy Wilder mixed these contrary moods, and most amazingly, it worked out just fine. \n\nFirst and foremost The Apartment deals with loneliness and the everlasting search for unaccomplished love. "I used to live like Robinson Crusoe. I mean shipwrecked among 8 million people. And then one day I saw a footprint in the sand and there you were." Baxter tells Ms Kubelik. Does any relationship ever work out the way one dreamed it would? Additionally the film points out how people let themselves be treated badly out of total lack of self-esteem. Standing up for oneself and saying the simple word "no" can sometimes be an art of its own. \n\nAs an able filmmaker and scriptwriter (together with I. A. L. Diamond, "Some like it Hot"), Billy Wilder once again produced a film classic of outstanding quality. I have yet to see another picture, equally consistent at providing such humorous and well-timed dialogues. The amount of memorable quotes is remarkable and the entire cast did a terrific job at delivering them. Moreover, Wilder chose to shoot in black and white widescreen, shining with beautiful cinematography, and thereby gave the film a very special melancholy mood. \n\nMaybe the greatest strength of The Apartment is its honesty. It doesn\'t lie to us by painting images of perfect love or of perfect people. Neither does it create scenarios of utter hopelessness. However, it shows us that although life can be unfair on default, everyone is responsible for oneself to work up the courage to achieve happiness. With the director\'s cynical, yet comic approach to life, the film takes itself serious and it doesn\'t. It lets us taste the bitter and the sweet, thereby lending itself a tone of reality. For that reason alone I don\'t feel cheated by The Apartment and its story never failed to cheer me up. Then again, I may be too much of a pessimistic optimist.', u'-0.0578664', u'Billy Wilder has made some tremendous satires. "Sunset Boulevard" is one of the greatest satires on film. "The Apartment", though not as cynical, is a very good one as well. I like that the satire is a backdrop for the main love story, and yet an integral part of it. The film shows just how much people are will to prostitute themselves in order to get what they want, whether that be a family or an executive office. Wilder handles some very serious and bawdy themes with a precise touch. This film could have easily turned into a wacky comedy of errors, but he is much to talented and sympathetic for that. He gives Baxter\'s character some sincere emotional depth. I could almost feel his loneliness and longing in many scenes. He is never really sure what he wants and how he can get it. He is a man searching for something, and he doesn\'t quite know it. Lemon plays this role to perfection. He doesn\'t go overboard. He gives the character the right amount of silliness and charm. McClaine is very strong. Her character is not stereotyped. She is a wounded soul that is looking for respite in the absolutely wrong place. I found her very charming and lovable. Some much of the film is in the wonderful cinematography. Wilder uses the widescreen to its fullest capability. The framing is so precise. You get a feeling of utter separation and distance. I really like the nearly infinite succession of desks in the office.', u'0.339621', u'\nBilly Wilder\'s "The Apartment is his greatest accomplishment. It is his most successful melding of comedy and drama that he never quite pulled off again. I\'m glad the Academy had enough good taste to award Wilder The Triple Crown: Best Picture/Director/Screenplay. But they still had enough bad taste to deny Jack Lemmon a Best Actor award, Shirley MacLaine a Best Actress award and Fred MacMurray a nomination and award.\n\nThe plot this time: C.C. Baxter (Lemmon; in case you\'re wondering: "C for Calvin C for Clifford, but most people call me "Bud")lends out his apartment to executives for their extramarital trysts in the faint hope of a promotion. Eventually, his boss, Sheldrake (MacMurray, excellent in a rare straight role) finds out and wants the key for his own affairs. Meanwhile, Baxter has a crush on Miss Kubelik (MacLaine, in a strong performance)the elevator operator.\n\nFor those who accuse me of spoiling the whole movie: rest assured. This only covers the first 20 minutes or so of the 126 minute feature. Wilder has many twists and tricks up his sleeve and I\'ll leave you to discover what happens. What amazes me about "The Apartment" is that unlike most films, this isn\'t about the plot. It\'s a study in human nature and the mistakes they make. That is a strong trait of most Wilder films (including "Kiss Me, Stupid" and "The Fortune Cookie", both hilarious comedies with a hidden meaning)\n\nAlso the dialogue by Wilder and I.A.L. Diamond isn\'t just one-liners (although they are funny; especially when spoken by Lemmon and Ray Walston)There is real heartfelt sentiment here and it isn\'t the syrupy kind that makes my stomach churn (as in films like "Patch Adams") Wilder allows enough to make his points and then gets back to comedy.\n\nThe cinematography is fabulous too. Wilder\'s film (as most of his 60s films) is in widescreen Black and White (shot by Joseph LaShelle, in Panavision; one of the most unsung and unrecognized cinematographers in history, he was nominated but lost) It has a crisp,clean look and is one of the few widescreen films that actually make the viewer feel confined in a tight space.\n\n"The Apartment" is a superior example of the "serious comedy", films that work as both comedy and drama. Sadly, many of today\'s filmmakers have lost touch with this genre. I can\'t help but feel that the freedoms granted today that weren\'t in the 1950s and 60s haven\'t been an advance. They\'ve been holding us back. Smart characters have lost way to stupid and oversexed ones. That\'s a real shame and it\'s high time we go back to our roots.\n\n**** out of 4 stars', u'-0.0851834', u'For me Billy Wilder has always been one of my all time favourite directors and he has not made a single film that has not appealed to me. Billy Wilder sums up perfection all his films manage to succeed in what they set out to do. Billy Wilder is not just one of the greatest directors; he is also one of the finest scriptwriters ever. Creating flowing dialogue like no other and perfectly making his actors and actresses work with the script brilliantly. Billy Wilder has made dark noirs, hilarious musicals and studies of human nature. It is extremely difficult to fully describe a director as versatile and genius as Billy Wilder. His films have held up for generations and will continue to have the same mass appeal that his films have had since their opening days.\n\nOn the surface The Apartment might seem like a comedy and yes that\'s what it is on the surface. Once you start watching The Apartment you realise that actually it is a very dark film underneath and actually has characters that contemplate suicide. The fact is that The Apartment captures the realism of the everyday workman and makes you laugh as well as feel pity. The script is what keeps the film moving and shows how the characters in The Apartment change as the film progresses. The Apartment is about becoming somebody rather than being something that someone uses.\n\nJack Lemmon creates C.C. Baxter the young aspiring workman who just wants to have a good career and the perfect woman. Though something always goes wrong and he\'s perfectly able to get a woman, but not the one he wants. At times you pity C.C. Baxter because he\'s so kind to everyone and never gets the thing he wants in return because something will always get in the way. I think there are times in every man\'s life where you probably feel like C.C. Baxter in one way or another.\n\nJack Lemmon perfectly progresses with his character to make himself one of the most distinguishable character actors ever. Jack Lemmon works with an elegant skill at comedic performances and always captures the true essence of his characters. He seems to be one of those actors who are able to find the perfect chemistry with his fellow cast. What makes C.C. Baxter so brilliant is the fact he stands for everything the film is about. He becomes one of the mot uplifting and joyous ever put on screen. Shirley MacLaine is also excellent as the lovable Fran Kubelik (C.C. Baxter\'s heartthrob). From first impressions you\'d think she is a beautiful and happy women, but she\'s actually very different to what you might expect.\n\nThe script is fast paced, memorable and most of all it helps sum up all the characters so well. It\'s a script that works so easily with its actors and helps to make some of the most superb character situations. The script is realistic as well and actually does feel like the kind of talk that would be used in similar situations in life. The script is extremely natural and the subtle undertones prove Billy Wilder\'s crafting of intellectual film-making.\n\nThe film is actually very similar to that of its A Wonderful Life and you could say Jack Lemmon is very similar to that of James Stewart. The direction is simple and fulfilling. It captures the image of "the apartment" perfectly and though just like any other New York apartment it feels extremely likable and memorable. The film\'s use of music is another high point and feels perfectly hand picked for the scenes it\'s used in. The film is actually quite sexually vibrant and does have many sexual undertones in its dialogue. Though subtle, it definitely is there and perfectly helps add more subtext to the film as a whole. A film to be studied in depth and not just watched.\n\nA film that never gets old and always manages to make the viewer feel uplifted with happiness. A first class example of perfected film-making you\'re ever going to see. Yes it\'s a definitive must-see, a masterpiece that was way ahead of its time and much more than just a movie.', u'0.606349', u'I would first like to make the comment that this is no comedy. For those that consider this film a valuable part of Hollywood cinema due to the comedic aspects need to get their eyes examined along with their minds. I do not think that I laughed at all during this film, but I would like to mention that I do not think that is a bad thing. Not laughing at this film means that it hit you at a different level. I witnessed a beautiful film with some highly intelligent actors painting a dark and disturbing picture of a sexual world circa 1960. I suppose I was thinking that this was going to be a "screwball" comedy, which completely threw me off balance when the events of this film occurred. Never have I witnessed such a bold attack on the sexual revolution of the 60s and its effect on the business world. It was a slap in the face to see the way that Billy Wilder represented corporate America and honestly, it felt really good. To see this lonely man turned away from his apartment at all hours of the night because his boss needed a place to take their mistresses was sad, not funny, yet in The Apartment it worked beautifully.\n\nTo begin, this film revolved around the actors. If you would not have had such strong actors like Jack Lemmon, Shirley MacLaine, and Fred MacMurray honestly conquering their roles than this film would not have succeeded as it did. It won Oscars for a reason, and even watched by today\'s standard of Hollywood I think that everyone involved should be very proud. Their work was the best Hollywood had to offer. Lemmon successfully portrayed this hurt every-man that you could easily find yourself engulfed within. MacLaine, beautiful in her young age, was an emotional powerhouse. Her eyes could have told the story without any words. You could feel her emotions through her eyes, and it was outstanding. I must say that my favorite actor in this entire film was Fred MacMurray. His portrayal of the typical "boss" who seems to use his powers to control instead of help, was perfect. In fact, even if you watch the film today, you may still be able to see your boss in MacMurray\'s portrayal. For once, it was a solid cast. It had a structured story that was heightened by sublime actors that knew exactly what they needed to do. I would have to say that this is one of the greatest pairings in cinema history, these three together could have taken Hollywood by storm, and it is evident in The Apartment.\n\nAs I stated before, the characters are exceptional, but coupled with their performances is a rich story that seems developed well before its time. I was not expecting to see such a sexual driven film released from the 60s. Films of this nature typically hint towards sex, but never quite spell it out, but in The Apartment it is in your face throughout the course of the film. From the opening sequence until the end, sex seems to be the biggest underlying theme of this film. In the world of C.C. Baxter, all he seems to know is sex, business, and the occasional conversation with the elevator girl. You can\'t help but wonder if that wasn\'t what was going through the minds of our fathers as they headed to the corporate world on a daily basis. It was such a slap to the face of the day to day America. To think that in this nation portrayed with family values and moral uprising that The Apartment would emerge as the breakout film of 1960. It shocked me. I think the reason that it did so was because of the strong writing, the powerful story, and the emergence of such innocent "characters" (as mentioned above). There were moments during this film that I honestly wanted to walk into the television, tell everyone to stop, and explain what was happening because I didn\'t want anyone to get hurt in the end. Isn\'t that a sign of a long-lasting powerful film? To me it is.\n\nOverall, I must say that The Apartment left my jaw on the floor. While my wife will disagree with me, I thought that it was a brilliant moment in cinematic history. Jack Lemmon could not have been handed a greater roll, nor could he have pulled it off with such beauty and pizazz. The story will shock and amaze you for nearly two hours. We are taken into a world in which we feel comfortable in, we feel as if we have been there before, and we can only thank the imaginative mind of Billy Wilder for that. He takes those moments in our lives that we wholeheartedly want to forget and places them in the window for all to see. His mockery of corporations, of the small man working his way to the top, and the disasters that follow are nothing short of classic. I have never witnessed a film quite like this and I hope I never do again. The Apartment was a once in a lifetime enjoyment, and I cannot wait to revisit it soon to see what I may have missed! \n\nGrade: ***** out of *****', u'0.0709133'], u'tt0052357': [u'\nStarting in 1958, Alfred Hitchcock directed a remarkable sequence of films in a row, each of them a classic; Vertigo (1958), North by Northwest (1959), Psycho (1960) and The Birds (1963). Never has a director made four such genuinely great movies in such a short space of time, either before or since.\n\nThe pick of this high standard bunch is undoubtedly Vertigo. From the opening titles, with their circling spiral imagery, to the dramatic final scene this is a movie that takes you to a different time and place. Specifically, to a San Francisco of the past; full of deserted parks, discrete rooming houses, oddly menacing art galleries and florists where the customers enter and exit through the back door. Through this landscape wanders Jimmy Stewart, towering in the lead roll as a former detective recently retired after a bungled arrest leaves him with chronic vertigo. Plot machinations lead him to the alluring Kim Novak (one of Hitchcock\'s famous "blondes"), the young wife of a friend who has started behaving rather oddly.\n\n"To reveal more," as Leonard Maltin wrote, "would be unthinkable."\n\nWhile the performances of Novak and Stewart are memorable, the movie is really set apart by the intelligent script and the stylistic touches provided by the director. Hitchcock is in his very best form creating hypnotic scenes and a general sense of unease and dread in even the most banal of situations. He is aided in this by the wonderful score of Bernard Herrman. A particular favourite of mine is the extended (largely silent) segment where Stewart follows Novak for the first time. Nothing much happens, but the atmosphere of these scenes is enough to keep you on the edge of your seat!\n\nOne of the all-time greats. They definitely don\'t make them like this anymore.', u'0.273463', u'\nOne of the many things that made Hitchcock such a great director is that he did not just stick to the same formula time after time; all of his best movies have their own unique feel and characteristics.  "Vertigo" is particularly distinctive, both as a complex story filled with suspense, and as a fascinating study in psychological tension.  While it lacks the humor of some of Hitchcock\'s other masterpieces, and sometimes moves rather slowly, it is unforgettable, and a great achievement by the director and his cast.\n\nIf you have never seen it, you will enjoy it more if you do not know too much about the plot, although the actual story is somewhat secondary to the ways that the characters are tested and their weaknesses exposed by the various events.  Hitchcock uses a complicated story, interesting characters, lavish visual detail, and deliberate pacing, plus a fine musical score by the incomparable Bernard Hermann, to produce a mysterious, almost unearthly, atmosphere.  The tension rarely lets up, and the viewer is caught up completely in it, at times almost to the point of discomfort.  It\'s the kind of film that repays careful attention, as almost every moment is filled with significant detail.\n\nThere are also some great acting performances.  Jimmy Stewart is outstanding in a role far different from his usual screen persona.  He enables the viewer to sympathize completely with him, even as we cringe at many of his character\'s actions and decisions.  Kim Novak is completely convincing in a difficult dual role, and the movie would not have been as compelling without her fine performance.  The rest of the cast all have much smaller roles, but are all quite good too, especially Barbara Bel Geddes as Scottie\'s (Stewart\'s) old friend, who provides important insight into Scottie\'s character.\n\n"Vertigo" is a classic by any standard.  It\'s a must-see that remains just as impressive with each viewing.', u'0.525688', u"Over the years, this film has been regarded as one of Hitchcock's masterpieces. Its been called the most personal, emotional, and complex of Hitchcock's films. I agree with all of these things except for one, this film IS Hitchcock's masterpiece work. All of the others pale in comparison to this. There are phenomenal performances here by Jimmy Stewart who plays the biggest anti-hero of his career and Kim Novak whose stunning beauty and exceptional personalities shine through this dark film. Barbara Bel Geddes provides great support as well. Everything about this film, the cinematography, the story, the depth, etc. leaves you mystified and transfixed on this dizzying, surreal artwork of a film. It truly is flawless. If you are a Hitchcock fan and haven't seen this you need to get up right now and buy, not rent, this as soon as possible!", u'0.678936', u"\nI have seen ALOT of movies in my life, but none have moved me the way Vertigo has...It's simply brilliant...the more times one views it, the more one picks up from it...a true masterpiece from the master himself...When I think Vertigo, I think the colors red and green...when I think Vertigo I think obsession with love, and the film itself...This movie is so deep that you could write a thesis on it and keep adding to it from time to time...Hitchcock really gave his all in this picture...it's about the ultimate love...wanting to achieve the ultimate love, and, as happens in life, never having love turn out to be the way we want it to be...all star performances by Stewart, Novak and Bel Geddes make this visually stunning masterpiece a true film classic...Newly restored, the DVD version simply blows you out of the water....I have seen the movie about 20 times now, and everytime I love it more...Vertigo is the ultimate cult film for me, as I keep going back to it more and more...considering it's dark storyline, it must be a glut for punishment, but Hitch only keeps me wanting more....10 stars...only because I can't give it 100 stars!", u'-0.822514', u"Although it got at best mixed reviews when first released, Vertigo is now considered one of Alfred Hitchcock's classic films. A tribute to the players, the director, and the composer of that haunting musical score that will stay with you forever.\n\nThe music is probably more important here than in most films, let alone most Hitchcock films. Because for most of the first half of the film and a great deal of the second half, it is without dialogue. In fact Kim Novak does not have a spoken line until about 48 minutes into the little more than 2 hour feature. She's under James Stewart's surveillance and the whole story of his growing obsession with her is told through his facial expressions and through Bernard Herrmann's music.\n\nStewart is a cop retired on disability who is hired by an old college friend Tom Helmore to follow his wife. Helmore tells Stewart a tale about his wife falling under the spirit of her dead great grandmother who committed suicide. The wife he's following is played by Kim Novak. Novak in fact makes a suicide attempt and by jumping into San Francisco bay and Stewart jumps in and saves her.\n\nIn a brief prologue the reason for Stewart's disability is told. While on the police force, he lost a man while pursuing the suspect in a rooftop chase. Another cop was killed trying to save Stewart who had slipped and was hanging on to a roof gutter for his dear life. After that Stewart acquired an understandable fear of heights with accompanying dizziness, vertigo.\n\nLater on at an old mission which has significance for Novak's family, Novak runs up to the top of the bell tower and Stewart because of his Vertigo can't pursue her to prevent her from jumping off and taking her life.\n\nLater on he spots Kim Novak again with a different color hair and this time essentially stalks her until they meet. By now he's totally obsessed with the dead Novak who he fell in love with.\n\nAlfred Hitchcock is plumbing some depths of the human psyche in Vertigo. Certainly good old all American Jimmy Stewart would not be one you would think of casting as a voyeur and a stalker. But he pulls off the performance in probably the film with the least dialogue Alfred Hitchcock ever made since sound came in.\n\nKim Novak is hauntingly beautiful in Vertigo, she has to be or the whole plot would make no sense. Barbara Bel Geddes is in this also as Stewart's girl friend who finds herself losing him to an obsession with a ghost. She also serves as a sounding board for Stewart as he expresses some of his feelings to her.\n\nThis was the first of two films Stewart and Novak made together. Ironically enough the second one, Bell Book and Candle, is about a witch played by Novak who actually uses witchcraft to ensnare Stewart. Given Stewart's obsession with Novak in Vertigo, if Hitchcock had thrown in witchcraft into the plot, the audience would certainly have believed it.\n\nOf course this is an Alfred Hitchcock film and therefore not all is as it seems. I can't sat any more, but there are no happy endings for anyone in this haunting film.", u'-0.097361', u'John "Scottie" Ferguson is a San Francisco cop who decides to quit the service after his acrophobia results in him being unable to save the life of a colleague. Whilst taking it easy he gets a call from an old school friend, Gavin Elster, asking him if he wouldn\'t mind doing a little bit of detective work for him. The job is simply to tail his wife because she\'s obsessed with an ancestress who committed suicide, and the wife, Madeline, is showing signs of herself being suicidal. Ferguson tails her diligently and as the tail progresses, Ferguson himself starts to become ever obsessed about the demur blonde Madeline. As the story twists and turns, Ferguson\'s obsession will have far reaching consequences for both parties... \n\nVertigo is Alfred Hitchcock\'s most discussed, dissected and critically reappraised film, based on a novel by Pierre Boileau called D\'Entre Les Morts, (also writer of Diabolique), Vertigo was not well liked on its release and unable to be viewed for some time due to copyright, the film was restored from a destroyed negative into a glorious 70mm print, and now in all its glory it can be seen as one of the greatest films to have ever been made. What is most striking about Vertigo, outside of Hitchcock baring his innermost that is, is that its plot on the surface is simplicity personified, but delving deeper, and repeat viewings are a necessity, its apparent that Vertigo is a chilling force of cinema, taking great delight in gnawing away at your perceptions, perhaps even your own capabilities as a human being. \n\nVery much a film of two great halves, Vertigo first seems intent on being an almost ghost story like mystery. Once the prologue has introduced us to Ferguson\'s fear of heights, we then enter an almost dream like sequence of events as Ferguson tails the troubled Madeline, the suggestion of reincarnation bleakly leading to death hangs heavy as Hitchcock pulls his atmospheric strings. Then the film shifts into dark territory as obsessions and nods to Dante\'s Inferno and feverish dreams take control, Hitchcock, as we have come to learn over the years, lays out his soul for us the audience to partake in, the uneasy traits sitting side by side with fascination of the story. All of which is leading us to a spine tingling finale that is as hauntingly memorable as it is shocking, the end to our own dizzying journey that Alfred and his team have taken us on. \n\nTechnically the film is magnificent, the opening credits from Saul Bass brilliantly prep us for what is about to unfold, while Bernard Herrmann\'s score is as good as anything he ever did, unnerving one minute, swirlingly romantic the next, a truly incredible score. Hitchcock himself is firing from the top draw, introducing us to the brilliant zoom-forward-track-back camera technique to induce the feeling of Vertigo itself, with that merely a component of two hours of gorgeous texture lined with disturbing little peccadilloes. The two leads are arguably doing their respective career best work, James Stewart as Scottie Ferguson goes real deep to play it out with an edgy believability that decries his aw-shucks trademark of years since past. Kim Novak as Madeline is perhaps the quintessential Hitchcock blonde, perfect with the duality aspects of the role and playing off Stewart\'s ever creepy descent with seamlessly adroit skill. It however should be noted that Hitchcock and his loyal subjects had to work hard to get Novak right for the role, but the result proves that Novak had ability that sadly wasn\'t harnessed on too many other occasions. \n\nVertigo is a film that I myself wasn\'t too taken with on my first viewing, it\'s only during revisits that the piece has come to grab me by the soul and refuse to let go, it not only holds up on revisits, it also gets better with each subsequent viewing, it is simply a film that demands to be seen as many times as possible. Not only one of the greatest American films ever made, one of the greatest films ever made...period, so invest your soul in it, just the way that Hitchcock himself so clearly did. 10/10', u'0.333254', u"\nI get a bit tongue-tied talking about Hitchcock's greatest movies because they are just so remarkable, so astonishing, so entertaining, so multi-levelled, that it's very difficult to put into words what makes them great. Hitchcock made some of the greatest movies ever made, and 'Vertigo', though by no means his most accessible film, is quite possibly his crowning achievement. It is without any doubt a masterpiece, and I cannot fault it in any way. Every time I watch it I am knocked out, and every time I see something new, some nuance or moment that I appreciate more than I did the previous viewing. Jimmy Stewart, one of the most popular movie star in Hollywood history, gives a remarkable performance throughout, one of the best in his career. Stewart had worked with Hitchcock before, and had always been superb, especially in the much copied suspense classic 'Rear Window' a few years prior to this, but he plays against type in 'Vertigo' and is jaw-droppingly good. It's difficult to remember now that 'Vertigo' is regarded as a movie milestone, that it received many bad reviews when it was originally released, and was a relative failure for Hitchcock. A lot of this had to do with Stewart's intense performance I think, and also the difficult subject matter. 'Vertigo' is essentially a tale of sexual obsession, something most people were probably not expecting at the time! Almost as good as Stewart is Kim Novak ('The Man With The Golden Arm') in a role that she will always be remembered for. 'Vertigo' is a virtuoso piece from Hitchcock, and a movie that will no doubt continue to inspire other film makers over the years to come. However the most important thing about it is that it is still  wonderful viewing, and a movie experience that you will never forget. In my mind it is one of the three of four greatest American movies. Simply astonishing.", u'0.611551', u'\nRetired detective, who is scared of heights, is hired to follow another mans wife and there follows intrigue, mystery and suspense.  A super melodrama! The acting,directing, sets, costumes, script, music, etc are all excellent. And near the start of the film there is one brilliant 10 minute period when there is no dialogue but the action is controlled only by the music. A sensational analysis of the movie is by Roger Ebert: see external reviews. This picture is worthy of maximum marks.  \n', u'0.447253', u'Although it was only modestly successful in theaters, time has been kind to VERTIGO and now many believe this is Hitchcock\'s masterpiece. Time was NOT kind to the original prints of the film, and in the mid-1990s Universal Studios put up one million dollars for a two-year restoration of the film. This is covered completely in a fairly fascinating 29-minute extra on the DVD, originally broadcast as an A&E special. The entire original film-making process is covered, the movie was first called "From Among The Dead", and includes current interviews with many principals, including Novak and Bel Geddes, plus the techniques used for the restoration. This special edition DVD should be a must-own for any fan of the film VERTIGO. The sound and picture are just fabulous for a film made in 1957.\n\nMy review, following, contains certain SPOILERS which are necessary for my summary. Please read no further if you have not seen the film. Watch the film first, you will not be disappointed.\n\nThe film starts with cops chasing a crook on SF rooftops, Scottie (James Stewart, 49) misses one roof, is hanging high from a gutter, cop returns to offer assistance, but instead falls to his death. This traumatic experience triggers the vertigo in Scottie, makes him unsuited for police work, he quits, and Midge (Barbara Bel Geddes) tells him only another emotional shock will bring him out of it. Midge, an artist, not so secretly wants Scottie, but while they are good friends, he just doesn\'t love her.\n\nOld college friend, wealthy shipbuilding magnate, hires Scottie to follow his wife who had been acting strangely. He meets Madaleine (Kim Novak, 24) and follows her to find that she visits the grave of Carlotta, who died at 25 in 1857, also visits the portrait of Carlotta at the art museum, has "visions" of being in a Spanish mission, all indications are that the dead Carlotta is taking over Madaleine\'s mind. While following her, saving her from a jump into SF Bay, and keeping her from jumping into the Pacific, Scottie is falling in love with her, the first time he has had such feelings.\n\nScottie feels he needs to take Madeleine to the old mission 100 miles south of SF to free her of this possession, but instead she climbs up the mission bell tower, Scottie is unable to follow quickly enough, his vertigo holding him back, he hears a scream, sees what looks like Madeleine\'s body falling to the red tile roof below, dead. A quick inquest ruled it a suicide, the friend gets out of shipbuilding, travels, while Scottie tries to get over his great loss, his first ever love, includes a stay in a mental hospital.\n\nNot too long after, Scottie sees a woman remarkably similar to Madeleine walking to her residence, a hotel, he follows her, knocks on the door, she is dressed differently, has different color hair, a different personality, speaks differently, and says she is Judy, from Kansas, has lived there 3 years, even shows Scottie her ID to prove it. But Scottie has not gotten over Madeleine, is obsessed with recreating her, asks Judy to dress like her, get her hair colored, all the while Judy just wishes Scottie would like her for who she is, not because she looks like someone else. But she gets completely back to the Madeleine look, same clothes, same hair color.\n\nBy now we have seen through Judy\'s flashback what is really going on. The wealthy husband had hired Judy to impersonate his wife, Madeleine, and had set up the incident at the mission so that he could shove the already dead wife off, Scottie would be the manipulated witness that she had climbed the stairs and jumped off, and after being paid off, Judy could resume her life. To her detriment, he also gave her the heirloom, Carlotta\'s necklace, and her wearing that is what got Scottie suspicious of the whole scheme. He catches on, brings Judy back to the mission, they climb to the bell, a nun approaches to see what is going on, Judy panics and falls to her death on the roof. Scottie no longer was in love with her, feeling lied to and manipulated, he has no emotion, but goes to the edge of the ledge and looks down, his vertigo gone. The emotional shock that Midge spoke of has cured him.\n\nThe story is a tragedy of two lives that only through misfortune become intertwined, Scottie\'s and Judy\'s. He is not young, now retired, and had never found true love. In Madeliene he thinks he found it, only to be shocked then disillusioned when the full truth came out. When Judy died, he was back where the film started. Maybe Midge was the one after all. Judy was very flawed, enough to participate in a murder plot and feel no apparent guilt over it. All she wanted was to be loved by Scottie, but a relationship built on fraud has no chance, especially since Scottie was an honest man.\n\nJames Stewart is known for his ability to play an "everyman" character, and is superb as Scottie. Kim Novak is a bigger mystery. She was not the first choice for the role, received it virtually by default, but after watching the movie it is hard to imagine anyone else playing the dual roles of Madeleine and Judy, she pulls it off so well. A big bonus is her commentary on the making-of extra, seeing her after all these years. She was only 24 when Vertigo was filmed, but she looked 40, a glamorous and beautiful 40. Actresses today who are 24 often still play teenagers. How things have changed in the movies!', u'-0.0501092', u'Vertigo divides audiences more than any other Hitchcock film.\n\nFor one critic it is "one of the four or five most profound and beautiful films the cinema has yet given us." A poll of 150 international critics has three times voted it the second greatest movie ever made (after Citizen Kane). However, many viewers find it a crashing bore.\n\nI have sympathy for both camps.\n\nVertigo is the film in which Hitchcock comes closest to dealing directly with his own personal demons. The surface story makes no sense by itself and only works if you respond to the powerful undercurrents in its subtext. But Hitchcock still has to get the surface story right. It must fully embody the subtext and engage with its audience. For many people, it doesn\'t quite do either.\n\nThe prologue leaves Scottie hanging over an abyss. By not showing his rescue, Hitchcock effectively leaves him hanging there for the rest of the movie and his vertigo becomes a metaphor for his spiritual condition; he is poised between a longing for life and a longing for death. In rejecting the (real) life-affirming Midge and in his infatuation with the (illusory) death-obsessed Madeleine, he makes his fateful choice.\n\nHowever, the prologue also supports a literal interpretation of his vertigo and the next scene doesn\'t really establish that Scottie\'s problems go deeper than his understandable fear of heights. We learn that he and Midge were once lovers but there is no follow through that explains why he broke off the relationship or why he becomes besotted with what we later learn is just a fantasy women.\n\nThe next scene, with Elster, is even more unfortunate and its defects reverberate throughout the movie. Elster could have been depicted as a sort of Mephistopheles, who sees Scottie\'s weakness and tempts him to his doom. In fact, he is thinly-sketched and is just a device for kicking off the story.\n\nMore crucially, he tells Scottie too much about Madeleine\'s obsession with Carlotta. This virtually forces Scottie into being the level-headed sceptic and makes his subsequent neurotic behaviour even more arbitrary and difficult to believe. It also undermines the ten-minute wordless sequence of Scottie trailing Madeleine around San Francisco.\n\nIf Elster has simply asked Scottie to investigate his wife\'s aimless wandering, we would have started out expecting something mundane (like an affair) only to be drawn into the much more intriguing mystery of her identification with Carlotta and her apparent sleepwalk towards suicide. As it is, the sequence merely confirms what Elster has already told us and often tries the patience of the audience. For many, the picture never recovers.\n\nMoreover, because Scottie\'s character is under-developed (and Stewart\'s performance is unable to realise what the story implies) the rest of the movie can be viewed as the tale of an ordinary man who becomes infatuated with an attractive, troubled, woman whose life he has saved. The shadow of Carlotta then becomes an incidental detail and we get only a weak sense that Scottie\'s love is an unhealthy obsession. His eventual break-down is then under-motivated and seems imposed on the picture rather than being integral to its structure (a feeling reinforced by Hitchcock\'s decision to present it in an abstract, symbolic way).\n\nI don\'t view Vertigo in this way, but I can sympathise with those that do.\n\nWith Scottie\'s breakdown, the picture reaches a second turning point. When Midge walks down the hospital corridor and the screen fades to black, it feels as if the movie is over. Of course it isn\'t and what happens next is crucial. Nothing up to that point makes any sense without it. But a second structural flaw immediately emerges. We are three-quarters of the way through the movie but only half-way through the story. Just when Vertigo needs time to re-engage our interest after the false ending it suddenly accelerates.\n\nWe get a montage that establishes Scottie\'s continuing obsession with Madeleine, then he spots Judy, follows her home and we are immediately plunged into a flashback that \'explains\' the plot. This meeting needed much better preparation and the subsequent relationship needed more time to develop.\n\nBy revealing the plot twist so early, Hitchcock is inviting us to see how self-defeating Scottie\'s neurotic behaviour really is: in recreating Madeleine he is inevitably destroying his own illusions. But he rushes through this process. We have no time to get to know the real Judy before we are confronted with Scottie\'s bizarre plan to transform her. Then, at the very moment the transformation is complete, Scottie immediately spots the deception so the picture gallops to its climax and then slams to a halt.\n\nAs a good professional, Hitchcock was wary about letting any of his pictures run over two hours, but if he wanted to impose this discipline on himself, then he should have been more ruthless in pruning the first half of the story. In fact, he should have just accepted that this story couldn\'t be told effectively in two hours and have let it run on longer.\n\nWe rightly admire Hitchcock\'s movies for their great set pieces, but tend to overlook their fragile story sense and relatively weak dramatic structure. Mostly, that didn\'t matter, but in an ambitious picture like Vertigo it is a fatal flaw.\n\nThere is much more to Vertigo than its detractors acknowledge, but it is far from being the near-perfect masterpiece that its most fervent admirers would have us believe.', u'-0.24359', u"Since there are already so many real good comments on this film I want to focus on only one aspect.\n\nVertigo is a great example for what color films really can look like! Not only do I want to praise the quality of the Technicolor dye transfer prints but also more the way Hitchcock used color to create moods. Many directors used light to create moods in black and white movies but only very few ever got so far as to use the much greater palette of colors for the same purpose. One wonders why. Some directors decide for an overall color look, which is often done in the lab, but not on the set.\n\nVertigo is full of scenes where the colors have been saturated or changed to create a special feeling. Hitchcock even went so far as to openly dye some frames is bright unnatural colors. He played around with colors in all his color films but never as much as in this one. Think for example on James Stewart's nightmare in the middle of the film. There are frames dyed purple and green; the cemetery scenes are red, inserted to the rhythm of the music with normal frames. Kim Novak is often bathed in colored light like in the famous hotel room scene, where she appears like a ghost with all the green light around her.\n\nThe shading is also important. In the scene in the bookshop we hear a dark and sad story while at the same time the light dimes down to simulate dusk. In the scene where Judy remembers the real events in the bell tower it starts with an outdoor scene, which we have already seen but it is now much darker than the first time. In the sequence where Stewart follows Novak to the cemetery everything feels unnatural since every scene glows through the use of a filter that creates a blur. \n\nThe non-color of Kim Novak's dress as Madeleine is also a very important aspect in the film. She has to color her hair to become Madeleine again at the end of the picture.\n\nThe way color is used in this film gives it this dreamlike quality that allows endless interpretations. A true masterpiece!", u'0.1192', u'\nAlong with "Psycho", Hitchcock\'s best film that wraps itself around the viewer very fast and never does let go. San Francisco detective Jimmy Stewart is slowly going crazy due to a failed mission which did not work because of his intense fear of heights. This is all front-page news of course and Stewart is shamed about the whole event. But a ray of light shines as he gets a job to watch a man\'s wife (Kim Novak) who is supposedly having an affair with another man. Stewart believes this is his chance to put the past behind him, but sometimes the future is even darker. Stewart falls in love with Novak and the love turns into a dark and twisted obsession that becomes deeper and deeper as the film progresses. When tragedy strikes, that is the end. Right? Not quite. An amazing screenplay and arguably Hitchcock\'s greatest directing venture make the film solid and Stewart\'s stunning performance raises the whole project to a classic level. Somewhat ignored around the awards circuit in 1958, but ages beautifully as the years go by. 5 stars out of 5. ', u'0.0687544', u'In Boileau-Narcejac\'s French novel "D\'Entre les Morts"= from among the Dead"),the revelation only comes in the last pages,but Hitchcock lets the cat out of the bag long before the end. Boileau-Narcejac\'s novel is a pure detective story,but the Master wanted more:the movie already outdistances the book in a first part visually wonderful,with memorable scenes,wrapped in mystery ,such as the one with the sequoia,symbol of immortality or the one down by the sea,to rival with the best romantic movies of all time.In the second part,Hitchcock explains in the Truffaut\'s book,we know but Scottie( James Stewart) does not .And he tries to recreate a dead woman,to transform Judy into Madeleine.This folie \xe0 deux ends where the first tragedy occurred ,which gives the movie a strength that the book had not.Read it and you\'ll realize how its end ,speaking in terms of cinema,had to be modified for the screen.That\'s Hitchcock\'s genius.\n\nWhen Boileau/Narcejac learned that Hitchcock wanted to transfer "Celle Qui N\'Etait PLus " (=les Diaboliques" )to the screen,they immediately wrote "D\'Entre les Morts " on the same pattern for Hitchcock to direct.', u'0.640563', u'\n****Spoilers Inside****\n\nI watched this so-called masterpiece for a class assignment (and I was actually looking forward to it, so I can\'t be held to expectations of poor quality), and I can only think of one word to explain my feelings on this movie:\n\nWHY?\n\nWhy is this considered one of the best movies of all time?  Why do people continually bow down to something just because it\'s "the definitive classic?"  Why did they leave the unnecessary 30-45 minutes in there?  Why was this film so horrendously acted, directed, filmed, and edited?\n\nWhere to go on... Ah yes.  The plot:\n\nThe plot was a wonderful concept.  A nice couple of twists, the story set up well and ready to hand off for a touchdown, but somewhere along the way, the runningback decided he should run a few laps around the field, in randomly alternating directions, before finally meandering in and taking a knee at the one-yard line and settle for a field goal.\n\nThe acting:  Stiff, over-done, "no-sir-audience-i\'m-not-reading-my-lines-from-cue-cards" crap.  James Stewart was quite possibly the worst choice.  He only has one speed: "Merry Christmas Bell Tower!"  Every movie I\'ve seen him in he\'s been the same idiotic dimwit.  His intended affable, lovable goofy exterior only irritates, frustrates and makes you want to set fire to the videotape or DVD it sullies.  Kim Novak was hardly any better.  Her cookie cutter character, "I-dare-you-not-to-love-me-NOWAIT-I\'m-untouchable-NOWAIT-help-me-NOWAIT-i\'m -insane" would have been served up more convincingly by James Stewart himself in a dress.  At least he has a whopping two modes to his emoting.\n\nEditing and Directing:  Why did Midge exist?  She provided no conflict save for that weird thing she did with the painting.  She provided no resolution. She didn\'t even serve as a voice of any particular sway (i.e. the viewer, the voice of reason, the voice of emotion etc).  An amazingly sexist viewpoint (I know, surprise, it was the 50\'s) pervades.  The women are stupid, naive, weak-willed and two-dimensional.  There were so many unnecessary camera shots, such as nearly all the various scenes during the "I\'m-following-Madeline-with-my-intense-stare-of-concern-and-intrigue" car sequences.\n\nQuite frankly, I\'m so disgusted with this movie, I can\'t really go on with any intelligent critiquing.  I wish I could say that we\'ve grown as an industry and learned our lesson about contrived, pointless plots with big names displaying less than tolerable acting capabilities, but only a fool would ignore Pearl Harbor.\n\nMaybe we can salvage the concept.  Do a remake.  Anything today would vastly improve upon this sorry waste of my time.\n\nMy score: .08/10 for the potentially breakthrough but saddeningly mundane plot.', u'-0.441022', u"Scottie Ferguson is a retired detective with a paralyzing fear of heights\x85 He had quit detective work after he sees a colleague falling to his death, and nearly he looses his own life at the same time while chasing a crook across some San Francisco rooftops\x85 \n\nAn old college friend gives him the job of following his blonde wife Madeleine who had some kind of mental problem or might even be possessed from beyond the grave by a figure from the past whose portrait she stares at in a museum\x85 \n\nScottie follows Madeleine around San Francisco and when she tries to drown herself in San Francisco Bay, he rescues her and falls promptly in love with her\x85 But Scottie' s vertigo made him powerless to save her when she climbed to the top of the bell tower at the mission at San Juan Batista, and jumped from the tower to her fatal end\x85 \n\nScottie must spend the second part of the movie regaining from the trauma\x85 His loyal ex-fianc\xe9e Midge helps him overcome his psychological torment\x85 \n\nOne year later, completely recovered from his nervous breakdown, he meets a red-haired woman who seems the living image of Madeleine...\n\nStewart gives a terrific performance of a man recognizing his own limits, suffering by his acrophobia... When he is given the chance to pursue this enigmatic woman, his boring life takes on new meaning... He is drawn into her romantic obsession with the past\x85 Madeline makes him feel important in her life\x85 This is something totally new to his world: a lovely straight-forward woman who takes him into a haunting dream... When he fails to keep her alive, his real world was suddenly shattered\x85 \n\nStewart delivers an accurate portrait of an annoyed human being searching for the unattainable\x85 He is a pragmatic man dealing with events in the light of his intuition\x85 \n\nKim Novak is so delicate as Madeleine\x85 Her performance is skilled and highly refined\x85 She is a pretty woman, very sensitive, not sensual, yet conscious of her charm and magic\x85 \n\nThis fascinating suspense masterpiece reveals something new with each viewing\x85 \n\nNote: Hitchcock appears after eleven minutes of the beginning of the film, walking past a Shipbuilding Co.", u'0.241838'], u'tt0093058': [u"\nStanley Kubrick's Full Metal Jacket seems like an uncompleted film, but to me that's poetic justice to one of America's uncompleted wars. The film is harsh and doesn't turn a blind eye to the atrocities of Vietnam. Kubrick is the true master of atmosphere in film. He makes you feel like you are there. Friends of mine have commented that they only like the first half of the film and that the second half falls apart. I believe Kubrick sets up the first half to be an understandable reflection of the terror that would eventually enter the lives of these soldiers during war. It is easy to identify with being picked on because we all have in some way. Not all of us, on the other hand, have fought in war. Kubrick is the master.  ", u'0.258555', u'NO SPOILERS! This is a review, not a synopsis. \n\nFirst of all I love Kubrick\'s work, so I came into this with a bias. However I have seen a lot of action and war films, and this one, to an individual who never went to war, seems the most true-to-life, taken as a whole. This IS how you have to look at this film, incidentally; trying to break it down into two or three parts and say which was better is missing the point of the film, I think. \n\nIn the same way that "Trainspotting" was an anti-drug film that did not gloss over anything, "Full Metal Jacket" is (for me) an anti-war film that stares straight at the ugliness of war and the potential for violence within almost all people, especially those trained, conditioned, even twisted, into military roles, without preaching even a single time. Less allegory and more applicability! Wonderful! \n\nThe camera work was superb. I felt like I was walking through the movie with the Marines, from the barracks to the battlefield scenes.\n\nI have seen others criticize this film for the voice over, but I felt that it was used sparingly, and was helpful, not overdone. The narrator doesn\'t say anything that seems out-of-place.\n\nOthers have commented on the music, the acting, and so on, so I won\'t add my repetitive comments, except that the drill sergeant is perfect!\n\nThe combination of the demented treatment the recruits receive in boot camp with the combined "hours of boredom, seconds of terror" feel of the Vietnam scenes is intense and not for everyone, but feels REAL.\n\n10 out of 10, perfect.', u'-0.145314', u"\nI like Kubrick's stuff. Generally any movie he directed was several notches, in quality terms, above any other director (particularly those working nowdays). Does `Full Metal Jacket' continue to show the mastermind behind `2001', `The Shining' and `Dr. Strangelove'? Yup, it does.\n\nAs plots go. there isn't much here. I don't particularly care because the script makes up for it. `Full Metal Jacket' is very much a movie of two halves - the first half dealing with a group of conscripts in training at military camp and the hardships they endure under their `hard-as-nails' instructor. The second half is about their exploits in Vietnam itself. Fights? In 'Nam? Haven't we seen all that before? Yes, but rarely with such an experienced hand at work. And it's the camp scenes that are so wonderful.\n\nGustav Hasford et. Al. have produced an excellent script, particularly for the opening hour. There's barely a moment's pause before you're thrown into the screaming face of Sergeant Hartman. He's hurling abuse at his new recruits with lines so forceful and sharp they'll have you gasping in shock while simultaneously laughing in incredulity. It's the way the script runs in without a pause for breath that helps so wonderfully - and the fact that it's so powerful. It's never just about one-liners from a sergeant, it's also telling a story about how humans work under these conditions. The first half is about how they suffer under their own at home (and very well told it is too), the second half about the human condition under the duress of war. It's an interesting comparison, and a tale well told. The battle may lack some sort of overall context or resolution, but then I feel that's in keeping with the movie - it's about the individual, and not the war, and such elements cannot be easily quantified.\n\nAll the characters have a grounded `real world' feel to them, due to both the material and the versatility of the actors. R. Lee Emery is viciously delightful as the manic Sergeant Hartman, while managing to add occasional touches of humanity and a `this is for your own good' attitude through subtle gestures. Matthew Modine is the amiable lead, Private Joker, and as such balances the hard and soft edges admirably (if not spectacularly). The other stand out though is Vincent D'Onofrio as Private Gomer Pyle, the recruit picked upon by Hartman and the other cadets. There's a wonderful innocence about him in the beginning, which transforms into a frightening hardening of his soul later on. The evil/beyond-hope look he gives later on (anyone who has seen the movie will know the one I mean), remains as the most frightening look I've ever seen depicted onscreen. All in all the cast accredit themselves well here.\n\nAnd so to the direction. It's Kubrick. It's good. Once more there's excellent cinematography - check out the haunting, almost claustrophobic landscapes of Vietnam. There's some lovely use of filters (that haunting blue). There's a brilliant subtle score, that's eerie when used, but never intrusive. There's a very good command of pace - the viewer is never left idle or bored, and the story (particularly in the tremendous first half) flows along smoothly. Great touches abound throughout - check out the many examples, such as the opening scene of Hartman marching right up to the recruits (and to the camera), spitting and screaming vindictive comments, almost as if at the viewer. Some may criticise the almost disconnected feeling you have in the battle scenes towards the end, but I found their stillness, their quietness, and raw power, far more effective than the flash-bang wizardry employed in tripe such as `We Were Heroes'. I can blather on about Kubrick for ages. so I'll stop now.\n\nIs `Full Metal Jacket' perfect? Not quite because of the `two halves' syndrome. Although they do contrast and complement one another, the first half is very much the stronger half. The second feels weaker against it. In and of itself the second half would normally be regarded well, but it doesn't have the visceral power that the first does. I love both bits, but I\ndo love one bit more. This makes the movie suffer just a little. There's so much to like here though that I can't criticise too much - and so much to cherish (especially in the lines delved out). Once more the main man succeeds. Definetely worth seeing. 9/10.", u'0.208746', u'\nLegendary Stanley Kubrick - probably the most ingenious film-maker of our time - directed only two movies in the 80\'s. Someone could thoughtlessly claim that it was a very bad and a slow decade for him but on the contrary: the films happened to be "The Shining" (1980) - the darkest, the greatest and most frightening, superb and impressive horror movie ever made - and "Full Metal Jacket" (1987) the finest war movie in the history of motion picture. The fact that he directed the most beloved classics of two completely different genre is simply unbelievable.\n\nFirst half of "Full Metal Jacket" is spectacular. Lee Ermey\'s Drill Instructor Hartman ("I do not look down on niggers, kikes, wops or greasers. Here you are all equally worthless") is probably the most hateful, forbidding and repulsive character in the history of Kubrick\'s movies. Jack Nicholson in "The Shining" was like a kitten compared to him. The fact that he is so overdone and the dialogue written to him is so sarcastic, biting and clever makes him also the funniest part of "Full Metal Jacket". Even though this is one of the most pressuring Kubrick movies first half can also be seen as an extremely dark comedy.\n\nRest of the cast is just as excellent. Matthew Modine in the leading role as Private Joker is simply fabulous but I guess most of the sympathies goes to Vincent D\'Onofrio\'s unforgettable Private Pyle. Audience really feels sorry for him because he\'s the most regrettable victim of the training period that turns perfectly ordinary nice blokes into merciless killers. Actually I\'m not sure if this is the greatest war movie ever made. I\'ve always had my difficulties of choosing between "Full Metal Jacket" and Francis Ford Coppola\'s outstanding "Apocalypse. Now." Both of these films really shows what war is really about. War is never justified, war is never good. Therefore I think war movie should never glorify war but rather show it as what it really is: nightmarish hell. Second half of "Full Metal Jacket" does it. That makes it probably the most pacifistic war movie I\'ve ever seen.\n\nInteresting fact: at the end of "Full Metal Jacket" soldiers walk on the battlefield and sing an absurd and silly Mickey Mouse marching song. Childish and senseless marching songs of the first half were very comical. This one should be rather funny too but at this time the audience has already seen way too much. This kind of humor no longer amuses and makes you laugh. Song is the final crown of "Full Metal Jacket". It gives the last touch to all this irrationality and I\'m positive that was also Kubrick\'s intention. I\'m pretty sure that this is Stanley Kubrick\'s greatest movie right after excellent "A Clockwork Orange". Magnificent Masterpiece with a capital M. 10 out of 10.', u'0.110581', u'Though I\'ve read only a couple of dozen of the nearly 500 comments on this film, I didn\'t see any from ex-Marines who\'d had the Parris Island experience. I went through PI in 1957. The time period in the picture would have been about 1967, since the in-country sequence includes the \'68 Tet Offensive. Little had changed in those 10 years except the switch from M1s to M16s. \n\nFor the most part Kubrick got Parris Island right on the money. And why shouldn\'t he have, since his screen DI, Lee Ermey was in fact a real DI before he started acting (he played another DI in "The Boys of Company C," an earlier and lesser Vietnam flick)? He had a built- in technical adviser. The screams and insults and profanity and physical punishment were all part of the DIs armamentarium. When you\'re facing up to 75 young strangers you need to immediately establish absolute authority and hang on to it for 13 weeks. Furthermore, you want to break the breakable as soon as you can. My platoon had its Private Pyles and though none ended up as he does in "Full Metal Jacket," I remember that they simply disappeared from our ranks, never to be heard from again. Nothing Ermey as Sgt. Hartman does is exaggerated.\n\nKubrick, however, does exaggerate. Speaking of Pyle\'s ending, it\'s almost impossible for me to imagine that a recruit could manage to sneak a clip of live rounds away from the rifle range. Every shooter at the range has his own rifle coach, and every single round is very carefully accounted for. Kubrick started the killing one scene too early.\n\nI\'ve read that DIs nowadays are forbidden to use the time-honored f-word, and are not allowed to lay hands on recruits. I don\'t know if that\'s good or bad for training (I had my face slapped hard my first day of boot camp and that was just for openers), but then all of us old-timers like to brag about how tough it useta be!\n\nA final note: It\'s interesting to compare "Full Metal Jacket" to another attempt at a portrayal of Parris Island, Jack Webb\'s "The DI," made around \'55 or \'56. Webb tries for authenticity, but as I was to learn a year or so later, his PI was a boy scout camp.', u'-0.231671', u'"Full Metal Jacket" is one of the legends of any service person in basic training. As a young recruit in the Army, we talked about it, and we talked about it further and it is one of those movies that you always find something new to say about. The beginning, the young men come to be trained as "killers." And it is at this point where you may realize later that not everyone is meant to be in the military, example, Leonard (Pyle.) He is a nice kid with probably a good sense of humor, probably liked among for his sense of humor and would have done better in college, but instead is in the Marine Corp where he does not fit in well. Then you have Hartman (excellent portrayal by Gunny Ermy) who has the heartless job of making killers out of these young men. It is here that you question if he is truly mean spirited or is doing what he knows he has to do by being as hard as he can so that these young men will survive the horrors of war. This is a point that I think is sometimes missed. Joker, a rather smart young man, attempts to take Leonard under his wing and the two become friends until Leonard messes up and is given a "blanket party" by the rest of the platoon. Hartman is the reason for this, but behind this hides another reason; he has to make them tough and solid so that they will work as a team and have each other\'s backs in combat. He knows this to be true, but no one else does. This sends Leonard into a psychotic break and for a while, Hartman begins to show interest in Leonard due to his progress. Joker, noticing the change in Leonard, does not bring this to anyone\'s attention and thus begins his journey through his own private war because he believes from his inaction, he may have been the cause for the aftermath of the confrontation of Leonard and Hartman and the eventual fate of Leonard.\n\nAfter that, the movie shifts and they are in Vietnam and only then does Joker begin to see why Hartman was so mean as he sees his friends become more like Leonard and may be destined to share his fate. When the young sniper is shot is when a part of humanity returns to Joker and we are left to guess at what follows.\n\nThe performances by Ermy, Modine and D\'Onofrio were remarkable, especially D\'Onofrio. I often wonder what went on behind the scenes, especially with a seasoned Marine war vet such as R. Lee Ermy on the set. I often wonder how much he contributed to the movie as an actual adviser.\n\nBy the way, I am a Gulf War I Army Veteran and I am female, so it could be that I may be looking at this differently. Females usually were not in combat situations, but some were. I do wish the movie would have shown that a little, but as far as making you think, I think the movie did what it was suppose to do.', u'-0.0296604', u"\nStanley Kubrick always managed to bring  something new to his palate whenever he  made a film. He brought dark comedy to the  screen with Dr. Stranglove, an epic story with  Spartacus, and a film more important for its  efforts than box office potential in the film  Paths of Glory. This is what makes Full Metal  Jacket so entertaining.\n\nHumor, horror and political commentary are  the themes which shape Full Metal Jacket.  From the overbearing drill sergeant to the war  loving soldiers. It all seems to make sense  within this film, never overstepping its bounds  or being to subtle. Kubrick may have alienated  some his hardcore fans with such a  mainstream-type story, but then again, he  helped mainstream movies take a bold step.  What doesn't the current cinema owe Kubrick?\n", u'0.469501', u'One of the greatest war movies ever, a statement very few will dispute. I will therefore not illustrate this point : thousands have done it before me, often brilliantly.I\'d rather lay the stress on Kubrick\'s modernity in "Full Metal Jacket". Indeed the USA being once again at war, it is interesting to compare the way they wage war these days with the way they did back in the sixties. And the comparison is edifying. Just apply the following statements to Iraq and you will realize NOTHING HAS CHANGED : - the marines are trained to become killing machines without being taught minimum knowledge about the people they come to defend. - the boys know nothing about the Vietnamese and reason according to American standards : for instance "Cow-Boy" complains half-jokingly half-seriously that there are no horses in Vietnam. Another example is the soldiers singing the Mickey Mouse Club hymn after fighting, which strikes as particularly out of place. - they try in vain to impose democracy through gruesome violence and destruction. Such similarities abound and testify to the film\'s absolute - and unfortunate - modernity. I wish Kubrick was still with us. I also wish George Bush and his advisers had seen this masterpiece and - most of all - understood its message. They would have avoided another bloody war doomed to fail.', u'-0.0447001', u'The first third of Stanley Kubrick\'s take on the Vietnam War is as powerful and shocking as any film ever made about the military\x85 \n\nIn the film\'s opening shots, we see close-ups of new Marine recruits getting their heads shaved at a military training post\x85 The next shot follows Hartman (R. Lee Ermey) as he strides through a barracks and completes the first stage of the young men\'s intimidating indoctrination into the Marine Corps\x85 The scene also establishes the measured pace that Kubrick maintains throughout\x85 \n\nBooming, gloriously profane, and imaginative, Sgt. Hartman is a force of nature that will mold these boys into killing machines\x85 At that point, most war films would turn to the young men, sketch out their pasts and then show their transformation into a cohesive unit\x85 These kids are names and archetypes who will react differently to Hartman\'s approach\x85\n\nKubrick makes Ermey such a mesmerizing force that one key early element is easy to overlook\x85 From the first moment we see him in the barber\'s chair, before we even know his name, it is abundantly clear that Leonard is mad\x85 He has that familiar vacant, smiling, dull-eyed expression of evil that Kubrick also uses to define Little Alex in "A Clockwork Orange" and Jack Torrance in "The Shining." The other characters do not see it, and so the inevitable confrontation between Hartman and Leonard is all the more horrifying\x85\n\nThe middle section of the film establishes Joker\'s role as a war reporter, working behind the lines during the Tet Offensive of 1968, and his desire for some "trigger time" with his old pals from basic\x85 That\'s where Kubrick shapes his view of the Vietnam war\x85 \n\nIn the third part, a new sociopath named Animal Mother (Adam Baldwin) is introduced, and the focus shifts to a patrol searching through the bombed out city of Hue to root out a sniper\x85 That is where the filmmakers comment most pointedly on the war itself\x85 They see it as a dead-end that serve no purpose\x85 That\'s certainly a valid artistic interpretation of history\x85 Many other films have made the same points, often more eloquently\x85 But Kubrick isn\'t interested in eloquence, either\x85\n\nThe three sections are unmistakably separated from each other\x85 The first stands on its own though key elements are stated again at the end\x85\n\nFor the viewer expecting a "traditional" war film, the result is disconcerting, frustrating, and somehow unfinished\x85 Most Kubrick fans will admit that "Paths of Glory" and "Dr. Strangelove" are more enjoyable, but even if their man is not in top form, "Full Metal Jacket" is challenging, and repeated viewings reveal more details and connections\x85', u'0.761317', u'"With flowers and my love both never to come back ... It\'s not easy facing up when your whole world is black". So sings the man whose throbbing song marks the film\'s end, merciless lyrics to describe thematically a story that is as wrenching as it is mesmerizing.\n\nThere are no villains in this film, only heroic victims. The villains are all off-screen, comfy behind mahogany desks, or dressed for success and giving shrill speeches about how maintaining peace requires war. Strange logic.\n\nFirst it\'s boot camp, a dreary prospect at best, for an ordinary group of young American men. Here, a sadistic drill Sargent, in colorful language, barks out orders and insults straight from Hades. It\'s do or die, almost literally, for our greenhorns. It\'s an ordeal of blackness from which some may never recover. Still, the grunts learn a valuable lesson; namely, that life is mostly physical, not mental. It\'s a lesson some ivory tower college professors never learn.\n\nBut then it\'s on to an even blacker black ... Vietnam. Combat scenes are rendered believable by effective visuals and terrific sound effects: pounding percussion, amplified sounds of equipment and footsteps across explosive debris, and an always present, ever-so-subtle ... echo. Potent and torturous, these scenes convey a Zen-like immediacy, an impending sense of doom. And then at film\'s end, those lyrics ...\n\nComposed of two, barely overlapping, parts, the script\'s structure is a bit unorthodox. But the film works, owing to an intensity that never lets up. R. Lee Ermey is of course terrific as the harsh drillmaster. Casting of the young lions is okay, though a tad weak in one or two cases. Insertion of pop songs of the era works well, to amplify the cultural disconnect between a war-torn Vietnam and an indifferent America.\n\nLike reading a history book, watching an occasional war movie is good for the soul. It puts one\'s problems in perspective. For that reason, this particular war movie is better than most. It\'s riveting, intense. And the sense of impending blackness hovers ever present over the story\'s heroic victims, like the sword of Damocles.', u'0.0860171', u"\nMr. Stanley Kubrick was not a prolific director. After 71 years walking this Earth he left us with only 16 movies among which some of the most powerful cinematic experience to date. `Full Metal Jacket' is part of Mr. Kubrick's list of masterpiece and was released 12 years before his last movie `Eyes Wide Shut' as War always precedes Denial.\n\nHaving a total control on his Picture from the writing to the editing, what you see on the screen is what he wanted you to see\x85and what we see is close to a perfect demonstration: One can learn to kill. Through this learning one looses his individuality. By loosing his individuality one can loose is Innocence and reach Madness and of course during all those steps something can go wrong\x85  To make this demonstration as obvious on paper as on screen you have to be methodic (as methodic as Stanley Kubrick) and you have to have the right actors and the right acting. Matthew Modine (Pvt Joker), Vincent D'Onofrio (Pvt Gomer Pyle) and R.Lee Ermey (Gunnery Sgt. Hartman) are a good example of how pristine the casting was. In order to draw a clear conclusion Stanley Kubrick used the chapter technique and delivers a 2 chapters demonstration.\n\n\nChapter One \x96 The building of a Corp. \x96 The Training.  Here Mr. Kubrick shows us how a Marine Corp. is built, how one can learn to kill and how through this learning one looses his individuality. This building has to go through 2 major processes: Humiliation and Team building. The humiliation process consists in the destruction of your ego, because your ego is what makes you unique. If an organization breaks your ego then you are most likely to be just like everybody else. Private Gomer Pyle is the perfect example of how someone goes through this humiliating process: he is the most humiliated Private and we all remember this wonderful quote from the Gunnery Sergeant Hartman Drill Instructor (R.Lee Ermey):'Are you quitting on me?! Well, are you?! Then quit, you slimy *beep* walrus-looking piece of *beep*! etc\x85' The second process in the building of a Corp., is in fact the team building process: It is an equally important process because at the end of this process each team member only exists through the team, alone each of them is `equally worthless' as our favorite Sergeant Instructor would say. Obviously something will go wrong because there is no such thing as invincibility (it's a chimer at best, a lie). The suicide scene is therefore the transition between the notion of individuality and the notion of Corp., between chapter one and chapter two. Admirably played by our 3 protagonist (Private Joker and Pyle and the Sergeant Drill Instructor) it emphasis the only true statement of the movie: `we live in a world of *beep*' and `the dead know only one thing: it's better to be alive'. \n\nChapter Two \x96 Disintegration of a Corp. \x96 The War.  This second piece of the demonstration (one can loose his innocence) is fueled with two dynamics: the desire of the killing and the reality of war. The desire of the killing is impersonating by Pvt `Joker', he is a combat correspondent who doesn't really understand the meaning of this War. At the same time he is `born to kill' and think that the combat will bring meaning to this absurdity. This contradiction is very well sum up in the following memorable quote from Pvt Joker: `I wanted to meet stimulating and interesting people of an ancient culture and kill them. I wanted to be the first kid on my block to get a confirmed kill.' As soon as Pvt Joker links up with Pvt Cowboy, Mr. Kubrick makes us dive in `the reality of war' and the disintegration of the Corp. begins: The lieutenant goes first with him the authority, one by one the Marines falls under the fire of a sniper. The climax of this chapter is the fugitive vision of the sniper. The platoon has reached the border of Madness, where `a day without blood is like a day without sunshine'. Did Pvt Joker found the meaning he was looking for? Can we control the dogs of war once we've unleashed them? Once again there is no lesson only one statement as the thoughts of Pvt Joker `drift back to erect nipple wet dreams about Mary Jane Rottencrotch and the Great Homecoming *beep* Fantasy.' He is `so happy that he is alive, in one piece and short. He lives in a world of *beep* yes. But he is alive and not afraid'.\n\n  Innocence is lost forever\x85left on the ground by the corpses and their `Full Metal Jackets'.\n", u'0.0296543', u'Goddamn you Stanley Kubrick. For me Clockwork Orange set the standard a long time ago for cinematic perfection; FMJ just raises the bar. Sitting around with bored in-laws I quietly slipped this into the DVD player, 20 minutes later conversation has ceased and everybody is absorbed. Predictable Kubrick really, stunningly lit, musical soundtrack that is oh-so-right, and the cinematography -Jesusmotherofmary. Ten years before anybody had thought of picking up a movie camera and running with it, Kubrick had perfected the technique. War is hell? -it sure looks a vision of hell. Stunning in every way.', u'0.349796', u'I always thought of Kubrick as the poet amongst the proza\'s in Hollywood. Kubrick always tries to tell a bigger picture than he\'s putting on the screen. But it requires the viewer to see beyond the images. I had to see this film a second time to fully grasp what Kubrick was trying to show me.\n\nThe film is divided in two parts: basic training at Parris Island and combat in Vietnam. Both are equally difficult to watch. Kubrick shows us young boys being stripped from every possible individuality, only to be sent into a war that will only damage them and the war-torn country even more.\n\nThe film has an eery kind of absurdness to it. The tone of the film balances between hard core anti-war and black comedy. Maybe thats because most of the soldiers in Vietnam (or any war) have the same kind of humor: harsh, but funny in a wrong kind of way. Kubrick lets R. Lee Ermey have his way the young recruits and gives him all the best "wrong lines". The rapid fire of slurs and insults is unbelievable for a normal person. Which all the recruits are in the beginning. Ermey glorifies the fact that Oswald killed Kennedy from 250 feet at a moving target. Oswald learned his skills IN THE MARINES. Yes, be proud.\n\nKubrick\'s Vietnam lies in ruins. The American involvement seems to have only negative results. It\'s native people are being slaugthered by either the VC or the Americans. Youngs girls prostitute themself to GI\'s. Once a beautiful country with a rich culture and historic buildings, it\'s not much to look at with tanks and marines roaming the streets. The scenes in the final act where the platoon is being cut to pieces by a sniper are very powerful. Those scenes make a bigger statement. They define the conflict: With all it\'s firepower, tactics and technology, the platoon lost three soldiers to one girl with an AK. An unwinnable war. \n\nThough and sometimes difficult to watch, this film is not anti-war for pacifists, but anti-war for humanists. Think beyond "oh, war is hell" and you will be satisfied with what Kubrick is telling us.', u'-0.00433373', u'\n"Seven-six-two millimeter. Full metal jacket." -Pvt. Leonard \'Pyle\' Lawrence\n\nFull Metal Jacket is a great movie. Not the best from Kubrick, but works great as a war film. The plot is about a group of soldiers who are turned into killers in marine training, and are then sent off to the Vietnam War.\n\nKubrick once again does a great job at directing. Modine, D\'Onofrio, Baldwin, and Howard give worthy performances, while Ermey gives an Oscar worthy (not even nominated) performance and steals the show. This is a very realistic look at Vietnam, while the battle scenes and script just aren\'t as satisfying as they are in the second half. Still, it is a wonderful film.\n\n9/10.\n', u'0.675074', u"'Full Metal Jacket' was a film that I had been meaning to watch for a while after all the good stuff I had heard about it.\n\nIt really is a film of two halves, unfortunately I didn't like the 2nd half.\n\nThe 1st half at boot camp was excellent, we saw a lot of character development and emotion as well as a lot of humour and really serious issues. R. Lee Ermey and Vincent D'Onofrio were just brilliant.\n\nThe 2nd half I didn't enjoy as much, it looked great and there was a lot of action but it was just a bit boring and felt really dragged out, whereas the 1st part just had everything that you wanted.\n\nGlad I got round to seeing it but wouldn't watch it again, slightly disappointed after a really good start to the film.\n\n6/10.", u'-0.144602'], u'tt0361748': [u"After watching Inglorious Basterds i was really surprised when i saw ratings on IMDb. Didn't expected high ratings and top 250 place. If we can only isolate and rate Christoph Waltz's acting performance i would agree that this movie deserves 10. But he is not alone, and his performance can't cover horrible plot, boring conversations, unfunny characters, alternative QT WW2 fantasy and Eli Roth as Jew bear. \n\nThe opening scene with Denis Menochet as farmer and Christoph Waltz as SS officer is best part of the movie. Only part that have same quality and connects tension from that scene with the rest of the movie is a basement scene. Basement scene was crossroad for me. Michael Fassbender was great in role of British spy and his character adds some new layer of logic and realism in movie. In moments you can actually see some plot finally breaking through the rubbish you watched after the farm scene. After the basement chapter, movie is going nowhere. \n\nEmpty space. A lot of empty space for movie that last 153 minutes. Long and boring scenes with boring characters and conversations. Childish fantasy mixed up with Spaghetti western movies and some atmosphere that don't belong to WW2 period. Thats why we have basterds to fill everything else and patch the rest of movie. They failed. Basterds are weakest/undeveloped and most boring part of movie. Movie is named by them, yes - Brad is on Movie poster ... but they are horrible. Worst role of Mr Pitt and i hope last one from Eli Roth. \n\nCinema/Shosanna story with David Bowie music was just another QT patch v1.1 to fill huge empty space between farm and basement. Extremely boring scenes with M\xe9lanie Laurent (taking off cinema letters, red dresses, secret love Marcel...) will blast your brain. Yes - headache is a must. \n\nBeside 2 good scenes, i really enjoyed listening smooth gradient of German, French and English language. But again, this is connected to Waltz and Fassbender and their personal knowledge that Tarantino used for his fantasy. \n\nInglorious Basterds is Hybrid movie where gangsters are replaced with Nazis adding them wild west background layer with Brad Pitt on movie poster just to sell tickets. It doesn't work in this case.\n\n5/10 - only for Christoph Waltz and Michael Fassbender.", u'-0.365662', u'I will just start with some quotes from other reviewers that describes it the best.\n\n"This is easily one of the most overrated films of the year and probably the worst film Tarantino has ever done." "The ONLY good thing in this movie was the performance of Mr. Waltz".\n\n"So I was really disappointed, and seeing this movie on place #40 of the greatest movies of all time is the only thing about this, that leaves me with my mouth opened" Now for more details go and read "Hated it" reviews.\n\nOne thing I hate about a movie is when it treats audience as bunch of dumb people. (Spoiler ahead). Now I know Tarantino\'s style is based on fantasy and fictitious plots, but come on, Adolf Hitler and 200 top Nazis Officers will be in attendance of a movie premier in occupied France and you have only two guards in the whole theater and the surroundings? Where also an American-African walks around freely with steel pipes locking doors and setting fire. These 2 guards are then executed in seconds opening the door for our 2 "heroes" to slay Hitler at point blank with around 100 rounds... very dumb. At least, challenge our intelligence and create a smarter plot to kill one of the most feared tyrants of all time (Go watch Valkyrie). Besides, Mike Myers impersonation of a British general is more realistic and authentic than the guy doing Hitler, just picture that.\n\nWhat ruined it further, is that the only smart and powerful character, which nailed everyone in the movie, with his psychological and mind bending interrogations, ends up to be effortlessly tricked by the most mindless character in the movie.\n\nAfter watching the movie, I was sympathizing with Nazis, who were portrayed to have more bravery and humanity than our Basterds!!! Imagine that.\n\nMy recommendations, if you have insomnia, 2hrs 33 min to waste or you want to give your mind a break, go watch this movie.', u'-0.0907449', u'This is one of the worst movies I have ever seen.\n\nWhat is the purpose of this movie? A bunch of Americans enters Nazi-occupied France and starts slaughtering Germans. You see them scalping their enemies and beating them to death with baseball bats. While making jokes, of course.\n\nSome will say that this movie is a parody of a certain genre. For a parody, it is neither witty nor funny. The contents is zero. It is exceptionally brutal and disgusting. Underneath lies a subtle political message, because it is again "the good guys" killing "bad Nazis". The whole plot is unthinkable if you turn it around. Could you imagine a storyline where Nazis (while making jokes) kill everybody in the Warsaw ghetto with flamethrowers? Probably not, but this movie is exactly about that, with the exception that is satisfies the weird moral expectations of a certain audience: slaughtering people is so cool when done by the right people.\n\nThis movie only works because of the hidden Nazi-ideology underneath. It does not regard the enemy as people. And if the latter is supposed to be an element of the fun, I am happy to say that this kind of fun will always remain a mystery to me.\n\nAnother mystery is how such violence can fascinate the American crowd while a bit of nudity will freak them out. But if a naked body is pornography, this movie with all its brutality is pure pornography at its very worst.\n\nInglorious Basterds is a pointless, boring and tasteless waste of time and money.', u'-0.388145', u"That's what I thought, when I heard about the cast of Inglorious Basterds. And I'm both from Germany and into movies.\n\nThat guy is older than 50 and so far he almost only played in mediocre TV series - and even there he didn't play the main parts. Obviously nobody ever noticed, what he's capable of. Now, thanks to QT, he got one shot to change that - and - let's put it this way - that was a bingo! He is the living proof of what a great caster Tarrantino is.\n\nBy the way: I think it's a great privilege to watch the movie as a German - being able to understand everything. And the German dialog is written almost as good as the English.\n\nNow I could repeat, what many others have written here before. I'll put it short: Finally, QT is back.", u'-0.0504782', u"Chapter One: Once Upon a Time\x85 At A Table (1941)\n\nIn which a German Nazi and a French Dairy Farmer talk at a table for 20 minutes; first in French, then in English.\n\nChapter Two: Three Years Of Inglorious Basterds In Sixteen Minutes... Without Tables (Mostly)\n\nIn which an American Lieutenant talks to his newly formed 8 man Jewish- American commando unit. There are no tables present. Cut to Adolf Hitler, three years later. He is angry at his men's inability to deal with the Basterds. Hitler does have a table. We return to the Basterds in a flashback. Again, distinct lack of table-based content. \n\nChapter Three: German Night in Paris... At A Table... Talking\n\nIn which a Jewish woman who escaped from under the table in Chapter One has somehow managed to become the proprietress of a cinema. The Jewish woman talks to an Actor at a table in a bar. Later, the Jewish woman, the Actor, Joseph Goebbels and a Translator talk at a table in a Restaurant. The Actor and Goebbels talk in German. The Translator translates the German into French. The Jewish woman replies in French. The Translator translates the French into German. Goebbels decides to hold a film premiere at the Jewish woman's cinema. The Actor and Goebbels leave. The Nazi (who talked with the Dairy Farmer at a table for twenty minutes back in Chapter One) arrives. He talks with the Jewish woman at the table. He leaves. The Jewish woman breaks down; overcome with emotion at having spent so long talking at a table. \n\nChapter Four: Operation Table Talking\n\nIn which Austin Powers sends a British Officer to join the Basterds and an Actress on a mission to talk in German at a table in a Tavern. After 21 minutes of talking at a table they all shoot each other. The actress survives but spends the next 5 minutes lying on a table talking.\n\nChapter Five: Revenge of the Giant Table\n\nIn which, The Basterds decide to continue the operation by talking in Italian and suicide bombing the cinema. The Nazi takes the Actress into a small room where they sit next to a table. A hoe that he found under the table in the Tavern fits her so he kills her. Then he takes two of the Basterds to a big room, where they sit and talk at a table. Meanwhile, the cinema burns down, Hitler is riddled with bullets and the two Basterds blow themselves up for no good reason at all.\n\nThe End", u'-0.433398', u"Inglorious Basterds makes no apologies, asks for no forgiveness, it's a \r no holds barred assault on the senses. Tarantino doesn't care if he \r offends, if he steps all over stereotypes and clich\xe9s, this is film \r making at it purest. It's great to see a film maker whose work clearly \r isn't interfeared with by the powers that be. Tarantino is a master of \r effortlessly cranking up immense tension and suddenly mixing it with \r laugh out loud moments; you're not sure if you should be looking away \r in disgust or rolling around laughing, either way it's a roller coaster \r and one not to be missed! It's not for everyone, certainly if you're not a fan of Tarantino's style, this may be a little hard to swallow, but \r never-the-less, it is a film which simply has to be seen. No self \r respecting film fan should miss this. And the performance of Christoph \r Waltz... Oscar don't you dare ignore him!!", u'-0.239859', u'Seriously disappointing performance by Brad Pitt and Q T, the plot is very superficial and lame, and, unless indirectly intended, this film actually glorify the Nazis and portrays them as men of honor, and show that the Jewish people are deceiving, cant keep promises and bloody vicious. ((THE FOLLOWING CONTAINS SPOILER)) Hitler together with the most notorious Nazis are attending a stupid plot less movie about the killing of 300 Italian soldiers in a small cinema theater in Paris is unbelievably ridiculous. the Nazis laughing and hooraying each killing in the movie as if watching a basketball game STUPID, the deal at the end is lame. whats really appalling is that the movie earned great reviews and is ranked here in the 40s amongst the greatest 250 films. will not be surprised if it harvested many awards, including Oscars, as well. the movie is simply a kissing ass to the Jewish people, but hey reconsider, its not even doing a great job doing that. it truly dwarfed the whole Nazi - Jews conflict and a pure insult to all who fought and suffered from the tyranny of the Nazis.', u'-0.863704', u'This usually all sounds a lot better in my head (so forgive me for rambling) I\'m hardly Tarantino\'s biggest fan (and will *try* not to stoop to calling him a \'hack\'....which is quite hard) I don\'t like to mock or critique a movie before seeing it. So with cautious hesitation, i walked to the cinema today to watch \'Inglorious Basterds\'\n\nNow, to call it a \'rip-off of a rip-off\' would be unfair here. Tarantino is happy enough to take the title from Enzo Castellari\'s (less than spectacular) Dirty Dozen clone, but not it\'s plot points (that, he takes from all other genre of movies) \'Inglorious\' opens with a Nazi officer and his lengthy interrogation against a farmer who is hiding Jews in his basement. This is such an anti-climax, in that, it\'s dialogue is stale, and outcome signposted a mile off. Of course, one of the hidden Jews makes her escape (but more of her later) We (the obviously, easily pleased) audience are treated to the introduction of Lt. Aldo Raine (ha-ha, that name almost sounds like B-movie king ALDO RAY....ha-ha Quentin...keep those \'tributes\' coming) and this character is played by none other than Brad (DALLAS) Pitt (sorry, DALLAS was about the only good thing he\'s ever starred in) and with jaw-jutting, Mr Jolie treats us to a hound-dogged, southern drawled, smirking Nazi-killer. Meanwhile Mr Tarantino forgets that actual grown-ups may be in attendance, so assumes that the teenyboppers won\'t have heard of the \'Dirty Dozen\'?\n\nRaines \'platoon\' consists of (John Cassavettes looking) blood-thirsty Jewish soldiers, all looking to get the big payback on Adolf Hitler. Tarantino in all his superior knowledge, pays special attention to two of these men, by casting his long time best buddy (and fellow homage-sycophant) Eli Roth (as the baseball bat wielding \'Bear Jew\') The other man is called Hugo Stiglitz (and i\'ll wager more than half the QT fan-boys had never heard this name before this movie) Keep up the good work Tarantino, you\'ve managed about 6 or 7 \'hommages\' so far (in the first 15 minutes) keep adding them, and it may detract from the plot (or lack of?)\n\nAnyhow, cutting a long (and extremely boring and protracted) story short, both Raine and his men (the \'Inglorious Basterds\') and the sole survivor from chapter one, both have separate plots to kill Hitler at the showing of a Nazi-propaganda movie, in a french cinema (owned by the fore-mentioned survivor, now grown up)\n\nMore boring (and pointless) conversations follow two and fro, as Pitt mugs away at an audience past caring. And any genuine suspense, leading to the assassination of the most deadly tyrant of all time, is thrown-away by the directors insistence of placing a 1980\'s David Bowie song in a WWII movie.\n\nMy problems (and there are many) with this movie, is the re-occurring problem i have with most Tarantino product.....he rarely knows when to either start or stop. I don\'t need \'homage\' after \'homage\' to get the *joke* (whatever it may be) I knew of Inglorious Bastards, Enzo Castellari, Aldo Ray, Hugo Stiglitz (and the ultimate crime of the entire movie) Ennio Morricone\'s haunting score from REVOLVER. I go to the cinema to see the stars.....if the best you can do is the dire Barad Pitt, i\'ll assume You (Mr Tarantino) are the main draw here? I don\'t want the audience directing the movie. I pay to see YOUR vision, your ideas, your creativity....NOT how you can patchwork (time and time again) endless scenes from endless movies. It\'s high time the fan-boys (on IMDb) employed some \'tough love\' on your \'idol\' (god knows, if you don\'t....the studios should?)\n\nThe tired old argument with Tarantino worshippers is "well, if you can do better...do so" Let me tell you, if i was a 46 year old director, with the (unfortunate) pull QT has.....i\'d want to offer YOU a lot more than a warmed up muddled re-hash of better WWII movies than this tripe. The directors he attempts to emulate, made movies so bad by accident, or due to budgetary constraints. It\'s a cop out, time and time again, to hear his fans campaign his lack of imagination as \'art\'. I\'m sure he\'s capable of better (but after giving him the benefit of the doubt, once more....and not to mention 2 and a half hours of my life.....) maybe he isn\'t?', u'-0.42554', u"It just goes to show how wrong you can be. I had not expected to like this film. I was disappointed by both the Kill Bill films (although i preferred the second) and Death Proof (although it was better in the shorter cut of the double-bill release). I love Reservoir Dogs, admire Pulp Fiction and think that Jackie Brown is Tarantino's most mature piece of film-making - technically his most superior - including the last great performance elicited from Robert De Niro. Since then it seems to me while his films have been okay (i haven't hated them) he has been treading water in referential, reverential, self-indulgent juvenilia.\n\nThen i read the script last year for Inglourious Basterds - and i hated it! Sure it had some typical QT flourishes and the opening scene was undeniably powerful. There were a couple of great characters. But on page it was more juvenile rubbish, largely ruined by the largess of the uninteresting Basterds of the title. It made me seriously contemplate not seeing the film. The trailers did nothing to convince me. I only changed by mind when i had the opportunity to see the film with a Tarantino Q&A following in London. I figured it would be worth enduring to hear him in Q&A as i know from interviews how entertaining he can be in person.\n\nSo little was i prepared for the sheer exuberant fun and brilliance of Inglourious Basterds.\n\nEasily Mr Tarantino's best work since Jackie Brown it is a triumph.\n\nYes the references are there but they do not interfere with the story, they are not the driving force. Yes Eli Roth is stunt casting but he works fine, with little to do but look aggressive, and does nothing to hurt the film as i had feared. While i admired Mr Tarantino for using stuntwoman Zoe Bell as herself in Death Proof in order to amp-up the exhilaration of the major stunt scene her lack of any acting ability in a key role was a problem for the film. The same could be said of Tarantino's own appearances in several films, especially Robert Rodriguez's From Dusk Till Dawn, which Tarantino wrote.\n\nWhat really makes this work is how BIG it is. The spaghetti western vibe to much of the style, dialogue and performances is wonderfully over the top without descending too far into the cartoon quality of Kill Bill. The violence is so big. The audacity so big. Brad Pitt is so big! In the trailers the Hitler moment and Pitt's performance bothered me but in the context of the film they are hilarious. Pitt is actually brilliant here, exactly what he needs to be. He is Mifune's blustering samurai in Yojimbo, he is Robards Cheyenne from Once Upon a Time in the West, there is a very James Coburn vibe to him, and of course a suitably Lee Marvin edge.\n\nChristoph Waltz (who i did not previously known) and Melanie Laurent (who i first noticed in a brilliant French-language British short film by Sean Ellis) are sensational and i expect to see both used a lot more in the future. Tarantino has clearly not lost his eye for casting, which seemed to desert him in Death Proof. Waltz is equally large in his performance. Chilling, yet theatrical. He is Fonda from OUATITW, Van Cleef from Good, The Bad & the Ugly. And Laurent is suitably Cardinale innocence but tough, a fighter. They both dazzle here.\n\nThat every member of the cast gets the fun to be had from what they are doing while not indulging themselves in just having fun and trying to get laughs helps tremendously. The laughs - and there are loads - come organically. Only Mike Myers comes close to tipping the wink and pushing it too far but his scene is reigned in just enough - with the help of a fantastic Michael Fassbender who seems pulled directly from the mold of Attenborough's Great Escape leader.\n\nAll the actors shine and Tarantino throws in wonderful flourishes, but ones that work with the story. The introduction of Schweiger's Hugo Stiglitz is a riot. After a sensational slow-burn opening and a glorious intro to those inglourious Basterds the pace never lets up and over two and half hours flies by.\n\nIt also looks beautiful, marking this as a return to real film-making rather than just self-indulgent silliness. The musical choices, as always, are inspired from Morricone on.\n\nThe film is audacious and hilarious. After a summer when nearly every film has disappointed me it came as a huge surprise that the real fun and entertaining, but also involving and impressive film should be this one, when i would never have believed it from script form. Welcome back QT.", u'0.30311', u'Inglorious Basterds is a dark and violent comic fantasy, gloriously so. Built on the framework of The Dirty Dozen, Inglorious Basterds ditches the elongated training sequences of The Dirty Dozen to plunge into the action right away. In the process, Tarantino fixes one of The Dirty Dozen\'s major flaws by giving the bad guys screen time to remind us just how bad the Nazis were. The Nazis with the most screen time end up becoming the most completely human characters in the film, which ironically makes them even worse monsters.\n\nBu ditching the training sequences, Tarantino is also able to give us a picture of the entire war, showing us not only British, American and German soldiers, but also giving us glimpses into the world of French and German civilians, both collaborators and Resistance.\n\nIt goes without saying that any Tarantino film is going to have fantastic dialogue, but when Tarantino made the decision to have the French characters speak French and the Germans speak German, beyond adding a level of authenticity, Tarantino also somehow ensured that his dialogue in French was as sharp and funny and clever as his English dialogue.\n\nCase in point, during the opening sequence the Nazi "Jew Hunter" SS Colonel Hans Landa (Christian Waltz) is interrogating French dairy farmer Perrier LaPadite (Denis Menochet). Landa suspects that LaPadite is hiding a family of Jews. While subtly pressuring LaPadite, Landa asks for a glass of milk. After greedily gulping it down, Landa compliments LaPadite on his daughters and his cows, "\xe0 votre famille et \xe0 vos vaches, je dis bravo." The thing of it is, in French "vache" means cow, but it is also a vulgar name for the vagina. If reprimanded for this vulgar pun, Landa could quite convincingly claim not to understand French well enough to have meant it that way, but Landa does mean it that way and he means it as a threat. And LaPadite understands his meaning all too well.\n\nThat is a really subtle piece of acting and word-play that many audiences would never catch, or at least they might understand the subtext without knowing the exact nature of the threat. The film is rich with that kind of detail. All of the French and English dialogue is chosen with that same attention to detail and while I can\'t swear to the German, I would suspect that it shows a similar level of craft.\n\nInglorious Basterds opens with the phrase, "Once Upon a Time... in Nazi-Occupied France." Personally, this reminds me of the opening of every Asterix book and movie, another comic fantasy in a war-torn occupied France. Like Asterix, Inglorious Basterds is howlingly funny in places, although the film also turns darkly serious.\n\nIn its more serious moments, Inglorious Basterds reminds us that the first casualties of war are compassion and the ability to relax, as in almost every elongated sequence of the film, Tarantino finds a new way to build cruel tension to almost unbearable levels.\n\nTarantino also reminds us that film is dangerous, even inflammable and that its power deserves respect.\n\nIf you can see this film as I did in a packed theatre filled with knowledgeable fans who get every joke, that you will see this masterful film the way that it was meant to be seen. If you are not that lucky, all that you will see is a great, great film that delivers a darkly funny punch.', u'0.118987', u"Previous Tarantino movies were from a guy in love with other movies. This one is from a guy in love with his own writing. It isn't Inglorious, its disgusting.\n\nI absolutely hated Inglorious Basterds. The entire point of a film is to entertain - if u call bashing people's heads and removing their scalps entertaining!!!! - and if there is one unforgivable sin a movie can commit, it is extreme boredom or disgust.\n\nThe movie is just a collection of endless and excruciatingly boring and disgusting scenes of people talking at tables in various languages. There is even one scene where 3 people talk for nearly 45 minutes at the same table, before, thankfully they are all shot. I wished they would have been killed off after 5 minutes. Even Woody Allen knows when to shut the F**K up.\n\nThis table talk style is a Tarantino hallmark, but in other films, I actually cared about what they were saying and the people who were talking. Here, I couldn't care less. All of Quentin's films display an enormous confidence, particularly Jackie Brown. But here there is a pervasive feeling in every scene, Tarantino had no idea where he was going with the film.\n\nIs it violent? Sure there's torture and scalping galore, but you'd have to remind me. Thankfully, the film was so thin, I didn't even remember I had seen it earlier in the day when until I saw a review headline on MSNBC.\n\nHe's out of gimmicks and apparently dying to write a novel. But do us a favor QT and spare us the movie.\n\nI walked out of this movie halfway through and I would never recommend anyone seeing it no matter what a die-hard quarantino fan he or she is.\n\nI give it 0 / 10.", u'-0.196012', u'I simply cannot believe this movie\'s current rating on IMDb.\n\nIt is currently sitting in the IMDb top 100, nestled closely with The Bridge on the River Kwai, Raging Bull and the Prestige.\n\nTo find this movie in the same standing as those three is truly staggering to me. Hence I am taking the time to give this film 1 star, to hopefully help get it down towards its rightful place among the other pieces of truly worthless cinema with which it belongs.\n\nI can understand that this is a movie that you either love or hate - it is certainly true that it is both a provocative and original film. However, what surprises me is the massive bias towards the "love" side, given the film\'s content - which can be summarised as an unashamedly unrealistic and soulless collection of sadistic/casual mindless violence, strangely blended with dramatic scenes of the kind of things that genuinely took place under the Nazis.\n\nWhat I am trying to say is that combining very tense, well written SS interrogation scenes (which evoke some genuine emotional investment in the film) with comic book character British generals/Nazi leaders/Jewish soldiers makes for an extremely uncomfortable combination for me. At times it feels like someone has spliced together Schindlers List with Indiana Jones and the Last Crusade.\n\nMy best guess is that the film\'s originality and uncompromising approach is refreshing to people bored of the same old Hollywood formulae. Certainly the film is unpredictable. The plot (such as it is) is extremely meandering and many of the characters\' actions are pretty much inexplicable. *SPOILER* (I point here towards Colonel Landa\'s killing of Bridget and his non-killing of Shosanna.) But then again every single character is so one dimensional that it leaves you with no idea which characters you are supposed to actually care about anyway. There is no real shock when anyone gets killed because you don\'t know who anyone is or what makes them tick.\n\nBrad Pitt gets the award here for the most wooden and pointless character to appear - he is truly awful throughout the film and finds himself in a role where he does not have to portray a single emotion throughout the film. Nothing.\n\nMy final point is that originality on its own does not make a great film. Yes, Tarantino has made a movie where you see things that you have never seen before in a major Hollywood release, but that is not any sort of achievement. The reason a high budget film has not been made before where the entire German high command has a day at the cinema in occupied France with almost no guards or security is because that idea is stupid. Yes, the film is stupid - and no amount of brushing over with "Tarantino is being postmodern" or "he\'s being ironic" will overcome that plain fact.\n\nIn summary this is a film that takes an exploitation film script, (that would ordinarily be filed under "trash cinema") gives it a big name director/very high quality cast and then takes the plaudits for being ground breaking.\n\nIt is not. It is simply a steaming turd given a coat of gloss paint.', u'-0.242482', u'For those that have studied WWII, and unfortunately, seen real human brains on the ground, this movie is a travesty, a sadistic farce, and a complete waste of time like most of Tarantino\'s other questionable work. I do admit to liking "Reservoir Dogs" to a point. However, this thing does not even have an original title.\n\nI (unfortunately) received this DVD by mistake and see this project as a new low for Brad Pitt and the other actors taking part in this joke of making jews more barbaric than the Nazis. It perpetuates blame on the common German soldiers while covering up the major part US and UK bankers like Prescott Bush had in funding Hitler, as well as, the now confirmed part that British Intelligence had in bringing Hitler and Mussolini to power beginning immediately at the end of WWI.\n\nWWII was a complex and tragic event, and the real world history deserves better than this self serving, mythological blood feast served up for fools too lazy to look for the truth and try to prevent a recurrence. History can repeat itself when we become manipulated by propaganda, desensitized to inhumane actions, and self righteous.\n\nIf you want to look at atrocities, many can argue that Stalin made Hitler and the Nazis look like rank amateurs in the business of murdering innocent people, as well as, the drug crazed gangs of Niger roping off streets with human intestines. Where does it end? We need to be getting the multitude of shadowy intelligence agencies under control and accountability instead of getting a cheap emotional thrill about perpetuating their myths in Hollywood and our capitol cities.', u'-0.532005', u'I am sorry folks, but I have to say I really cannot understand the overwhelming feelings everybody gets by seeing this movie...\n\nWhen I saw it I looked at my watch to know how much more time I had to spend with this Kindergarten nonsense.\n\nSo why this verdict?\n\nFirst of all: The movie tells a story that doesn\'t deliver any excitement! It is not even the amusingly distorted reality of a Quentin Tarantino we used to know. This story could have come out of every little kid\'s head. It doesn\'t have anything intelligent in it, neither anything inventive and it goes on for hours... the story has appropriate content for about 30 min. The rest is just awfully enhanced scenes that are supposed to leave a somewhat cool image. Doesn\'t work. Even the previously seen cutbacks that Tarantino often uses just confuse and are not in any way cool. \n\nSecond: Some guys go to Germany and kill Nazis. Ah really? Do they? The only Nazis they killed were a handful of guys, one of them being man enough to rather die than betray his companions. Is this the ugly face Tarantino wanted to give the Nazis? A brave soldier that is more valiant than any of the "Basterds"? Certainly not --> fail And what happens to the terrible Nazi-killing Basterds? Well they all get killed by Nazis except two who are taken hostages --> wow, what terrible revengeful monsters they are...\n\nThird: Any characters? Yes one! The only role and the only gleam of hope for the entire movie is Chritoph Waltz who is building a truly deep and very detailed character here. Great acting! Brad Pitt really sucks and is completely out-acted by Waltz. Never seen a such a weak performance by Pitt... And the rest? Well, some Germans you\'ve never seen before and will never see after. When the movie started and I saw the group of the seven Basterds I hoped to see something like the "Magnificent Seven": A group of extraordinary guys, each one with a distinct character, making their way to their destiny fearless and knowing... I was then very disappointed, when I saw the "inglourious Basterds". No details at all, no characters, no real men, just some random guys you won\'t remember who were not given any chance to differentiate themselves... But in fact you don\'t even need to differentiate, cause the "Inglourious Basterds" except Pitt hardly play any role in this movie...\n\nSo I was really disappointed, and seeing this movie on place #40 of the greatest movies of all time is the only thing about this, that leaves me with my mouth opened...', u'-0.386241', u'I will never go to another Tarantino movie again. The entire film was worthless. My wife and I both regret that we didn\'t get up and walk out at the first indication of what the film was really going to be about (which is still hard to determine since it was such a ridiculous storyline...blood, guts, and violence seemed to be the only real theme), but we kept hoping there\'d be something redeeming just around the corner. Unfortunately, there wasn\'t because there wasn\'t anything that made sense! We, along with a lot of the other people in the audience walked out of the theater muttering "that was disgusting", "what a waste of time", "I should\'ve walked out", "where was the comedy", "that was pathetic", etc. It actually made us, the audience, voice our disgust and the feeling that we had just been thoroughly ripped off. The only thing of merit in the film was the costuming and the acting ability of almost everyone in the film....there just wasn\'t a plot/script worthy of their talents. I rate this a 1 because there isn\'t a 0. I can\'t quite understand how anyone could rate this higher than a 0!', u'-0.624635'], u'tt0435761': [u'I attended a special screening for Toy Story 3. I went in with HIGH expectations. I LOVED the first two Toy Stories movies. Toy Story is a beloved franchise that almost everyone that I know loves the first two films. Now how about the 3rd film? Well all I could say is that it lived up to my unbelievably HIGH expectations and then some. This is such a good film. It has the laughs, magic and best of all the entertainment. The new characters in the movie feel like they were in the previous two films, they were that engaging and really worked well in the movie. The best part of the movie has to be the ending, I almost cried and was moved to just about to tears. I truly believe that this is one of the best Trilogies of all time. It might even rival the Lord of the Rings Trilogy.\n\nThis movie has a real chance to become the First Animated Film to win Best Picture. I surely would not be surprised.\n\n10/10 An Amazing End to a Fantastic Series Go Watch It', u'0.605801', u'The best magic tricks in the world are ones that cannot be unraveled, reverse engineered or dissected to figure out exactly how they are pulled off. This philosophy is doubly applicable to Pixar\'s "Toy Story 3", the storyline-ending outro of the beloved Toy Story, uh, story.\n\nI feel it relevant somehow to divulge my age, as it somehow validates the powerful emotions evoked throughout the film. I am a 28 year old male, who, fifteen years ago, was fresh into the teen years of supposed adolescence at the release of some weird, 3d animated movie (wait, they can animate with computers?) entitled "Toy Story". This was a pretty bold move, a calculated stroll to the edge of the cliff and a daring leap off into the thin air of creativity and innovation. And it was a hit, ensuring 3d animation a place right alongside (more or less) 2d animation. And naturally, Pixar would be at the forefront, leading the cavalry charge of digital animation ranging from great to gawd-awful.\n\n"Toy Story 3" starts off as comfortably as possible, with our friends Woody and Buzz Lightyear doing what they do the best...playing with Andy in his world of make-believe adventure. We are then treated to some familiar Pixar progression, like abandonment, solidarity, coming back to friends, and the passing of the torch. Clearly, in the eleven years between this point and when "Toy Story 2" wrapped, a computer revolution or four has occurred, allowing a world of unsurpassed clarity, reality and imagination to shine through like never before. TS1\'s spark is TS2\'s candle, and that in turn is TS3\'s blazing sun.\n\nRoll the last fifteen minutes of film. It became clearly obvious that the figurative tables have been turned, because a good number of the adults in the audience (including myself) were sniffling and teary-eyed, while the kids were looking up, likely thinking "jeez mom and dad, they\'re just toys, get over it".\n\nWasn\'t it conventional wisdom that just the kids get emotional over losing plastic playthings? With "Toy Story 3", Pixar has shown us one of the greatest magic tricks in modern showbiz history, likely not to be outdone or duplicated, that we all have very real and deep connections to our childhoods and to the things and people that allowed us as kids to be free, and innocent, and pure, and most importantly, to dream. This, to me, is a life lesson worth remembering, to infinity and beyond.\n\n"Toy Story 3" gets 10 of 10 blazing stars', u'0.423974', u"Star Wars. Indiana Jones. Fistful of Dollars. Bourne. These are all incredible trilogies that can, will, and should stand the test of time. Yes, I am neglecting the fourth Indiana Jones. Upon the mention of the third Toy Story, I was deathly afraid. Afraid because it has some major, major shoes to fill. The original is a masterpiece that changed animation forever, and the sequel is among the best in the history of film (I mean that). The first two Toy Story films are among the best movies of all-time and to this day entire animation studios have failed to duplicate an ounce of the magic contained in Toy Story. Could part 3 even come close to the original two? My friends, I am very happy to say, the answer is a resounding yes.\n\nToy Story 3 does exactly what the first two did, delivered on all cylinders, all aspects of film-making and entertainment. The humor is back, the heart is back, the delightful cast of characters is back. This time, thanks to an incredible script, there's more suspense, more drama, and many more surprises. Like any spectacular trilogy, it wraps up all loose ends. It literally is difficult to find any flaw or any slow moment in this movie, and even if there is, it will immediately be forgiven by the next major laugh or the next major revelation. The predictability factor in this movie is low, and the payoff to all the suspense is extremely high. Guys, this is the go-to movie of the summer, and makes up for any disappointment you have seen this year or last.\n\nJust like Toy Story 2's subtle and underlying themes, Toy Story 3 revolves around the group of toys and their latest adventure, but dwells far deeper than that. On the surface, this movie is about the toys in a series of circumstances, winding up in a daycare center that isn't all it seems. At the same time, Andy is heading for college, but Woody isn't quite ready to let go of his owner and the memories that follow. The deeper aspects involve aging, growing up, and moving on. Michael Arndt, the Oscar winner that wrote Little Miss Sunshine, was behind the spectacular screenplay in this third trip in the world of toys. Then with the help of John Lasseter and Lee Unkrich (who serves as the director), we see plenty of references to Pixar, other movies, the previous Toy Story installments, and even we even see nods to the influences of the entire animation studio (Miyazaki).\n\nThe writing wasn't the only thing that was on par with the first two Toy Story movies. The voice acting cast was once again phenomenal, with popular actors, underrated talent, and great character actors filling the bill. Come on now, just read em': Tim Allen, Tom Hanks, John Cusack, Wallace Shawn, Jody Benson, Estelle Harris, Blake Clark, John Ratzenburger, Ned Beatty, Jeff Garlin, and Michael Keaton. Unlike what Dreamworks pulls off on a yearly basis, Pixar carefully chooses their voice cast in terms of pulling off the best performances, not to generate more money. Because honestly, was there even a point to Angelina Jolie voicing the tiger in Kung Fu Panda? On the other hand, very few can pull an authentic Barbie like Jody Benson (a.k.a. Ariel in the Little Mermaid). It takes reliable and authentic acting to pull at the heartstrings, and everyone definitely was on their A-game.\n\nLee Unkrich directed this movie with incredible pacing and just as much heart and dedication as Lasseter, who was in charge of the first two. The truth is, Pixar directs the movie together, as they share ideas and suggestions amongst each other. This fact can be traced to the similar pacing and directing styles seen in Pixar's better works like Ratatoille, Finding Nemo, and Up. They all have the similar technique of incorporating just as many tears as laughs. But unlike all the other Pixar movies (with the exception of The Incredibles), Toy Story 3 has a heave dosage of suspense and peril, which is climaxed by one of the most exciting animated sequences this side of Castle in the Sky (a Miyazaki adventure masterpiece). Other reviewers have noted this before me, but this Toy Story is quite scary in depth and in imagery at some instances, so be wary of this while watching this with the kids. With so much time invested with these toys, the drama runs a bit high.\n\nBottom Line: Toy Story 3 secures its place in cinema brilliance by becoming the best third installment since Indiana Jones and the Last Crusade, the best sequel since Kill Bill Vol. 2, and the best movie we've seen this year. This movie is usually hilarious, sometimes thrilling, and sometimes downright tear-jerking. And yes, just like Up's opening 10 minutes, there is that one major sequence in which Pixar will play with your heartstrings like Eric Clapton playing tears of Heaven. If you enjoyed the first two Toy Stories, there's no need to worry about the third and hopefully final chapter in the quality-filled saga. How Pixar manages to deliver yet again is absolutely beyond me.\n\nWalt Disney may not be one-hundred percent proud of his company if he were alive to see it now, but he would be absolutely delighted at seeing what beautiful art Pixar has delivered ever since 1995. Pixar has re-created Walt Disney 's magical methods of storytelling and movie-making, and arguably has taken it a step even further by adding depth to the characters and depth to the overall stories presented. The direction was fantastic, the writing was Oscar-worthy, and the overall production is Best Picture caliber. This is Pixar's best work since Finding Nemo, and a must see by any means necessary. Despite my cynical nature, there's no way I can grade this any less than perfect. Just no way.", u'0.304947', u"I was about 10 or 12 when I watched the first Toy Story in the cinema with my little brother and sister. We were all enchanted! Years later Toy Story 2 came out and it was a blast! Again we all went to the theater to see it and we were so thrilled and excited after the movie! Im 24 now, and just yesterday I was at the Bulgarian gala-premiere of the film. My brother was fortunate to win an invitation for two (he took a photo of himself with our small collection of Toy Story toys and sent it to the website), and we had the chance to see the third part on its first screening... and for the 1st time in 3D! No doubt that the animation is better than ever, the guys from Pixar constantly push the limits, but that's kinda natural for them. But still it feels like 100% Toy Story, with all the improvements, somehow I don't feel this 15-years-wide gap between the first and the third part.\n\nWhat matters more is the (Toy) Story itself! And it is just fantastic! I had really high expectations of this film and honestly, after seeing it, my expectations were surpassed! The plot is really emotional, with so many nostalgic moments... Being kinda grown-up myself, but doing my growing-up with the first two parts of Toy Story, I couldn't relate more with this one! I was really touched! I just wish the theater was empty. Then I could stop holding back my tears! And it's not just t the big story, but also all those little things that go on around it! I don't know how many of those references and gags were in the script and how many were put in there in the making process, but it's just amazing! Even if it's the most dramatic and the darkest of the 3 (as dark as Toy Story can get) the comedy is still there, and I was laughing out loud all the way through! It's a wild roller-coaster, and I'm not even sure who will have more fun with it, if it will be the kids, or their parents! There's just so much more in there for you to notice, admire and laugh at! And I'm sure that after watching the film again I'll find out even more! There's also a really neat Totoro cameo, and it's great of Pixar to pay homage to their old friend, Miyazaki san.\n\nThe old lovable characters are all here, and they are joined by an army of new ones, and each one of them has his real personality and you can recognize in them characteristics of someone, both visually and with their attitude they express different things and you instinctively feel what these toys stand for. It's really funny to recognize in them some movie archetypes or features of people that you know.\n\nI realize that I just poured out tons of superlatives, but there's nothing else you can say about this film! It has everything! (And about how many 3rd parts you can say that?) The only thing I could criticize is that there is one really freaky baby-toy, that can give the creeps to the smaller kids, but it's done on a purpose and for me it was really an enjoyable touch to the atmosphere of the film.\n\nTo wrap up this review, I will just say - Thank you, Pixar!", u'0.376475', u'It was in 1995 that Toy Story signaled the arrival of Pixar, and the rest was history. To date, I have personally always found myself to have enjoyed all of their outputs, and it does seem that Pixar has indeed grown from strength to strength with sophistication in its graphics and attention to detail, but more so that their creative teams have always come out with solid stories to tell, which is always the key beneath all the glossy bells and whistles visuals.\n\nAnd I simply love this installment, not only because it reunites us with the characters whom we have taken to heart as old friends, welcoming them back to yet another big screen outing, but because it has a moving story to tell, and has various elements from action-adventure, comedy and drama all rolled into one, allowing an outpour of a kaleidoscope of emotions as we journey for close to 2 hours with Woody (Tom Hanks), Buzz (Tim Allen), Jessie (Joan Cusack), Mr and Mrs Potato Head (Don Rickles and Estelle Harris), Hamm (John Ratzenberger), Res (Wallace Shawn), Slinky Dog (Blake Clark) and the aliens (Jeff Pidgeon) for one last hurrah.\n\nThe storyline for all three Toy Story films may share some similar plot lines in having the constant fear of being discarded and unwanted when one turns old, or to obsess with the thought of being forgotten and unappreciated, and almost always comes with a distance to conquer. That continues here in stronger terms given that it\'s been some 11 years since the last Toy Story film, and that the toys\' owner Andy has already outgrown the toys and have chucked whatever\'s left all into a treasure chest. Making things worst, he\'s about to relocate to attend college, and thus the anxieties that Woody, Buzz and the rest of the gang has to come to terms with, being provided 4 options of heading for the trash, the attic, being given away or being that rare toy that gets to accompany Andy to his new environment.\n\nNew toys get introduced by way of how the story got crafted involving a children\'s day care centre, where we get to meet up with the over-emphasized, metrosexual Ken (Michael Keaton!) from Barbie (Jodi Benson), and others such as the Lotso bear (Ned Beatty), together with those belonging to a new human character called Bonnie (Emily Hahn) who owns a cool plush Totoro (which doesn\'t speak of course)! Sequels tend to overcrowd their stories with plenty of characters, but it worked perfectly for this installment as other than those which get lines, there are plenty in the background that you may just spot a few that you too may have owned at some point in time. Things also aren\'t quite what they seem at the day care being the paradise for toys in constantly being played with and loved but never to suffer a heartbreak or to be left feeling unwanted, and provides the basis upon which the story develops, providing plenty of challenges for the gang to overcome (gotta love that Monkey!)\n\nWhat\'s powerful about Toy Story 3 are the themes that get thrown in, such as that about loss, and the search and fight for things that are worthwhile. It emphasizes the bonds of friendship and courage, while tackling how the lack thereof in abandonment and the feeling of tremendous loss, can someone turn one into a bitter soul, which allowed for the film to take on tragic, darker consequences unseen in the earlier installments, while balancing the light hearted moments. We get to grow with the familiar characters a little more, while having new ones which are just as fun. Just ask Ken!\n\nAnd a word of caution - prepare those tissues and hankies! Parting is such sweet sorrow, and the manner in which director Lee Unkrich deals with will definitely tug at your heartstrings. At least two scenes got to me, one involving facing a consequence of inevitable hopelessness that is a definite edge of your seat stuff only to remind you of how much you really care for the characters, while the other was what I deem as the perfect send off, an au revoir fit for closing the chapter on this Toy Story arc, while leaving room for another to happen (if it does). It moved, and shows how valuable it is to be loved again, and I thought it was pitch perfect. It would be interesting to know how the creators had intended to end the story, but it was brilliant to have chosen with what was.\n\nToy Story 3 is a must see, and it\'s contending for a space in my top 10 for the year. It\'s a sequel done right, a tale with a lot of heart, with elements encompassing what essentially is a fitting tribute and farewell to beloved characters that have blazed the trail for computer generated animation to take centerstage. As with all PIxar feature films, a short precedes the main feature, and "Day and Night", like the one offered in Up, comes without dialogue, but with plenty of imagination and again, a solid story for a well animated short film that only Pixar can.', u'0.336361', u"As a 28 year old single female lawyer, i have always enjoyed Pixar's movies. I cannot label them as cartoons as there is nothing cartoonish about their stories; they have heart, meaning, feel-goodness with the right touch of class & humor. The formula is A1 yet without feeling overused.\n\nToy Story 3 is once again a hit. We are treated to our favorite familiar characters and reminded again why we like them so. They are heroes who share the same values of team spirit, bonding and camaraderie. No one gets left behind. The technical aspects are again flawless. This is one series of sequels i do not mind seeing for Toy Story 4, 5, 6...this is coming from someone who adamantly refused to watch Toy Story 1 & 2 and UP..up and until last week i forced myself to..and i was so blown away by all three i have never been gladder to be proved wrong.\n\nWatch this, and Pixar, don't stop making movies for us.", u'0.118797', u'Is "Toy Story 3" good? Yes, it is. Is it exciting? Yes. Is the animation good? Excellent. Is it worth the money? It\'s worth. Is it better than the previous two? Much, much better. "Toy Story 3" is an excellent movie for all ages.\n\nFirst, the animation. The moves of the characters are simply perfect. Ken and Barbie, they\'re robotic moves are so breathtaking. The moves are simply so detail and mesmerizing. \n\nThe appearances. Not much to talk about. But, the appearances of the characters were perfectly designed. The main characters were really cool. Ken and Barbie, they\'re really designed in detail. For Barbie, the line where is visible in the neck was really detail. Ken is also really detail especially with his body. Lot-o-Huggin\'-Bear was also carefully designed by the paper which often appears on dolls listing the warning or whatever.\n\nThe way the movie is presented. Very well done. In around 90 minutes of running time (excluding "Day & Night"), the movie was not boring at all. It had some laughable expressions which are pretty funny. I liked it when Buzz turns into Spanish mode where most of the audience laughed. That moment was hysterical. The scenes were also thrilling like the end scene (which I\'m not going to tell you) or the scenes in Sunnyside. I thoroughly enjoyed the film.\n\nThe new characters. Well, I think there\'s one negative point. I think little kids around the age of 3, 4 or 5 might be scared with the appearance of Big Baby, because, his appearance is kind of scary for little kids.\n\nThe 3D effects. Not so cheesy and not so breathtaking but pretty good. The depths of the items in the film were not bad. \n\nThe sound acting. They were really good. Tom Hanks on Woody was really good. He really projected his voice until he becomes a real Woody. Tim Allen on Buzz Lightyear was also good and satisfying. He really sounded like a real astronaut or space ranger. The others were also good. But, I think Tom Hanks on Woody still has the best projection of voice in the film.\n\nFinal thing, the short film attached to it: "Day & Night". It was shockingly, awfully, crazily cool. That short film was quite funny. It was really good. Overall, the short film compliments to the film to be a very good movie.\n\nA short advise, you might want to prepare some tissues to wipe your tears as there are some pretty sad moments in the film. The scenes were just so sad that that\'s another praise for Lee Unkrich on his directing. So, if you don\'t prepare those tissues, I hope you have something you can use to wipe your tears.\n\nAs an amazing end to such a magnificent trilogy, "Toy Story 3" is a must watch movie. Watching it in 3D is not a bad choice. Your kids will definitely be thrilled watching this film. I truly believe this is the best animated film of the year, or even the best film of all 2010 films. If you haven\'t watched this yet, what are you waiting for? Go purchase your tickets and enjoy this masterpiece. I guarantee you that you won\'t regret watching this movie. \n\nOverall, I give this movie a perfect score of 10 stars. I wish a fourth installment would be made.', u'0.304412', u"Since I felt none of the other reviews here do the movie justice, I became compelled to write my own. It is the most inspired film I have ever encountered.\n\nThe creators of Toy Story 3 have an imagination that is unparalleled. I cannot begin to compare any of the other animated movies that I have ever seen to it. It is a fantasy in an unconventional sense: aside from the talking toys, the environment and settings are typical; commonplace. Yet, the Pixar Team manages to cram every last drop of energy into the incredibly clever story and inventive plot devices out of just common household objects. The animation is so brilliant that it captures shading, lighting, and textures that have yet to be seen on film.\n\nThen, Toy Story 3 becomes a beautiful elaboration on the first two, with very clever character development. Its maturity of relationships is concise but witty: Woody, the wise sheriff, leading the other toys with courage and finesse; a spaceman winning the love of a cowgirl; the loyalty of the dog, slinky; the grumpy married potato and his devoted wife; the superficial relationship of Ken and Barbie; the broken spirit of a lost teddy bear. At the same time, Pixar uses a metaphor that is so strong that it drives the audience to love these characters with all of their hearts. It is a similar emotional complex to a happy puppy who is brought into a home and has nothing on its mind but playing with its youthful owners. But these toys never age, and as its owners, once in their playful youths, leave for work and college, these toys still know nothing more than their youth and happiness of living to one day play again. As you leave for work every morning, your dog doesn't know where you go. And every day, he does nothing more than pray that you come back to see him, every day waiting for you to bring out the ball again for a game of fetch.\n\nFinally comes Pixar's ability to integrate so many emotions - fear, love, action, and comedy, among others - with each having so much vigor in its own right, that the movie becomes a roller coaster of animation and adventure, wound together by the constant movement of setting and storyline, always keeping the audience guessing on what might happen next. It is a brilliant tale; a perfect movie for children and adults alike. I cannot wait to see it again.", u'0.244766', u'This movie is the best movie out of the entire franchise hand\'s down! Every character makes a nice warm welcome back during the exposition of the film which makes it quite an enthusiastic introduction, and several new characters either gain more face time or become "brand new" before the audience. There is classic Toy Story humor for the kids and a great deal of character humor throughout for any viewer. Frankly, the newest characters had some of the funniest voices and actions that made the film so much more enjoyable. Although the Andy character was not necessarily the most sincere, there was still plenty of excellent material that gave the movie a heartwarming touch. The movie was completely worth the wait and I suggest it to anybody in the world!', u'0.90063', u'So I saw Toy Story 3 tonight at an early screening here in Houston, TX. A little background info about me. I am a big, no HUGE, Pixar fan, I\'ve watched every film that they have created dozens of times. Let me begin, this is definitely no Ratatouille, Wall-E, or Up. Pixar is definitely coming back to it\'s family roots and Toy Store 3 is extremely evident of that. Don\'t get me wrong, Pixar has completely outdone themselves once again offering a film that is extremely entertaining, thrilling, and fresh, but it is kind of disappointing that the film doesn\'t reach any true depth until the POWERFUL last act.\n\nI\'m going to divide my review into several sections.\n\nWriting: The humor was straight up HILARIOUS. There were several scenes that had the audience ROTFL\'ing, even I, as crude and bitter I may be when it comes to comedy, was laughing out loud at a few parts. However some jokes do fall flat into Dreamworks territory with potty humor (lincoln logs anyone?) which I hope does not become a recurrence, but overall the film had some wonderful writing and dialogue creating a truly believable setting and tone.\n\nAnimation: It\'s truly a shame that some of the later scenes in the final act haven\'t been shown in the commercials because, DAMN, the detail is truly remarkable. Since this is a no spoiler review I won\'t move further into that but let me tell you now, you will be impressed. Humans are beginning to look more realistic with ton\'s of attention to movement and the toys have benefited from some spackle in the facial department in an attempt to create a more emotionally expressive character. While it didn\'t blow me away like Finding Nemo and Wall-E did when they released, the work done here by Pixar is truly solid and way above anything Dreamworks has brought to the table. The 3D is also decent, I\'m not really buying into this whole fad because after a few minutes you don\'t notice the effect. The added depth is nice but you honestly won\'t be missing much if you watch it in a good quality cineplex.\n\nSound: The theater I went to had a pretty weak sound system so I can\'t really comment on the effects but when it comes to voice talent, the actors truly shine. It was sad to see some characters go like Bo Beep and Squeaky but some of the new additions like Lotso and Ken, played by Ned Beatty and Michael Keaton, are some true standouts thanks to the excellent dialogue provided by the script. All the original characters once again do their job quite well and with the excellent editing and mixing, the dynamics of social interaction between the characters are expressed clearly.\n\nDepth/Theme: You know I was going here and I HAD to talk about it. Ratatouille had the whole analysis of segregation with "Everyone can cook", Wall-E brought environmentalism, consumerism, capitalism, and most importantly love to the table, while Up directly deals with death and the emotions that stem from it. Toy Story 3 repeats the abandonment and moving on angle from Toy Story 2 which is TRULY the film\'s weakest link. Not because the movie copies the second films moral, but because TS3 virtually ignored these themes until the last act which I will admit was quite compelling. It would have been nice to spread these serious moments throughout the film to create a balanced equilibrium but unfortunately this does not happen. However I do want to talk about this pivotal juncture in the final act, there was a moment in the movie that only last a minute or two, but felt very, very, very real. I can\'t stress this enough, I have never felt anything like this from a movie. The first time I cried in a move was with Up\'s "Ellie" sequence but for some reason I didn\'t do it here. My emotions went beyond crying, I don\'t know if it was the swirling bright ember colors contrasting with the stark images or the expressiveness of the toys in that very moment, but I sat there in disbelief and was affected in a way that has not existed before.\n\nOverall: I really do wish that Lee Unkrich could have spread the last 15 minutes throughout the movie but that didn\'t happen which is why I could not give this movie a 10, however, that last act SAVED this motion picture from being another run of the mill Dreamworks film. Aside from some of the lame toilet humor and disappointing direction choices, Toy Story 3 is a very solid conclusion to one of the best trilogies of all time that needs to experienced solely for the last beautifully gratifying act with the gang that I grew up with.', u'0.118007', u"Toy Story 3 brings back nostalgia, but that's to be expected. We all think back to fifteen years ago, or eleven years ago, when the Toy Story movies came out the first time. If you're too young for that, then at least the re-release was last year to catch people up, though it's not quite the same thing. As Andy is off to college- as was predicted would happen as a given in Toy Story 2- we in the audience realize that this third film follows a kind of time-line that runs with our lives. Even if you're an adult (i.e. older than my 20-something age) you can relate to what the toys and Andy are going through. What happens at the end of the film, the resolution of the ultimate conflict of what to do with the toys as life goes on, is one of the most beautiful and heartwarmingly bittersweet (well, more like sad-sweet) moments in recent cinema. Pixar tends to do that.\n\nThis is the kind of third movie that makes it a trilogy- it's hard to see it going on to a fourth film and having any kind of the same resonance- and one that seems perfectly fit together in terms of a progressing story. But where something like Star Wars saw the second film as the darkest and third one coming into (somewhat) lighter terms, this is not quite the same with Pixar's baby. Toy Story 3, with it becoming a prison movie in more than just a sense (the toys get sent to Sunnyside Daycare, run by a cute-looking but ruthless bear voiced by Ned Beatty), and what happens in said prison. To be sure, other cute things abound in the movie, from Peas-in-a-Pod to (yes) Totoro from Miyazaki's movie. But in that prison, and other things that happen such as the trip to the junkyard/landfill, it gets dark.\n\nAnd yet, Pixar continues their outstanding method of storytelling and entertainment: nothing is even scaled-down for kids, and nothing is too sappy for adults. A couple of obvious song choices aside- 'Dream Weaver' for when Ken and Barbie first meet, and 'Freak Out' as Ken hilariously tries on a wardrobe- there's nothing that doesn't work for kids and adults, equally, and often more-so for adults than kids (I wonder, for example, when Buzz is reset and becomes El Buzzo and speaks Spanish if the wee little ones will be able to read the subtitles). When it's funny the humor is aimed at sophisticated one-liners and, yes, sophisticated (or just well-timed) slapstick, when there's action it's intense just as in the previous Toy Stories, and when it's heartbreaking it'll make everyone in the audience cry. I wonder if Pixar has some kind of magic movie-voodoo to get the old adage to come alive: you'll laugh, you'll cry- and sometimes in the same breath! \n\nThe new toys are great additions, but they never detract from the classic cast. And even with them, and the great dynamic of the daycare center and its prison atmosphere, we never get lost in the shuffle of toy conflicts and desires and dreams halted (Lotso's backstory is like a twisted version of Jessie's story from Toy Story 2). It would also be a given to say that the animation keeps getting better, a little higher quality in stylization and panache, but the animators and filmmakers also aim higher in a number of ways. The opening of the film, with its grand depiction of what's going on inside of Andy's mind as he plays with his toys, an Old West-Sci/fi hybrid complete with a train full of troll orphans and Hamm as a giant flying pig-spaceship-weapon, is so epic as to seem like it's out of a much bigger Summer Action Blockbuster than it should be. Or rather, Toy Story IS this summer's big Blockbuster, and it's epic enough to be qualified as a kind of mini-masterpiece - that is, until the rest of the film unfolds.\n\nAt the least, Buzz dancing to Spanish Salsa music, and that end of the movie, make it one of the high points of Pixar's career - and this is following WALL-E and Up!", u'0.267838', u'Andy is now seventeen years old and is going to college. His mother presses him to decide the fate of his toys, and Andy decides to leave them in the attic, with the exception of Woody that he intends to bring with him. However Andy\'s mother donates them by accident to the Sunnyside Daycare. The toys are welcomed by Lotso Bear but sooner they discover that the children mistreat them. Further, they are imprisoned in the daycare by Lotso and his gang. But Woody discovers the intention of the evil bear and returns to the daycare to organize the escape of his friends. \n\n"Toy Story 3" is a wonderful and touching animation for adults\x85 imagine for children. This magnificent tale of loyalty and friendship is fantastic and recommended for the whole family and it is a worth entertainment. My vote is ten.\n\nTitle (Brazil): "Toy Story 3"', u'0.116208', u'The only Disney movie I cried in was Lion King. The other Disney film that came close was Pixar\'s WALL E. I did not cry during Toy Story 3. I went home walked into my room a realized that my Optimus Prime is not at the foot of my door, my Sylvester the Cat stuffed toy was not on my bed, and my McDonald\'s Sonic the Hedgehog toy was not on my shelf. My conner only housed my stack of video games. I asked myself why did my mother give away my toys without my permission? At THAT moment is when I thought about the last 30 minutes of Toy Story 3 I started to cry. This film was a carelessly thoughtful stoke of genius! It keeps both children and adults entertained. Lots of drama, lots suspense, and lots of toys! Disney and Pixar outdid themselves with this one. Toy Story was a smash hit when it first hit the screens. Toy Story 2, in my opinion, was not as good as its first installment but it was a film that almost never hit theaters so I\'ll give them the benefit of doubt. But Toy Story 3 set the bar "to infinity and beyond!" The VA cast was pheNOMenal. The visuals were stunning! The script was enjoyable! This movie reached all corners of film greatness (and its a kid\'s movie). I have no idea how Disney and Pixar knock out great movies like this (they make it look easy). I related to Andy in this film just as I did in Toy Story 3. The ending was so tough to watch without sniffling because if you watched Toy Story at around Andy\'s age during the time and you watch Toy Story 3 around Andy\'s age now (he was 17 and I am 22 and went through roughly the same hassle as he did when he was moving out for college), you would feel a wallop of emotion. Toy Story 3 is a MUST SEE. If you don\'t have children to take to go see this film then take friends who saw the first two films.', u'0.113577', u"I am 52 years old and have seen an embarrassingly huge amount of movies over the past 45+ years. Toy Story 3 is one of the best movies I have ever seen.\n\nIt took me a few days to figure out why I was so affected by the movie. Toy Story 3 is really funny and imaginative, but so are a lot of other movies. I could see that the audience, including my own two children (16 and 11), were deeply engrossed in the film, laughing and crying, and bursting into applause together after the final scene. It is very rare today to see a theater audience having such a deep and common understanding of something as a group. I had seen this occur more frequently in the past, however, so the shared experience (while very nice) isn't really what makes the movie so great for me.\n\nI think that the movie is great because Woody has to struggle with his age and purpose in way that seems so shockingly real. In the first part of my life, I only wanted to find a role that was worthy of me, an education or a job or a spouse that would let me....well...what I did wasn't really important, only that I be the greatest at whatever unique thing I was supposed to do. In the second part of my life, I found myself doing something that wasn't unique - it was pretty much what others did; Nor was I the greatest - I was only average. But I did it anyway, because the things I was to trying create and help, both in job and family, those things were important, even if they were ordinary. In the third part of my life....I sense there will come a time when I will still be loved but not needed. And it has to be that way, because otherwise death would be too hard to bear, for me and for those I leave behind.\n\nI can accept all of this....but still be really happy when Andy plays with his toys one last time.", u'0.276647', u'I left the theater in 1995 after seeing the original Toy Story strangely moved. I was only six years old, and I\'m not sure I had even fully grasped the revolutionary CGI for what it was (it probably just registered as animation to me, and I didn\'t quite understand its impact), but I did know \x96 at least on a basic level of storytelling \x96 that it was fantastic. Four years later I went to see the sequel with my younger sisters and felt the exact same way I had the first time. Even at a fairly young age I knew there was something special about these films.\n\nMany times nostalgia has to compensate for quality (or lack thereof) in your perception of entertainments as you age. Suddenly Mac and Me isn\'t as awesome as you once found it to be. You revisit films from your childhood and learn to appreciate them based solely on the memories they conjure up, trying to block out the reality that, hey, This kinda sucks.\n\nThat never happened with the Toy Story movies. As I grew older, as I saw them more and more times, they only seemed to improve. New layers appeared \x96 adult humour that I never appreciated when I was ten but suddenly blindsided me. Characters that revealed new depths; emotional scenes that only became increasingly poignant and meaningful, like that amazing scene where Buzz first becomes aware of his own mortality as a toy that can\'t really fly, or when he learns to cope with that fact by embracing the fact that he can instead fall rather well (with style).\n\nThe point of this rambling trip down memory lane is that Toy Story, the whole legacy of it, means a lot to me. I grew up with these pictures and never tired of returning to them, and they were always there for me like a good friend is. I approached Toy Story 3 with the slightest of reservations, fully trusting Pixar, and yet wondering how they could possibly produce anything that would live up to such high standards.\n\nWell, suffice to say, they did it \x96 if Toy Story 3 isn\'t the best of the series, then that\'s merely because it comes eleven years after the last one and it hasn\'t been given some time to work its full magic on us. This is every bit as engaging, heartwarming and funny as the first two films \x96 but it\'s also the saddest, most human and most moving.\n\nThe plot has already been outlined by other critics, so I don\'t feel a need to recap anything. Nor do I want to inadvertently spoil any key moments (and please, for your own sake, avoid reading too much about the movie before going to see it \x96 some reviewers are a bit too keen on giving away the ending, although it\'s understandable given how surprisingly emotional it is).\n\nThe introduction of new characters is seamless \x96 Ken (voiced by Michael Keaton) is hilarious but thankfully not overused, and the other assorted variety of toys, including Lots-o\'-Huggin\' Bear (Ned Beatty), are fine additions to the series.\n\nAnd Woody and Buzz (Tom Hanks and Tim Allen, respectively) pick up right where they left off, and you feel, in a weird way, like you\'re visiting old pals. The movie features the best animation of the trilogy, and the second half \x96 which is darker than the two previous installments \x96 makes excellent use of lighting and cinematography. The climactic finale is incredibly intense (especially for a "kids movie") and features particularly impressive visuals. Many reviewers have noted that they cried during the finale, and even I must admit that I came pretty close.\n\nIn a summer full of bores, disappointments and under-achievers, Toy Story 3 is not merely the first thoroughly satisfying motion picture of the season \x96 it\'s the only truly moving one. It is fairly ironic, perhaps, that we must turn to movies about pieces of plastic to find such poignant reflections upon human nature, but then again, I\'m not sure I\'d want to have it any other way.', u'0.081935'], u'tt0087843': [u'\nMany people compare "Once Upon a Time in America" with "The Godfather". In my opinion these two movies can\'t be compared. Both are masterpieces in their own way, but each of them has a different style. You don\'t compare a Picasso to Michelangelo\'s Sixteen Chapel either, do you?\n\nWhat is it that makes this movie a masterpiece? Well, first of all there is the director. Sergio Leone is a real master when it comes to creating a special atmosphere, full of mystery, surprises and drama... He\'s one of the few directors who understands the art of cutting a movie in such a way that you stay focused until the end. \n\nThe way the movie was cut is also the reason why a lot of Americans don\'t think this movie is very special. There are three versions, but only the European version is how the director imagined it to be. He didn\'t want his movie to be shown in chronological order (1910\'s - 1930\'s - 1960\'s), but wanted to mix these three periods of time. The studio cut the movie in chronological order, loosing a lot of its originality and therefor getting a lot of bad critics. If you want to see this film the way Sergio Leone saw it, you have to make sure you get the director\'s cut. \n\nThe second reason why this movie is so great is the music. Ennio Morricone, who is seen as the greatest writer of film music ever, did an excellent job. Together with the images, the music speaks for itself in this movie. From time to time there isn\'t said a word, but the music and the images on their own tell the story. He understood perfectly what Sergio Leone wanted and composed most of the music even before the movie was shot.\n\nLast but not least there is also the acting and the script. The actors all did an excellent job. But what else can you expect from actors like Robert De Niro, Joe Pesci... They helped making this movie as great as it is by putting there best effort in it. The script helped them with it. It took twelve years to complete, but it hasn\'t left any detail untouched. The writers really thought of everything when creating it.\n\nI can really recommend this movie to everyone, but especially to people who like the gangster genre. When you want to see the movie, you better be sure that you will have the time for it. This isn\'t a movie that is finished after 90 minutes. You\'ll have to be able to stay focused during 3 hours and 47 minutes, which will certainly not be easy during the first 20 to 30 minutes. Some scenes at the beginning only make sense when you have seen the end of the movie. But when you are able to stay focused, you\'ll find this one of the best movies you\'ve ever seen. I certainly did and I rewarded it with a well deserved 10/10.\n', u'0.322095', u'This movie was a masterpiece. It ranks as one of the very best in film history, if not the best. At Cannes people yelled and screamed, couldn\'t believe just how good it was. The profound atrocity was a combination of two completely brainless acts, the first being Zack Stienberg\'s hatchet job for US release, supposedly requested by either Warner Bros or The Ladd Company (one blames the other now) and the second was the lack of anyone (and everyone)to post anything in this great film for Academy Award consideration, of which probably as many as 14 nominations and 4 sure- fire Oscars went down the toilet. \n\nThese atrocities were perpretrated, I believe, with two reasons in mind, the first to preserve the dim hope of "The Killing Fields" (Daly & Semel\'s baby) of garnering any awards... and second, to try to boost up the non- foreign chances. Warner Bros knew just how good it was, that goes without saying. The problem was... they already had their share of cash cows and they wanted a real star- studded showpiece to point at. The small minds already had their showpiece but, alas, it was an "eye- tallyan" flick with a producer/director who didn\'t communicate well. The hatchet job was carefully planned, I believe... the so- called "sneak preview" was done in Canada and not well received, probably due to the fact that the sound system was over- amped and the film \'broke\' 3 or 4 times during the showing, what a farce! The awards snub started with the GGs and carried right thru. What a myriad of stupid and utterly pointless decisions! Must have literally tore Leone\'s heart out when he learned what they had done. \n\nMorricone\'s score was a sure- thing Oscar, no question about it. DeNiro and maybe even Woods would have fought it out for best actor, Tuesday Weld as supporting actress, any one of 4 or 5 other supporting actors & actresses, most notably William Forsythe, cinematography, film editing, the list goes on & on... (best picture...Amadeus???? give me a break!!) Just what in the hell were they thinking? \n\nSaw it in a theater 20 years ago and then again on TV about 1998 and finally in its correct format(on DVD) about two years ago and again last week at a friend\'s house. Stirred up all those angry thoughts all over again... sorry about that, getting\' old & crotchety.', u'-0.27888', u"\nThis is, for me, one of the finest examples of cinematic art. It isn't a simple, cut-n-dried 90 minute little package that gets wrapped up with a pretty bow at the end. You get pulled in by the enigmatic opening that unwinds the threads of the story to be found later. For many people having half an hour of purely visual story telling, of stories that are only mysteries at that point, before anything becomes truly linear is difficult to follow and discourages to many people. Our own memories are only snippets that only become linear as we concentrate on scenes from our lives. Once Upon a Time in America is like that as we follow Noodles through the `significant' part of his life - the times that formed him. When the story actually starts, we meet the girl that he always loved but could never have.\n\nDavid `Noodles' Aaronson (DeNiro) was a kid on the very mean streets of Brooklyn when organized crime was born in America and he grew into and out of it. That's the simplest synopsis of the plot. The reality is that this isn't a movie about gangsters. Being a gangster is the easiest way for Noodles to survive and get ahead, but it also alienates and ruins his one love. Whenever he is close to giving himself to Deborah he always gets pulled back into the gang, in some form or another.\n\nDeNiro's portrayal is of a gangster, through and through, who also has a conscience that, while not preventing him from being a ruthless killer, rules his life with regret, remorse and guilt. Leone takes a bit of poet/historic license by showing the Brooklyn Bridge being built in the background (the bridge had been built 40 years before), but it symbolizes Noodles' own growth. When the bridge is just pilings and incomplete towers, Noodles is just forming his future. By the time the bridge is complete, Noodles is nothing but a gangster and the bridge is majestic. When he returns 35 years later our view of the bridge is from under a freeway -- the world has moved along, but the bridge and Noodles are just as they were.\n\nThe length: If you're looking for a brief distraction that you'll barely remember 30 minutes later, this isn't the movie for you. However, if you are prepared and able to be undistributed for the nearly 4 hours that this film uses to compress a lifetime -- you will be rewarded with many facets of thought and examination.", u'0.180664', u"\nThis film is a profound expression of truth regarding friendship and betrayal.  Noodles, played by Robert De Niro and Scott Tiler (during childhood), is a simple man and a thug with one credo: you can battle the entire world but you never betray a friend.  During the course of this film we experience various pieces of Noodles's life, from childhood, through young adulthood and old age. We learn what happens to his friends, his foes and the love of his life, Deborah.  The time span considered is long, including Noodles's childhood shortly after the turn of the century, through the prohibition era, and finally the 1960's.\n\nThe film is about relationships; the many years Noodles spends away from his friends receive only a cursory mention. The film, like life and memories, unfolds slowly and reflectively. Sergio Leone's cuts are long and each scene is beautifully amplified my Ennio Morricone's haunting score.  The story is not told chronologically. Instead, the chapters of the story are slowly revealed like pieces of a great jigsaw puzzle. Each delicious piece might make us laugh, or cry, or smile, or feel shock.  But, as each piece falls into place, a mystery unfolds. When the final piece is revealed, the true essence of the story becomes clear and a sad and beautiful tapestry comes into view.\n\nThis film is a true masterpiece, expressing a profound statement about friendship and betrayal, with fantastic acting, writing, directing and music.  There is a shortened, two-and-a-half-hour version of the film released that is a disaster.  It is like trying to understand a jigsaw puzzle with half of the pieces missing. The original four-hour film can be viewed and enjoyed several times and each time the viewer will see something new.\n", u'0.287767', u'Simply the best movie ever made. Dot.\n\nLife. Love. Friendship. Nostalgia. Souvenirs. Childhood. Adulthood. Betrayal. Children\'s dreams. Psychology. Sex. Manhood. Womanhood. Romance. Illusions. Acting. Ambition. Glory. Fate. Masochism. Sadism. History. Death...\n\nSome even say it\'s a movie on Italian Mafia...\n\nThis movie is to cinema what "A day in the life" is to modern music : an evocation of what life is, in a global approach, with its darker sides and its epic moments, and in the end everything is vain and you die. Magnified as always by the superb work of Ennio Morricone, and the perfect acting of De Niro and Woods, it was for Sergio Leone THE movie of his life, his long time cherished plan, his masterpiece to end with. Additionally, it has become THE movie of the 20th century.', u'0.147104', u'\nSergio Leone\'s films are all love letters to America, the American dreams of an Italian who grew up at the movies, who apprenticed with Wyler, and Aldrich, signed himself Bob Robertson, and gave us Clint Eastwood, Lee Van Cleef, Charles Bronson as we know them.  Sadly, America didn\'t always repay the compliment.  Leone\'s were "spaghetti westerns", money makers to be sure, but deemed  disrespectful of the great tradition of Ford, Walsh and Hathaway. Many critics and Holllywood insiders called his earlier Eastwood films cynical and violent bottom-line commercial exploitation.  By the time that they caught on to Leone\'s genuine popular appeal, the director had already moved on.  And, his Once Upon a Time in the West was damned as pretentious, bloated, self-indulgent: an art film disguised as a Western, the Heaven\'s Gate of its day. That film\'s canny blend of pop appeal and pure cinematic genius gradually dawned on the powers that be (or were), and helped give rise to the renaissance of American filmmaking in the early seventies. It is worth noting that The Godfather could have been made by Leone, had he chosen. Leone had been pitching a gangster film that would encompass generations, for a generation or two, himself.  Rather than do the Puzo version finally thrown back at him, he waited an eternity, and finally realized this, his last finished project.  That ellipse of a decade or so between conception and completed movie is paralleled in the film, itself, by Robert De Niro\'s ("Noodles\'") opium dream of the  American twentieth century, its promises, and betrayals.  Naturally, Leone was betrayed, once again, himself, by America, and this truly amazing film, with its densely multi-layered, overlapping flashback structure was butchered upon its release, becoming a linear-plotted sub-Godfather knockoff in the process. Luckily, the critics had grown up enough in the meantime to finally get a glimmering of what Leone was up to, and demand restitution.  Very few saw it properly in theaters, but the video version respects the director\'s intentions, more or less.  Ironically, Leone had foreseen television screen aspect ratios as determining home viewing of the future, and abbreviated his usual wide screen format for this movie, so this most troubled last project was the first released on video to most properly  resemble the true cinematic experience.  For diehard fans of the Eastwood westerns impatient with this at first, watch those movies till you want and need more.  This will eventually get to you.  For art film fanatics who don\'t get the earlier Leones, travel in the reverse direction, and you will be pleasantly surprised.  This is the movie that Leone spent a decade conceiving. It will deliver for decades of viewing to come.         ', u'0.0528335', u'It\'s been said that when one watches a "spaghetti" western (one of the "Man with no name" films with Clint Eastwood) filmmaker Sergio Leone\'s trademark cinema style and flair for clear storytelling is instantly recognizable. This is no truer than in his most ambitious effort, Once Upon a Time in America, in which his usage of close-ups, concise camera movement, sound transitions and syncs, and the sudden change in some scenes from tenderness to violence. And, he pulls it off without making the viewer feel dis-interested. Of course, it\'s hard to feel that way when watching the cast he has put together; even the child actors (one of which a young Jennifer Connelly as the young Deborah) are believable. Robert De Niro projects his subtitles like a pro, with his occasional outburst in the right place; James Woods gives one of his first great performances as Max; Elizabeth McGovern is the heart of the film; and Joe Pesci should\'ve had more than just a one scene appearance, thought it\'s still good. \n\nIt\'s a story of life-long friends, in the tradition of the Godfather movies with obvious differences, and the story cuts back and forth to Noodles (De Niro) in his old age returning from exile, looking back on his childhood in Brooklyn, his rise to power with his partners, and the twists come quite unexpectedly. The pace is slow, but not detrimental, and it gives the viewer time to let the emotions sink in. The story is also non-linear, and yet doesn\'t give away facts to the viewer- this is something that more than likely influenced Tarantino (and many others) in style. By the end, every detail that has mounted up makes the whole experience rather fulfilling, if not perfect. Finally, I\'d like to point out the exceptional musical score. Ennio Morricone, as it says on this site, has scored over four hundred films in forty years, including Leone\'s movies. This would have to be, arguably, one of his ten best works- his score is equally lively, saddened, intense, and perhaps majestic for a gangster epic. Overall, it\'s filled with the same spirit Leone had in directing the picture, and it corresponds beautifully- there are some scenes in this film that would simply not work without the strings. Grade: A', u'0.389132', u"Leone's beautiful vision met with an epic story to create one of the most beautiful movies of all time. Four hours long but time melts away as you are transported into New York. In a movie where the importance of time is stressed, and how it should not be wasted, it is pleasing that this considerably long movie does not waste, rather enhance your time. Instead of regretting lost time we are instead left exhilarated and wondering. Performances all-round are fantastic right from the child performances, 'Noodles, I slipped' to the aged De Niro with a look in his eye that he has seen it all before. His weariness is astonishingly realistic and applause should be directed at De Niro and his method. A true masterpiece.", u'0.420303', u'"Once Upon a Time in America" is a film set free of time; it spans many different years and, like "Citizen Kane," never tells the audience where it is. As many times as I watch it, I can never guess what is going to happen next.\n\nAnd watching "Once Upon a Time in America" on the new extended DVD is like revisiting an old friend, finally seeing a masterpiece in its entirety. Many people complained of the choppiness in the three-hour-version of the film originally released in 1984 - and the new four hour version puts all the pieces together and is truly marvelous to behold.\n\nThis is the dirty, gritty version of "The Godfather." It has an incredible amount of violence, especially for a film made almost twenty years ago. I\'m not sure how much violence, sexual content and so on was in the original cut, but this extended version is pretty close to an NC-17 rating.\n\nThe film stars Robert De Niro in one of his most memorable yet forgotten roles. He plays Noodles, a gangster operating sometime during the 1930s. Noodles grew up during the early 1900s, and on the streets he and four other kids started their own crime operation. After a local crime lord named Bugsy gets jealous and murders the youngest member of Noodles\' operation, Noodles returns the favor and kills Bugsy. Apprehended by police, Noodles is sent to jail for years.\n\nSometime, years later, Noodles is released into the free world. He isn\'t a changed man, either. His old crime buddy Max (James Woods) picks him up and introduces him to the old gang members. Soon they are back in business, working for Frankie (Joe Pesci). \n\nThis is the truest definition of an epic. "Once Upon a Time in America" is one of the most forgotten gangster films, and yet it is ironically one of the best. It took director Sergio Leone almost ten years to get this motion picture to the screen. Sergio\'s original script treatment - the outline for the story - was 200 pages long. Just the outline. Soon he employed numerous writers to redo the script, and they bounced it up to 400 pages. There is a saying that for every page in a film script, there is one minute of screen-time. You do the math. \n\nAfter the long scriptwriting process, they then had to get permission to film the movie, from the author of the novel this film is based upon. Then, after that struggle, there came the film itself. How to turn such a bold narrative into a compelling film? What techniques should be used? Where to start?\n\nThe beginning of the film opens up during the 1930s or sometime around then, fast-forwards to the 1960s, then flashbacks to the early 1900s. It skips around a lot. This makes the viewer active, trying to figure out where and when they are. It is an element that gives a film rewatchability. Roger Ebert pointed out that "Citizen Kane" is set free of chronology, and the same goes for "Once Upon a Time in America." \n\nSergio Leone is the master of extreme close-ups and wide frame shots, seen in "Fistful of Dollars" and here with wide shots of busy streets. In one scene a young girl (pre-stardom Jennifer Connelly) walks along a street, and Leone pulls the camera up, up, up and back, back, back, revealing the entire street. Soon she is lost in the crowd. The same thing is done with De Niro\'s character as a child, and we lose image of him in the crowd, but then Sergio uses an almost invisible dissolve and we come back upon him.\n\nThe acting by De Niro is superb. His character, Noodles, is probably the character in this film who is most in-touch with his feelings. We often feel for him, but numerous times in the film he does things disturbing and sickening and we are repulsed. One scene extended in the DVD is the controversial rape scene between De Niro and Elizabeth McGovern. After it is all over, Noodles climbs out of the back seat of the car and walks to the side of the road, standing there, looking into the distance. Many people say this is guilt because he knows what he has done and is ashamed. I don\'t think so. During the film he rapes numerous women and doesn\'t seem to mind at all. I think the point Leone was trying to make is that De Niro\'s character has no idea how to treat or respect women. His entire life he grew up around women who were treated as objects (such as the young prostitute who lived in his apartment complex). So when Noodles stands by the side of the road, this is not from the guilt of what he has done - it is from the guilt of not knowing how to treat a woman, not knowing what to say, not knowing what to do. Not knowing how to respect her. His entire life he was taught that women were just there for pleasure, but when he stands by the road this is a sign that Noodles is starting to think this may all be wrong. It is the guilt of naivety, not self-awareness.\n\n"Once Upon a Time" is the master of gangster flicks. Two other tremendous gangster flicks, "The Godfather" and "Goodfellas," have gotten the respect they rightfully deserve over the years - but "Once Upon a Time in America" has been seemingly ignored - up until know. I hope that this DVD sparks a newfound interest in the film, because no one should go a lifetime without seeing this moving motion picture.', u'-0.0458614', u"\nOnce Upon a Time in America, which bookends Once Upon a Time in the West as director Sergio Leone's best work, is a powerhouse of a movie. A gangster epic told in a very different style than the standard of the genre, The Godfather, it is in some ways (at least to this viewer) even more emotionally compelling. Although the movie was sabotaged upon release by an edited studio version eliminating about 40% of its original length, the version now available for rental is thankfully the nearly 4 hour version intended by Leone.  The story is at essence a basic one about friendship among thieves, telling the story of a group of Jewish kids in New York near the turn of the century who grow up to become powerful and ruthless mobsters, while maintaining (or trying to) their bond with one another.  As was most famously done in the taxi scene between Rod Steiger and Marlon Brando in On The Waterfront, the movie again makes the point that bad people can have good aspects to them, such as loyalty, devotion, and even love. I think this movie includes one of Deniro's best roles, and far and away James Woods best film work. The score, by arguably the greatest movie composer of all time, Ennio Morricone, is incredibly haunting in its beauty and sadness (with no fewer than three separate themes that are breathtakingly beautiful).  The non-chronological manner in which the story is told results in a wonderfully effective narrative device:  the movie begins and ends with the same scene.  The first time you see the scene, it is a frantic jumble, without meaning or context, and you do not know why it is so important.  When the scene recurs at the end of the film, everything has become clear, and the scene has an incredible poignancy and sadness to it:  although it occurs in the middle of events chronologically, you realize that, in a real sense, life stopped at this point for one of the film's main characters.  There is no other event that matters anymore to him. This is not a simple movie, and it merits repeated viewings.  Indeed, in my view one cannot fully appreciate the greatness of the film until the second viewing, when the full story is known, and the  events of the film resonate with knowledge of where they ultimately, and tragically, lead.", u'0.44664', u'"Once Upon a Time in America" is probably the most difficult film I have ever encountered in terms of completing an overall accurate cinematic criticism. This movie just grows in myth and debate as the years come and go. Co-writer/director Sergio Leone (who became an international success with "A Fistful of Dollars", "For a Few Dollars More" and "The Good, the Bad and the Ugly" in the late-1960s) could not really figure out what to do with the complicated novel "Hoods" when adapted to the silver screen. He struggled through with writes, re-writes and several versions of this production. Every version seemingly has more questions than the one before. There are six screenwriters credited. In the end the final product (the very long running 229-minute version) is one of those films that cannot really be talked about. If you try to talk about this production with someone unfamiliar with it, you will leave them dumb-founded and completely confused. Elements of time, situations, heart of the story and characterization get mixed up into a long and winding road of a movie that is extremely deep and definitely complicated. An elderly Jewish man in the 1960s (Robert DeNiro with heavy makeup) comes back to his old New York neighborhood and goes on a quiet and sad journey of remembrance and personal loss. Flashbacks to the early-1920s start quickly as we see a young group of Jewish adolescents in New York (Scott Tiler, Rusty Jacobs, Adrian Curran and Brian Bloom among them) run around town and take advantage of hard-core criminal syndicates and dim-witted beat police officers. The group is wise beyond their years. They have street-smarts that put them into a high class of law-breakers. Early problems develop and brutal multiple murders take place by Tiler. He is sent to prison for the better part of the 1920s and returns in the 1930s in the form of Robert DeNiro. The other youngsters have grown up to become James Woods (in his first legitimate screen role), William Forsythe and James Hayden. DeNiro\'s reunion comes and goes like a lightning strike and the group gets back to old crime basics. By this time Prohibition is a way of life for the gangsters of major U.S. metropolitan areas and the quartet takes full advantage of that opportunity to run wild around the city and create immense profits for themselves. Killing men in their way and even at times raping women in their path becomes a norm as the production advances. Other characters leave almost as fast as they appear. Joe Pesci, Burt Young, Treat Williams and Danny Aiello make such short runs that if you are not paying attention closely you might miss them. The women make more pronounced impressions. Youngster Jennifer Connelly grows to become Elizabeth McGovern (DeNiro\'s childhood love who has aspirations of acting and singing professionally) and Woods finds companionship with the ultra-erotic and smart-mouthed Tuesday Weld (doing her best work by a mile). As the movie continues, DeNiro and Weld develop a bond of hate that turns into mutual respect and eventually they even become the oddest of friends. Woods and DeNiro have a mutual unspoken brotherly love that translates into one of the most important relationships in the history of the movies (DeNiro and Al Pacino would later share a similar bond in the vastly under-rated "Heat" some 11 years later). As all this happens though we begin to wonder if all we are seeing is the true reality. A dream-like beginning (which supposedly shows the fates of the four criminals) does not always fit with an amazingly strange final 30 minutes that seems to defy convention, time constraints for the characters and major cinematic screen-writing principles. Symbolism that has always been prevalent in the Italian cinema also comes into play here and these symbols may indeed hold the true answers to the mysteries within. And then again, maybe not. "Once Upon a Time in America" was Sergio Leone\'s final film and it grows in myth and legend due to that fact. Much like similar movies like "Giant" (James Dean\'s final performance) and "Eyes Wide Shut" (Stanley Kubrick\'s hypnotic final production), this movie just seems to go into a higher stratosphere of Hollywood that totally ignores the typical norms that are always in association with other big-name movie products. James Hayden even died of an apparent drug overdose shortly after this film was initially released while performing on Broadway. And thus the legends grow and multiply. Overall in the end I do believe that "Once Upon a Time in America" is arguably the finest movie of the 1980s. It is definitely a unique production that stands near the paramount of a decade that was mired in stupid comedies, teen flicks and endless horror movie installments. DeNiro is truly a revelation once again here and he dominates most in a production of seemingly endless wonderful performances. The movie is one of those that should be studied and analyzed over and over by those who really want to get to the root of cinematic history and development. Much like its running time, the excellence of "Once Upon a Time in America" is nearly immeasurable. 5 stars out of 5.', u'-0.0129908', u"This Godfather-type film was done by Sergio Leone, of spaghetti-western fame, so you know you will see and experience several of his trademarks. Namely: (1) a lot of facial closeups; (2) some slow-motion or slow-moving dramatic scenes; (3) good overall photography and (4) a unique soundtrack.\n\nThe period sets here are magnificent. You get a real feel of the time, whether it's 1910, 1933 or 1967. The colors are awash in blacks, browns and grays and the DVD brings all these out very well, especially considering the film is over 20 years old.\n\nDespite some of Leone's slow moments, this is a fascinating film to watch for the story, too. There are numerous memorable scenes, some of them involving some downright shocking violence, even for today's movies. However, the amount of violence is less than what you see today.\n\nThe movie also sports an interesting twist near the end involving the two major characters, played by Robert De Niro and James Woods. The story is not always clear, either, so be prepared to be possibly confused about a few things....at least on the first viewing. Confused or not, this film always is fascinating to view, especially with intense actors such as the two men just mentioned, along with Elizabeth McGovern, Tuesday Weld, Joe Pecsi, Burt Young, Treat Williams and more.\n\nThe child actors in here take up almost half the movie and are excellent. What an injustice they don't receive any publicity for their acting, especially the kids who played De Niro and Woods as youngsters. One of the girls has become a famous adult actress: Jennifer Connelly. She was 12 years old in this film and was already alluring.\n\nThis is Godfather-type crime movie that ranks right up there with that famous film, not taking a back seat to it at all.", u'0.163273', u"\nOnce Upon a Time in America is Sergio Leone's epic tale of the lives of four Jewish gangsters in New York City. The period spans decades, ending in the 1970's, but focuses on three periods - the childhood of the gangsters on the Lower East Side, their young adulthood and the old age of the survivors. \n\n\nThe protagonist, in a manner of speaking, is Noodles (Robert DeNiro), who along with Max (James Woods) calls the shots for the gang. The story focuses on their odd friendship and their relationships with the other gangsters (William Forsythe and James Hayden), and with Fat Moe (John Rapp), a non-gangster friend from the neighborhood.  \n\nWatching Once Upon a Time in America is a very strange experience. Director Sergio Leone directs with the same eclectic, erratic style he employed in his better-known `spaghetti westerns' starring Clint Eastwood. The result is an exquisite, ridiculous movie. \n\nAt least it's a thing of beauty to look at, and this gets you half-way there. At times, the movie has overwhelming visual impact -- when Leone films the actors close-up, they look like portraits painted by the Great Masters, and in wider shots he frames the actors so that they interact electrically with the locations or sets. And the sets are themselves beautifully produced - his reconstruction of the Lower East Side, for instance, is vivid and incredibly detailed. It's all wonderful to see.\n\n\nLeone also skillfully uses music to set the scene and convey emotion. True to form, his melancholy theme music is hard at work in the movie, and it performs yeoman service. Now and then he trips up, however -- his trademark use of pan-flute solos is even weirder here than in the spaghetti westerns, and, to be frank, when the Beetles song `Yesterday' popped up at one point, I laughed out loud, so out of place was it, so cloyingly sentimental. For the most part, though, Leone's characters are amazing to look at, set in vivid backgrounds and propelled forward by terrific music.\n\n\nUnfortunately, the plot and the writing are terribly clumsy, and so the movie does not make it all the way to the status of a great film. It's a bridge half built, which can be more frustrating than no bridge at all.\n\n\nActually, the movie's premise is intriguing at first, and the fatuous dialogue doesn't get in the way too much. Noodles has been driven out of New York and has lived in exile, hiding for more than 30 years until he receives a mysterious invitation to return to New York for an unknown reason. But the screenplay itself is a toxic brew of histrionics and adolescent bravado, with an almost comically-exaggerated sense of its own gravitas. It was clearly written by a staff of writers, and what's even more clear is that all of them spoke English as a second language. The movie is reminiscent of a story written about adult life by a teenager -- it is not nearly as deep as it thinks it is. \n\nTroopers all, the very talented actors weather the implausible situations and hokey dialogue as best they can. As the hours roll on (I watched the four-hour long `director's version'), and the story marches toward its unsurprising conclusion, the viewer begins bracing for this with a mixture of dread and relief. At the end, the disappointment is all the more palpable because the cast, sets and cinematography are so good, and some of the initial scenes held great promise. \n\nThe fact that the movie is itself mostly about rough people is absolutely no excuse for any of this, as Martin Scorcese's phenomenal Goodfellas readily proves. Likewise, the fact that the movie is set amidst a haze of opium at certain points is even less excuse for shoddy characterizations . The simple truth is that the movie is trite and makes little or no sense, long version or short. \n\nLeone assembled an impressive cast of young talent to act out the story of Once Upon a Time in America. As mentioned, most of them try very hard to make the fatuous story float, and some - particularly Woods and Tuesday Weld as Max's sometimes-moll - are terrific. DeNiro himself is strangely out of place and not terribly convincing as a Jewish gangster, although he is good in his scenes from the 1970's.  Elizabeth McGovern does what she can with the role of Deborah, but it's probably the worst-written role in the movie, and again her strongly-Celtic face doesn't exactly conjure images of a first-generation Jewish immigrant.\n\nReceived opinion has it that Once Upon a Time in America is a great movie, possibly because it is a very long gangster movie (like those other ones), or because it was an epic work of passion for Leone, or because DeNiro is in it (again, like those other gangster movies), or maybe it's a combination of those elements. But here, as is often the case, received opinion is mistaken. Once Upon a Time in America is a mess, though an often-beautiful one. ", u'0.196925', u"A few very rich people and a great many very talented people, not least Snr. Leone, invested a great deal of time, talent and moolah to bring this movie to completion. It shows, and the movie is a rich spectacle - but nothing more. No-one should waste their time watching this except to learn how to overspend on art direction. I just want four hours of my life back. Naively, I sat through endless period son-et-lumi\xe9re, gratuitous sex and violence, dubious ageing makeup jobs, unrealistic dialogue and nondescript music, hoping that the ending would tie it all together in a satisfying way. Epic fail. It's a bad B-movie plot dressed as The Sting.\n\n*SPOILER* Noodles (De Niro, wasting his prime - the ridiculous name of the protagonist says it all) returns to New York after 30 years to find he has been advanced a million bucks for a hit, but why? It's Max, (James Woods) his boyhood gang chum that he thought he'd double-crossed and got killed, wanting Noodles to kill him before the real baddies get hold of him. What rubbish; after all, a million buys a lot of secret hideaway. It is so telling that the movie's premise considers a huge sum of money a good enough maguffin to hang a four-hour marathon melodrama on. Mild, ostentatious tedium follows - mystified, Noodles wanders from mausoleum to left luggage office to cold-cream besmeared dancer's dressing room, all the while flashing back to a squeaky-clean 1930's gangland, where we eventually learn that it is a bad idea to call Max 'crazy'. Because instantly he goes crazy, in a piece of character development that probably had the Scooby-Doo writers looking to their laurels. That was said of 'Bugs' Moran, actually - you didn't call him 'Bugs' to his face. \n\nThere's no chance of any such real-life wit or irony in this script. No chance of any reality at all, because the intention seems to have been to make grand opera, so it doesn't matter that a man can be forced to sit in a vat of gasoline (and drink it) yet jump out when rescued as though it were gameshow gunk. It doesn't matter that driving a car at speed into a quay with no-one wearing belts would result in a bloody mess, not male bonding. Grand opera requires grand passion to drive the plot; Noodles' only passion is for looking at length through one of the movies' two terribly unconvincing peepholes at a budding ballet dancer, whom he goes on to rape. As you do; another piece of meaningless quasi-characterisation. Grand opera requires grand symbolism to resonate with people; there is no symbolism in OUATIA, the whole thing is a completely pedestrian display of directorial indulgence. But then, in 1984 we all thought the money would last forever. This movie certainly feels like it.", u'-0.546458', u'In order to cater to their everlasting lust for making money, the movie production studios have always endorsed the motto of quid pro quo \x96 "A favor in return of another". Every movie-maker capable enough to be called an auteur\x97by the virtue of his knack for eccentricity and novelty\x97has had to borne the brunt of this naked opportunism: be it D.W. Griffith, Charles Chaplin, Orson Welles or Stanley Kubrick. Sergio Leone too had to pay collaterally by having to make five Westerns in order to get funding for his dream project, Once Upon a time in America (OUTA). OUTA is a masterpiece of epic proportions and is consummate on almost every level. The uniqueness of the movie is such that it can be looked upon from various angles with each perspective adding immensely to movie\'s substance and profundity. The movie not only transcends genres by making simultaneous forays into the realms of Crime, Drama, Mystery, Suspense and Fantasy, but also crosses on several occasions the fine line that separates Dream from Reality. \n\nAt the beginning of his career, Leone got widely proclaimed as a master of technique and style as he added new dimensions to cinematography and screenplay. Leone\'s directorial debut was \'A Fistful of dollars\'. Movie\'s success was marred when Akira Kurosawa sued the production house for plagiarizing Yojimbo. Leone bounced back with \'For a Few More Dollars\'. He single-handedly reinvented the Western genre by providing a completely different perspective to the Old West, which was hitherto portrayed as the battle ground for the epic battle of virtue versus vice in the backdrop of chivalry and machismo. With \'The Good, the Bad and the Ugly\', Leone perpetuated what would become his trademark: Spaghetti Western. Leone\'s distinctive style included juxtapositions, super close- ups, long continuous shots, and the rotating camera shots. Leone\'s collaboration with master-composer Ennio Morricone gave cinema some of its most mellifluous compositions. Once Upon a Time in the West elevated Leone from the position of a showman to a serious movie-maker\x97an auteur capable of much profound works. Leone refused a multitude of projects, including the opportunity to direct \'The Godfather\', in a bid to realize his dream project.\n\nOUTA is an epic crime saga based on the lives of Jewish gangsters from their humble childhood in the ghettos of New York to their rise in world of organized crime. \'Noodles\', \'Patsy\', \'Cockeye\', and little Dominic struggle as street kids in the East Side of Manhattan in the early 1920s. They work for \'Bugsy\', a local gangster, until they meet \'Max\' and decide to start an independent operation, triggering a series of incidents which changes their lives for ever. Robert De Niro as \'Noodles\' gives one of the most subtle performances of his career. James Woods is chillingly menacing as \'Max\'. Young 13-year-old Jennifer Connelly as \'Deborah\' serves as a pulchritudinous delight for the sour eyes, and I say this as a testament to her ethereal, nymphean charm that was evident even at such a tender age. The rest of the cast gives a great support to the actors in lead with special mention of Elizabeth McGovern, James Hayden and Joe Pesci. The music is composed by Leone\'s long-time collaborator Ennio Morricone, who once again works his magic by creating music that is so plaintively divine that even Mozart would be proud of it. \n\nThe film poignantly explores the themes of love, lust, friendship, greed, betrayal and loss of innocence in the backdrop of the 20th century America. For the European release, Leone cut down his original version to 229 minutes to appease the distributors. However, for the US release, OUTA was ignominiously edited down to 139 minutes by the muddle-headed studio personnel against the director\'s wishes. In this short version, the flashback narrative was omitted as the scenes were put back in the chronological order. Many of the movie\'s most beautiful shots are not present in the shorter version, including the nigh magical sequence in which time-switching is indicated by the conjuration of a Frisbee. Movie\'s abysmal show in the US is attributed to this sabotage. Leone was reportedly heartbroken by the American cut, and never made another film again.\n\nThe dreamlike screenplay of OUTA gives it a lyrical, almost hypnotic feel. OUTA is a tapestry of highly complex mesh work: the story depicts the lives of same individuals across three different timelines. The time-switching techniques used in the movie are so effective that the switching seems absolutely seem-less. The mystical ringing tone that the viewer gets to hear in the beginning of the movie provides a great subterfuge in unison with the dream-like finale, and adds surrealistic elements to the movie by raising doubts that the events depicted in the movie could well have been a part of a drug-induced dream that Noodles would have been experiencing under the hypnotic effect of opium. The movie has a multitude of unforgettable moments, which can be cherished again and again with the same levels of indulgence. The sequence in which little Dominic\x97caught between the want to satiate his newly attained puberty and the fundamental urges\x97buys a pastry to charm a neighborhood girl, but succumbs to the universal temptation and ends up eating it himself is pure gold. The scene which depicts Robert De Niro molesting his childhood love represents cinema at its most macabre. The make-up, set designing and costume designing are all top- notch. The make-up artists have gone about their business with such meticulousness that the actors seem to genuinely represent their character\'s age in each era. \n\nOverall, OUTA is a testament to Sergio Leone\'s dedication to the free spirit of Art. It succeeds at multiple levels and makes the viewer go through an entire gamut of emotions, keeping him engaged throughout. It is sanguinary and is surfeited with blood-cuddling violence that makes it unsuitable for the weak-hearted. OUTA, however, is as a must for the enthusiasts of the genre and the cineastes worldwide. 10/10\n\nhttp://www.apotpourriofvestiges.com/', u'0.209582'], u'tt0169547': [u'Of the 250+ films I\'ve seen and rated on IMDb, only one other (Schindler\'s List) is as good as American Beauty. A film like this not only entertains while you\'re in the theater but also drops subtle questions in your head about the nature of human behavior and the gulf between fantasy and reality. After watching this movie, viewers will think long and hard about their own lives as well as the lives of people around them. The movie spells out the social disillusionment phenomenon everyone experiences but can\'t really grasp.\n\nAmerican Beauty reminds us that, like Lester, we really have no idea what we really want. We\'re not rational creatures as economists assume we are. Our instinct might lead us to perform one action, yet our brains might tell us to perform the complete opposite. We may lust after material belongings, yet how do we know we will still treasure those material belongings once we obtain them? Lester may lust after Angela, yet once he feels her in his hands and finds out the truth about her sexuality, an entirely different feeling comes over him.\n\nRicky Fits, the drug-dealing boy next door, is able to look beyond conventional notions of attractiveness and find beauty in non-promiscuous, solemn girls as well as in plastic bags floating in the wind. When many criticize the movie, they say, "Where\'s the beauty in a plastic bag?" And that\'s the point. We live in a world of aesthetic subjectivism. What one person finds attractive, another may find repulsive, yet the urge is there for people to assume aesthetic absolutism. "It\'s just a plastic bag! How can there be beauty in it?" Well, a human being is just an aggregation of tissues, bones, and blood. How is that attractive? It depends on how you look at it. Reality is shaped by perspective.\n\nSome people criticize the Ricky Fits character because he records his life experiences on tape and doesn\'t actually experience them. But time moves inexorably in one direction. Time cannot be stopped. In a physical sense the past and the future don\'t exist. We are only conscious in the present. Everything we do, everything we achieve, every bit of happiness we experience -- they are all eventually buried in the past by time. Recording subjective beauty is a means by which one can attempt to salvage beauty from the past into the present because time eventually destroys all beauty. If you don\'t believe me, walk into a pre-school and then walk into a nursing home. Remember that all the old men and women in the nursing home were once little kids.\n\nAnother profound element of American Beauty is in the tag line: look closer. An individual\'s behavior is not independent of his environment. Humans are conformists by nature, and humans will modify their behavior to assimilate into existing social categories. If any individual dares to stray from the category to which he has been assigned, he is shouted down and ostracized. No one can resist the urge to conform, so why bother? Everyone is nice in public, yet on the streets they blare their horns, scream, and swear. Some boys I know pretend to hate American Beauty because on the surface it seems like a "chick flick." They force themselves to watch gory horror movies and show off to others how they can stomach intense violence and excessive sex scenes. In American Beauty, Angela acts like a total slut, as many girls seem to be nowadays. In the end, however, she is not what she makes herself out to be. Colonel Fits tries to act like such a man, yet in the end it\'s all just a giant facade. Civilization is but one giant movie, and members of society must start acting their parts if they want to belong to this civilization. Otherwise, they\'re outsiders. Try walking into a job interview without a tie. You\'ll be thrown out. That is the power of convention.\n\nWhat if I asked you this question: What do you want in life? Most people would say, "happiness." But is happiness worth deluding yourself for? Carolyn Burnham shields herself from sadness by adopting a positive-thinking philosophy, a philosophy of self-affirming mantras and harsh self-discipline. Positive thinking may help you attain your goals, but positive thinking also blinds you from reality. Is it wise or moral to change the channel when you hear about mass starvation in Africa so you can enjoy moments of fleeting happiness from a cheap romance movie? Self-help is just a euphemism for self-deception. All humans need some complex fraud to distract them from the harsh and nihilistic realities of life, whether it\'s religion, money, or even love.\n\nIn spite of American Beauty\'s greatness, there are problems. Characters are stereotypical, but viewers will hardly notice unless they\'re ultra-critical. Anyway, exaggeration is essential in satire so that certain points are made obvious to viewers. Furthermore, Alan Ball\'s original screenplay is slightly edited. The ending is more optimistic.\n\nProblems aside, Sam Mende\'s debut movie is one of the greatest I\'ve seen. Not only is it entertaining but it is also filled with interesting ideas. It\'s an important film for society because there\'s so much society needs to learn. One boy I knew refused to watch American Beauty because, as he said, "I\'m not gonna watch a movie with a name like that!"\n\nLook closer.\n\n10/10', u'0.0641242', u"\nAmerican Beauty is the greatest movie ever made.\n\nIf you haven't already, watch American Beauty by yourself and give yourself some time afterwards to think it over. You will never, ever look at life the same way. It does exactly what movies are meant to do - give us a window into ourselves, and American Beauty does that better than any other film has ever done. No word of dialogue is unnecessary, no character exaggerated, everything is perfect...but if you have seen American Beauty you should know that already. Once you look closer at this movie, and see Beauty in every frame, it becomes so much easier to look closer and see Beauty in everything around you. You think I'm waxing poetic? Then you must not have seen the movie. Every character is a part of each of us: the Lester Burnham of change, the Carolyn of uncertainty and failure, the rebellion of Jane, the defeated Barbara, the false control of Angela and the Colonel, and the real control of Ricky. To me Ricky, not Lester, is the center of this story; he somehow controls or sets in motion the heart of Lester's rebirth and downfall. There are several parts of this movie where I lose control every time I see it, and none more so than the paper bag scene. To me that scene is simply the greatest monologue ever written.\n\nI listened to the message of American Beauty - look closely and you can find Beauty in anything - and it changed my life. I rose out of a long, deep depression and started out into the world. Sometimes there is so much Beauty in the world, I can't even stand it, and it feels like my heart is going to burst.\n\nThis is the most beautiful movie I have ever seen.\n", u'0.301316', u'\n"American Beauty" is tour de force cinema. Sam Mendes\' brilliant debut feature depicts a web of characters who yearn for their own \'American Dream\' - yet, in the end, only one character truly attains it.\n\nHaving seen "Happiness" only recently, I could not help but draw comparisons: both films centre around a microcosm of society in which the people, in their own unique way, all strive to be successful or simply \'happy\'. But here the similarities end: the characters in "Happiness" undergo a self-realisation process through which they become increasingly aware of their meaningless existence, and go on to wallow in their own depravity. "Happiness" shows no signs of redemption; whereas in "American Beauty" the audience is offered a sense of hope, of salvation, though the characters must endure a similar fate, or more accurately, they must endure the way of life in which they are trapped.\n\nThe pivotal character upon which this theme centres, is the father Lester, played impeccably by Kevin Spacey. He is presented to us as a bit of a loser who plays the subjugated figure in the home and at work. He appears resigned to an unhappy life in which he is treated badly by his wife and daughter and his boss at work. Seemingly beyond redemption, Lester transforms from being a loser.\n\nMendes portrays this transformation admirably well: he shows Lester on his \'path to enlightenment\' pushed up against a grim background of suburbanite existence. These early scenes are well balanced, forming a steady rhythm of TV commercial-like vignettes which prove very comical, if at times unsettling. As Lester reflects in the film: "My life is like a commercial". And how this rings true: like in "Happiness", all the characters hide underneath this veneer of normality and respectability, yet they are all revealed to be nothing but the opposite: depressed, depraved and desperate.\n\nLester\'s wife, played by Annette Benning, is the most success-driven character in the story which renders her the most hopeless in the film\'s tone of moral conviction. "In order to be successful in life one must project the appearance of success" is the maxim she adopts from the \'king\' of real estate, Buddy King. It is a phrase which resonates throughout the film: for Benning\'s pawn, life is all about keeping-up appearances. This is where Lester differs from her: his emancipation is enabled by him discarding the constraints of \'normal life\' and following what his heart desires.\n\nLester is the catalyst in this narrative in which the ancillary characters either follow suit (as does his daughter and Ricky) or pay the price (as does his wife and the Colonel). The irony inherent in this film, and it grows with resonance as the film draws to a conclusion, is that the only character who truly becomes free must sacrifice everything in order to achieve it. Yet it is through his sacrifice that he is able to afford the surviving characters a glimpse of hope in life.\n\nThis film left me gasping for air: its hyper-realism conveys, at the same time, a portrait of the suburban comedy, a jolting-shock of realisation, and a cathartic sense of hope. Mendes depicts a certain people who, to varying degrees, all strive for a certain \'American Dream\', yet so few actually attain it. Though whilst one may have difficulty with tagging this film with the \'feel good\' label, the beauty of "American Beauty" is that it sits half-way between a desperate cry for help and a reassuring sense of happiness and fulfilment and that is cinema at its best.', u'0.269617', u'\nThis film is one of a kind.  After seeing this film last week, I was left with a hole in the pit of my stomach.  It left many questions in my mind, and most of them cannot be answered. In my view, a film that makes me think after I watch it is second-to-none, and this film certainly delivers in that aspect.\n\nI was amazed with the vivid imagery in this movie, as well as with the symbolism.  However, what makes this film the best of 1999 is the acting. Kevin Spacey shines as Lester Burnham, and Annette Bening (Carolyn Burnham) isn\'t far behind.  Supporting cast members such as Wes Bentley (Ricky Fitts), Thora Birch (Jane Burnham), Mena Suvari (Angela Hayes), and Chris Cooper (Col. Frank Fitts) only add to the drama of this film.  I think the most special aspect of this film is how all of the characters intertwine in a way that is believable, yet fantastic at the same time.  I congratulate Sam Mendes for his direction of this film, as well as Alan Ball for writing it.  I don\'t think it could have been any better.\n\nRated R in the U.S. for strong sexuality, language, drug content, and violence, the film obviously deserves its rating.  However, none of the causes for the R rating are overbearing, and all of them add to the plot-line of this film.  While I don\'t think that this is a film for children, I would suggest that adults should view it with an open mind.  I believe that the traits which many of the characters in this film have are found in many people around the world. Perhaps that is why this film hits close to home for so many viewers.\n\nWhile billed by some as a "comedy-drama", I don\'t see anything about this film as funny.  Sure, there are some comedic moments, but by the end, those moments were all but forgotten when faced with the grim reality of the conclusion of the events portrayed in this film.\n\nIf you want to watch a light-hearted film with some elements of comedy and some elements of drama, don\'t see American Beauty.  But if you enjoy films that make you think, and are entertained by an excellent cast, excellent directing, and an excellent screenplay, this film should be at the top of your list.\n\nMy Rating:  10/10', u'0.241287', u'\nI have come to see the movie with a certain prejudice.  Everyone saying that it was so wonderful, so touching, so excited -- I usually tend to go with movies that nobody likes.  Nevertheless, this one was a certain exception.\n\nIt is a wonderful psychological drama, a satire about the American community and about the American life; dark, painful irony and cynicism in the descriptions of life and characters; deep sarcasm on types of people in the community, habits of behaviour such as "...if you want to succeed, you always have to seem successful..." or "never stop smiling", parasites of the community, and, most importantly, the treatment of people who are "different", who are "freaky" to some extent; and eventually, there is no character in the film that is not odd in its way, although we have to wait for the very ending of the film, to discover this.\n\nWith very deep and accurate exaggeration, (most of) the characters in the movie demonstrate the worst, the darkest sides of their personality, while still remaining very human, very touching and very involving the observer. Everyone can find a certain similarity with characters and persons who he met in his life, in the characters described in the film.  The tragi-comical events, the little pieces of funny, disturbing irony dripping from almost every episode, lead the observer to exploration of the American Beauty -- the beauty in life, and the way that we fail to find it, for all our life; the way we hide our feelings and emotions, even behind sullen walls of our sepulchre.\n\nThe acting is truly brilliant, the episodes are built logically, coherently, the dialogues are deep, thrilling, intriguing; every sentence and every word is deeply constructed, containing profound irony and intelligent elements of humors.  The plot is very intelligently built, constructing a true indication of the sad situation of the American society, and an excellent ground for the actors.\n\nAn amazing movie, strongly recommended.  10/10', u'0.56918', u'\nProbably the best film of 1999. This dark comedy drama marks two fantastic feature film debuts with Alan Ball as writer and Sam Mendes as director (both winning oscars for their sterling efforts).\n\nKevin Spacey plays Lester Burnham, a man on the brink of a mid-life crisis, who suddenly becomes obsessed with one of his teenage daughters friends played by Mena Suvari. His daughter (Thora Birch) is, as Lester tells us; "a typical teenager. Angry, insecure, confused...". And his wife Caroline (Annette Bening) has an obsession of her own, her public appearance.\n\nLife starts off on a downer for the Burnhams and their new neighbours the Fitts despite their lives looking good from the outside.\n\nAs life begins to improve (with most of the main characters finding what they think is love or new relationships) it soon all comes crashing down in the climactic final day.\n\nThe writing is nothing short of brilliant and made even more amazing by knowing that it comes from a first time feature film screen writer Alan Ball (who had had years of prior experience writing TV sitcoms -  not  that you\'d be able to guess from the tone of this film).\n\nThe directing is on a par with the writing and Sam Mendes manages to get some brilliant performances from the great cast, who are all faultless. No doubt Mendes\' theatre directing past played a huge part in directing the actors so well.\n\nAnother person worthy of a mention is the late director of photography Conrad L. Hall, another one of the five oscar recipients for this film.\n\nAll the elements in this film gel perfectly together to make one superb masterpiece. Not one person, either cast or crew, steals this film or does anymore than anyone else to make this film what it is. Truly an ensemble effort. 10/10.', u'0.0651325', u'\nThis movie was a joy to watch.  I didn\'t know what to expect when I came into it.  I had heard the buzz of the acting and the story, etc...but we\'ve all heard that before and had been disappointed, but not so with this one.\n\nKevin Spacey plays this part to a "T".  He is strong when it requires and meek when it is needed.  His emotional rollercoaster ride is a trip to partake in. Annette Bening is marvelous as well.  I think they both should be nominated.\n\nThe support cast is also spectacular.  Thora Birch, Wes Bentley, and Mena Suvari all give great performances as the troubled "Teenagers" in the film. Of particular mention is Wes Bentley\'s performance, worthy of a supporting nomination as well.\n\nThis is a dramatic and funny tale of a man and his life in a state of turmoil and transition.  When he happens to see a beautiful friend of his daughter\'s at a cheerleading exhibition, he is completely infatuated with her beauty.  Using this as his inspiration, he attempts to change all aspects of his life.  He confronts his marriage, his job, his ego, and his libido.\n\nThe music in this film is also very well chosen.  There are moments when the music fits so perfectly with the scene that they meld together as one to present a perfect emotion.\n\nThe plot can get rather involved, but you will follow it endlessly to see where you go.  I was simply involved, hook, line and sinker.\n\nSee this movie more than once, and skip some of the other movies out now that are dare I say, trash.\n\nThis should be on the top of many critic\'s lists this year and it is certainly on top of mine.\n\nMy Rating (1 - 10):  10\n\n', u'0.302107', u'\nAnd there were a lot of great ones this year. I will also say something even (possibly) bolder--that Kevin Spacey gives the performance of his career. And all us movie geeks know that is saying a LOT, given this man\'s past roles, and his talent. I used to think he was overrated as an actor. Then I figured OK, I see what all the fuss is about. Now, he\'s up there with my favorite actors of all time, with James Woods, Steve Buscemi, Robert Deniro...probably in the top 5. \n\nI was lucky enough to see a free screening this afternoon and boy, am I glad I had the privilege. In fact, this review might not even be that coherent- it\'s one of those movies that blows you away so much that you have trouble even putting your feelings into words. \n\nThe plotline sounds trite when you first describe it (it did to me when I first heard about it), Spacey plays a man who describes himself as a loser, with Annette Bening as his horrible, shrewish, self-absorbed, pathetic b*tch of a wife. His daughter is not all that likeable either, despite the fact that you can understand why she turned out this way, with her as a mother. Just when you think you\'ve met the most dysfunctional family in the world outside of "Happiness", you find out about the family who just moved in next door. At first, the strange son seems like the most messed-up member of their brood, but after you get to meet his ex-military, abusive, homophobic, terrifying father and his withdrawn, sad, headcase mother, you realize he is the most normal member of the household by far. Then, the filmwriters toss in Kevin Spacey\'s lustful obsession with his daughter\'s sexkitten cheerleader friend, which trust me, is a lot more fun, entertaining, and amusing than it sounds when you read about it. Soon, he is having the most entertaining, amusing midlife crisis ever seen in the history of cinema. He just doesn\'t give a ***k about what he does or says anymore, and you only wish you could get away with doing the things he does.\n\nI found myself laughing out loud in this movie so many times, most of it horrified, amazed laughter at what is happening and the things that are coming out of the character\'s mouths, especially Spacey\'s. He had at least a dozen lines that had every member of the audience in hysterics and actual applause and cheers. \n\nI can\'t say enough good things about this movie. You think, after the first five minutes, that you know how the movie will end. Well, Spacey\'s opening narrative does give it away, but trust me, the events unfold in a way that you will NEVER see coming. You will swear you can see what a character is going to do next, what violent or self-destructice act they will commit, but you turn out to be wrong.\n\nWithout getting too pretentious here, the movie lives up to it\'s theme/tagline of "...look closer". THe characters are not what they seem, up until the end, and even then they surprise you. At least two characters that you are POSITIVE you have figured out, do or say something that turns all your preconceptions of them upside down, while making your jaw drop, and your heart ache. You will leave the movie with a smile, though, and that is maybe what I expected least of all.\n\nWords just cannot do this movie justice. \n\nSee it for yourself.', u'-0.0116824', u'\nWhen I first saw this movie in theaters, I found it to be very funny. When I\nrented it at home, I found it to be very sad and complex. Looking at it now, I realize that it is surely one of the most extraordinary films ever to come out of Hollywood. To some it may look trite or cliched, or maybe too un-ordinary to be worthy of its praise, but the overall impact of this film is extremely powerful. After you\'ve seen it, you know you\'ve seen something.\n\nA few notable elements stand out. The direction is superb; this is visually a superior film, for the director understands the subtle changes in tone. The writing is equally compelling; the story effortlessly interweaves multiple stories to create one amazing movie. The haunting music is also notable. Lastly is the acting. Kevin Spacey has done excellent films before, and he can add this one to the list. He may be a little to witty to suggest the overshadowed character he portrays, but he simply disappears into the role. Annette Bening is also fine; a less strong role, but she is magnificent none the less. As the teenagers, Thora Birch is able to mesmerize us with one intense look; her "typical teenager" role is fleshed out completely. I enjoyed Mena Suvari\'s character equally. It seemed that she did not receive as much acclaim, but her performance evokes both innocence and experience, and her scenes toward the end give her a depth unlike any other character. And Wes Bentley, as the video-taping boy next door, is easily the most original character. At first he seems a little tense, but, like Spacey, he sinks into the role. His "purpose" in the film, unlike anyone else\'s, is a mystery, thus making him the most enigmatic person.\n\nMost films are able to make a lasting impression on its audience, but never has a movie been known to "move" its viewers as much as this movie. It truly says something about life, no matter how predictable or tacky it appears, this film disturbingly shows us how to appreciate our individual lives, so therefore, when they are over, we each have something to remember.', u'0.375943', u'This is by far one of the best, if not THE, movies of the 90\'s. "American Beauty" stole my vote immediately as I started watching it. The idea and concept of "American Beauty" is just some ordinary people on an ordinary block with ordinary lives.\n\nKevin Spacey plays Lester Burnam, a middle aged married man who has lost some hope in life. He has a job that is degrading, a wife who refuses to show any type of loving emotion towards him, a daughter who practically hates herself, and is judged constantly as a looser. But all of a sudden, he sees his daughter\'s friend, Angela, and something snaps in him to do something with his life. He quits his job and takes, the dreaded by most Americans, a fast food cook job. He starts working out and doing some illegal substances. Even though this sounds like he is ruining his life, it actually helps him and makes him realize how much he loves "the precious moments in his stupid little life." You have no idea what he is talking about I\'m sure, but don\'t worry, you will some day. Kevin Spacey was by far the best actor in 1999 and deserved this Oscar 100%.\n\nAnnete Benning plays Carol Burnam, Lester\'s wife. She is a very fake and unsuccessful real estate agent who cannot get a sale. Her image in life is "in order to be successful, one most project an image of success at all times". You can tell, she is not happy with her marriage and starts to have an affair with the big boss of the real estate company. Again, seems horrible, but it helps her in the end. Annete was unfortunately robbed of an Oscar for this film.\n\nThe supporting cast: Thora Birtch who plays Janie, Lester and Carol\'s daughter, is extremely depressed and hates her body and herself. But when she notices a strange boy next door and develops a relationship with him, she realizes how precious life is and starts communicating with her family. Mena Suvari plays Angela, Janie\'s best friend, Lester\'s crush, and a girl who is clearly insecure despite her attempts at showing her sexy side to every guy in town. Wes Bentley plays Ricky, the next door neighbor boy who looks at something as simple as a bag being tossed in the wind as something beautiful. Some say that this was a very stupid scene, but I disagree. His dialog was perfect and made us look twice at something so simple. He won most of our hearts despite having somewhat of an arrogant attitude. Wes without a doubt got robbed of a nomination for this movie. Chris Cooper plays Ricky\'s father, Col. Frank Fits. He is a military Sergent who is very abusive to his wife and son and is an obvious homophobic that turns into an ironic situation in the end. Chris also should\'ve been nominated.\n\nThe most stunning character actually to me was Allison Janney who played Barbara Fits, Ricky\'s mom, and Frank\'s wife. She was so beautiful and perfect. Her scene in the front room with Frank and Ricky, everything is so quite, and she says "I\'m sorry, what?". Ricky says "Mom, no one said anything". When Ricky gets kicked out by Frank after a horrible accusation, Ricky says "Mom, I\'m leaving". Instead of being like the average mom and trying to stop him or say things will get better, she knows this is best and says "OK. Wear a raincoat". Allison was just amazing and didn\'t get enough credit for her role.\n\nIf there could have been nominations for every role in this movie, they were well deserved. This is a terrific movie that should be watched by every adult. It\'ll make you look again at your life and think. What a great movie.\n\n10/10', u'-0.0909129', u"\nOn a scale of 0 to 100; I gave American Beauty a score of 99.\n\nWow\x85no, I mean that. American Beauty is a film that takes my breath away each time I watch it, and every time I do watch it, I notice something newer, something more exciting and something more funny. There is honestly no other movie like this, and if you haven't seen it, there is something donged in your head, and you must do so now.\n\nLester Burnham (Kevin Spacey) is in a mid-life crisis, caused by his stressed wife Carolyn (Annette Bening) and rebelling teenage daughter Jane (Thora Birch). When Lester and Carolyn go watch Jane cheerleading, they meet Angela Hayes (Mena Suvari), and Lester, caught in sudden lust for Angela, decides to change his life. Angela and Jane's friendship is not all it seems, too, because Angela only brags about how many times she's done it with guys and stuff. That doesn't help an already insecure Jane very much but she finds solace in the arms of the next-door-neighbours' son, Ricky Fitts (Wes Bentley). Ricky, himself from a broken home as well, and Jane find they have a lot in common and eventually turn out to be soulmates.\n\nEverything about this film is so darkly clear, it is extremely obvious why the Academy loved it, and it is very obvious to see that I love it. Spacey brings Lester wildly to life in a performance reminiscent of Spacey's acting coach Jack Lemmon. Also on top form is Annette Bening, in an over-controlled performance that is just so instantly loveable. While all the attention went to these performers, it is also Thora Birch (especially), Mena Suvari, Wes Bentley and a quiet Allison Janney that manage to steal the show just as much. Sam Mendes is an excellent director, this is his first feature, and he is a British man directing an American-based film! And he won an Oscar for it! That's an amazing achievement, ditto to Alan Ball, who's script is effectively a stunner and an instant winner.\n\nThe best film of 1999, the best film of its decade and for now anyways, American Beauty stands tall as the best film ever made.\n", u'0.464522', u'The intention is so clear that everything else falls into place, perfectly. Kevin Spacey\'s suburban husband and father reminded me of his character in "The Ref" and that could only be a good thing. Annette Bening and her giggle works wonders here. Their marriage is a tabloid version of a "Who\'s Afraid To Virginia Woolf" Which means very close to someone we know. The biggest surprises in the film. besides the amazing dexterity of Sam Mendes at his first outing behind the camera, are West Bentley. Chris Cooper, Thora Brch and Allison Janney. As I\'m writing this 8 years after its first release, the Oscars and the whole hullabaloo, I\'m very surprised that West Bentley hasn\'t become a major star. He is amazing in "American Beauty" the complexities of his character are based on recognizable human stands, the hardest to face up to and I went where he went. Thora Birch is lovely as the object of his attention and the film, I believe, is here to say.', u'0.119335', u"\nWhat can I say, except that this film really knocked me on my keaster.  I went in to the theater not knowing what to expect, but was pretty sure it would be worth the ticket price.  Boy was I happy when I left.  Not only was it worth the ticket, I paid to see this film two more times.  This film is virtually perfect.  The acting is superb, the story is magnificent, the narrative is brilliant, and the structure of the film is truly groundbreaking (absolutely loved the last 20 minutes).  What really surprised me about this film was how well the cinematography was done.  In a small, character driven film such as this, it is very unusual to have such great cinematography.  With this film, there is something interesting going on in every scene, not many films you can say that about.  In a year where first time directors have made some of the best films, Three Kings, Being John Malkovich, etc...  Sam Mendes seems to have out-done them all.  Though I have yet to see The Green Mile or Magnolia, I find it hard to believe that either film will out-shine American Beauty.  This film should easily win a substantial amount of the Oscars this year.  What's up with all the cirtics awards snubbing it so far?", u'0.38987', u"\nAhh, suburbia. That manifestation of mediocrity and anonymity in this, our post-industrial society.\n\nWhere else but in a typical SFR (single-family residential) nestled on a typical tree-lined street in a typical North American suburb can we find someone like Lester Burnham?\n\nWhere else can the inspiration be found for a movie as ironically sublime as American Beauty?\n\nBurnham is a 42-year-old man who makes a living writing promotional material for a magazine that faces downsizing thanks to the excesses of his superiors.\n\nHe is married to Carolyn Burnham, a woman maniacally devoted to making it big in local real estate, and they have a daughter, Jane, who feels about as significant as plankton floating about the briny deep and about as attractive as a rusty Ford Pinto.\n\nAbout the only thing that keeps this family together is Burnham's self-loathing and the mutual hatred heaped upon him by the two women in the house.\n\nWe're talking about a guy, after all, who starts the morning by masturbating in the shower. `This is the high point of my day,' he says. `It's all downhill from here.'\n\nIt's pretty obvious that the Burnhams have been somewhat dysfunctional for a\nfew years now. And there's no doubt that Lester is struggling with a mid-life crisis, one that is expressed in more than buying a sports car.\n\nThings come to a head when Lester develops a lusty obsession for his daughter's best friend, replete with life-like dreams of seduction as she lies in a bath of rose petals. Now Jane has to worry about dear old dad `spraying himself' whenever she brings a friend home.\n\nMeanwhile, Mom has started playing around behind Dad's back with a smooth yet snake-like super salesman, Buddy Kane. And Jane must come to terms with a rather unique boy next door, when some new neighbours move in.\n\nWhen Ricky Fitts, the son of a homophobic military man and a robotically devoted mother, isn't dealing marijuana to people like Lester, he's video taping anything and everything that remotely interests him, and he's developing enough footage of Jane to fill the vault at MGM. Needless to say Jane is a little freaked about this headcase with an eye for the visual.\n\nAs you've probably guessed, the humour can be pretty black in this movie. Indeed, it may not be for everyone, but any accusations that this movie is nothing better than mean and cynical are simply unfounded.\n\nInstead, taking in American Dream is like biting into the fruit of knowledge (a.k.a. the apple), the edgy initial sting is followed by a bitter sweet aftertaste.\n\nMatters are most assuredly helped by the casting of Kevin Spacey, the kind of middle-aged guy that every middle-aged guy would like to be, in the lead role. And Annette Bening pulls no punches as the self-centred career woman whose need to prove self-worth knows no bounds.\n\nIndeed, everyone in this movie fits the bill perfectly, right down to the manager of the local Smiley Burger (Dennis Anderson) that Lester turns to for a job after he more than refuses to toe the company line.\n\nIn its own way, American Beauty is a humourous tale about a man who finally decides to come to account for his `silly little life' on his own terms regardless of what that means in appearances. And while the price is heavy, Lester comes out a true hero.\n\nAs ironically uplifting as it is caustic and acerbic, American Beauty, to use the clich\xe9 of enthralled reviewers everywhere, is a must-see movie -- especially for anyone who has acquired enough wisdom to know that no matter how old you are, there's plenty of life left that's worth living, and plenty of growing up still left to do along the way.", u'0.201272', u'\nSam Mendes\' big screen directorial debut will one day be mentioned along with classic greats like Psycho, Vertigo, 2001 and Sunset Blvd., which it cleverly mimics in a certain way. That way, I won\'t ruin it, if like me, you stayed away from all reviews and talk about American Beauty until you actually saw the movie. To my surprise, I somewhat succeeded. The script, wonderfully written by Alan Ball, who like Mendes is doing his first try in this certain ball park, and hitting a home run. Sorry for the cheesy analogy, but I may talk like that through out this review because this is the kind of movie where words can do no justice and it\'s almost impossible to translate your feelings into words. A similar experience happened to me earlier this year with Stanley Kubrick\'s Eyes Wide Shut. But back to American Beauty.\n\n"When You\'ve Got Nothing To Lose, You Might As Well Risk Everything."~Tagline for this film.\n\nThat is probably one of the most accurate taglines I\'ve ever read in my life. Lester Burnham (Kevin Spacey, in what may be the best role of his career, which used to be Swimming With Sharks) is reaching his mid-fourties. Uh-oh, mid-life crisis time, he rarely ever talks to his daughter (Thora Birch) whose feelings for him, border on hate. He and his wife Carolyn, (Annette Benning, being able to make me forget about In Dreams) constantly bicker and the whole Burnham family quietly sit at the dinner table except for the occasional quibble about this or that, for instance ("Mom, why do we have to listen to this elevator music?") The new next door neighbors, the Fitts, move in one day. Colonel Fitts (Chris Cooper, giving one of the finest supporting character performances this year), is a hard-core Army officer. (Every six months, he makes his son Ricky take a urine test to make sure he\'s not on drugs.) His idea of fun is sitting in front of the t.v. at night with his wife (Allison Janney) watching shows of Army Cadets training. Ricky Fitts is a hopeless optimistic. He is what Dawson (from the Creek) wishes he could be. Ricky walks around everywhere with his hand held camcorder (while selling dope of the side) filming all the beauty in the world. ("Sometimes, there\'s so much beauty in the world that it overwhelms me and my heart feels like it\'s going to cave in). He finds a new subject to add to his beauty collection of film. Lester\'s daughter, Janey. At first she doesn\'t like his new interest in her and thinks he\'s weird, but as the film progresses, they get to know each other and she starts to understand Ricky, and instead of thinking he\'s weird, thinking he\'s special. Special in being able to find beauty in the most minor and trivial things you can think of. ("Would you like to see the most beautiful thing I\'ve ever filmed?" That turns out to be a 15 minute shot of a plastic bag flying in the wind, right before it snows.) One night, Carolyn, in an effort to help Lester save his relationship with Janey, (although, it could be her trying to save her own relationship with her daughter) makes Lester go with her to a basketball game at Janey\'s high school, where she cheerleads. Lester meets Janey\'s best friend Angela (Mena Suvari, in an interesting turn from Choir Girl in American Pie). Angela sets something off inside Lester and wakes him up from his 20 year sleep and makes him start changing and living life to the fullest. ("I feel like I\'ve been in a coma for the past 20 years and am just beginning to wake up). Although this is work of an ensemble cast, this is really Spacey\'s forum. The acting throughout this film is remarkable. Newcomer Wes Bently was excellent as the outcast Ricky, who came off as shy, yet confident. The cinematography in this film is majestically beautiful, in every frame, it\'s almost as if you\'re invited right into the scene. For instance, in one scene when Spacey came home from a cocktail party with Benning, he was in the refrigerator getting a root beer and out popped Suvari, I was so entranced into that scene, that I actually felt Spacey\'s startle when he saw her. This movie could be categorized as a drama, although throughout the movie, I had a smile on my face. I got to know these characters, almost as if, as friends. In a gossipy kind of way, I couldn\'t wait to see what happened next because this film was a look behind the scenes of real suburban life. These people portrayed, really do exist in the world. Somewhat like the people in Happiness, the people and what they do are just like things families you know do, or even your family does. The last scene of this film is amazing. Although it starts too early, way before it\'s ready to, it pays off at the end. With tensions building, and emotions rising, the inevitable climax will leave you breathless while making you wish it wouldn\'t happen and that somehow it would change. There is so much more to say about this movie, and so much left out, but I can\'t help it. Sam Mendes\' American Beauty is an instant masterpiece, as Lester says in the movie, "You have no idea what i\'m talking about, I\'m sure. But don\'t worry..... You will someday." I believe those are words to live by for explaining the brilliance of this film even though critics and audiences love it now, it won\'t truly be appreciated until after it\'s time.\n\n', u'0.276305'], u'tt0112573': [u"Most on this site pick the Godfather, or the Shawshank Redemption, but this is it, this is the best film ever made. People will complain, will argue that I am wrong, but I will say it again...Braveheart is as close to perfection as a movie can be. The acting is superb, the man who played Lonshanks, the actor who portrayed Robert the Bruce, both should have been nominated for Oscars due to their powerful rendering of evil and a man who is saved from losing his humanity (from becoming evil) by meeting William Wallace. And let us not forget the direction, the cinematography. Braveheart is glorious, beautiful to look at. The slow motion pictures of horses preparing to charge armed combatants, the entire landscape of Scotland that Mel Gibson captures with the camera. Braveheart is artwork, it is as good as any picture. That the film is number 93 on the list of the top 250 movies ever is a shame. Yes there is violence in this film but that violence does serve a point...that freedom isn't free and sometimes it takes death, gruesome and horrible, to let ones people taste what it is like to be free. Braveheart is a great movie and it deserves to at least be in the top ten of IMDb's list of greatest films.", u'0.408659', u"I remember seeing this movie for the first time in late 2003, and I was impressed. I saw it again last night, and I was even more impressed. The acting is amazing, and the ending was brilliant. For me, all my guesses were incorrect. Everything that happens in this movie in unpredicted. The last half hour itself was highly unpredictable, and it had a powerful message. When a scene was meant to be dramatic, they did a great job at it. I don't know about everybody else, but the ending did make me cry. The message the movie sent kept me thinking for a while. The amount of courage and bravery was inconceivable, there was barely any faults or anything wrong with the movie. For a movie of 1995, they did a great job.\n\nI absolutely guarantee this movie to anybody who enjoys action and war with a bit of drama mixed in. One of the best, or maybe even the best movie of the 20th century.", u'0.31838', u"\nOn my list of the greatest movies of all time, BraveHeart ranks as number 3. It is by far one of the most epic stories ever told.  Mel Gibson deserved all the credit he recieved and more. His portrayal of William Wallace, one of Scotlands most mightiest warriors, was spot on.  The only part that lacked was the romantic affair of Princess Isabella and Wallace.  It historically never happened.  This movie also has other historical errors but WHO CARES!\n\nThe Battle of Stirling has to be the second most graphic piece of footage ever shot next to Omaha Beach in Saving Private Ryan. I love the part where the English Commander gives the order to charge and Wallace sees this and raises his broadsword into the air and starts yelling.  He charges the field with the Scots and I'll let you see the movie to see what happens next.\n\nWallace's emotional speech at the battle of Stirling still is inspirational and I think that the REAL William Wallace would be proud of the way Mel Gibson portrayed him.\n\nMy hat goes off to Mel Gibson.  I hope he makes a few more movies like this one.\n\nOut of ten............10/10!\n", u'0.0982221', u"Unfortunately, I wasn't able to watch Braveheart till 2003 when it was on TV. However, the lack of theatrical effects never stopped me from being mesmerized by this epic for one moment. So mesmerized, I literally sat motionlessly on the couch for two minutes after the movie. Any normal audience would likely to cast his/her sense of reality away and be captivated by this distant Celtic saga. \n\nBeside proving himself as a brilliant director, Mel Gibson more importantly gave life to a historical hero whose superb gallantry, vivid character and magnificent spirit shall never be history. Along with the unforgettable 'Alba gu bragh!' and the unprecedentedly heart-stopping 'Freeeeedom', Braveheart unquestionably is one of the greatest movies ever made.", u'0.0714628', u'This is simply the best movie ever made, containing all the elements a perfect movie should, even considering that every person has a right to his/her opinion. The soundtrack is amazing, the scenes are ingenious and the story is simply excellent! This is a story about a Scotsman named William Wallace (Mel Gibson) and his fight for the freedom of the Scottish people, from the oppression of the English ruler-ship. After seeing the death of his wife at the hands of an English nobleman, William Wallace (Mel Gibson) sets out on a quest for vengeance that quickly turns into a crusade for freedom for the entire "country". The extreme violence as well as the human compassion in this movie are overwhelming in its brilliancy.', u'0.605096', u'I saw this film for the first time on cable, and, fortunately, it was an "uncut" version. I was greatly impacted, but, as bad luck would have it, I would not see it again for two years.\n\nMel Gibson is an accomplished actor, with films like "Mad Max" and "Lethal Weapon" under his belt. "Ransom" showed he was more than just a quirky role actor, but it was "Braveheart" that proved to everyone that he was a great actor... and director.\n\nWhat he has envisioned and ensnared on camera is one of the great cinematic achievements of all time, and at an awkward time, too. Looking back at previous years at the Oscars, and you have "Schindler\'s List," "Dances with Wolves," and "Unforgiven." Looking ahead, you have "Titanic," "Shakespeare in Love," and "Gladiator." These are all period pieces. Right smack dab in the middle is "Braveheart." It is the most simple of the films above, yet it is arguably the best. None will argue its impact is greater than "Schindler\'s List" nor its power greater than "Unforgiven," but what it has, more than any of those other films, is heart. Much like his "Passion of the Christ," Mel Gibson brings a passion to this film, and that is what sustains it.\n\nMel Gibson plays William Wallace, a well-educated Scottish peasant who is determined to lead a peaceful life. Well, if you\'ve seen the poster for this film, you probably already know that he doesn\'t succeed. When a law is put into place that says English noblemen have first right to lay with Scottish brides, Wallace marries in secret. But, when it is found out, a local noble attempts to take Murron, Wallace\'s wife, she resists, leading to a gruesome execution. With little choice, Wallace opts for vengeance, and thus begins the journey of Scotland\'s greatest warrior.\n\nThis is a wonderfully acted, directed, photographed, and designed film with great performances, particularly from a breathtakingly beautiful Sophie Marceau, and I recommend it wholeheartedly.', u'0.339467', u'This has to be one of the best movies I have ever seen. I recently purchased it and have watched it at least five times since then, and each time i pick up on things I did not see the other times. The fight scenes are great, the plot is both interesting and thought provoking, there is romance and comedy. This is a movie that any person can appreciate at some level. \n\nTrue, the historical content may have been distorted, but even though, this movie is meant for entertainment. It is not a history lesson caught on video.\n\nThe acting is absolutely superb, this movie is guaranteed to have you on the edge of your seat for the entire three hours.', u'0.386167', u'Unfortunately, I have yet to find a film of quite this caliber again. Braveheart contains elements of Romance (several heart- wrenching and warming instances), Epic/Action (spectacular scenes), Mystery (can take a few viewings to put it all together), History (albeit romanticised) and of course Drama (perfectly unravelled). This level of uncompromised multi-tasking allows the film to move you to laugh and cry, love and hate or even to think and be taught. I\'m trying to avoid the clich\xe9s of glowing reviews (almost as bad as entirely negative ones) - but this is one of the few movies that I feel deserves one.\n\nThe witty banter between friends/foes/lovers/relatives is, in my opinion, flawless and aids the film\'s claim as a true classic. The soundtrack is similarly top-notch and encapsulates and refracts the patriotic theme during several key moments. The political sub-plot and gorgeous scenery also serve as refreshers during otherwise heavy areas of the story. Perhaps Braveheart\'s only flaw (but if you share my sentiments it\'s actually a bonus) is its length so you\'ll want to prepare a comfy seat and maybe even two pots of tea (complete with cosies!).\n\nI suppose it\'s also relevant to touch on the historic inaccuracies as I expect this is what people might dislike most about this film. However, "History is written by those who have hanged heroes"; also, the overall sketchiness of such periods coupled with the right of artistic license are enough for me to personally dismiss such thoughts. On that note, I hope you also enjoy what, to me, is the greatest film created (so far).', u'0.353906', u"This enthralling movie Braveheart takes a viewer's breath away. The invigorating battle scenes, the incredible acting, and the fierce power of love all captivated me when I first saw this movie. James Horner's music is a masterpiece--it adds elegance and dimension to the magnificent film. Mel Gibson's zealous passion as his character William Wallace is truly an inspiration. Scots are very dignified, highly revered people, and this movie really presented Scotland's pride.\n\nEverything in this film was done tastefully. Even the ending, which by the way is heart-wrenching, was done artistically, as Wallace sees his wife during such a traumatizing event. Of course, nothing was better than the rich satisfaction of watching Wallace scream for freedom, freedom and not mercy. This epic film must be watched again and again.", u'0.571864', u"Set in the late 13th century, 'Braveheart' is the story of one of Scotland's greatest national heroes Sir William Wallace. leader of the Scottish resistance forces during the first years of the long, ultimately successful struggle to free Scotland from English rule...\n\nCrucially charismatic in the title role, Gibson plays the heroic figure and emerges as a remarkable hero with wit and romantic soul, determined to rid his country of its English oppressors...\n\nWallace's revolution was set in motion, with great obstacles from his countrymen... Many Scottish nobles lent him only grudging support as most of them were more concerned with wealth and titles than the freedom of the country... In fact, the Scottish leaders are in favor of revolt-or not-depending on English bribes... Wallace, by comparison, is a man of honor, incorruptible and righteous... He was knighted and proclaimed 'guardian and high protector of Scotland,' but as much as he railed against the Scottish nobles, submitted to Edward I, King of England, he was astonished and in shock to discover the treachery of the leading Scot contender for the throne\x97Robert, the Earl of Bruce\x97to whom he confided , 'The people would follow you, if you would only lead them.' Sophie Marceau is exquisite as the distressed princess Isabella of France who ends up falling in love with Wallace, warning him out of several traps...\n\nCatherine McCormack is a stunning beauty who ignites Wallace's revolution...\n\nPatrick McGoohan is chilling, brutal, and vicious as the ruthless Edward I, known by the nickname 'Longshanks.' This king remains simply the embodiment of evil...\n\nWhile Angus McFadyen moves as a nobleman torn between his conscience and political aspiration, and Brendan Gleeson brings strength and humor to his role as the robust Hamish, David O'Hara is very effective as the crazy Irishman who provides much of the film's comic relief from even the most tensed moments...\n\nMel Gibson has reason to be proud of 'Braveheart.' It is a motion picture that dares to be excessive... Gibson presents passionately the most spaciously impressive battles (yet staged for films) even excessively, and it is his passion and excess that make the motion picture great... The horror and futility of massed hand-to-hand combats are exciting rather repulsive... It is epic film-making at its glorious best...\n\nGibson's 'Braveheart' focuses on the human side of Wallace, a character so immense, so intelligent, and so passionate, exploring the definitions of honor and nobility, pushing us to follow the hero into his struggle against injustice and oppression...\n\nThere is a great shot of the lovely mountains of Scotland covered in mist with beautiful bagpipe music... James Horner's beautiful score, calls up memories of his work for 'Titanic.'", u'0.340068', u'I\'m talking just in the 90\'s. The 90\'s were a great time for the movies, we had so many memorable one\'s and there is no doubt that "Braveheart" is one of them. "Braveheart" is one of my favorite movies that never gets old. Despite it\'s long running time, I will watch this movie any day.\n\nMel Gibson has come so far in the movie business and he not only stars but directed Braveheart. He did a terrific job and deserves a lot of credit for this remarkable film. Despite it not being totally accurate with history, anyone can enjoy "Braveheart". Based on the life story of William Wallace, a town peasant who just wants to live in peace and harmony with a wife and children. But when the British king of England, Longshanks, is sick of Scotland "being full of Scots", he comes up with a way of bringing them more into a British land by "breeding them out". Promising any British soldier to a Scotish bride on her wedding night before her husband can have her. Wallace won\'t hear of it and marries his love in secret. When a British soldier notices his wife and attempts to rape her, Wallace comes in and saves her causing a riot in their village and he thinks he\'s got her safe when he sends her away from the soldiers, but they catch her and kill her right in front of her family.\n\nWallace has had it and wants war for not only the murder of his wife and love, he wants freedom for Scotland and will shed blood to do it. "What will you do without freedom?!", this is one of the most memorable speeches of all cinematic history during their first major battle with the British. Through countless battles, friends, traitors, and bloodshed, all Wallace just wishes for is freedom. As Robert the Bruce says to his father "They look at him and fight by his side." He describes Wallace\'s bravery and what everyone feels in wanting to be him. I love Robert\'s last line "You have bled with Wallace! Now bleed with me!" and the army stands and continues their struggling battles for freedom! This is such an inspirational movie with a powerful message "Every man dies, but not every man really lives" to a tearful ending that will make anyone shed a tear to a terrific heartfelt sound track, it\'s no wonder this won best picture with other Oscars. This is a movie, a terrific one that everyone should enjoy and watch.\n\n10/10', u'0.134417', u"Shockingly one-sided portrayal of real, tragic events that left thousands of innocents dead on both sides of the Anglo-Scottish border.\n\nPrevious historical epics have dealt very maturely with the subjects of conquest, rebellion, repression, etc - 'Spartacus' being one good example, 'El Cid' another \x96 so for that reason alone, this self-indulgent, schoolboy fantasy rates as a big disappointment.\n\nBasically, Mel Gibson throws the history book away, and makes Scottish knight William Wallace into a Geronimo-like hero, constantly on the run, constantly outwitting (and brutally slaughtering) his cruel, pompous, haughty, tyrannical, cowardly, ignorant, 'pagan' (!) enemies. Rarely is it mentioned that the real guy killed anyone who understood the English tongue, and often skinned and burned alive his prisoners \x96 many of whom were taken during Scottish raids into England (yes, it happened both ways, though this film would have you think differently).\n\nDoes it work? Sure it works, on a very simple level. The scenery is lovely, the battles are probably the most convincingly filmed to date (though if you look closely, you'll see that they mainly consist of brawny Scotsmen bloodily butchering screaming, squawking Englishmen). But it does work. It's pacey enough, it's entertaining and it has as raw, gutsy feel.\n\nIf, however, you're like me, and you prefer at least a little bit of historical accuracy, then it's a dog's breakfast. To begin with, the armies Wallace led are portrayed in the movie as poorly-armed highlanders, whereas in reality they were lowlanders, easily as well equipped as the English armies they fought. The battle of Stirling Bridge was decided by the collapse of the bridge under the weight of the English cavalry, most of whom then drowned in their armour. The Scots did wreak some butchery, but mainly on the small infantry vanguard who'd got to the other side \x96 the English 'heavy horse' were never involved. At Falkirk, the Irish didn't side with their fellow Celts (they despised the Scots), and though the battle was indeed won by the English because the Scottish nobility fled the field, Wallace also fled \x96 how else did he survive? The characterisation is extraordinarily weak. Gibson himself, though his performance strikes a convincingly muscular, patriotic note, speaks in modern Glaswegian and sports blue woad and Celtic plaits that predate the Dark Ages never mind the Middle Ages. Sophie Marceau's beautiful French princess is totally one-dimensional as an abused innocent (in truth she was a scheming harpy, who later connived in the savage murder of her own husband and then an attempted coup). Patrick McGoohan (who steals the show for me \x96 at least he gives his character some charisma), concentrates mainly on the stern, unyielding side of Edward Longshanks \x96 we don't learn that he founded Parliament, or revised countless laws for the benefit of the underclass, etc.\n\nIt's a big missed opportunity. The same story could still have been told, painting Wallace as a hero, depicting Scotland as an oppressed society, but a bit of balance and political back-story would have made it much more interesting and, dare I say it, more adult.\n\nIt sill works, but only the way a pre-1960s cavalry vs Indians western works: as a bit of rousing fun, anachronistic in a more educated age.", u'-0.0943721', u"In this spectacular, historic movie a young Scotsman becomes the hero of his country, after his wife gets killed by the members of the English occupying force. In the beginning of the movie young William Wallace experience the death of his father and brother. They get killed by the English Kings Soldiers. After this he grows up with his uncle. Years later Wallace (Mel Gibson) returns back to the farm of his father to fall in love Murron (Catherine McCormack), the same girl who gave him a flower after the burial of his father and brother years ago. Because the English noblemen have the right to deflower every new married girl, Wallace marries Murron in secret. But the young luck won't last forlong. A few English soldiers try to rape Murron at a marketplace. Wallace tries to rescue her but the agressors can catch her and kill her right on the marketplace. When Wallace finds out about it, he takes revenge. He executes the murderers of his beloved. This ation is like a wake-up call for his fellow countrymen. They see him as their Leader to defeat the English occupying power. In their first battle the highlanders accomplish to defeat a numeral superior English Force. Wallace becomes an inspiration and more and more Scottish people follow him into war. Meanwhile in England the tyrannic King Edward the Longshankes (Patrick Mc Goohan) takes notice of the triumphs of Wallace. But this is not his only problem: His and heir apparent is a mollycoddled coward, who doesn't behave like his father would like to see it from a Prince. At least Edward the Longshakes arrange the marriage between his son and the lovely Princess Isabelle of France (Sophie Marceau). Besides this the Kings health is not the best anymore. But not only the English have their problems: The Scottish Landlords betray each other for more land and try to get more land for themselves from the English King. During the movie you'll see a lot of great filmed battles, two heart breaking love storys (first between Wallace and Murron, later in the movie young princess Isabelle falls in love with Wallace) and an exciting story about love, hate, patriotism, deception and heroism all in front of a wonderful landscape (the movie was actually set in Ireland). When you watch this movie, you'll be carried away by this powerful and always haunting epic and unterstand why there was no other chance than giving this movie 5 Oscars (including the award for the best film). It is a film who has it all: A great story, perfect filmed battles, one of the best soundtracks ever made (it is a shame, that the score didn't win an Oscar) and a hell of a cast. The role of William Wallace fits Mel Gibson perfect: heroic, romantic but always in a down to earth kind of way. Sophie Marceau and Catherine McCormack are lovely from their first appearance until the end of the film and Patrick McGoohan gives the most despicable (this is meant as a compliment) interpretation of an English King ever seen. This movie you can see over and over again and it never looses his magic and it is a movie you can watch with men and women as well: Men will love the great staged battles and women will love the lovestory.", u'0.235185', u"I hate Braveheart! As an Englishman and as a history student I am insulted by this film. It is obvious that Mel Gibson has a hatred for England and Britain as whole and Randell Wallace only looked at a basic history of the Scotland war and I mean really basic!\n\nThe film is about William Wallace's rising against the English in the late 13th Century. They are many historical inaccuracies in the film. I can understand minor things just to make the story flow better but Braveheart takes the biscuit. William Wallace was a minor noble and he wouldn't have lived in a shack, and most of the Scottish nobles in the film also were living in poor conditions which was not the case. Scottish nobles were well-off and wouldn't have been must different to English nobles. Many Scottish nobles tended to own land in England as well as Scotland. The film make out that England had invaded and occupied Scotland for a long time, what really happened was Edward I wasn't too interested in Scottish affairs at first and he was later invited to help the Scottish to solve the crisis in picking a new king. However, Edward I became upset when his ally he made king tried to flex his muscles. Braveheart also makes out the Scottish army ran around painted themselves blue and defeated a superior army with ease. The Scottish army in the late 13th century wouldn't have been much different to any army in Western Europe and would have been as well armed and armoured to as the English army. The only different between the English and Scottish armies were the Scottish army was more infantry based whilst the English army was more calvary based. I personally think this film is pretty insulting to Scotland as well as England! William Wallace would not have fought for revenge or freedom but for his own personal interest, believing he would have got a better deal any an independent Scotland then under semi-English rule. They was no idea of nationalism or the nation-state in the medieval period. As well as already mentioned many Scottish nobles had land in England and many had English names like Campbell. The film also ignores that William Wallace was also a brutal man, not some heroic revolutionary. They are other things such as the Battle for Stirling Bridge was not fought at a bridge and that it was implied that Queen Isabel was in love with Wallace and that he fathered Edward III, which couldn't have been possible because at the time Wallace's death Isabel was six-years-old and lived in France. Some people have praised the acting in the film, I ask why? I don't think its anything special. Mel Gibson's performance wasn't particularly good, and only Sophie Marceau stood out to me. Edward I was a one-dimensional villain, showing he takes joy out of violence and death, in real-life he was an experience commander, but he was no different to any other Christain king at the time. William Wallace was a simple man who was driven to going to war, against this did not happen. Prince Edward was effeminate, weakly wimp: he was bisexual and not a good military commander, but he was not weak willed and he couldn't have lasted in medieval society if he was effeminate. He was also famous be being a fit man. The portrayal of Prince Edward was homophobic.\n\nThis was a hate-filled movie that shouldn't have been made. If it was made as a fictional film set in an made-up country it would have called unrealistic. This was a weak film and should not have won Oscars for best Director or best Film, the Usual Suspect was hundred times better and should have won those Oscars. The only good thing to come out of the film was some good action and the costumes of the English army. But this is not enough to save this film and people have seen Mel Gibson and Randall Wallace for what they really are for making films such as the Passion of the Christ, Apocalypto and Pearl Harbor. If you have any taste at all don't watch this film!", u'-0.388564', u'The Best film I have ever seen. And the most successful one which has stayed in Turkish cinemas 2 years in a row. Having watched this movie more than 200 times, I am declaring it as my whole life\'s movie. Special side characters, as Steven, Hemich and most of the rest remind me of a huge history "wirtten by those who have hung heroes".\n\nWhen dying in your beds, many years from now; Would you be willing to trade, all the days -from this day to that-, for one chance -just one chance- to watch this film and tell everybody we know, that they can watch lots of movies but they will never watch any Braveheart quality movie again..', u'0.169076'], u'tt0051201': [u'WARNING: SPOILERS AHEAD!\n\nI\'m not sure I have the ability to adequately praise this film. The original short story(rather unremarkable, actually)has been expanded into a magnificent example of Hollywood entertainment at its best. In addition to perhaps the finest line-up of character actors ever assembled(next to Cukor\'s David Copperfield, that is), we get Laughton and Dietrich at the top of their form. The person who criticised Lanchester\'s performance as "annoying" missed the point entirely. Miss Plimsoll is meant to be annoying! Also, what\'s with all the bad-mouthing of Tyrone Power? "Hammy"; "terrible"; "worst performance ever". These are the perceptive IMDb reviews? Only one of you got it right: it\'s hammy because Leonard Vole is the one acting, not Power! For 95% of the film, the character is dissembling, only showing his true colors at the end. Of course it looks hammy: Vole isn\'t a born actor like his wife. And to all those know-it-alls who called this film mediocre and predictable, I look forward to your upcoming film projects which I\'m sure will be paragons of excellence and worthy to be set alongside classics of the golden age.', u'-0.0948661', u'\nCharlie Chaplin was funny. Charles Laughton was witty. As good as \'Witness For The Prosecution\' is---Agatha Christie\'s story, the other actors, the technical expertise---the Oscar-nominated Laughton is THE reason to see this film. What he brings to Billy Wilder\'s 1957 courtroom thriller is his tremendous wit and intellect. It\'s a serious story, but the dark-comic tag team of Wilder/Laughton upgraded the film from "a good courtroom mystery" to "a classic of the courtroom genre".\n\nThe headlining star, Tyrone Power, sure doesn\'t help them very much. He plays anguish about as smoothly as ripped sandpaper...and anguish is the unfortunate emotion he\'s got to play for most of the picture. Power has been accused of murdering a wealthy older woman. His wife (Marlene Dietrich) seems to be doing all she can to sell him out, appearing as...drum roll, please, drummer man...the star witness for the prosecution. Laughton is the brilliant (and ailing) English barrister defending Power. The plot twists \'n\' turns a dozen ways from Sunday, just as it always does in Christie\'s best work.\n\nAmongst all the talk of bloody murder, there are running gags about cigars and alcohol. More dark wit---Laughton\'s character\'s poor health might cause him to drop dead at any moment. Wilder weaved thrills and smiles as well as any director. In this, he was wise to anchor the supporting cast with mainstays of the stiff upper lip. John Williams and Ian Wolfe (Hirsch from "WKRP"), not to mention Laughton\'s control-freak assistant Elsa Lanchester (who was also CL\'s real-life wife), are bloody good.\n\nMovies of this type have been ripped off so often that students of the "don\'t give away the ending" class are bound to figure it out. I did. That hardly mattered because there were STILL more surprises to come. Through all that plot, Dietrich winds up being the most fascinating character. Project back and you\'ll realize how well her performance works. But she & Power are merely the star attractions in \'Witness For The Prosecution\'. The main dish is Charles Laughton. Considering how ironic and cynical our society has become, it\'s stunning that brilliant old pros like Wilder and Laughton aren\'t more popular today. After this movie, they\'ve become personal heroes of mine.', u'0.139102', u"\nA film I have not seen for years but will always remember with fondness. A classic thriller with all the right ingredients - Power and Dietrich are spectacular, and, by early standards (and recent ones!), the twist is excellent. \n\nCharles Laughton however, provides us with a glib chuckle as the aging defense attorney ruled by his overlord maid. A distraction that only adds to an excellent plot line.\n\nI can't imagine another film of the genre and the era, that so wickedly entangles the essential thriller with a 'crime of passion' (oops, spot the plot killer...) gem. A classic. \n\nA film for true movie lovers. Take it from me!\n", u'0.421459', u"Billy Wilder is a director with an understanding of cinema that is almost unmatched throughout the medium's entire history - that's why his films are always so good. Witness for the Prosecution is yet another highlight in the great director's history, and it proves that courtroom dramas can be both riveting and a great opportunity for some first rate comedy. Wilder's film features one of the most well paced plots I've ever seen in a film, and it's a plot that includes some very finely tuned twists. Towards the end, Wilder bombards us with twist after twist, each one both making sense and topping the one before it. In a time when people are impressed by films such as 'The Sixth Sense', Billy Wilder still shows us how to skilfully attribute a twist into a film's plot. The plot itself follows the story of Sir Wilfrid Robarts; an ace defence lawyer that has been told that his health won't allow him to tackle anything more than mundane cases, but is brought back into the fray when a case involving the murder of an elderly woman comes into his hands. Wilfrid must now juggle the case and his health as he attempts to keep the young man from being sent down.\n\nLike all Wilder films, this one is a very pleasurable viewing. Wilder manages to find a middle ground between substance and entertainment, and so this is a film that will please fans of both aspects. The film is deliriously entertaining throughout, with some truly great lines of dialogue (most of which is very quotable) and every twist adds a new level to the story. The substance comes from a multitude of angles, and themes of love, health, sacrifice and most notably, justice, are all more than prevalent. The acting is certainly of note in Witness for the Prosecution. Charles Laughton is absolutely sublime as the undermining and stubborn Wilfrid Robarts; his performance is very strong, and makes up the backbone of the film. The main supporting performance comes from Marlene Dietrich. I'm not a big fan of hers; despite having a great pair of legs, she just doesn't do anything for me, but in this film she brings sufficient coldness to her character and really makes it her own. The final main performance comes from Tyrone Power; he isn't as great as the other two, but does enough with his character to ensure he's believable. Highly recommended viewing!", u'0.634545', u"Witness for the Prosecution is, as IMDb voters cann attest, a great movie. A clever, character-driven courtroom drama, it deserved the Academy Award nominations that it received in 1958, and it has justly endured to the present day. Starring the terrific talents of Charles Laughton, Tyrone Power, and particularly Marlene Dietrich, directed by Billy Wilder, and based on the superb short story by Agatha Christie, it is a combination has all of the very best ingredients, and delivers a nearly outstanding film.\n\nThe movie centers around Laughton's character, an aged, feisty, and very canny English barrister (lawyer) who is in poor health and headed toward retirement. The opening of the movie is entirely Laughton's show, as he portrays a curmudgeonly and endearing character. On his first day home from the hospital, he soon takes up the defense of Leonard Vole (Power) a man who is charged with murder and up against a barrage of circumstantial evidence. Power is convincing as the honest and somewhat naive defendant, in increasingly over his head. Soon, Dietrich makes her entrance as Vole's cool German femme fatal of a wife. After a few flashbacks to set up the story of the murder case, Laughton takes up Vole's case. What ensues is a well-written and well-directed courtroom drama, in which Laughton continues to shine, delivering a convincing performance peppered with humor. Soon, the story takes a series of dramatic twists, during which Power plays his part as the beleaguered defendant to the hilt and Dietrich uses the gifts that made her a legend. By the end, the audience has been treated to an excellent drama with sensational acting.\n\nThe result is a classic, but not an icon in the sense that Christie's short story, penned twenty years earlier, would become. While it may be the best-regarded of all Christie adaptations (Murder on the Orient Express a possible exception), the movie does not seem to have the stature it ought to have. At the end of the movie, I did not feel the same as when I read the story, and not just because I knew all along how it would turn out. With such visible talent on all fronts, I took a long look at what it was, and what was missing. The answer: Christie. \n\nThe movie is good in its own right, but from the beginning misses the crucial aspect that the original story has: the mystery. Agatha Christie is the master of suspense, and throughout the story, that suspense, that anxiousness to know what will happen next, the eagerness to know where this next twist will lead, and the shock that comes at the very end, were what the story was all about. The direction the movie went, the legal thriller, substituted drama for mystery, and while the movie only added to the story, changing very little of what Christie wrote, the movie lost the grip that only she could create. Christie treated the courtroom proceedings (the centerpiece of the movie) with brevity, focusing on the intrigue surrounding the case. Also, the Hollywood ending overdoes it a little bit, and deprives the most important plot twist of some of its its emotional impact.\n\nThat said, however, the movie is still a classic. Fortunately, the heart of the story was still very strong, with a unique plot and rich characters, which were taken advantage of by Wilder and the cast, respectively. And, as it turns out, the movie is a good complement to the story. To those who have only seen the movie, the story should be read to truly appreciate the missing value of the mystery. To those who have read the story, the movie nails the characters (particularly Dietrich's Mrs. Vole). All in all, I give this movie a 9 out of 10, and would gladly see it again.", u'0.0802907', u'At the end of the day the films you give top marks are those films that become constant companions. You can see them again at the drop of a hat, you show them to people who have never see them and it\'s always a triumph. "Witness For The Prosecution" is one of those wonders. Suspend your disbelief for a couple of hours and enjoy this banquet of a romp. Charles Laughton showed here what he was made of better, more clearly and more loudly than in any other film and all of his films, at least the moments with him in it, are unforgettable - Captain Blight or Henry VIII, Quasimodo or that malefic Senator from South Carolina. Here the severity of his lawyer by vocation takes your senses away with his masterful judicial way to see logic and it\'s such an incredible fun to watch him do it. Tyrone Power is a toy in his hands but not Marlene Dietrich who stands her ground, not merely as a character but as a presence on the screen. Billy Wilder visits early Hitchcock territory with wit and fun. Elsa Lanchester\'s nurse is the cherry on top of this delightful film.', u'0.568778', u'This is one of the best "trial movies" ever made. It\'s an outstanding film that is just as good today as it was almost 50 years ago when it was released in the theaters. The shocking ending caused quite a stir back then, too.\n\nThe only part of the movie I thought looked dated and unrealistic was Tyrone Power\'s character being able to interrupt the trial with outbursts and not be reprimanded for it. There is no way that would be tolerated, at least today.\n\nOtherwise, it\'s a pretty solid film with a good cast that includes two fascinating characters played by actors who know how to entertain: Charles Laughton and Marlene Dietrich. \n\nLaughton, who plays Power\'s defense attorney, grabs the spotlight in the story but Dietrich almost steals the movie in her role as Power\'s wife. Laughton\'s dialog is terrific throughout, bringing a number of laughs to this serious film. He\'s just a joy to watch. Dietrich is even more riveting but just doesn\'t have anywhere near the same amount of screen time as Laughton.\n\nNot to be overlooked is Elsa Lanchester, playing Laughton\'s nurse. She, too, demonstrates her comedic talent and significantly adds to the fun of watching this film.\n\nIf you like some fine drama, storyline twists, a little humor thrown in and great acting and dialog, this is a classic film to check out.', u'0.395645', u"In a recent biography of Billy Wilder, Agatha Christie is quoted as saying that this was the best adaption of her work ever done on the screen. I can't praise Witness for the Prosecution any higher than that.\n\nTyrone Power in his farewell film plays Leonard Vole who befriends a dotty old widow played by Norma Varden. She even rewrites her will leaving him the bulk of a very large estate. When she's murdered, Scotland Yard arrests Power.\n\nPower's solicitor Henry Daniell retains a dream team for defense of John Williams and the recently recovered Charles Laughton. Laughton is recovering from a heart attack and against medical advice plunges into the case. Laughton also has to deal with the efforts of his assigned nurse Elsa Lanchester to keep him following doctor's advice.\n\nThe original play this was taken from concentrated completely on the Power character and the machinations of his wife. Wilder built up the character of the nurse and barrister Sir Wilfred Robards so that they almost equaled the screen time of Mr. and Mrs. Vole. So much so that Charles Laughton was nominated for an Academy Award in 1957, but lost to Alec Guinness. \n\nMarlene Dietrich plays Mrs. Vole. She's a war bride over from Germany and she's got her own agenda going. Her performance and what her character does is the key to the whole film. Dietrich probably would have gotten an Oscar nomination herself, but due to the fact that if her performance was hyped up for Academy consideration, the element of surprise would have been lost in the film. Wilder in fact apologized to Marlene for that.\n\nThe Anglo-Saxon legal system's goal is justice. Justice is served though not quite in the way it usually is in Witness for the Prosecution.", u'-0.173346', u'\nAnother brilliant work in the legendary career of Billy Wilder. The director signs a cinematic adaptation of this Agatha Christie story: actually it is really as if the camera went on stage for filming the play. But the film is passionating and exciting, there\'s no time to get bored.\n\nAnother thing we shall not forget is that Billy Wilder is European. He manages to keep the spirit of the film very British, with lots of humour and sarcasm. Compared to films like this one, "legal" movies from John Grisham\'s novels are empty and meaningless, without soul.\n\nMr.Wilder is the director, we know; we have Charles Laughton, Tyrone Power and Marlene Dietrich: what a cast! Add a superb black and white cinematography... The result is amazing, with a film where dialogues are flawless and carry everything.\n\nTimes are different now, but the atmosphere and the taste of movies like this one are impossible to find in contemporary films.  \n', u'0.424374', u"\nI first saw this movie about 15 years ago and loved it.  I just watched it on VHS and was captivated all over again.  Agatha Christie's story, Billy Wilder's screenplay and direction, and the four main leads all get it right.  Charles Laughton is absolutely superb, and Elsa Lanchester is a perfect foil.\n\nAgatha Christie's story has more twists and turns than a roller coaster and this provides a strong foundation for the movie. But the actors give life to the characters. I haven't seen the 1982 version, but I'll admit to a bias for Marlene Dietrich.  She and Tyrone Power pull just the right punches.\n\nIt's a mystery, of course.  But a top notch one. So if you want only to dabble in the genre, this is the one to try. (If you like mysteries, it goes without saying that you must see it.) Moreover, this is one B&W movie for people who don't like B&W movies.", u'0.356161', u'To see "Witness for the Prosecution" for the first time in 2008 is a jolting surprise. Nobody could do it better than Billy Wilder did in 1957. A man accused of murder, Tyrone Power, the weakest link in this terrific chain. Sir Wilfred is called to defend him, he is played by the extraordinary Charles Laughton, but he\'s just out of hospital - he wasn\'t dismissed he was expelled - and due to doctor\'s orders he\'s not to take any criminal cases. He finds Power charming and personable enough but he\'s not going to risk his life to save his until Marlene Dietrich makes her entrance - and what an entrance! How marvelous that what amounts to a bit of Agatha Christie\'s usual fare becomes such an entertaining and at times right down riveting piece of film-making.', u'0.222749', u'\nThis is a fun movie, with marvelous performances by Laughton, Dietrich and Lanchester. Even the usually mediocre Tyrone Power fits his role to a tee. It\'s the best filming of a Christie mystery that I\'ve seen.\n\nIf you haven\'t seen it, though, read no further. For those of you who have, I would like to point out one relatively large flaw in the plot. Much is made during the final scene of Christine Helm\'s perjury. She even agrees with Sir Wilfred that she will go to prison, but teases, "it won\'t be for life, will it?"\n\nIs it possible that neither Christine Helm, Sir Wilfred Robarts, Billy Wilder, nor Dame Agatha herself noticed the rather stunning fact that every word Frau Helm spoke on the stand was the absolute truth? The revelation of the final plot twist could have been that much more dramatic had she asked Sir Wilfred, in their moments alone together at the end, "Perjury? What perjury? I committed no perjury. Leonard was guilty as charged. And all I testified about the letters was that I wrote them, not that they were true. They can\'t touch him, and they can\'t touch me, either."\n\nIt\'s possible that the book ends differently, and this flaw was introduced in the adaptation. Not having the book handy, I can\'t verify it one way or the other.', u'-0.229036', u'WARNING! SPOILERS AHEAD! The Billy Wilder touch adds cynical wit to his sparkling adaptation of Dame Agatha Christie\'s play WITNESS FOR THE PROSECUTION (WftP), with some of the best lines in a Wilder movie since DOUBLE INDEMNITY, thanks to Wilder, Harry Kurnitz, and Larry Marcus. In our household, "Is that really desirable?" has become a catchphrase, along with many other gems from the mouths of star Charles Laughton and the rest of the sterling cast! :-) I only hope people seeing this for the first time haven\'t already seen Marlene Dietrich\'s scene-stealing performance in Orson Welles\' TOUCH OF EVIL, or they might tumble to the twist finale before they\'re supposed to! :-) (In fact, if I recall correctly, when WftP was shown on Turner Classic Movies, Robert Osborne mentioned in his intro that Welles helped Dietrich out with her WftP "Cockney informant" makeup as a favor!) La Dietrich looks fabulous and keeps you fascinated even when she\'s coming across as the ultimate bitch; it\'s a shame she wasn\'t nominated for an Oscar along with co-stars Charles Laughton and Elsa Lanchester. Tyrone Power\'s usual slightly wooden delivery actually serves him well as the defendant; somehow it adds to defendant Leonard Vole\'s air of feckless innocence. Henry Daniell, John Williams, Ian Wolfe, Torin Thatcher, and particularly Norma Varden as the ill-fated Emily French provide able support, too, with Una O\'Connor stealing her scenes as Mrs. French\'s loyal but "antagnistic" Scottish housekeeper. A young, brunette Ruta Lee provides a memorable moment or two. As sickly but sly barrister Wilfrid Robarts and his chipper but no-nonsense nurse, Miss Plimsoll, real-life husband and wife Laughton and Lanchester shine in the most engaging performances of their careers. The comic sparring chemistry between Sir Wilfrid Robarts and Miss Plimsoll, and the warmth and understanding that\'s grown between them by movie\'s end, had my husband Vinnie opining that if another movie was made featuring these characters, Miss Plimsoll would probably end up as Mrs. Robarts before it was over -- what a delightful series that could have been! Hey, at the very least, I\'d have paid good money to see Billy Wilder direct Laughton, Lanchester, and Dietrich in a sequel in which Sir Wilfrid prepares for the trial of Christine Vole, a.k.a. Christine Helm! :-)', u'0.232193', u'After the artistic success of AND THEN THERE WERE NONE, the only notable film based on Dame Agatha Christie\'s stories was a remake of LOVE FROM A STRANGER with John Hodiak and Sylvia Sidney as the ill-matched couple, but re-staged in the 1890s rather than 1930 England. Then, in 1957, Billy Wilder made this production of a short story by Dame Agatha called WITNESS FOR THE PROSECUTION. With a tip-top cast of Charles Laughton, Marlene Dietrich, Tyrone Power, and Elsa Lancaster, the film was a brilliantly done version of Christie\'s short story, changed in it\'s ending (but to a changed ending found in Christie\'s own dramatization). \n\nLeonard Vole (Tyrone Power) is a salesman who meets an elderly, wealthy woman (Norma Varden) and gains her affections - much to the dislike and mistrust of her servant (Una O\'Connor). O\'Connor claims she saw the two together the night that Varden was beaten to death in her apartment. Vole is arrested, and his solicitor (Henry Daniell) wants England\'s best barrister, Sir Wilfred Robarts (Laughton) to defend him. Robarts is recovering from a heart attack, and is being nursed by Miss Plimsoll (Elsa Lancaster). He is a difficult patient, and is not looking forward to an enforced rest in Bermuda. So, despite the protests of Plimsoll he takes the case. He does promise her he will listen to his doctor and take his medicine. She does not trust him. \n\nSir Robert meets Vole\'s German born wife, Christina Helm (Dietrich), who alarms him. She is too cool, to detached at her husband\'s peril. But he goes ahead, and is soon in court fighting a first rate opponent (Torin Thatcher as Myers), and scores some impressive points against the prosecution, especially in cross-examining O\'Connor. But at the critical moment he finds that by a subtle point of law, Dietrich can testify against Power, and does so. So the plot becomes, how to defeat this "witness for the prosecution"? Is there something that can turn the tables on her and her testimony.\n\nAnd the evidence to use against Dietrich does appear - from an unexpected source. Is it effective? Will Power be saved in the end? Or is there something going on?\n\nAlthough the conclusion of this film has been pretty well known for years, I will refrain from explaining what it is. A good mystery should surprise the audience, as this does every audience that sees it for the first time. Laughton and Lancaster make a funny pair (and in the end, an endearing one from Lancaster\'s point of view). Power gets to play his most sinister part since "the Great Stanton" Carlyle in NIGHTMARE ALLEY. And Dietrich does pull off the biggest surprise twist in her career. \n\nAs for Wilder, after some questionable films in the mid 1950s (THE SEVEN YEAR ITCH, THE SPIRIT OF ST. LOUIS) he was back in form. His handling of the courtroom scenes (which make up nearly 60% of the film) are far more realistic and speedy than Alfred Hitchcock\'s plodding THE PARADINE CASE a decade earlier. It was the best of the Christie films prior to MURDER ON THE ORIENT EXPRESS.', u'0.0840794', u'This Billy Wilder-directed adaptation of Agatha\'s Christie\'s Witness For the Prosecution features Tyrone Power, Marlene Dietrich and Charles Laughton, and these three leads could easily have appeared in a 1937 version, except that Christie hadn\'t written it yet, and so this film is from 1957. It\'s a story about a man on trial for the murder of a woman he\'d only fairly recently become acquainted with who left him a large sum of money in her will, and who has a flimsy alibi as to his whereabouts on the night of the murder, and is in very deep trouble indeed. Fortunately for him, a first rate lawyer has agreed to take his case, and all kinds of complications ensue till the surprise ending, in which everything comes together, but not as the first time viewer might have expected.\n\nThere\'s a lot of good and bad in the film. The good is a tight script; and a a bravura performance from Laughton as the lawyer (okay, barrister) with health problems; Laughton\'s real life wife, Elsa Lanchester, as his nurse, is delightful; Tyrone Power, as the accused, is nicely enigmatic and ambiguous; Marlene Dietrich, as Power\'s neglected war bride wife brings her own special brand of charisma to her role; while John Williams, Una O\'Connor, Henry Daniell and Ian Wolfe are all splendid in supporting parts. As to the bad, the movie is dull looking, resembling an episode of a television series of its time. It lacks the fine tuning of the best of Hitchcock, or for that matter Billy Wilder. The pacing could be better. While I wouldn\'t call the movie slow moving it never at any point really catches fire. It feels rather chilly throughout. There\'s not much in the art direction or the photography to draw the viewer in. Wilder serves his material and doesn\'t bring much of himself to the party.\n\nWhat keeps the thing humming is its plot, which is a good one. Ty Power uses his charm skillfully in his early scenes, yet seems to lose focus later on. Laughton brings gravitas to his role but somehow fails to bring the much needed moral authority his character presumably possesses, which is absent from the actor\'s performance. Too often Laughton just seems to be indulging himself, which is fun to watch but not really right for his character. Dietrich seems to be working extra hard and actually convinces me that she is or could be Power\'s wife.\n\nOverall, Witness For the Prosecution feels like a "leisure movie" for its director. Wilder wasn\'t exactly slumming when he made it, but he wasn\'t running on six cylinders, either. It plays well enough, keeps the viewer\'s attention, yet lacks a certain heart, fire, intensity, something that might have elevated it to the level of a classic. It\'s definitely worth a peek if one likes murder mysteries, but it\'s not in the same league as Hitchcock\'s Dial M For Murder, which is a far more engaging movie. There\'s no flamboyance and little style to Witness. As a footnote it\'s worth mentioning that this was Tyrone Power\'s last or nearly last movie. He shows himself to good advantage, as it mustn\'t have been easy to for this middle-aged former matin\xe9e idol to have played a murder suspect named Leonard Vole. Power was clearly moving in a character star direction, and doing well at it. Had he lived longer and continued in the same vein he might have given Dirk Bogarde a run for his money over the next decade.', u'-0.198592'], u'tt0364569': [u"To start off; This is the one and only film that kept me quiet for a whole 5 mins after seeing it. I literally couldn't close my mouth, and yet there wasn't any sound coming out of it. Oldboy had such an impact on me that words are too little to describe that impact. Therefore this film is definitely in my top 3 films ever made. It belongs there because it has a massive ingredient that a lot of films seem to miss out on; a divine plot. Even though the acting and screenplay are world class, the plot is really the cherry on the cake.\n\nWhen it comes to screenplay Park Chan-Wook is unique (at least for western standards) in his way of filming. The colours are so vivid and it seems like he wanted every shot to be a piece of art. One tip: If you like the shooting in 'Oldboy', have a look at 'Sympathy for Lady Vengeance', the third part in Park's revenge-trilogy. It's even superior to the camera-work in 'Oldboy'. Don't, however, expect a story like Oldboy's, because you would be very disappointed.\n\nWhen it comes to acting and the music, this film is also one of the better films ever made. The music sticks in your head and every time I put in my Oldboy-DVD and the theme-song comes up, I'm just flooded with good memories (even though the plot doesn't have a single reason to be happy about). The characters are also presented very well by the outstanding cast. Especially Choi Min-Sik and Yu Ji-Tae set a very convincing performance. \n\nI really appreciate this film being respected as it should be, by having a place in the top 250. If, however, it was up to me it would be even higher in the ranking. I don't see why films like 'The Usual Suspects' or 'Memento', which are fantastic pieces of film-making and which without a doubt deserve a place in the top 250, are higher in the top 250 than 'Oldboy'. They serve the same cause; a fantastic plot. But those plots can't stand in the shadow or even come close to the plot of 'Oldboy'. The one and only reason is that those two films are better known and from a western production company. If we were all living in Asia, no doubt 'Oldboy' would be in the top 20 of all time. \n\nMy advice to people who haven't watched this film yet: Go see it! This is definitely a must- see. If you have a weak stomach, pull yourself together and still watch it. Don't be as shallow as a lot of people here tend to be. Look beyond the violence and see the things I mentioned before: world class acting, cinematography, music and last but certainly not least the plot. Once you've opened yourself up you'll find a whole new world of cinema. Enjoy!", u'0.169263', u"I've scored this a 9 but I think I may have been a little harsh! I have just read a review that says the reviewer cannot understand the hype. I can see no hype. Everything the film promised and more was delivered. This is a truly wonderful film. It is beautifully acted, brutally and painstakingly directed and as good a display of raw emotion as I have witnessed in any language. The story is gripping, the characters believable and well rounded, the emotion human and the feeling I was left with at the end of the film is one of awe. And that was after I had watched it twice. Honestly, this is a truly, truly wonderful film. Do not miss it under any circumstances!", u'0.334318', u'After going through the comments, i must say i\'m impressed how many people out there don\'t have a slightest clue of beauty or intelligent screenplays. there are so many comments from people that totally disliked the movie. which is plain and simple not possible, if you got an open mind and a open heart (and are not drunk). I would compare it to chocolate. You may find it too sweet and prefer bitter chocolate. or you like white chocolate more. Or you got diabetes and can only sometimes eat one. But people that totally dislike chocolate scare me to death. Same goes for Oldboy, you gotta admit some of the genius art-form it contains. Its everything in there. Its heartwarming , disgusting, intelligent, beautiful and lead with outstanding performance of any actor . You HAVE to like something, cause it wont get much better. Its chocolate. If you disliked the movie so much and on a constant basis, why even bother to write a comment? My guess is you just could not follow the movie at all. which is my only guess actually. well enough rambling.\n\n:::::::::: Bottom Line :::::::::\n\nIf you call common sense, and a human heart your own and like "challenging" movies, go and see it NOW.(i recommend the original korean version with subs)I also recommend the pre- and sequel to this movie. (just browse Chan Wook Park) If you think "The Fast and the Furious" is the best movie ever made, please do not even bother to watch Oldboy, and spare others your "brilliant" reviews.', u'0.0196269', u"I decided to check this movie out after Ebert's 4 star rave review, and the cult status this movie has received (and was also intrigued by the sexy-looking Ultimate Edition), so I decided to rent it. I was VERY surprised at how different it was than I expected it to be - I expected a ton of violence and not much in the way of writing or acting. The first time I saw it, I wasn't blown away, just kind of like whatever.\n\nWhen I watched it for the second time, however, I really started to notice how well it's made, in addition to liking it more. Every shot is bursting with background detail, a great amount of attention on the production design (the theme of a certain color in a scene was restrained, yet perfectly balanced). The actors really gave it all, especially the 2 male leads who really blew me away. The music is a varied mix of beautiful classical music and some pretty cool techno. The screenplay is brilliant; the characters are developed very well, extremely complex, and the plot is not only ingenious, but the payoff and twists are 1000x better than any Shamaylan movie.\n\nSimply put, from a technical point of view, it's one of the best movies ever. From a critic's point of view, it is a very well-done movie that goes a little overboard in sex and violence, and is just a little strange.", u'0.259219', u'I haven\'t written a comment on IMDb for about 3 years but was inspired to with this film. It is not very often that I come across a film by accident (World Movies on cable) and the spend the next day scouring the internet to find out information about it and can\'t get it out of my head! Anyway, yep there are plot holes, but Old boy borrows a lot from surrealism and you are meant to suspend your disbelief! I don\'t buy comments when people say "it is so unrealistic because he should\'ve done this ..." because it is a surrealist film and meant to be unrealistic! For me the sign of a good film is if it sticks on your head! THis one surely does (althought I did have to look away a few times ... ) Loved it!!!! Work of cruel genius!!! (HOLLYWOOD - Please don\'t ruin it by remaking it!!!)', u'-0.0771644', u'I looked at program for today and I saw movie "Oldboy". I read plot and I liked it. What I expected is decent thriller from very good South Korean cinematography,something like "Salinui chueok ". But once again I was wrong. "Oldboy" is masterpiece, so unusual from all other movies. I\'ve seen lots of violence on screen and to me this isn\'t nothing new but I think that people under 18 really shouldn\'t watch this one. It\'s because movie is brutal and I don\'t think that younger ones would fully understand this one.\n\nTo say something about plot is quite impossible because I don\'t know where to begin. If I start talking about the movie I could tell few important things and I know that people often read other comments because they didn\'t watch that movie. So,I\'m going to say only what I read before watching this movie.\n\nOn his daughter\'s birthday, Oh Dae-su gets drunk and soon he\'s arrested by the police. His best friend No Joo-hwan somehow manages to get him out of jail and when No Joo-hwan is making a phone call Oh Dae-su disappears. Someone kidnap\'s him and puts him into room during 15 long years.But one day he\'s released.\n\nThat\'s the plot. Very interesting, you should watch this movie and then judge it. By the rating on IMDb this movie is in top 250 movies. Now I can understand why. This plot that I wrote doesn\'t reveal the greatness of the people who wrote the script. I bow to them because this movie is so good, with all those twists and it really represents a whole new wave of making a movie, of writing a script and of acting in it. About direction and actors I can say only good things. Director Park Chan-wook won prize Grand Jury at Cannes. That\'s enough about direction part. About actors. I can say that I\'m impressed by one actor:Choi Min-sik. He\'s amazing in major role and he showed great potential. I hope I will see him again in some good movie.\n\nI cannot say anything more because I could reveal some secret and I don\'t wanna do that to all new viewers. Only a recommendation. Beautiful, intelligent masterpiece of movie that I highly recommend for everyone with strong stomach and too all of you who want to see one excellent, but sick story. 10/10', u'-0.00406347', u'Armond White of the NY Press has called it a "virtuosic stupid movie". I think that\'s exactly right.\n\nCertainly the movie looks fantastic. I liked the surrealistic touches. I think the director has a real imaginative way of capturing the process of memory -- there\'s an extended flashback about 3/4 way through which I think is as well conceived and shot as anything I\'ve seen. The acting is standout. Hell, I even liked the score.\n\nBut the movie almost aggressively makes no sense.\n\nSPOILERS Leave aside for a moment the obvious plot holes, large and small -- although it\'s worth noting that there\'s a whole lot of them. Leave aside the contrivances, too: the endless special gadgets the bad guy comes up with just when he needs them, the rather magical view of hypnosis, Dae-Su\'s magical new abilities, the seeming omnipotence of the badguy. Let\'s assume all this is beside the point, and that we\'re supposed to take the movie more or less symbolically ala FIGHT CLUB (probably the closest reference).\n\nThe movie doesn\'t make any sense thematically, either. What\'s it really about? The virtue of keeping your mouth shut? The movie seems to suggest that the bad guy\'s sexual relationship with his sister is just fine, the problem seems to be Dae-Su\'s big mouth. The movie rather laboriously teaches this: the sister kills herself because of the rumors which somehow the sister believes to be true (?); Dae-Su becomes convinced that he was, in fact, at fault; Dae-Su cuts his own tongue out; Dae-Su pleads that Mi-do never learn the truth; Dae-Su even ends up brainwashing himself via hypnosis to forget the truth -- or "keep his mind shut", in a sense. I mean, huh? This is a pretty juvenile kind of ethics, to be blunt about it. Although Dae-Su is the protagonist the movie really doesn\'t seem to be on his side. It also hints at a weird kind of passivity: for all of the hammer swinging and octopus eating, Dae-Su doesn\'t really do all that much: things are done to him, and eventually he begins to internalize the abuse given to him.\n\nIs it about the futility of revenge? One would think, particularly with the references to COUNT OF MONTE CRISTO. But leaving aside the notion that Dae-Su\'s tormentor\'s omnipresence seems to weigh against the notion of him and Mi-do doing anything, really, but take their lumps or try to fight back, the fact that Dae-Su is considered by the movie to have really "done" something makes any critique pretty complicated. Remember, in COUNT Dantes is a true innocent. His motives are as pure as revenge ever gets -- that\'s why Dumas\'s ultimate critique, his ultimate notion that revenge even for the Count is wrong works so well. The force is seen in isolation. Here, though, it seems more a case of Dae-Su learning how "bad" he really is. He shouldn\'t take revenge because he really IS at fault.\n\nI guess you could argue that the movie shows revenge is futile from the bad guy\'s point of view. Then why are we watching Dae-Su at all? Maybe the point is that everyone feels themselves righteous until they realize the true dimensions of their "sin". But I don\'t see a lot of people facing up to facts in the movie: I see a lot of denial, in fact. Dae-Su admits to his relatively "minor" sin but can\'t face up to his "major" one.\n\nAfter I saw this I read some interviews with the cast and crew, and apparently some of this vagueness is intentional -- we\'re supposed to be left unsure. Well, the movie is successful in that, but I think it\'s an unworthy goal, an abdication of the artist\'s responsibility. People have bristled at the charge that this movie is nihilistic, but if that really is the point, that the movie\'s supposed to throw up it\'s hands and say, "hey, I dunno, you figure it out", then that truly is nihilism.\n\nAh well, I could go on, but I won\'t bore you. A virtuosic stupid movie indeed, I think: often amazing to watch but underneath the surface just a whole bunch of muddleheadedness.', u'-0.282823', u'Oldboy takes a hammer and "batters" its American equivalents, leaving them as pulped as a chewed up squid. Park Chan Wook displays what America misses with his ultra-stylish, ultra-violent thriller. Why watch Ben Affleck fail spectacularly to summon any displayable talent, when Min sik Choi serves up a memorable role as the disturbed, vengeful Dae Su Oh, in the second of the Vengeance trilogy. Park skillfully creates a compelling plot that will have you guessing through the entire film, up until the final shocking revelation. The Cinematography expertly done by Jeong-hun Jeong, who also worked on the follow up to this film, Chinjeolhan geumjassi. Everything about this film is done in style and panache and creates a memorable experience, and has many memorable scenes.\n\nMany people accuse this film of being "unrealistic". These people forget that this a film, not a documentary. No one complains About Star Wars being unrealistic, and rightly so. Films have a right to stretch out reality, don\'t forget the reason it does this is to be entertaining.\n\nAlthough the film has strong violence of a graphic nature, I advise you to watch it, if only to broaden your perspectives of world and Asian cinema.', u'0.0590765', u"I feel compelled to defend this film from some quite frankly unwarranted criticism. Although it isn't without its flaws, and all films have a few,it certainly isn't a one star film.What this film has is the ability to be sublime, shocking, ridiculous, mildly amusing and visually stunning which is some feat for any film.The sheer scale of the comments here suggests that here is a film that gets to you in one way or another. This film is as far away from Maborosi as you can get yet both films are up there as great pieces of cinema. I wont divulge the plot or end this comment with a Latin quote to reinforce my self importance i'll just say go and watch it, preferably if you're not too squeamish and don't mind subtitles.This film left me thinking about it the following day which is normally a good thing (atleast it shows my memory is working!)", u'0.169171', u'This movie was awful, plain and simple. It will probably be revered by those who only see "films" and not "movies" and will therefore feel sorry for me for having such a limited understanding of the theatrical brilliance of this film, but I am secure enough in my intellect to say that this boring, self-aggrandizing and painfully drawn-out movie was a waste of two hours and nine dollars.\n\nI was suckered into seeing this by the inexplicable good reviews it had been receiving and came out of the theater thinking that those reviews had to have been written by over-excited film students and the aforementioned group of individuals who shun regular movies, perhaps for fear that they may actually enjoy one someday.\n\nThe storyline is quite a promising one - a man is imprisoned for 15 years, never knowing his captor nor his crime. He is then abruptly released and given just five days to discover the identity and reason of the man who imprisoned him. However, the great concept soon disintegrates into a pathetic joke as Oh Dae-Su runs around beating people up, trying to have sex with a young girl who is attempting to use the toilet and eating a live, writhing squid (presumably for dramatic effect, as there is absolutely no other reason for it). All the while he is trying to figure out this horrible thing he did to earn himself fifteen years in jail, and when he finally finds out it is both ridiculous and a major letdown. His nemesis, a man who supposedly went to school with him when he was a young man, looks like a Banana Republic model twenty years younger than him. Hey, I know prison has been hard on Oh Dae-Su, but is it too much to ask to find an actor that looks a bit closer to his age? Of all the things wrong with this movie, this one seems like the easiest one to fix.\n\nAnd the big secret - the one that kept me in my seat for 90 minutes when I could have been out doing something productive - is some joke of a plot line involving incest and a rumor started in high school. Come on! Throw us a bone here - was that really the best they could do? I sat through stupid dialogue, over-acting, gloomy sets and gratuitous violence for this? (By the way - I\'m not at all against violence in a film if it seems to fit the story, but in this case it seems I was forced to watch our hero knock out someone\'s front teeth and cut off his own tongue with a pair of scissors in order to distract me from figuring out I was wasting my afternoon watching a pretentious piece of garbage).\n\nTake my advice - do something else with your time and money. Or take your nine dollars and go see a lowly "movie" - one that you might actually enjoy.', u'-0.566283', u'Yes this is a twisted movie with plots that unravel slowly and sometimes there are scenes that are slow. But over all it\'s incredible. Some of the symbolism behind the scenes are stunning. You have to go deep to appreciate it. There is a lot of gore and violence that can turn you off, but I was simply amazed by the depth and width of some of the scenes.\n\nWithout giving anything away, once the main character is released he meets a man with a dog. It\'s seems to be an irrelevant scene, but put yourself in a cage for 15 years and think about how you would act? What happens to that man? Isn\'t he also in a cage? Aren\'t we all? What is the symbolism of that man? How about the dog? Revenge to the main character in this movie is his life. Why? And you don\'t question it because you know what happened to him. He doesn\'t question it either.\n\nTo me this was one of the greatest depictions of Oedipus or other Greek characters I\'ve seen this decade in a movie. Nothing is new. If you liked "Requiem for a Dream" or "Blue Velvet." Consider this one.', u'-0.0405577', u"Old Boy sucks! No, wait, let me rephrase that: Old Boy is a stylistically challenging, highly innovative, but ultimately hollow and repugnant exercise in genre film-making. \n\nAnd just to let you know where I'm coming from \x96 'Sympathy for Mr. Vengeance' was brilliant; an unforgiving and touching descent into doom. In that movie everything that happened somehow had to. One action triggered the next one and we experienced a vicious circle of violence and revenge. The characters seemed trapped in their situation.\n\nIn Old Boy our protagonist is also trapped, but you know the story, so I won't tell you again. So he's in this room and there is great sound design and camera work. But once he frees himself, the complications and problems multiply. The plot is at first close to incomprehensible as he stumbles from one situation to another. When the villain explains his schemes at the end and brings enlightenment, I just couldn't care anymore. The intriguing premise is destroyed by the revelation that it's all a contrived revenge plot by the bad guy.\n\nAnd contrived it is. The story only works by inserting endless flashbacks (full of bad pathos) and explanations. To keep the audience interested, we get gruesome scenes of murder, self-mutilation and general mayhem. As others have remarked, these scenes are well done, but serve no greater purpose. It's all a so-what comic extravaganza.\n\nOut of 'Old Boy' I got small pleasures and a lot of disappointment, courtesy of one of the most interesting directors working today. I liked (among other things) the infamous hallway scene, the actors, the fight with the bodyguard, the revelation of the Secret and the sequence of Oh Dae-su leaving his bad self behind at the end. Small pleasures, indeed.", u'-0.223571', u'This comment is meant mainly as a warning to the people who might be attracted to the title by its (temporarily)high user rating which I find frankly puzzling. The reasons why I didn\'t like this title are following:\n\n1. The directer must have had some doubts whether to make a Jackie-Chan-type of a flick or a dark Oedipian tragedy. As a result, in terms of genre, the film falls between two stools, as the tragic and comic elements clash and cancel out each other rather than make a harmonious whole.\n\n2. The characters\' motives and behaviors are incoherent and unconvincing. Psychological truth and logic are sadly missing.\n\n3. Absurd casting. I don\'t blame the actors, for it is a hard thing to create a convincing character by acting alone, if there is scarce logic in the script. However, why is there an apparent age difference of about 15 years between the leading two actors, whose ages in the film can\'t differ by more than 3-4?\n\n4. To me the film was poor entertainment primarily because of point 2. If you can\'t find a character you could sympathize with it is hard to follow the story with interest. When you finally learn the reason of what happened to the main protagonist, it turns out to make no sense.\n\n5. Some films apart from being entertaining are also thought-provoking. Having seen this film, I began to wonder whether the thought the director tried to provoke was not that incestuous relationships could be perfectly wholesome and delightful. I cannot put any other construction on the ending. \n\n6. The film is rife with totally unnecessary violence. Violence in a film (and elsewhere) is a good thing, if it serves an important and worthy purpose. Purposes can be different and I don\'t want to enter into this broad subject. Let me just say I don\'t object to violence in such films as "Saving Private Ryan", "The Passion of the Christ" or "The Pulp Fiction". In "Oldboy" the scenes of torture and suffering are prolonged and graphic (or aural). What for? I do not know. Personally, I don\'t derive any satisfaction from watching teeth being extracted with a hammer or hear a man cut off his tongue with scissors and then see him choking on his own blood etc. etc. \n\n7. The film reminds me a little of Japanese porno mangas in its fixation on incest and young Asian girls\' panties, urinating and the like. It appears there is a minority who actually enjoy this kind of thing. If you\'re one of them, you might find this film enjoyable.\n\nIn short, I do not recommend this film either as entertainment or "food for thought". Where it isn\'t silly, it is disgusting. Don\'t waste your time.', u'-0.412573', u"In an age of American cinema where our biggest blockbusters are based on films already successful overseas, this is one movie that needs to be seen by more American movie goers. This is the movie that got me hooked on Asian revenge films. Oldboy is an original movie that shows what happens when a man's freedom is taken away and he doesn't know why, or by whom. He is sudden thrust back into society where he must track down the person that took away his freedom. Along the way come multiple plot twist and surprises that you just don't see coming. \n\nIt's a shame so many American film goers refuse to see foreign films, because this movie is genius. Who knows, maybe someday the movie will get remade for audiences here in the U.S. and the main character will be played by Mel Gibson or Bruce Willis. If you want to stay true to the Asian vision, I even think Jackie Chan could be a candidate.", u'-0.0532338', u'It seems that some viewers assume that the only thing which can make the viewer dislike this movie is the graphic violence. In fact violence, both disturbing and cartoonish, is the last of "Oldboy"\'s deep flaws. The characters are unidimensional, underdeveloped, primitive. The "intensity", an obsession and a goal in itself with this director, is served up with the cheapest of means. Let\'s not confuse a mindless shot of adrenaline with artistic worth. By the end of the movie, it seems that all the cards were exhausted so the script becomes almost inadvertently funny in its efforts to find new levels of "horror", to continue to "shock" an audience which is already numbed by the plethora of dumb soap-opera "revelations" already served up in big bunches. It would be hard to imagine anybody even vaguely familiar with the masterpieces of the last fifty years of Asian cinema being enthralled by this pompous piece of trash. Imagine Homer Simpson hesitating in front of the cinema theater: "should I go in or should I buy five cones of ice-cream for the same money?" Be smart, Homer, go for the ice-cream.', u'-0.349186'], u'tt0208092': [u'\n"Snatch" is fantastic; and not least because it demonstrates emphatically that the British movie industry is capable of rivaling even the best of what Hollywood can offer.\n\n"Lock, Stock and Two Smoking Barrels" was one of the funniest movies released in recent years, and "Snatch" takes everything that "Lock, Stock..." did so well and does it even better.\n\nBack are the cleverly intertwined plotlines, the hilarious one-liners, and the simultaneously intimidating and comedic London villains. So is the skillful editing, and often original cinematographic style. This time however, it all looks somewhat slicker and better funded, and alongside the British regulars are the odd American celebrity (Brad Pitt, Benicio Del Toro).\n\nEveryone in the film puts in an excellent performance, but Pitt stands out as a charismatic and near-incomprehensible Gypsy boxer.\n\nLike Ritchie\'s earlier film, this one takes a little while to find its feet, but once it does the pace doesn\'t slacken until the finale. One scene featuring three guys and a squeaking dog in a stolen car stands out particularly, and left the audience at my local cinema almost weeping as punchline after punchline was uttered.\n\nWhen it comes to comedies, I cannot recommend this one highly enough. If you\'re after a good laugh, you won\'t find much to better "Snatch".', u'0.474396', u'\nI was never really too keen on "Lock, Stock And Two Smoking Barrels".  All my friends constantly quoted it, raved and ranted, and then when "Snatch" came out, everyone made an even bigger deal of that.  I watched Lock Stock, and though I did like it, it didn\'t really tickle my fancy.  But Snatch, that\'s a completely different story all together.\n\nWhen I saw Snatch at the cinemas, I was shocked to see a couple leave only fifteen minutes into the film.  As they left, you could hear their intellectually deficient comments; "this movie is so boring".  I couldn\'t believe it!  I\'d recommend this movie to ANYONE, The Pope even!\n\nThere are hundreds of thousands of reasons for anyone to see this movie; each word of the script being a reason.\n\nSnatch is possibly one of THE best written movies I\'ve seen. It\'s smart, witty, funny and has just the right touches of dark humour.  With characters like Turkish, Mickey, Tommy, Brick Top, Bullet Tooth Tony and Cousin Avi; their witty repartee will have your personal quotes list full for months after watching it.  The camera work and editing complement each other to keep the film\'s pace on its toes, much like the boxers at the center of the character\'s stories.\n\nJason Statham has some of THE best lines in the movie, constantly slamming anything even slightly intelligent his partner Tommy has to say.  Brad Pitt turns out an excellent performance as the Irish-Gypsy-Pykie Mickey; his accent is hilarious.  \n\nEven though the story line is only a simple one (following a massive Diamond through England\'s criminal underworld), it is the connections each character has to the diamond and each other that really makes this film stand out from all the usual jewel-heist films.\n\nAnother 10 / 10 from me on this one, it\'s just a pity the follow up to Snatch was a "collaborative effort" from Mr. Richie and his um.......wife.\n', u'0.1578', u'\nA film about boxing, diamonds, gangsters pretending to be Jews, a fat getaway driver, a rather vicious dog and man eating pigs. Guy Richie has followed the success of Lock, Stock with an equally stunning and ambitious return just as Tarantino did with Pulp Fiction. The characters are so colourful they jump right off the screen, the dialogue so snappy you want to learn it by heart and the acting simply wonderful. Vinnie Jones reveals he can act and Brad Pitt shows that he is far more than a pretty face and could well win a best supporting actor oscar for his role as Irish Mickey. See this movie!!!!', u'0.5336', u'\nRead this review carefully, please.\n\nFirst off, Snatch is an amazing movie in every sense of the word. There are very few movies made where the director obviously did not let one FRAME onto the screen without a reason, and Snatch is one of them. Nothing happens onscreen without it having an effect on the plot.\n\nBy now you know the plot, or plots. We follow a diamond-heist and the various characters trying to get theirs, at the same time following participants in an illegal boxing ring. The incredible part of the movie is how every scene ties in with the rest somehow, every character connects with the rest at least once.\n\nThere are complaints that the movie is confusing, or muddled. There are a lot of things that they don\'t tell you (such as what the dog has to do with anything, but he\'s a VERY important character), and that\'s a good thing. Too many movies force feed the audience its plot points (Think The Ring vs. Ringu, did we need the "How long could you survive down there all alone?" line?). Rather, we just watch occurrences, and have to piece together what ties everything together, the plot weaves together beautifully.\n\nThe cinematography and performances are fantastic as well. Even the soundtrack is perfect. The camera style during the fight scenes (slowdown/stop/go) makes it difficult to stop watching, the sound effects fit in quietly in the background without being overwhelming. And it will be IMPOSSIBLE to watch this movie without repeating many of the lines around your friends. I found myself saying "Zee Germans" and things like "It\'s not like he\'s a set of car keys, now is it?" quite a bit. Naturally, Brad Pitt\'s pikey is one of the most outlandish I\'ve ever seen.\n\nSummary: watch the movie, and don\'t expect to be TOLD everything, expect to have to pay attention.', u'0.24647', u'This movie is perfect in all its categories: credits, sound track, production, casting, writing, photography, editing, acting, and direction. 10/10.\n\nI was amazed with the freedom of the use of the camera. This movie will change the way movies are made. Slow-mo, stills, black and white, and color were all used to brilliant effect.\n\nI must pick out specific actors who were just over the top - meaning 10+!\n\nJason Statham as "Turkish" is simply superb - a star of very high caliber. (You should see him in anything he made, and read my comment about John Carpenter\'s movie: "Ghosts of Mars.")\n\nAlan Ford as "Brick Top" is terrifying - his forced speaking style made me think that he was chewing on the flesh of his previous victim.\n\nVinnie Jones as "Bullet Tooth Tony" is total tough head to foot tough - a walking brick wall - a marine for all seasons - none tougher.\n\nBrad Pitt as "Mickey O\'Neil" is utterly 110% convincing. I never liked Mr. Pitt\'s work before this - but this one totally sold me - he is as solid an actor as ever came out of Hollywood... and better!\n\nFinally, Guy Ritchie should be recognized as a Michelangelo of film.\n\n-LD', u'0.440033', u"\nGuy Richie's follow up to Lock Stock and Two Smoking barrels is every bit as astonishing as its predecessor. The humour is better and I have never seen people in a cinema laugh as loud and as frequently as they did here. Vinnie Jones plays a similar role as Big Chris, here as Bullet Tooth Tony. His appearance is limited but boy does he make an impact. Even when he is not on screen there is much to savour from Dennis Farina as Avi and a trio of pawnbrokers who are sent to rob a bookies. Brad Pitt sheds his movie start personna and preforms impressively as an Irish gypsie. Unlike Lock Stock.. the humour will appeal to all nationalities. However they mind some slang expressions such as Pikey and blag hard to understand. Good preformances, fantastic characters, razor sharp diologue, expert direction and camera work and brilliant humour, Snatch will make you laugh more than any other movie this year. See it now.", u'0.302591', u'\nImagine what would happen if you took 8 or 10 criminals of various professions, threw them into a maze, gave one of the criminals a diamond the size of a fist, and yelled out load, "SOMEONE IN THIS MAZE HAS A HUGE DIAMOND!  WHOEVER FINDS IT AND IS THE LAST MAN STANDING, WINS!" What do you think would happen?  Snatch is what happens.\n\nSnatch is a confusing, twisting, crazy movie.  Let me repeat that.  This movie is crazy!  Imagine the Mr. Toad\'s Wild Ride at Disney Word on acid, and this is what you get my friend.  Believe it or not, this mass confusion and complete insanity is very, very entertaining.\n\nThe movie has it\'s problems.  First off, for those of you who have seen Snatch\'s predecessor, (Lock, Stock and Two Smoking Barrels), you know that Guy Richie (the writer and director of both films) has a very music-video style as far as the camera angles, movements, and cinematography goes.  The strange camera techniques get so mad with lunacy that I noticed people walking out of the theater.  I was also turned off by this madness. However, most of this insane crap gets over within the first hour, so it doesn\'t last.\n\nIf any of you people out there loved Lock Stock as much as I did, do yourself a favor and see this movie as fast as you can.  Snatch is a bit more serious than Lock Stock, but when it\'s funny, you\'ll laugh till your lungs burst.  It was nice to see Vinnie Jones, who was Big Chris in the last movie, return as the same basic character (only now named Bullet Tooth Tony) and doing the same "slamming victim\'s head in a car door" act again.  The performances were just as great as Lock Stock, with Jason Statham and Pitt leading the pack.  I was disappointed to see that Bendicio Del Toro didn\'t have a bigger role.  I was expecting him to be a lead character, but he\'s not.\n\nSo, in conclusion, if you have never seen Lock, Stock, and Two Smoking Barrels, I would see that first before seeing Snatch so you can get adjusted to Guy Richie\'s style.  I still think that it is stupid to compare either two movies to Pulp Fiction (unlike most people), but it is in the same ballpark as Pulp.  That means if you liked Pulp, you will most likely like Snatch and Lock, Stock.  If you have never seen Pulp or Lock Stock, you have deprived your life of culture.\n\n9/10\n', u'-0.171218', u'\nThe release of Tarantino\'s "Pulp Fiction" in 1994 prompted a schism in the staid gangster movie genre: the standard hallmarks - serious characters, gunfights, intrigue and damsels in distress - were enhanced with snappy dialogue, and gallows humour.  The biggest change however was the introduction of the mobius strip-style plot line, where the concept of time is no longer linear, instead constantly folding in upon itself, flitting between past, present and future that forces the viewer to pay close attention lest they miss some subtle detail.  Inevitably, numerous copycat films emerged that tried to capitalize on Tarantino\'s success, but it wasn\'t until 1998 when Guy Ritchie, an unknown British director, took on the challenge that a successor was found.  Now Ritchie is determined to prove that his first time out wasn\'t a fluke.\n\nTurkish is a young man with an entrepreneurial bent, who, when he\'s not running his gambling operation, manages bareknuckle boxers.  Through a business deal gone wrong, he becomes acquainted with one Mickey O\'Neil, a mumbling manic motor-mouthed piker who also happens to be a one-punch marvel.  Turkish persuades Mickey to join his stable of fighters, but soon discovers that Mickey has his own agenda, and gets Turkish in trouble with the gangsters who run the underground boxing circuit.  Other characters that become involved in the drama include a four-fingered degenerate gambler/jewel thief, a vicious boxing promoter, a gang of inept robbers, a polite hitman, a crazed Russian gun runner, a group of Irish gypsies, a crooked New York jeweler and a pugnacious pet.  The common thread binding them all is a perfect diamond the size of a peach pit.  If you aren\'t confused yet, you soon will be.\n\n"Lock, Stock and Two Smoking Barrels", Mr. Madonna\'s (Ritchie) first film, was shot on a small budget, with a no-name cast (except for football bad boy Vinnie Jones) and quickly became a rousing success at home and found receptive audiences abroad.  While not a technically a sequel "Snatch" is stylistically very similar to "Lock, Stock\x85":  Ritchie utilizes his trademark bombastic staccato sequences, and repeatedly bounces off on radical tangents to throw the viewer off balance.  He did however opt for a decidedly darker satirical tone in this film, that may make some people uncomfortable (think "Very Bad Things").  What struck me as particularly daring was his decision to create a story with such a voluminous cast.\n\n\nRitchie faced a daunting task with this film: how, with roughly twenty principal characters, does one adequately flesh out each character, and not hopelessly confuse the audience?  The feat was made doubly difficult, as several cast members are big name stars.  Somehow Ritchie manages - each actor is full bodied, receives ample screen time, and no one character is the centerpiece.  With so many talented actors, it is difficult to pick out one performance that stands out:  Rade Serbedzija is hilarious as the mad Russian who blithely burns through each of his nine lives, as is Vinnie Jones\' manic gentleman hitman.  On the other end of the spectrum, is Alan Ford as Brick Top, the promoter with a penchant for pigs, who epitomizes cold-blooded viciousness. If forced to pick my favorite however, I would have to go with Brad Pitt\n\nPitt resurrects his trailer trash look from "Kalifornia" and adopts a nearly indecipherable brogue that sounds like my best friend\'s Uncle Wally on a bad day.  As Mickey O\'Neil, the hard drinking wily grifter and part-time pugilist, Pitt displays a wide range of emotions, demonstrating again that he is not only a star, but also a gifted character actor.  And I would be remiss if I didn\'t mention the dog that subtly stole every scene he appeared in.\n\nWhile "Snatch" initially struggles to find its stride, and is very similar to Ritchie\'s earlier film, it is fresh and funny enough to make you forget any minor shortfalls and stand on its own.\n', u'-0.114424', u"\n`Snatch', written and directed by Guy Ritchie is by far one of my favorite films of all time \x96 it is easily in my personal Top Thirty.  In the film, about (what else?) several schemes that happen to go very wrong yet manage to intertwine and (for better or worse) resolve themselves in the end, Ritchie assembles one of the funniest cast of characters in recent memory.  Let's see if we can keep this straight:\n\nTurkish (Jason Statham) and his partner Tommy (Stephen Graham) are amateur boxing promoters who, after their premier fighter is wounded, have to find a replacement to fight, or one of the meanest guys in London, Brick Top (Alan Ford), who just happens to run the boxing matches and stands to make a lot of money off of the fight is going to impart his unique brand of justice on them.  Enter Mickey (Brad Pitt) the gypsy who knocked their fighter out, who is an unintelligible drunk with quite a right hook.  Meanwhile, there is a diamond `the size of a fist' that has been stolen by Franky Four Fingers (Benicio Del Toro). On his way back from London to America where he is planning on fencing the diamond, trouble ensues, and his fence, Cousin Avi (Dennis Farina) is forced to come to London to find both Franky and the diamond with the help of characters like Bullet Tooth Tony (Vinnie Jones) and Doug `The Head' Denovitz (Mike Reid).  Of course, this can't happen easily, as there are a trio of inept thieves on the trail of the diamond as well as my personal favorite character in the film, Boris `The Blade' Yurinov (Rade Serbedzija) \x96 or as he's better known, `Boris the Bullet Dodger'.  \n\nDid you get all that?  The performances by all of the above actors, and several more that I didn't even mention are all really good, particularly Brad Pitt's.  Every single actor in `Snatch' looks like they are having one hell of a good time working in the film. This story, while complex and with many ramifications from the core plot is absolutely brilliant and a lot of fun.  There are many one-liners that I still personally use four years after first seeing the film, and the intricate weaving of the characters to tell a very simple heist story is just SO good.  `Snatch' would be a great film due to its story alone, but Guy Ritchie's direction is so dead on, the film transcends brilliant and becomes FAN-insert your choice of expletive here-TASTIC.  The slick cinematography, lightning-fast pacing and fun camera angles are right on target with the story.  Add on a great soundtrack that spans Oasis, techno and a traditional-sounding Hasidic song and Ritchie has presented the viewer with an instant classic.  \n\nWhile this was not the first time I had seen the film `Snatch', it was the first time I'd watched the film knowing that I would have to analyze it slightly in order to funnel my thoughts from the film just being `Phenomenal!' to `Phenomenal because\x85..'  While I can certainly be classified as an unabashed Madonna fan, and have been for the last two decades, I REALLY hope that Ritchie decides to drop his wife from his film work and not continue on the `Swept Away' path, rather, to get back to the work that has earned him well-deserved high praise.  Sorry Madge.\n\n--Shelly\n", u'0.355979', u'\nI saw the first showing of Snatch in my town this past Friday.  I loved it. I am quite a fan of Guy Ritchie\'s first and was expecting more of the same with Snatch.  Rarely do a film\'s opening credits hype an audience as much as Snatch.  Quick paced action-to-freeze-frame-cuts introduce each cast member in situations that identify their character sort.  Then we\'re right in it. It\'s true, similarities abound between Snatch and Lock, Stock and Two Smoking Barrels.  From Vinnie Jones\' character\'s tough as nails negotiating means, to oft referred to in-jokes between characters (\'Zee Germans\' here compared to \'Tubby Tommy\' in LS&2SB).  Still the film is fresh and not really a Lock, Stock take 2 of any sort. The humor is more frequent in this one and a major difference is how dark this film is compared to the previous.  Alan Ford\'s Brick Top is the meanest SOB I can remember on film since Mr. Blonde in Reservoir Dogs.  Brad Pitt is a standout too as the never to be trusted One Punch Mickey-he\'s not as incomprehensible as the trailers make him out to be, but still that pikey accent is a huge laugh.  And the scene where he is glaring at a burning trailer lumped my throat (when you find the context by which that scene is drawn it should get a reaction from anyone). The use of violence as humor is more embellished in Snatch as well (eg: the Bullet Tooth Tony and Boris the Blade showdown). Secondary characters are all over the movie and all grab laughs from their scenes , especially the dog and the tank of a getaway driver, Tyrone.\n\nSee this movie for it\'s frenetic energy, retribution for the "good guys" is all that ties the end together but the ride to the finale is what makes this movie great.  After all, as a wiser man than myself once said, it\'s not where you go, it\'s how you get there.  Snatch is all about the ride.', u'0.209837', u'I would imagine viewers would either really love this movie or be totally turned off. It is presented in a different format for its time (since copied), has very odd and profane characters, accents that are difficult to understand, and tells an unpleasant story with some disgusting scenes. So, why do I enjoy this film, being an old-fashioned so-and-so?\n\nWell, because I usually enjoy "stylish" film-making and dark humor and this has both in abundance. This is almost as stylish as it gets: fascinating visuals, odd camera angles and various tricks, sound effects, etc. Most of the characters in this bizarre crime film have colorful nicknames and most speak in a strong British accent. A gypsy, played by American Brad Pitt, is almost intelligible.\n\nThis is why I strongly recommend you use English subtitles while watching this film, at least for the first viewing, or you will totally lost. The DVD offers a feature I\'ve never seen before: the option of using subtitles solely for Pitt\'s character. The filmmakers knew few people were going to understand Pitt\'s weird way of speaking. Anyway, I recommend the subtitles for everyone. It makes the film more enjoyable when you know what\'s going on, especially with the many slang terms used in here that have to be totally foreign to most viewers outside GB.\n\nSince the action changes every two minutes to another scene with other people (Lord of The Rings subsequently did the same), it\'s had to get lulled to sleep or have your mind wander. Something wacky is going on every few minutes. The attitudes of the criminals are rough: these are low-life people in the underworld: extremely tough people with the toughest being "Bricktop" (Alan Ford) who likes to feed people to the pigs. There are a ton of f-words in here, too.\n\nThe disjointed story is not easy to follow and I found I needed several viewings to understand everything that was going on. The characters are so strange, so cartoon-like, that - combined with the unique visuals - it makes it a fascinating film to watch every time. Some of these actors were fairly unknown at the time of this release , at least here in the States, such as Jason Statham ("The Transporter") but we know them know. There is a good mix of young and old actors in here.\n\nThis is a guy\'s movie with the top dozen actors in this film all tough-talking, almost-crude men (plus a funny dog). It\'s so weird, I\'ll just end with the clich\xe9 that "this is not for all tastes" but if you enjoy dark humor and something totally different, you might want to give it a shot. Just remember to turn on the subtitles.', u'0.0249423', u"\nA Diamond heist by Franky Four Fingers is carried out and he flies into London on a stop over.  He goes to Boris The Blade for a gun and Boris tells him to go to the bookies for him and put money on a fight in exchange.  Boris then sets Frankie up and has a group of men waiting to rob the bookies and Frankie.  The fight in question is also difficult because promoters Turkish and Tommy have promised local villain Brick Top that they'll put up a fighter.  Said fighter is put in hospital by a gypsy Tommy buys a caravan from (Mickey).  Putting Mickey in the fight makes things worse when he not only refuses to take a dive but knocks the fighter out \x96 to Bricktop's displeasure!  Meanwhile Frankie's boss flies into London to find him and the jewel while Bricktop tries to catch the men who Boris sent to knock over his bookies.\n\nI had seen Lock, Stock and enjoyed it to a certain degree.  It had problems but it was fresh and had energy and style.  It re-launched the British gangster film with some good ones and some bad copies.  One of those copies was Snatch \x96 admittedly a copy by the same director!  This film has all the style and energy of the Lock, Stock and borrows heavily from it.  However it is clear that the plot is both weak and over-plotted (if that's possible!).  It is weak because it is so full of clich\xe9 and silly occurrences and it is over-plotted in that every scene needs more plot in order to explain the new thing that just happened!\n\nWhat keeps it watchable is Ritchie's style and energy.  The plot may not work but it moves along with pace that almost (almost) covers it's lack of substance.  So we get the same old cockney gangsterisms, dark humour, Vinnie Jones being tough with a few good lines and so on.  It felt to me like Ritchie just didn't have any other ideas in him.  It's all very samey but his style saves it as he intercuts and delivers some really inventive shots.  In tune with this style and energy is the casting.  The film is much better cast that it deserves!\n\nStatham and Graham are the least colourful characters in the piece and Ritchie knows it \x96 so despite being the leads, they often play second fiddle and only act as the catalyst.  Ford, Reid, Jones et al all enjoy delivering tough old stereotypes and do well enough considering what they're there to do.  Pitt is a great bit of casting \x96 and here he is DELIBERATELY doing a bad Irish accent (unlike Devil's Own where it was an accident!).  He is funny and seems to enjoy playing out of type.  Likewise Del Toro and Farina can only help add class to the film.\n\nOverall though this is a victory for style over substance.  It's visual style and general energy will carry it for the running time but when it was over I found it had failed to make any lasting impact on it and I really could remember very little of it \x96 it had just seemed noisy and in a rush to get somewhere.  Sure, I enjoyed it while it was on, but as little as 10 minutes afterwards I realised that I'd been taken for a ride by the style and flair of Ritchie.  At time of writing it is 199 in the top 250 \x96 you gotta be kidding me!", u'-0.0140605', u'Last year I was working on the IMDb Top 250 list, and I noticed that Snatch was on the list, so I decided to take a look at it. I was in Denmark at that time. I live in Faroe Islands.\n\nI stayed at my uncle\'s apartment, and he told me that you have to watch some of Guy Ritchie\'s movies before watching Snatch to get to know his movies better, so I watched Revolver. I was not very keen on it and then I was not looking forward to see Snatch.\n\nWhile my uncle was not at home, I decided to watch it. I wanted to turn it off after the first second, because I thought it was so weird. I\'m 14 years old now, and I knew almost nothing about cinema back then, and I had never seen such a movie like Snatch, and it\'s style! I thought it would be stupid of me to turn it off after 1 second so I kinda forced myself to watch it. To be honest, I actually loved the weird style after 10 minutes!\n\nThe cinematography was great. I had never seen something like that before and the editing was just as great too. There were lots of great characters and the script was excellent. It was funny and clever and it will you make you laugh every single second! This movie is like Pulp Fiction. You can almost quote every line! The acting was totally awesome! Jason Statham, Vinnie Jones and the rest were great, but Brad Pitt totally stole the show!\n\nI was thinking to myself "This movie can\'t be any better!", but then it got better! Brad Pitt showed up! His accent got me laughing all the time! My stomach hurt, it literally hurt, and I got many bruises on my thighs because I could not stop hitting myself from laughing!\n\nThis was one of the few movies that I didn\'t want to end, so I decided to watch it again the next day and the next day after that.\n\nI have seen a lot of movies in my life, but there are few movies that are better than this one! It\'s definitely in my top 15 of all time.\n\nIt truly deserves a 10/10', u'0.20233', u"Upper middle-class mockney Guy Ritchie virtually remakes his previous hit LOCK,STOCK AND TWO SMOKING BARRELS,but this time with a larger budget,the addition of a Hollywood big-name (Brad Pitt),and even more flamboyant surface style than before.But this does not disguise the excessively complicated plot,the rather glib characterisations (not enhanced by jokey,Runyonese monikers),and the undoubted emptiness that lies beneath Ritchie's directorial excesses which threatened to get out of hand on LOCK STOCK;it certainly goes several miles overboard in SNATCH,which is to the film's considerable detriment.It is quite obvious that Ritchie is impersonating such American filmmakers as Scorcese and Tarantino (who himself has always been somewhat derivative of other directors,and judging by his recent efforts seems to be running out of the ideas he once had),though the gangster epics made by the aforementioned had far more style,depth,wit and conviction about them.Ritchie's closeted,wealthy background means that his essay in low-life criminality comes across as a caricatured,stylised fantasy,which admittedly is slick and very fast-paced,but lacking in the slightest bit of profundity.He may think his various directorial flourishes which he frequently employs here (and to a somewhat lesser extent in LOCK STOCK) are clever and the epitome of innovation,but they are actually anything but;merely designed to cover the obviousness of the plot,they rapidly become wearisomely flashy,and so resistibly self regarding as to become monstrous and indeed wholly pointless and unnecessary;subtler and quieter directorial techniques would've been much more credible and effective.\n\nThe cast involved (Alan Ford,Jason Statham,Lennie James,Dennis Farina among them) appearing as various English,American and Russian mobsters are mostly adequate but are merely reduced to a back-seat ensemble due to Ritchie's directorial self-gratification.As with LOCK STOCK,Vinnie Jones plays Vinnie Jones again,though with even less persuasion this time,the soundtrack includes a tune from Ritchie's future spouse Madonna (it's doubtful much money had to paid for the copyright there),and Pitt is rather foolish as a virtually unintelligible Irish Traveller who gets dragged in to this most complex of stories.The only female role of any note comes from Sorcha Cusack as Pitt's mother,and that consists of a mere sprinkling of exposition. SNATCH has it's merits but like it's somewhat better predecessor LOCK STOCK,mostly gives the undeniable impression that it is overwhelmingly pleased with it's own bravado,which when you look more closely is not as outstanding as it believes it is.And Ritchie's subsequent flops (SWEPT AWAY,REVOLVER) means he will have to tone down his narcissism very soon or his career may never recover.\n\nRATING:5 and a half out of 10.", u'-0.549029', u"\nI really looked forward to watching Snatch. Not only was it from the director of 'Lock, Stock and Two Smoking Barrels', one of my favourite UK movies of all time, but it had Brad Pitt in, who since Twelve Monkeys and Fight Club is my numero uno cool actor.\n\nBut I ended up greeting many of the attempts at humour with a stoney face, found some of the images (notably the one with the body bags) just gross and distasteful and the entire plot lacking in the FUN that had been Lock, Stock.\n\nThe plot didn't seem to weave as much - the diamond changed hands predictably, the comedy dog wasn't and some of the gags were so...sitcom-like. Ooooh...a fat man having trouble getting out the car.\n\nThe characters were bad too. Ah, he has a cockney accent that's all  we need to know about him. Ah, everyone f***ing hates Pikies. That's funny repetition.\n\nThe violence didn't fit with the cheeky style the film attempted...It makes me angry to think how much better Lock, Stock is. And it's a warning to ppl making a 'next' movie - change the plot, setting, chracters, tone, etc. so that comparisons between two movies are left abstract.\n\nSnatch is the half-backed sequel to Lock, Stock. But Ritchie sold out earlier than Lucas. If you look carefully you can see Ewoks everywhere.....or is it just lack of originality?", u'-0.376412'], u'tt0211915': [u'\nTo start off with, I heard a lot of good things about this movie when it was on the big screens but never got around to see it before it disappeared. Sitting here, long after in the aftermath, I might never forgive myself for missing that opportunity. Eventually I did get around to see it, though a small TV never does a film the same justice a theater does, and being a bit sceptic about the small hype this movie caused made me prejudice about it, but I must say I have never been so wrong before. And I am happy saying it.\n\nThis movies biggest crime, and yet its biggest asset, is that it is in French. Subtitles just does not bring full justice to a movie like this, and it is bound to scare off most of the audience not used to subtitled movies. Sad to say so, but I believe it is the truth. I do not know any French at all, but I sure wish I was fluent watching this movie!\n\nCompared to most other films "Amelie" (and I will stick to "Amelie" since "Le Fabuleux destin d\'Am\xe9lie Poulain" is a bit long to write) is based on a\nrather ordinary and plain story everyone can relate to, but it is given to us in a very special kind of way, mixed with wonderful little subplots and an almost chaotic amount of details. We get to see and experience the world and especially Paris through the filtering eyes and fantasy of Amelie, A Paris that might feel small and limited on the screen but in fact is just as big as it is in the eyes of Amelie.\n\nDirector Jean-Pierre Jeunet brings to life the world of Amelie with colors, masterful camerawork and a few special effects (Well, I have certainly felt like melting a couple of times too in my life!). Some people I spoke to before seeing "Amelie" criticized it for being too childish and unrealistic, but I believe it is an essential part of the movie since Amelie herself is a\nvery childish and imaginative young girl. She just happens to fall in love one day when she decides to embark on a quest. Jean-Pierre Jeunet manages to bring us along without losing control of the set or the plot. It is exactly this kind of movie that could easily be overdone and lose all of its magic in the hands of the wrong person, but Jean-Pierre Jeunet never slips a single time. For you who think you never heard of him before he is actually the same man who brought us "Alien 4" back in 1997, (I still refuse to believe he was involved in that horrible film...), and the wonderful "Delicatessen" in 1991.\n\nAudrey Tautou could not be overemphasized for her importance in portraying Amelie. I am a bit embarrassed admitting it but I was almost falling in love with Amelie myself, forgetting she was only fiction on the screen. However she does not carry "Amelie" solely by herself. The cast makes an excellent whole and it is hard imagining switching anyone without affecting the whole outcome. Everyone manages to make the most out of their role and even though we only get to know some of them briefly they come alive just as much as Amelie herself does.\n\nI could go on forever about "Amelie". It contains so many details and switches in tempo and camerawork it has to be seen more than once to take in and understand everything. Damn it, "Amelie" made me happy, laughing out loud at times, and very few movies affects me like that.\n\nI very rarely give movies a 10, and I was indeed considering a 9 for a while, but for me this is one of those movies I will come back to time after time. Long after the CG thrills of hyped fantasy movies and big budget Hollywood productions have faded and been forgotten, Amelie will still be jumping around in my heart, doing all those silly and charming little things I wish I dared to do too...\n', u'0.200612', u"\nShort analysis on Jean-Pierre Jeunet's Le fabuleux destin d'Am\xe9lie Poulain\n\nFor 20 years Jean-Pierre Jeunet collected small astonishing and intriguing moments in his life, taking notes in his diary, not knowing that he was up to co-write and direct one of the most successful film in French film history. Jean-Pierre Jeunet fell in love with the story and the film he titled Le fabuleux destin d'Am\xe9lie Poulain. But it's popularity was even a surprise to Jean-Pierre Jeunet himself as he once stated: `I guess I have to produce a film like Alien Resurrection (USA 1997) to make a movie like Le fabuleux destin d'Am\xe9lie Poulain', obviously not aware of the films potential. Unfortunately the film didn't win an Academy Award for the best foreign film in 2001 which still puzzles film fans all over the world.\n\nI consider Jean-Pierre Jeunet's film as a masterpiece. In my opinion, it is an outstanding film in film history for its cinematography, the music, the story, but above all the overall atmosphere. Going to the cinema is like meditating. We sit for over one-hour and comfortable chair - our breath slows down and as the lights are switched off, we enter a dream world. We seek to escape our normal world just for a short period of time, to experience something totally different and yet, we want to find ourselves in this world. Thanks to Jean-Pierre Jeunet I had a wonderful dream, I will never forget.\n\nJean-Pierre Jeunet and his camera man, Bruno Delbonnel, wanted to make the film look like the Spanish painter did his artwork. To establish a dreamlike atmosphere they used mostly red and green, sometimes adding a little blue spot in the picture to set the contrast. Audrey Tautou (Am\xe9lie Poulain), mostly wears either red or green dresses, as well as the housekeeper (Yolande Moreau as Madelaine Wallace, concierge), and Am\xe9lie's mother (Lorella Cravotta as Amandine Poulin) in the beginning of the film. When Am\xe9lie Poulain sits down to watch the tragedy of her life on her TV, there is an outstanding of a blue lamp in the background. Sometimes the use of color gets very obvious. Am\xe9lie's apartment for example is almost completely red, the underground station and the train station are kept in green and the green grocery store stands out from the grey buildings. Honestly, I haven't noticed the extreme use of color the first time I watched the movie. I just wondered how Jeunet succeeded in establishing such a fabulous atmosphere.\n\nThe atmosphere is also supported by the magnificent music by Yann Tiersen who has composed 19 songs in 15 days for this movie. The principal motive appears in many variations somehow being joyful, yet at the same time sad - slow and sometimes fast and activating. The music supports every moment in the film and becomes the sound of a fabulous world.\n\nCamera movement certainly contributes its part to the atmosphere. Balanced and unbalanced pictures contribute to the message of each shot. Right in the beginning when Am\xe9lie's mother is introduced, the picture is balanced symbolizing her pursuit for correctness and cleanliness. The same can be about the first shots of Am\xe9lie's father. When talking about his dislikes, the shots are unbalanced. But more impressing are some camera movements. For example there is an astonishing high angle shot of Am\xe9lie flipping stones on le canal in Paris. The camera shows her leaning on a fence, flying above her head then craning to a low angle shot to show her flipping stones in the direction of the camera. Another one worth mentioning might be the chase of the repairs person. Nino is shown falling up the steps chasing the repairs person for the photo machines. The camera turns to show the man getting in the car driving off. Still in a low angle Nino starts his moped, trying to follow the worker, almost hitting a car. Am\xe9lie is entering the picture running after Nino. The camera follows her, then turning almost 180\xb0 around her to show her hold Nino's red bag that he lost. When Am\xe9lie sits in front of the station, we see her in a long shot, the camera dollies in to fly over her head to an over-the-shoulder shot. Some of these camera movements are really awesome, not only from a technical point of view, but moreover from an aesthetic standpoint. They support the dreamlike atmosphere, adding interesting aspects to ordinary actions.\n\nAudrey Tautou at the age of 23 is an astonishing actress. I really can't imagine anybody doing the job better than she did. To me she is not only giving life to the character, she lives it. It's wonderful to watch her. There was no moment when I had the faintest impression that there is something wrong or inappropriate in her acting. Also Mathieu Kassovitz as Nino Quincampoix is extraordinarily gifted with his talent. Most of the actors have done a wonderful job, although I want to mention the scene when Am\xe9lie's mother gets her nervous breakdown because of the suicidal fish. This scene appeared to me exaggerated which it probably was intended to be. Anyhow, the extreme close-up of Yolande Moreau was to intriguing to me, so I\nshrug back in disgust rather than laughing about it. I gues this was the director's choice, so I don't hold her responsible for that.\n\n\nAnother negative and distracting thing where some scenes when Jean-Pierre Jeunet decided to show the key in Am\xe9lie's pocket after copying it and bringing the original key back to the grocer's door in a very unrealistic way. He uses a digital effet showing the key's silhouette in a yellow light. This is a technique that hasn't been used very often in the film, except for showing Am\xe9lie's heart going faster and the old, blind man feeling very happy after being guided by Am\xe9lie. All these scenes disturb the otherwise wonderful cinematography. There could have been other ways to communicate the actions. A simple smile on the old's man face, a close-up of Am\xe9lie's hand letting the copied key slide into her pocket and the heart beat as a background sound would have done the same without disturbing the atmosphere.\n\n\nAnyway, Le fabuleux destin d'Am\xe9lie Poulain is still my favorite movie. The narration is perfectly arranged taking its time to tell every detail. I enjoyed the subplots a lot that are told in a subtle way. Maybe the introduction is a bit to long, but still I enjoyed every second. Maybe I am too used to typical Hollywood productions, where you can tell the stages of a story by watching the clock. Le fabuleux destin d'Am\xe9lie Poulain has its own rhythm driving the story forward not by a superhero trying to achieve his goal, but by a hero that knows that she has time to arrange everything by strategic means. Maybe that is also one reason why I like this film so much. The story is told with time and not against time. There is no last minute-rescue, no time pressure, no need to act. It just takes its time as life does.\n\nIn my opinion, Jean-Pierre Jeunet created a masterpiece. A film that is not only outstanding because of the cinematography, the special effects or any other technical characteristics, but also combines the perfection of craftsmanship with a wonderful story, humour, and emotion.\n\n", u'0.220368', u'\nA slice of heaven right here on earth, "Amelie" is a joy to behold, and has some of the most gorgeous cinematography I\'ve ever seen in a movie. \n\n\nAudrey Tatou is perfection as the title character.  A combination of Audrey Hepburn, Dolly Levi and Roger Rabbit, she involves herself in the world surrounding her as a means of really enjoying living. There are moments when she finds complete and total joy just walking down the street. \n\n\nSome of it is hilarious, too..like when her pet goldfish habitually tries to commit suicide, or when she is on the telephone with the man at the porno shop, or when a character is asked "Are you a congenital shmuck"?\n\nBut for the most part, its a human comedy, about love, of course.\n\n\nJust beautiful.  10/10. ', u'0.553124', u'I had heard superlative comments on this film and it does not disappoint.\n\nParis is the backdrop and what a Paris, A Paris of La Boheme and the Merry Widow. Audrey is brilliant in the role of Amelie, projecting a true joie de vivre.\n\nThe film is full of surprises in both plot and characters. I left the theatre feeling lighter. It is truly one of a kind, eccentric, unusual and uplifting. I will not say more on it as it would spoil the fun.\n\nI gave it a 10 out of 10 for something so completely out of the ordinary and so very unhollywood.', u'0.247116', u'\nNot a lot of movies create their own sort of universe. Some that come to mind include "The Wizard of Oz", "American Beauty" and "Vertigo." These movies are so distinct and original that they seem to have created there own spot in the universe, untouchable by anything else. You can add "le Fabuleux destin d\'Am\xe9lie Poulain" to that list.\n\nHere is a film so original, so funny, and so warm that it left me with smiling for hours and the people on the sidewalk thinking I was crazy. Yes it is heart warming, but not in the phony Wal-Mart commercial sense; but in the sense of how good you feel when laughing with a dear, dear friend.\n\nThe film tells the story of French waitress Am\xe9lie (Audrey Tautou.) She is in her early twenties, lead a gloomy childhood and is missing something in her life until hearing of the Death of Princess Diana causes her to drop the cap of a bottle which rolls along the floor and dislodges a tile on her bathroom wall. What she finds behind that tile leads her to the decision that she is going to do what she can to make the people around her happier by whatever means possible.\n\nAm\xe9lie goes about this with great success. One particularly wonderful scene shows Am\xe9lie helping a blind man across the street and rapidly describing what\'s happening around them to give him a picture of the world he doesn\'t get to see. This is only one in a mountain of selfless deeds she does to make people happy.\n\nAs she continues enriching the lives around her, Am\xe9lie becomes challenged with the fact that if she only helps others anonymously, she may live her life alone and without the happiness she brings others.\n\nAm\xe9lie\'s conflict is what rounds out the picture and makes it complete. The movie is deep and takes Am\xe9lie\'s inner struggle seriously, but it\'s never heavy. Brilliantly hilarious, "Am\xe9lie" has a wonderfully funny script and is brought to life in visual splendor by director Jean-Pierre Jeunet ("Alien: Resurrection", of all things) and has at its center Audrey Tatou giving one of the warmest, most sincere and funniest performances you\'ll see this year.\n\nI can\'t tell you how much I love this movie. Just thinking about it gives me goose bumps and I can\'t wait to see it again. SEE IT IN THE THEATRE IF YOU CAN! This may be the year\'s best picture and is not to be missed.\n', u'0.139842', u'\nA year ago, if someone would have asked me "What is your favorite movie ?" ,\nI would not have known what to answer exactly, maybe Fight Club, maybe Vertigo, Indiana Jones even would have come to my mind.\n\nSince June, I have but one answer: \'Le fabuleux destin d\'Am\xe9lie Poulain\' !!! It is simply unique in his kind.  And now it has come out in the US, I am a\nbit frightened, because everybody there describes it as a simple \'feel-good movie\'.  It is so much more than that ! Never before has a movie INFLUENCED my life in such a way.  Audrey\'s performance is simply stunning... she plays with an innocence, a wit, a smartness and na\xefvity that even someone with 40 years experience could not have done better. (please, will someone give an oscar to that girl, she makes Kidman & Blanchett look pale :-) The score from Yann Tiersen is so beautiful that by now I\'m addicted to it (\nI read here somewhere something about \'accordeon jingle\', please, get some education ;-). The story itself could easily have been abused, and I\'m sure that if Hollywood had made this movie, it would have been ridiculous, but now it is a beauty, a pearl amidst broken hearts.\n\nThis movie is for everyone who understands passion or who has lost his/her childhood somewhere along the way. If you love art & music, sunshine & poetry than you are qualified for seeing this movie, be warned though...this movie can change your life (and maybe..it will ;-)!\n\n\nAudrey is superb, Matthieu is better than himself, every actor gives a stunning performance, the scenery is beautiful, the whole movie is amusing, entertaining and charming, even CGI is perfectly done ! 10 out of 10 !!!\n\na 21-year-old Am\xe9lie fan who can enjoy the little things in life again', u'0.445988', u"\n'Le Fabuleux Destin d'Am\xe9lie Poulain' finds its charm in the little things. The story about Am\xe9lie (Audrey Tautou) is a modern day fairy tale and that is exactly how it looks the entire film. \n\nWe have a wonderful story about Am\xe9lie who decides to help people around her, making them happy. Not by doing great big things or giving money, but by little things. She helps her father by making him believe that his gnome from the garden is on a trip around the world, she helps a lonely neighbor by just visiting him, she helps a stranger by returning something she found in her home. On the way she falls in love with Nino (Mathieu Kassovitz) who's hobby it is to collect photos from automatic photo booths. Photos that were tossed away because people thought they didn't look good enough. He puts all those photos and pieces of photos in a big book. There is a little mystery in the book as well, of course I will not spoil that for you. The story is not only sweet and charming, it has some great moments of comedy as well.\n\nThe movie looks colorful and bright almost constantly. Even the sad parts from Am\xe9lie's life, her youth for example, look almost strangely happy. In this world, Paris actually, Audrey Tautou is the perfect inhabitant. She has one of those faces that seem to smile the entire time. She looks like she just pulled a joke and she is waiting for you to find out what it is. In a way her character is really doing that here so it does not feel strange.\n\nIn short 'Le Fabuleux Destin d'Am\xe9lie Poulain' is charming, funny, romantic bright and full of life. This is the perfect lighthearted movie.", u'0.375968', u"\nIt is the best film i've ever seen.Only the French could make films as good as this. Am\xe9lie explores the trivial things in life and it brings you to some realisations of your own in that our lives are so simple and we only need the simplest of things to keep us happy. Am\xe9lie is a must for anyone", u'0.892626', u"\nWaiting for `Amelie' to begin in a theater fraught with noisy college students drinking cheap beer, I wasn't expecting anything more than an over-hyped flick from our friends in France.  I slowly began to realize as I\nwatched Amelie skip stones in the canal that for the very first time, a film deserved all of hype it had been accorded and more, and I felt so blessed to be a part of this revelation.\n\nPossible Spoilers\n\nIt's hard to put into words how much I loved `Amelie.'  I felt as though I were sitting next to Monet, watching as he effortlessly splashed brilliant watercolors across his canvas.  I had this strange but fantastic feeling of being inside the mind of Amelie, seeing everything in the vibrant colors she viewed life with, and wanting to remain there much longer than the two hours allotted.  It was just so refreshing to watch a movie where your imagination was free to soar rather than feel confused by the apparent deja vu from last year's first installment of the same pointless drivel.\n\n\nI almost always loathe films with subtitles as I feel that they get in the way of viewing the characters actions and facial expressions.  `Amelie' is the first film where I adored the subtitles and in fact, had a nagging urge to go out and learn French that is still with me today.  Much of this can be attributed to the delightful Audrey Tatou.  Her expressive eyes and sweet caring nature provided the viewer with fond memories of Audrey Hepburn and prevented me from being distracted by the subtitles.  Could a 23 year old actress with little experience be just as fantastic as Meryl Streep and Katharine Hepburn?  I really wasn't expecting it but Audrey Tatou revitalized my interest in film and left me wondering why her name didn't appear on Academy ballots and what possessed the Academy to favor `No Man's Land.'\n\nAn already perfect film couldn't get much better but along with the lovingly created cinematography and delight of rising star Tatou came the wonderful story of a true do-gooder.  `Amelie' is a film that begs  you to get happy and should give some short-term contentment to even the most depressed of individuals.  Little moments like the tragically funny early years of Amelie are very special and the best I've seen on the silver screen.  The scene where Amelie is skipping stones in the canal should be studied for years to come as the greatest technical moment in cinema.\n\nMovies like this one don't come around very often.  Perhaps the creators of films that pander to dumbed-down audiences who apparently can't tell that their watching last year's film should take the hint.  The movie-going public wants to be inspired and wants to be provided with the same imagination they have when reading a great novel. This is why `Amelie' remains #18 on the list of best films.\n\n10/10         ", u'0.224111', u'Amelie is a film that struck a certain chord with me. Every now and then movies come along that speak out to you and emotionally touch you in some way. Amelie is one such film for me. I related to its innocent charm and delightfully shy protagonist played by French sensation Audrey Tautou, the way very few films have. Part of the reason we watch movies is to learn something about ourselves or recognize characters that are remarkably similar to us and the way we are in real life. For all of us shy, introverted, quirky, and odd-ball eccentrics out there who have trouble relating to "normal" people, Audrey Tautou in this film is our personal hero. Instead of going into much detail about why the film works, I\'ll instead try to explain what it meant to me personally. Sure I guess this means I have to open up maybe more than I\'d like to about myself, but oh well. The way Amelie\'s childhood was presented is similar to my own. I am an only child to divorced parents and very rarely had friends as I was and still am very much a loner. As a child much of my time was spent alone so I entertained myself in all kinds of silly ways. Just like Amelie does in the film. Of course I gained my fixation with films at an extremely early age, but also did stupid things like give my stuffed animals personalities and have conversations with them, draw pictures and create stories to go along with them, and laid in bed listening to the radio with the windows open on a lazy summer day imagining creatures out of the cloud formations. Apparently there are legions of us out there. Even today I enjoy solitude far more than the company of most people and still use my imagination to think of stupid little things. Amelie did an amazing job in capturing what the world is like through the eyes of a person who doesn\'t really fit in, but finds joy in the simple things in life. Like the fresh spring breeze on your face, the sound of the rain, the chirping of birds, the touch of fur, and popping bubble wrap. Actually popping bubble wrap was always an exciting and rare treat during my youth. Jean-Pierre Jeunet\'s film also has a marvelously fun nifty view of sex. For Amelie sex is not something that is intimidating, temptingly desirable, sinful, adult, or lustful. It\'s just another of the many silly things that people do in this world that make us human. Two people taking off their cloths and rubbing up against one another. How sweet! In fact many people have insulted the film for it\'s unique view and open attitude towards sex. For shame really. Sure there\'s a lot of it actually. Amelie\'s first sexual encounter, the orgasms, the object of her affection working in a porn shop with a stripper and putting price tags on didoes. But it\'s all in good fun and filmed with the naivety that a character like Amelie would view sex as. Anyways the movie really works. Cinematographer Bruno Delbonnel does an excellent job in filming Jeunet\'s crazy vision and Audrey Tautou with her funky hairdo, wide brown eyes, and whimsical voice and kitten like mannerisms and shyness brings the movie to life. As I said I relate to this movie and understand the character the way I do with few other movies simply because it is frighteningly very much like I tend to be in real life. \n\n"You mean she would rather imagine herself relating to an absent person than build relationships with those around her?"\n\nHmm, so would I sometimes. Audrey Tautou\'s been a more reliable friend than most people and has put a smile on my face and lightened my day at the thought of her more times than one. And I still say I\'ll marry her one day.', u'0.149795', u'\nRating: ***1/2 out of ****\n\nWhat a fun film! From the moment it begins, "Amelie" bursts with joy and energy. It\'s a fable of sorts, a love letter to a Paris fondly dreamt of by many. It may not be the real world, but it is such a delightful fantasy that it doesn\'t matter how unbelievable some of it may be. "Amelie" is the rare romantic comedy that has both the romance and the comedy. It isn\'t very surprising that this has been a hit in France for a while now, and I have no doubt it will find the audience it needs in the States as well.\n\n\nAmelie Poulain (Audrey Tautou) is a nave girl working at the Two Windmills Caf. When she was a child her mother and teacher was an innocent victim of a\nsuicide gone awry. Amelie stayed with her father until she was old enough to leave and lead a life of her own. One day she finds a small box of treasures behind a tile in her wall, she decides to return it to her owner and become a natural do-gooder. Later on, she catches a man groping for lost photos under a photo booth (Nino Quincampoix, played by Mathieu Kassovitz), and it\'s love at first sight. She decides to go on a quest to find this man and help anyone she can along the way (including her father and co-workers).\n\n\nI said before that this film was a love letter to Paris, it is also a love letter to Amelie herself. Jean-Pierre Jeunet (director and co-screenwriter) conjured the film like a dream, as if Amelie is his dream girl and he is trying to save her and bring her to a happy ending. It\'s not hard to want everything to work out for her and her friends. Amelie Poulain is the kind of person who you wish was your best friend, your neighbor or your sister. She bounces along with good grace and whimsy living life to its fullest, yet keeping a mischievous grin. She has her own idea of justice that isn\'t very disagreeable. The tormentors must in turn be tormented; the lifeless must be brought to life. The film is like a non-musical "Bells Are Ringing", with our heroine bringing so much life to those around her but neglecting her wants and needs.\n\nAfter seeing Audrey Tautou as Amelie, I can\'t possibly imagine anyone else in that role. She embodies Amelie like no one else could, she is a rare find that pulls off the job of breathing life into Amelie in spades. Wait, I take that back. She does not just breathe life into Amelie, Tautou makes her jump off the screen and pull the audience into the story. It would be a crime for her not to get a Best Actress nomination for her role.\n\n\nMagical is the world that Amelie lives in, where photos and lamps come alive to aid her quest, where TV shows are showing nothing but her story. The story this setting surrounds is pretty standard, and presented plainly could have just been another machine-processed romantic comedy. Is it too sappy? No. On the contrary, the film takes quite a few steps to make sure it doesn\'t become tacky or conventional. The rich, storybook setting and a witty screenplay (asides are taken to deepen our connection each character, little things that each likes and dislikes) make the film all the more a delight to watch. The cinematography, crafted by Bruno Delbonnel, does wonders for "Amelie". The camera captures the action with an eye of a child in a candy store, beautifully bringing about each shot as a new discovery.\n\n\nWith films like "The Widow of Saint-Pierre", "With a Friend Like Harry" and box-office hit "Brotherhood of the Wold", French cinema has had quite a year. It\'s a delight that we round off the year with "Amelie", a fresh, funny journey that could have easily just been more Meg Ryan-esque romantic comedy fodder. If not for anything else, see it for Tautou\'s performance, but prepare to be smothered in a dream world.\n', u'0.316792', u'Not too long ago I was watching "The Hustler", and it was quite obvious that the film and practically everything about it was undeniably cool. Especially the way Jackie Gleason walked, the way he was dressed, the way he spoke, he wasn\'t trying to be cool, he simply was.\n\nOn a minorly related note, "Amelie" is a film that wants to be quirky, it wants to be cutesy, but it fails because it tries too hard: The exaggerated camera movements and sound effects, the ultra-luminous (yet rather nice) cinematography designed to turn Paris into a fantasy world, the odd quips of dialogue on orgasms, but the absolute biggest fault of the film is with the lead character known as Amelie.\n\nAmelie is a woman-child who likes to take it upon herself to do selfless good deeds for everyone around her, and the entire storyline revolves around her attempts to fix various problems for everyone within her vicinity. The only problem is that Amelie\'s selflessness isn\'t real, she\'s only doing this to feed her own sense of accomplishment so she can crack that god-awful smile at the camera once that good deed is done. Not long after it becomes extremely apparent that she\'s a psychopath who breaks into other people\'s appartments to screw with them (because she, not the police or any authorities, must be the one to deal with bad people), appoints herself as an unneeded tour guide for a blind man and basically does whatever she wants, regardless of whether it actually helps anyone.\n\nThe film has clearly taken cues from the French New Wave (Amelie even watches "Jules Et Jim" at the Cinema) but it has taken those editing and storytelling tricks to the nth degree and spoiled the entire film, even Amelie is taken from Irene Jacob\'s character in "Three Colours: Red" and made even nicer and sweeter until she\'s just plain obnoxious It\'s an unbearably naive film that\'s filled with so much sugary fake charm that it becomes sickening rather quickly, and once the cutesy novelty wears off you realise that there\'s just no substance to the storyline at all. Some people have been enchanted by the magical qualities of it, but I was completely put off as the whole thing was over-the-top and rather self-indulgent. A film like "L\'Atalante" finds the poetic beauty in the banality of life and simply displays it in all of its ordinary glory. "Amelie" constantly forces you to accept its own childish and faux-magical view of the world, some people can accept it, but I can\'t.', u'-0.242192', u"Let's be honest: is this film really worthy of being in the Top 250? What with all the psychotic behavior and the annoying, creepy smiles Am\xe9lie cracks from time to time while she's trying to be cryptic and heroic, this film is easily one of the worst I've seen. The worst part is when people go on trying to defend it, saying that the character is simply misunderstood and that since the film is french, it offers a different perspective. Do we have to remind people that foreign films also have the ability to suck as much as American films? And I tried to give this movie a chance but the more I tried, the easier it was to find things that I didn't like about it. So go ahead, defend it as much as you like, but it doesn't change the fact that it's one of the most annoying films of the decade.", u'-0.19753', u"Two of my friends had told me how much they had enjoyed this movie, so it was a big surprise to find how much I disliked it. The main character, played by Audrey Tatou with the most off- putting mannerisms, was so artificially sweet and coy it made me want to puke. Almost the entire ridiculous story was riddled with self-conscious cuteness. I say 'almost' only because after forcing myself to watch it for almost an hour in the hope of some improvement I couldn't stand it anymore and switched it off.\n\nIn summary, if you admire sugar-coated dross you'll love this movie; if you don't, then steer well clear of it.", u'-0.177649', u"\nI hate to be one of those negative people, but I hate this movie with an incredible fiery passion. I think it's very possibly the most overrated film of all time. I watched it a while back expecting to see something amazing but I was disappointed beyond words. The main character is very possibly the most annoying movie creation of all time. She's really cutesy and pale and she doesn't say anything. She's like a cross between Shirley Temple and a mime. By the end of the movie you just want to reach into the screen and choke her. Beyond that, as far as I can tell, the movie has no point whatsoever. And just for record, I'm not just saying this because I'm an idiot American who can't appreciate French cinema--I actually love French films (my favs are The Girl On The Bridge, La Haine, and Leon: The Professional). But this one just makes me want to pull my hair out. Anyway, I'll certainly attempt to watch it again at some point and give it another chance, but so far I'm at a complete loss as to why this movie is ranked at #18. Feel free to reply and tell me why I'm wrong.", u'-0.465106'], u'tt0036775': [u"\nThis is one of the best films of all time, not necessarily because of its story but because of the acting, direction, cinematography, lighting, and just the way that the story itself was told. At the time the film was released, the idea of revealing who the killer was in the opening scene was virtually unheard of, but it ended up being very effective because it allowed the audience to concentrate more on other elements of the film, which was the goal of Billy Wilder, the director. Instead of trying to figure out who the perpetrator was, there is more emphasis on how the crime was pulled off, what mistakes were made during the murder, who betrayed who, how close Barton Keyes (the insurance investigator) was getting to solving the case, and, probably most importantly, what kind of person Walter Neff is and whether or not sympathy should be felt toward him.\n\n\nBarbara Stanwyck, in one of the most remembered performances of her extensive career, represents (with nearly flawless ease) the cold and ruthless manipulator who has no difficulty in ruining other people's lives in various ways (including death, if necessary) in order to get what she wants. Known in the film community as the `femme fatale,' this is someone who uses her sexual prowess, seductiveness, and emotional detachment to drag an unsuspecting person (generally an interested man) into a scheme from which she is expected to benefit heavily and he is most likely headed for destruction. In these types of films, the man often either finds his life in ruins or ends up dead, as is often (but not always) also the case with the fate of the femme fatale. \n\nBarbara Stanwyck (as Phyllis Dietrichson, the murderous femme fatale in Double Indemnity) and Fred MacMurray (as Walter Neff, her \x91victim'), have amazing chemistry on screen. Their attraction is incredibly well portrayed, and the development of their relationship with each other is so convincing that what happens between them almost seems normal. Besides that, their mutually calculated interaction, although it seems at first like it has been rehearsed endlessly and ultimately brought unconvincingly to the screen, is exactly as it was meant to be, because it represents each character's intentions, even very subtly foreshadowing their future betrayals against each other. Phyllis has gone through every word she ever says to Walter in her head. She has practiced what she wants to say when she brings up the idea of life insurance to Walter in the beginning and she knows what she wants to say whenever they interact with each other because she has been planning for quite some time the prospect of murdering her husband in order to collect his fortune. Walter, conversely, methodically makes amorous advances as though this is something that he does regularly, and then ultimately he also plans out his conversations with Phyllis because he begins to suspect her and is sure to tell her only what he wants her to hear. This seemingly stiff dialogue brilliantly represents Phyllis and Walter's precise (and sinister) intentions, and it's quick pace creates a feeling of urgency and restlessness.\n\nProbably the most fascinating and entertaining actor in the film, Edward G. Robinson, plays Barton Keyes, Walter's friend and employer at the insurance company where he works. Keyes is a very suspicious man who closely investigates the insurance claims which come into the company, having a striking history of accurately isolating fraudulent claims and throwing them out. His handling of Phyllis's (and Walter's, technically) claim and the way that he gets closer and closer to the truth create a great atmosphere of tension and drama. \n\nDouble Indemnity is nearly flawless. From the shocking and unexpected beginning to the already known but still surprising end, the audience is held rapt by the excellent performances, the brilliant and imaginative direction, and the flawlessly created atmosphere. This is excellent, excellent filmmaking, and is a classic film that should not be missed.", u'0.244065', u'This is one of the best-liked classic films of all time and I am among that large group of fans as well.\n\nFew movies have ever had dialog this entertaining.....at least the conversations between Barbara Stanwyck and Fred MacMurray. I think it\'s a big appeal to this movie, except to younger folks who look at it as "cheesy."\n\nI read the book, Double Indemnity written by James Cain, and was surprised that the film\'s snappy dialog was not in it. This is one of the rare times when the movie was far better than the book. That\'s not a shock after you find out that literary giant Raymond Chandler and Hall Of Fame director Billy Wilder combined to write the screenplay,\n\nFor a murder/suspense story, there is very little action, almost none, yet there are no boring lulls. The three main actors - Stanwyck, MacMurray and Edward G. Robinson, are what make this so good.\n\nMacMurray\'s narration is fun to hear as he tells the story in flashback, from the beginning by dictating into an old Dictaphone to his co-worker Robinson. The latter is almost mesmerizing in his performance, the way he delivers his lines. He can even make a speech about something as boring as insurance and still keep you riveted to the screen.\n\nStanwyck was no sex symbol (at least to me) but she looked great here in the most seductive of 1940s clothing and, like Robinson, has a distinctive voice and accent that keeps your attention.\n\nThis film was the inspiration for the 1980 movie, "Body Heat," starring William Hurt and Kathleen Turner. That, too, was a very, very good movie....but not many films are in the class of this one.', u'0.122398', u'I\'ve now seen this movie 14 times in 25 years, at all times of the year, in all moods, sober or not etc - but always at night. I recorded my copy off TV in 1987 so I can only imagine what a remaster would do for it. With an atmosphere thick enough to cut with a knife it never fails to engross and enchant me, and although it\'s been dated for 40 years or more still seems relevant and watchable today. TV, answer phones, recordable CD/DVD, memory sticks and the internet have all come between us and yet I can still watch Fred MacMurray speaking into a Dictaphone without a qualm. Who wears a hat in California nowadays? Who buys beer whilst driving! Lift attendants have gone but I can still believe in Charlie working and laughing away in the garage past 11 at night.\n\nWoman and man agree to murder woman\'s husband but on the way to the cemetery they face grilling by insurance company. I think everything has been said before on the IMDb - by those who think it\'s one of the best films ever made! To those who simply think the main problem is that it\'s dated I wish you could see the TV commercials that dug into DI back in \'87 - what a hoot - and compare. I\'ve just noticed the print TCM UK is showing in 2005 is lip-synced out, very wobbly Rosza music track, fading and ageing fast - worse than my 1987 video tape (maybe logically). They\'re supposed to be encouraging people to enjoy the classics but they won\'t do that with such inferior screening copies. Dear TCM UK, this is an impressive iconic film - it deserves a billion dollar remaster authorised by the Library of Congress, not repeatedly trotting out unimpressive cheap worn dupes to fill those 2 hour slots.\n\nEverything about DI from the acting, production, direction, and music is superbly dignified and is as "close to perfection" as human beings are probably allowed to get with this form of Art - especially with the more limited technology at their disposal in \'44. When most films from now are long forgotten and dated DI will still be getting re-runs on TV and art-house cinemas - God and remasters willing - that is the fact of it.\n\nFortunia Bonanova certainly was fortunate to have appeared in bit parts in 2 of the best films ever made - Citizen Kane the other.', u'0.108272', u"\nDouble Indemnity is based on a novel by James Cain adapted to the screen by great novelist Raymond Chandler, who made here his most important contribution to the cinema history in his career, though somehow matched by following screenwriting work for 1946 Howard Hawks' classic The Big Sleep, and Billy Wilder, who previously worked as a screen writer for Ernest Lubitsch and had been already nominated three times for Academy Awards in the process before making Double Indemnity, which nevertheless played the key role in establishing him as one of the best writer-directors in Hollywood, and giving him his fourth Oscar nomination as a writer and his first one as a director.\n\nDouble Indemnity was the third feature Wilder directed after 1942 The Major and the Minor and 1943 Five Graves to Cairo, but it was definitely the first film, his primary American tragedy where the author for the first time revealed his black and somehow hopelessly pessimistic view of the American society and of the human society in general, blackishly desecrated in the film simply by populating it with exceptionally sordid characters, who independently of being a victim or victimized, of being the protagonists or just simple supporters are never really able to transcend the utterly low and devilish motivations in theirs as a consequence sordidly painful lives and reach such a state where the viewer might get relieved by considering one of them as a positive element. Instead the characters' lives shown in a\ncontinuous noir flashback of Fred MacMurray's not-a-confession are driven from the start to the very end by an utter greed in a form of double and not only indemnities with consequential and inherent to it risks and fears in a\nrather unsure world of insurance.\n\nAn insurance salesman Walter Neff (Fred MacMurray), a man with `no visible scars', starts to lose his already shaky dominance over his mind's yearnings when glimpses on a horizon a possibility of becoming a recipient of a monetary fortune along with no less seductive desire from a part of unhappily married and as devilishly beautiful as resourceful in pursuing her zany in its deadliness schemes, an ultimate femme fatale blond Phyllis (marvellously portrayed by Barbara Stanwyck).\n\nInitially apparent as a romantic, the relationship gradually mutates into double confrontation of the two fears of the two characters in their greedy and ambitious pursuits, a conflict which at one point apparently results in a sort of humanization of Phyllis' character, appearing hiding the eyes of her soul behind the sun glasses, a humanization which is let to happen by her only to accentuate later her unchangeably fatal nature.\n\nThe double confrontation gradually evolves into a triple one when the threatening presence on the scene of no less and probably more resourceful character of Barton Keyes (Edward G. Robinson) becomes more and more evident, as a result of his continuous and obsessive investigation conducted with different but nor less ambitious motives. A motives which find its ultimate revelation in a most touching, but finally most hypocritical scene of declaration of love (I love you - I love you too) between Walter Neff and Barton Keyes in the end, exactly reflecting the same nature of previous interactions between Walter and Phyllis, where such moments with the very words used, such as the supreme word of loving affection - Baby lowered to an unthinkable extent, only were a mere preparation to struck another blow in yet another outburst of hate caused by a new misfortunate complication in carrying out so well devised and apparently perfect plan.\n\n\nPermeated right from the start to the very end with the flavour of unstoppable fatality in an extent that a few other film-noirs achieved, accentuated by the wonderful music score by Miklos Rozsa, Double Indemnity's story is motored by the money like in nearly all of Billy Wilder films. But in this case all the misery produced by it as evident as never before resulting in utter corruption of already corrupted characters and their descent into a such a deep abyss of human misery as probably never before or after in a Hollywood film history, an abyss with no exit, with omnipresent hypocrisy, with no place for sincere human feelings of love, friendship or affection, an abyss to where the characters descent under the monotonous tune of Miklos Rozsa's score, which serves as a reflection of their monotonously hypocrite and ultimately doubly doomed lives. 10/10\n", u'-0.11492', u'Double Indemnity is a film which fully embodies its genre, all the classic noir elements are present: venetian blinds, diagonal lines, a femme fatale and a victim of fate.\n\nFred MacMurray takes the central role as victim of fate, Walter Neff; cast against type, MacMurray gives a thoroughly convincing performance as a typical insurance salesman transformed into a calculating killer.\n\nThe estimable Barbara Stanwyck also delivers a typically faultless performance as the coldhearted and seductive Phyllis Dietrichson who enlists Neff in a plot to kill her husband and cash in on the insurance money.\n\nAlthough this film may seem clich\xe9d today, as many thrillers since have offered similar plot lines, rarely has the story been told so well. For fans of Film Noir, Stanwyck or MacMurray, this is an absolute MUST SEE!', u'0.622566', u"\nDouble Indemnity begins with a car speeding on a dark, rainy night.  This begins the classic film noir plot.  Billy Wilder directs a steamy and grabbing film.  Billy Wilder pulls this film together with an awesome cast, perfect lighting and an amusing script.  Fred MacMurray plays Walter Neff, an unsuspecting insurance salesman.  He is unsuspecting in the sense that he is unaware of what the \x91femme fatale' is going to put him up to.  Barbara Stanwyck plays the \x91femme fatale', Phyllis Dietrichson, a manipulative housewife who will stop at nothing to get what she wants.\n\nThe film begins in present day giving insight into Walter's current plight. Walter Neff gives the voice over as the plot unfolds.  It starts in the present time allowing the audience to know what crime has happened without the interesting details to support it.  This is an interesting twist to the common film noir plot.  Knowing the crime at hand keeps the audience hungry for those details.  Walter is the victim of the beautiful woman who manipulates him into pulling off a murderous insurance fraud scam.  Walter is an impeccable insurance salesman and Phyllis, in some ways, forces him into providing her with what she needs.  Phyllis is the typical \x91femme fatale' who has no problem in using others to get what she wants.\n\nThroughout the film Walter is completely enamored by Phyllis.  Walter could have coined the pet name \x91baby' with his fondness towards Phyllis by calling her that throughout the film.  He is easily distracted by her beauty and evil charm.   He seems to be entranced by Phyllis's ankle bracelet, so much that he mentions it numerous times.  This allows the audience to feel the sexual tension between the two.  Phyllis, on the other hand, shows the audience that she can use and abuse anyone who gets in her way.  While believably attracted to Walter, Phyllis keeps him hopping to fulfill her needs.  She pulls him in and handles him like a puppet.  She is the epitome of the film noir genre's \x91femme fatale'.\n\nBarton Keyes, played by Edward G. Robinson, is Walter's co-worker and friend at the insurance company where he works.  Barton closely investigates all insurance claims that come across his desk.  While at one time Walter assuredly agreed with this practice, once Barton starts to unravel the mystery behind Mrs. Dietrichson's insurance claim, we begin to see just how nervous and paranoid Walter is.  Walter then begins to see Phyllis in a whole new light.  Barton plays the integral part by piecing together details that are thrown around throughout the film.  This keeps the tension high for the filmgoer.  These details are pieced together perfectly through to the end.\n\nDouble Indemnity has the perfect plot with the perfect cast.  Walter and Phyllis' attraction are tasty and the crime is wonderfully puzzling. Double Indemnity is the true film noir giant.\n", u'0.143254', u'There are occasional times when all the elements come together to make a great film that will stand the passing of time. "Double Indemnity" seems to be an example of this phenomenon.\n\nFirst, there was a great novel by one of America\'s best mystery writers, James Cain, who created these characters that seem will live forever in our imagination. Then, the lucky break in getting the right man to direct it, Billy Wilder, a man who knew about how to make a classic out of the material that he adapted with great care and elegance with Raymond Chandler, a man who knew about the genre.\n\n"Double Indemnity" works because it\'s a story we can relate to. There is a greedy woman trapped in a bad marriage, who sees the opportunity when she encounters an insurance agent who is instantly smitten with her and who has only sex in his mind. The manipulator, Phyllis Dietrichson, doesn\'t need much to see how Walter desires her. His idea of having her husband sign an insurance policy he knows nothing about, thinking he is doing something else, will prove a fatal flaw in judgment.\n\nMr. Wilder achieves in this film what others try, with disastrous results. The director, who was working under the old Hays Code, shows so much sex in the film with fully clothed actors, yet one feels the heat exuding from the passion Walter Neff feels for Phyllis. He is a man that will throw everything away because he is blinded by the promise of what his life will be once the husband is out of the picture.\n\nIn life, as well as in fiction, there are small and insignificant things that will derail the best laid plans. First, there i Jackson, the man who shouldn\'t have been smoking at the rear of the train, contemplating the passing landscape. Then, no one counts in the ability of Barton Keys, the man in the agency who has seen it all! Walter and Phyllis didn\'t take that into consideration and it will backfire on their plan.\n\nWe try to make a point to take a look at "Double Indemnity" when it shows on cable from time to time. Barbara Stanwyck makes a magnificent Phyllis. There are no false movements in her performance. Phyllis gets under Walter\'s skin because she knows where her priorities lie and makes good use of them in order to render Walter helpless under her spell.\n\nFred McMurray makes a perfect Walter. He is consumed by his passion and he will do anything because of what he perceives will be the reward for doing the crime. Walter Neff was perhaps Mr. McMurray\'s best creation. He is completely believable and vulnerable.\n\nEdgar G. Robinson, as Barton Keys, makes one of his best performances for the screen. Keys is a man that has seen all the schemes pass by his desk. He is, in a way, Walter\'s worst nightmare, because working next to Keys, he gets to know how wrong he was in the planning of the crime.\n\nThe supporting cast is excellent. Porter Hall, Jean Heather, Tom Powers, Richard Gaines, Fortunio Buonanova and John Philliber are perfect.\n\nThe music score of Miklos Rosza gives the film a texture and a dimension that capitalizes on the action it intends to enhance. Also the music of Cesar Franck and Franz Schubert contribute to the atmosphere of the movie. The great cinematography of John Seitz, who will go on to direct films, is another asset in the movie. Edith Head\'s costumes are absolutely what a woman like Phyllis would wear right down to her ankle bracelet.\n\nThis film shows a great man at his best: Billy Wilder!', u'0.275074', u'\n"I liked the way that anklet bit into her leg. I wanted to see her  again, up close, without that silly staircase between us."--Walter Neff, after meeting Phyllis Dietrichson This is Fred MacMurray like you\'ve never seen him before. He\'s edgy and sharp, and amoral, although he hides it well from his boss. Barbara Stanwyck\'s astounding performance set the standard for bad girls in Film Noir for years to come. I love this film because it is a perfect example of how the censorship of the time made it so that filmmakers had to get the sexiness across in a subtle way. This movie is undeniably sexy, and there\'s not a single \'love scene\' in it!', u'0.792908', u"\nThis film is great fun. Sxity years later, it's as taut and engaging and beautiful as any contemporary story.\n\nIt simmers, it sizzles, the tension between Neff and Dietrichson is positively palpable. But, as the tension between Neff and Dietrichson fizzles, the tension between Neff and Keyes heats up.\n\nIt's as pure a sample of classic film noir as there is, and it does it with unparalleled style.\n\nThis is what movie-making is all about. It's not a labrynth of characters and trick endings and gimmicks. In fact, the movie starts with our tragic hero admitting he's the who whodunit...what are we left with?\n\nThe story of how and why he dunit, of how he was intoxicated and bewitched, yet came to his senses, not soon enough to save him legally, but at least to come to terms with his own failure.\n", u'0.220412', u"\nIf you are a noir fan then this film is an absolute must see. The screenplay itself is a work of art in its charater construction, plot structure and dialogue which is delievered by an ensemble of first class actors divying up first class performances. Barbra Stanwyck as the deadly, smouldering, scheming Phyllis Dietrichson turns in a performance that is right up there with Mary Astor's Brigid O'Shaughnessy. Fred McMurray delievers a performance of a smart but desperately lovelorn patsy and Edward G. Robinson is perfect in the role of Barton Keyes and just about steals the moment every time he appears on screen.\n\nI personally love a good Noir film and this is right up there with the best of them. Billy Wilder should be proud of this work eventhough the Academy didn't see it fit to reward him for his efforts, however I personally think this film is an absolute winner.", u'0.810733', u"This film noir classic may be the best murder mystery of all time in this storied Hollywood genre. Fred MacMurray and Edward G. Robinson are excellent but it is Barbara Stanwyck who really makes the picture come together as a woman without a moral compass. Stanwyck set the standard for tough, calculating, shady women who exploit men without shame or remorse and her masterful manipulation of MacMurray is the movie's central theme. The film's imagery is filled with shadows and low lighting, accompanied by a tense, brooding music score. Stanwyck spins her web of ensnarement like a black widow with her victim seemingly unaware of the danger that enfolds him. MacMurray provides the narrative of the film which is told in flashback and delivers a cryptic account of the events in a confession to a boss who trusted him completely. Robinson is on target as the skeptical and suspicious boss who has a sixth sense about phony insurance claims. A nice supporting cast contributes to this thriller, namely Richard Gaines and Porter Hall.", u'0.522427', u'There were some superb thrillers coming out of Hollywood in the forties which did not rely on the private eye conventions \x96 but somehow the best of them were spread throughout by the same cynicism, the same realism, the same ruthless suspense\x85 \n\nBest of all was Wilder\'s "Double Identity." It was based on a real-life assassination in New York in 1927, when a wife and her lover killed the husband for his insurance money\x85 \n\nIn the film, a near-breaking-point tension was reached and sustained in the passion of an insurance salesman and a passionately sensual femme fatale \x96 an intense desire for each other and for money; in the murder of the poor husband; and in their useless attempts to escape the ability of a fast-talking investigator\x85', u'-0.452265', u'For years, I was entertained by film-noir homages/parodies like Garrison Keillor\'s "Guy Noir, Private Eye" and the Coens\' "The Man Who Wasn\'t There," but I\'d never seen an authentic noir. I finally got my chance with "Double Indemnity," which helped establish the genre as we know it. The expected elements are all here: Shadow-filled black-and-white cinematography. An ordinary man (Walter Neff, played by Fred MacMurray) who becomes an amoral criminal under the influence of a femme fatale (Phyllis Dietrichson, played by Barbara Stanwyck). Abundant cynicism, pessimism, and fatalism. Tough, stylized dialogue, including voice-over narration with a kind of hard-edged poetry to it.\n\nHowever, because in the 21st century we see film noir parodies more frequently than the real thing, we\'ve been conditioned to laugh at some of the excesses of the genre--especially this sort of narration. Thus, lines like "How could I know that murder could sometimes smell like honeysuckle?" or "I got to thinking about what cemeteries are for--they\'re for putting dead people in!" strike us as much funnier than they were probably intended to be. Instead of helping create a dark, gritty atmosphere, they actually jolt us out of the movie by prompting our scoffing laughter.\n\nIn short, "Double Indemnity" does a great job of establishing the rules of the world in which the story takes place, but we now have trouble accepting that world on its own terms. And I do believe that this movie was intended to have some humor to it--but of the grimly ironic kind, not the "isn\'t this a little ridiculous?" humor we find in it today.\n\nStill, there is much to admire about "Double Indemnity." It has a very strong plot--simply but elegantly constructed, and even though its general outlines get revealed within the first five minutes, the movie always remains interesting. The relationship between Walter and Phyllis is intriguingly ambiguous--it\'s not clear whether they are motivated by lust, greed, or something else entirely. (Roger Ebert\'s Great Movies essay has some noteworthy theories about this, and made me realize that this ambiguity is an asset, not a flaw.) Most impressive and unexpected is the character of insurance-claims investigator Barton Keyes (Edward G. Robinson). Though Keyes functions like a detective, his role doesn\'t indulge in any "film-noir detective" clich\xe9s. Instead, he\'s the most real-seeming person in the movie: rumpled, gruff, blustering, detail-obsessed, highly conscientious, and very funny. And gradually, the film reveals that the relationship between Walter and Keyes is even more complex and interesting than that between Walter and Phyllis.\n\n"Double Indemnity" will always be watched because of its role in establishing the conventions of film noir, but more importantly, it\'s still an entertaining movie--even if, sixty years later, it\'s sometimes entertaining for reasons the filmmakers never intended.', u'0.0688847', u"\nThis is a dynamite piece of filmmaking by Billy Wilder.  Wilder is in my opinion a very underrated director, much like John Houston.  The acting is in top form from all of the players.  The cinematography is crisp, and beautiful.  The sound is nice and clear, and the direction is arguably some of Wilder's best.  However, the real star is the screenplay.  First off, it was taken from excellent source material.  James Cain is always great for a story where nobody wins out.  Check out The Postman Always Rings Twice for an example.  But it is Chandler who I think really put this one on the map.  Chandler has a way with dialogue that makes it all ring in your ears.  The lines are smooth, and the characters always say something that makes me wish I could be that clever and smooth in everyday situations.  Chandler knows dialogue, Chandler knows LA, and Chandler knows how to deliver a story.  Check out any of his novels, and you will see this.  This is a teamup that I really wish would have happened again.  Oh well.  If you don't mind voice over narration, then this is a film for you.", u'0.401739', u'From the first time he sees that ankle bracelet, Walter Neff (Fred MacMurray) is a doomed man. As Phyllis Dietrichson (Barbara Stanwyck) descends her California home\'s spiral staircase, we are as enraptured as Neff. And it takes little time to figure out that being enraptured by this femme fatale is a very dangerous position to find oneself in. Is it accidental that the bracelet is worn around her ankle, as opposed to the more traditional wrist? Is it accidental that the sunlight streaming through the windows cast shadows not unlike bars across the living room? I suspect it\'s about as accidental as Mr. Dietrichson (Tom Powers) eventually ending up dead along the railroad tracks. We must remember that Billy Wilder is doing more than evoking noir here, he\'s inventing it. And how brave he is! Beginning the film by all but divulging the ending is hardly the route most directors choose to go when directing a thriller. But as he\'s well aware, the audience doesn\'t care half as much about where they end up as they do about the thrill of the ride it takes to get them there. \n\nThe structure of the film is familiar to anyone who has seen "Body Heat," or any other knockoff. "Double Indemnity" is the original however, and it\'s intricate plot revels in its complexities nearly as much as Walter and Phyllis do in their convoluted plot to dispose of an unwanted husband. The audience learns only a minimum about the relationship between Mr. and Mrs. Dietrichson, but we easily surmise that their union was not out of love. If the marriage was one of convenience, than the murder certainly is. It seems unlikely Phyllis is after the freedom to continue her heady tryst with Walter, and even the money provided by the double indemnity clause of Mr. Dietrichson\'s life insurance policy seems more like a bonus than a motivation. In other words, Phyllis just wants her husband dead. And Neff obliges. \n\nSeveral times while watching "Double Indemnity," I felt my pulse physically quicken. These scenes were most notably the ones in which it looked as though Walter and Phyllis\' trolley car had finally reached the end of its line, and discovery of their crime was inevitable. The scene where Phyllis is forced to hide behind a door, knowing that incrimination awaits if the person on the other side sees her, is unrelenting in its suspense. After all, we want this reprehensible act to go off without a hitch every bit as much as they do. That is the sign of a good film. It also stands to reason, seeing as how we were there when the elaborate scheme was being plotted. That makes us accessories. And if they get caught, God help us, so do we.', u'-0.109872'], u'tt0062622': [u'\nSometimes reading the user comments on IMDB fills me with despair for the species.  For anybody to dismiss 2001: A Space Odyssey as "boring" they must have no interest in science, technology, philosophy, history or the art of film-making.  Finally I understand why most Hollywood productions are so shallow and vacuous - they understand their audience.\n\nThankfully, those that cannot appreciate Kubrick\'s accomplishment are still a minority.  Most viewers are able to see the intelligence and sheer virtuosity that went into the making of this epic.  This is the film that put the science in "science fiction", and its depiction of space travel and mankind\'s future remains unsurpassed to this day.  It was so far ahead of its time that humanity still hasn\'t caught up.\n\n2001 is primarily a technical film.  The reason it is slow, and filled with minutae is because the aim was to realistically envision the future of technology (and the past, in the awe inspiring opening scenes).  The film\'s greatest strength is in the details.  Remember that when this film was made, man still hadn\'t made it out to the moon... but there it is in 2001, and that\'s just the start of the journey.  To create such an incredibly detailed vision of the future that 35 years later it is still the best we have is beyond belief - I still can\'t work out how some of the shots were done.  The film\'s only notable mistake was the optimism with which it predicted mankind\'s technological (and social) development.  It is our shame that the year 2001 did not look like the film 2001, not Kubrick\'s.\n\nBesides the incredible special effects, camera work and set design, Kubrick also presents the viewer with a lot of food for thought about what it means to be human, and where the human race is going.  Yes, the ending is weird and hard to comprehend - but that\'s the nature of the future.  Kubrick and Clarke have started the task of envisioning it, now it\'s up to the audience to continue.  There\'s no neat resolution, no definitive full stop, because then the audience could stop thinking after the final reel.  I know that\'s what most audiences seem to want these days, but Kubrick isn\'t going to let us off so lightly.\n\nI\'m glad to see that this film is in the IMDB top 100 films, and only wish that it were even higher.  Stanley Kubrick is one of the very finest film-makers the world has known, and 2001 his finest accomplishment.  10/10.\n', u'0.274148', u'\nFor all those bewildered by the length and pace of this film ("like, why does he show spaceships docking for, like, 15 minutes?"), here\'s a word you might want to think about:\n\nBeauty.\n\n Beauty is an under-rated concept. Sure, you\'ll often see nice photography and so on in films. But when did you last see a film that contains beauty purely for the sake of it? There is a weird belief among cinemagoers that anything which is not plot or character related must be removed. This is depressing hogwash. There is nothing wrong with creating a beautiful sequence that has nothing to do with the film\'s plot. A director can show 15 minutes of spaceships for no reason than that they are beautiful, and it is neither illegal nor evil to do so. \n\n  \'2001\' requires you to watch in a different way than you normally watch films. It requires you to relax. It requires you to experience strange and beautiful images without feeling guilty that there is no complex plot or detailed characterization. Don\'t get me wrong, plots and characters are good, but they\'re not the be-all and end-all of everything. There are different KINDS of film, and to enjoy \'2001\' you must tune your brain to a different wavelength and succumb to the pleasure of beauty, PURE beauty, unfettered by the banal conventions of everyday films.\n\n  "All art is quite useless" -  Oscar Wilde.', u'0.0926954', u'Instead of writing a paragraph, I\'ll give four good reasons why 2001 is \r the greatest cinema experience of all time:\r \r\n1) It is a visual Odyssey that could only be told on the big screen. \r The special effects that won Kubrick his only Oscar are the most \r stunning effects before that age of Jurassic Park and T2. They allow \r Kubrick to give an accurate (or at least are the most accurate) \r depiction of space travel to date. The silence that fills the space \r scenes not only serves its purpose as accurate science, but also adds \r to the mood of the film (to be discussed in a later point with HAL). \r The fact that Kubrick shot the moon scenes before the Apollo landing is \r a gutsy yet fulfilling move. Many have said that upon its original \r release, it was a favorite "trip" movie. I can think of no other movie \r that has such amazing visuals for its time and even of all time (sorry \r Phantom Menace fans!)\r \r\n2) Kubrick\'s directing style is terrific. As in all his films, Kubrick \r likes to use his camera as means to delve into the psychology of his \r characters and plots. His camera is not as mobile as other greats, such \r as Scorsese, but instead sits and watches the narrative unfold. Faces \r are the key element of a Kubrick film. Like classic movies, such as M \r and Touch of Evil, Kubrick focuses on the characters\' faces to give the \r audience a psychological view-point. Even he uses extreme close-ups of \r HAL\'s glowing red "eye" to show the coldness and determination of the \r computerizd villain. I could go on, but in summation Kubrick is at the \r hieght of his style.\r \r\n3) HAL 9000 is one of the most villainous characters in film history. I \r whole-heartedly agree with the late Gene Siskle\'s opinion of HAL 9000. \r Most of this film takes place in space. Through the use of silence and \r the darkness of space itself, a mood of isolation is created. Dave and \r his crewmen are isolated between earth and jupiter, with nowhere to \r escape. Combine this mood with the cold, calculated actions of HAL 9000 \r and you have the most fearful villain imaginable. I still, although \r having see this film several times, feel my chest tighten in a \r particular scene.\r \r\n4) The controversial \r ending of 2001 always turns people away from this film. Instead of \r trying to give my opinion of the what it means and what my idea of \r 2001\'s meaning in general is, I\'d like to discuss the fact that the \r ending serves to leave the movie open-ended. Kubrick has stated that he \r inteded to make 2001 open for discussion. He left its meaning in the \r hands of the viewer. By respecting the audience\'s intelligence, Kubrick \r allowed his movie to be the beginning, not the end, of a meaningful \r discussion on man\'s past, present, and future. The beauty of 2001 is \r that the ending need not mean anything deep, it can just be a purely \r plot driven explanation and the entire movie can be viewed as an \r entertaining journey through space. No other movie, save the great \r Citizen Kane, leaves itself open to discussion like 2001. It is truly \r meant to be a surreal journey that involves not only the eye but the \r mind. Instead of waiting in long lines for the Phantom Menace, rent a \r widescreen edition of 2001 and enjoy the greatest cinematic experience.', u'0.400199', u'I did and I lost two and a half hours of my life that I can never regain again.\n\nI honestly have no idea what the critics and fans see in this movie. And that\'s not because I can\'t appreciate "art". I love a good film with profound messages, brilliant cinematography, and great directing.\n\nThis film just isn\'t one of them.\n\nMy main complaint about this film is that it\'s so horribly slow-paced, to the point of boring its audience to death. On the other hand, sequences of dialog go by too quickly and there\'s not enough exposition to let people who haven\'t read the book know what\'s going on (My mother had mercy on me and explained everything before I watched it). Would it have killed them to hire a narrator? At least for the beginning and the end? \n\nLet me break it down for you: (Spoilers throughout) \n\nFor the first two minutes you are treated to a black screen with no music, waiting for the actual movie to begin.\n\nFor the following minute and a half, you see several pictures of sunrises and savanna landscapes. Like the audience couldn\'t figure out how to set the scene unless they saw the establishing shot three or four times.\n\nThe next eleven minutes are occupied with the grunting monkeys. They fight, see the monolith, fight some more, pommel things with a bone. Supposedly they are prehistoric men whose evolution is being influenced by the monolith\'s singing. Not that you could tell if you hadn\'t read the book.\n\n*Finally* we get into space. Only to be subjected to twelve minutes of ships slowly spinning to the Blue Danube Waltz (A pretty quick-tempo-ed waltz as I understand, yet here it feels absolutely agonizing). At last we get some innocuous dialog and rather cryptic exposition about the government not letting people land on the moon. We are left to wonder about this for fourteen more minutes of Blue Danube and spinning ships and neat camera tricks with anti-gravity.\n\nNext comes four minutes of watching a ship travel over the surface of the moon and dock at a space station. We get a little more exposition in a board room scene that follows. Then we\'re back outside traveling at a snail\'s pace over the moon. A second monolith is revealed, again filling our ears with that horrible ringing (I had no idea that was an actual piece of music!). The monolith does its little light show and then the plot jumps forward.\n\n*Seven* minutes of watching the ship to Jupiter travel. By this point in time my brains had turned into mush. Could it be moving any slower? Maybe it\'s "realistic" to portray it as such, but we still don\'t need to see five or six different shots of the same thing to grasp the concept of its "realism". Let me tell you about this "realism" thing; I cheered when the secondary astronaut character died. Not because I\'m a sadist and like watching people die, but because after five minutes I was just so annoyed at the sound of his darn breathing! I\'m supposed to care about this character, feel when he dies! Instead I found myself waiting for blissful silence whatever way it came.\n\nAnyway, now we get to the most interesting part of the film-the part with HAL. Forget Dave the stick-of-wood protagonist. The real star of the show is that coldly impersonal, chillingly villainous, ruthlessly merciless bad guy of a computer. He\'s great. And the "Open the pod bay doors" sequence is wonderful. But it\'s too short. And it\'s not long before the director once again lapses into too-long goings on.\n\nFour minutes for HAL to die. And die he does. Slowly, painfully, losing intelligence with every minute, voice getting lower and slower, singing "Daisy, Daisy", all with a low and constant hissing that becomes just as annoying as the heavy breathing.\n\nSeven minutes of flying colors as Dave enters the monolith. Seven. I could FEEL my brains melting and dripping out of my ears! Seven full minutes of absolutely nothing but some guy\'s whacked out psychedelic version of space travel, again with that thrice-cursed chorus! We got the idea at the beginning of the sequence! Why drag it out so long? Unless he wanted to make LSD users go psychotic and have flashbacks.\n\nI\'m not even going to try to explain the ending, mostly because I don\'t quite get it myself. Supposedly he\'s in an alien research laboratory and they\'re teaching him deep and profound things while he watches himself getting older and older and then they send him back to earth as some kind of cosmic celestial space baby. None of this comes across in the film. For all you know, it\'s just a sequence of images with no purpose or plot whatsoever. A lot of the movie felt that way.\n\nThe first time I tried watching this movie I gave up halfway through. The second time I suffered through this sore excuse for a film, it was to help my sister time the sequences to see how long they lasted. It\'s that boring.\n\nCall this crummy film "art" if you wish. I wouldn\'t. I\'ve seen more interesting "art" in the local museum. And I am never subjecting myself to this kind of suffering ever again.', u'-0.39333', u"A review I have put off for far too long....\n\nBluntly, 2001 is one of the best science-fiction films made to date, if not the very best. Stanley Kubrick was a genius of a film maker and this is one of his very best works. And although it is misunderstood by many, and respectively underrated, it is considered one of the best films of all time and I'll have to agree. Back in 1968, no one had done anything like this before, and no one has since. It was a marvel of a special effects breakthrough back then, and seeing how the effects hold up today, it is no wonder as to why. The film still looks marvelous after almost forty years! Take note CGI people. Through the use of large miniatures and realistic lighting, Kubrick created some of the best special effects ever put on celluloid. This aspect alone almost single-handedly created the chilling void of the space atmosphere which is also attributed to the music and realistic sound effects. I can't think of another film where you can't here anything in space, like it is in reality. Not only is the absence of sound effects in space realistic, it is used cleverly as a tool to establish mood, and it works flawlessly.\n\nAside from the magnificent display of ingenious special effects, there are other factors that play a part in establishing the feel of the film. The music played, all classical, compliment what the eyes are seeing and make you feel the significance of man's journey through his evolution from ape to space traveler.\n\nThe story, while seemingly simple, is profound. Sequentially, several mysterious black monoliths are discovered and basically trigger certain events integral to the film. What are they? Where did they come from? What do they do? These are all questions one asks oneself while watching the story develop and is asked to find his own way. While most come away with a general idea of what took place in the story, each individual will have to decide what it means to them. Any way one decides to answer these question results in profound solutions. It's not left entirely up to interpretation, but in some aspects it is. Experience it for more clarification. The end result is quite chilling, no matter your personal solution.\n\nWhile it is a long film, and sometimes slows down, it has to be in order to accurately portray the journey of man. It's not a subject that would have faired well in a shorter film, faster paced feature. Those with short attention spans need not apply.\n\nLast but not least, is the epitome of a remorseless antagonist, HAL 9000, the computer. Never has a machine held such a chilling screen presence. Which reminds me, for a film with such profound ambition and execution, there is surprisingly little dialogue. Another sign of Kubrick's genius.\n\nAll in all, one of the best films made to date and one of the very best science fiction films made. A personal favorite. Everyone must see this film at least once.\n\nVery highly recommended.", u'0.38871', u"2001 is one of those movies where, if you don't like it, you are told that you don't 'get it' and need to look at the deeper meaning and symbolism. You're told that you clearly have a slow attention span, and just want to see sex, explosions, and have the plot handed to you on a platter.\n\nLet's break down the movie shall we? Three minutes of blackness, with something that sounds like a dying hippo in the background. Then we get the opening credits. A minute of fascinating shots of the Savannah. Then a bunch of monkeys find a black rock and start killing things with bones. Cut to the first of many 20-minute shots of ships doing things while the 'Blue Danube' plays in the background. A bunch of pointless dialogue, and a group of moon scientists find another monolith.\n\nCut to a spaceship that's too long for the crew complement--three sleeping people, two people named Dave and Frank, who have only slightly more personality than the stiffs in hibernation. And then there's HAL, the 'perfect' supercomputer who runs the ship. Predictably, he snaps and starts breaking the First Law of Robotics. Now this is something that has potential. An evil, coldly ruthless super-mind who controls the surrounding environment and can predict your every move. And what does he do? He lets one guy float into space and turns off the hibernation machines so the three sleeping guys die, leaving Dave floating in a pod. He simply uses the airlock, puts on a spacesuit, and turns HAL off--agonizingly slowly. Then, apparently, there's some psychedelic 'evolution' at Jupiter.\n\nHere's the movie with the pauses taken out: Apes see monolith, kill things. Scientists find moon monolith. HAL kills people. HAL dies; Dave gets a prerecorded message, and evolves at Jupiter.\n\nThis is not me 'not getting it.' This is me being bored to tears by long stretches of absolutely nothing. Sure, it's realistic, but I find I have no reason to care. No matter the message, no movie can be good without being entertaining. Frankly, every character could be replaced with Keanu Reeves, and nothing would change.", u'-0.39148', u'\nI spent many a sleepless night after watching 2001. Not only because of the psychological horror (of which 2001 is a masterpiece) but also because of the way it brought me (a restless soul) some clarity to the way I observe the universe. It changed my way of thinking in a very profound way. And after reading the novel (by Arthur C. Clarke) I found myself once again inspired (a writer as I am) by the level of imagination.\n\nThe Space Odyssey is not something one can just "go and see". One has to be ready for it, or it cannot be understood. In fact I don\'t think it can be understood at all, at least not all of it at once. It is a philosophical journey to the infinite and beyond, a masterpiece of it\'s genre and still after 32 years technically quite impressive all the way to the powerful musical soundtrack featuring \'Also spracht Zarathustra\' by Richard Strauss and \'Blue Danube\' by Johann Strauss.\n\nTake all the time you want, but eventually you are going to have to see this film. If it can bring some order and understanding to the universe of a struggling artist like me, it can certainly do it for you as well.\n\nOr maybe I\'m just plain crazy...', u'0.116512', u"I write this review just after hearing of Stanley Kubrick's death. It's a great loss, and I write about 2001: A SPACE ODYSSEY, because I feel it is the consummate Kubrick film, the one he will be most remembered for. It is a picture like no other, not only revolutionizing science fiction, but changing the way films are conceptualized. It was probably America's first 'art' film and has inspired the likes of George Lucas and countless other writers and directors.\n\nAside from its visual greatness, the reason the film spawns so much discussion and analysis is because so many people have so many different interpretations of it. Kubrick and Arthur C. Clarke, his co-writer, had a vision, but we have never really found out what was going through their minds. Of course, the skinny on its 'message' is how technology of the future will take over humanity and decide the course of our lives unless we are careful. 2001's ending is one of hope, a version of our rebirth through the star-child's flight back to earth. It is meaningless to many, but discerning filmgoers will understand.\n\nAlthough 2001 does not have the wicked, dark humor of DR. STRANGELOVE or CLOCKWORK ORANGE, or contain strong, eccentric characters that filled his earlier works like PATHS OF GLORY or SPARTACUS, I still feel he would've liked to be remembered most for this. If anything, HAL will be his most memorable character, dangerous, murderous, and artificial. It was a half-decade in the making at a time when Hollywood was still churning out dull musicals and just waking up to the New Wave of French and Italian cinema. Kubrick was a maverick director who made great films on his own terms, his own time, and for everyone else to marvel at. He will be missed.", u'0.0658021', u'Mankind\'s Self awakening is the theme of "2001: A Space Odyssey", a process that unfolds along a space-time continuum. We "see" our primordial past, and we "infer" a cosmic future. The powers of intuition thus become the doors of perception, in our ongoing collective journey.\n\nFrom this transcendental perspective, a conventional, egocentric plot seems superfluous. Our frenzied conflicts and self-important dialogue are consumed in evolutionary change, and are irrelevant in a cosmos that is vast beyond comprehension. It\'s a tough lesson for a vain and aggressive species. Not surprising then that some of us huff and puff about the film\'s slowness and minimal story. For perceptive viewers, the remuneration is an inspirational sense of wonder and awe.\n\nIn this film, which is mostly visual, geometric symbols guide our intuition. Circles and arcs represent nature. Right angles represent conscious intelligence. Some people think the sleek, black monolith is a Von Neumann probe. Maybe. Without doubt, the monolith is a visual metaphor for an extraterrestrial intelligence whose physical form is never shown. Mystery is more profound than explanation.\n\n"2001 ... " is unique among films in content and scope. The cinematography is out-of-this-world, the special and visual effects are breathtaking, and the classical music is sublime. I rarely use the word "masterpiece" to describe a movie. But Stanley Kubrick\'s "2001: A Space Odyssey" is art in the highest sense, like Leonardo da Vinci\'s "Mona Lisa", or Vincent Van Gogh\'s "The Starry Night".', u'0.248091', u"\nThis movie is certainly one of the greatest films ever made. It is a story told in a steady pace, told mostly not by words but by cinematic means of expression. Perfect blend of spectacular special effects and classical music bring to life creations of human imagination in both realistic and poetical way. The story itself is quite simple at a first glance. As the title implies, there is an archetypal journey, a motive repeated for thousands of years. This motive was always used not only to depict a trip in space and time, and beyond, but also had rich philosophic meaning. The film is a poetical contemplation of most exciting eternal questions. It is not just an odyssey of a person; it is an odyssey of our species. The film is great by itself, yet, in my case, the impression from it will always be mingled with that from the book. I've read it at the age of 10, really not thinking about problems like 'what is the relationship between evolution of humankind and development of human morality'. But the impression was great enough to make me fall for entire genre of science fiction.\n\nThe day I learned '2001' got only special effects Oscar and was not even nominated for the Best Picture was the day when 'Academy Award' completely became two words meaning nothing to me.\n", u'0.621843', u'"200l: A Space Odyssey" is a supremely intriguing space-travel journey with a profound look at mankind\'s future... It is one of the very few great films of our times... It gives us something to think, talk and argue... It wonders about our importance in the universe and ignites our imagination and curiosity... It inspires us to dig for insights...\n\nAs a science fiction fantasy, it is one of the most original films ever made... Kubrick\'s camera dances to the "Blue Danube" with planets floating exuberantly through the light years... It\'s an experience in the poetry of motion, a rich statement to the power of cinema...\n\nBut "2001" reveals that it\'s not really a science fiction film after all... It\'s, instead, a philosophical enigma, a magnificent meditation on man\'s place in the grand scheme of things, and a quest to understand ourselves by knowing all else...\n\n"2001" is a unique film about man\'s evolution told in almost subliminal terms... The people in this classic science-fiction epic hardly matter... Kubrick relates a chronology in images of things\x97the mountains, the desert, the technology, the space capsule, the computer named HAL (who is more interesting than the humans), and the time warp... The final landing scene is the very hallmark of cinematic genius...\n\nAs a terror story, too, it is a towering achievement (not on the same scream-inducing level as Hitchcock\'s "Psycho"), but in an innocent and far more haunting way...The film uses invisible but powerful forces to manipulate the plot but perhaps the most overwhelming one is the picture\'s vision of man... In Kubrick\'s fantasy, the Golden Age of man was a neglected instant between a man-ape\'s exaltation at discovering the first weapon and a nuclear-powered spaceship floating in a graceful orbit around the Earth... Man has indeed evolved!\n\nAs a spectacle "2001" assaults the mind, eye and ear, with stimulating images and suggestions... We are surrounded by a totally believable futuristic environment... The film is filled with brilliant sequences and extraordinary moments: The first interesting minutes in which the story of the apes is told visually, without a single line of dialog; the zero-gravity toilet with its great list of instructions; the stewardess defying gravity by walking the walls calmly upside down; the frightening moment when we realize that HAL is reading the astronauts lips; the magical alignments of Sun, Moon, and Earth; the "Starchild" returning home to charm the orb...\n\n"2001" is filled with poetic imagery: the view of the Sun rising over the Earth; the tossing of the bone into the air in slow motion; the slow images of the giant spaceship revolving in a cosmic ballet...\n\n"2001" is also a work of great visual acuity... It allows us to view more than the mystery of existence and destiny implicit in every man... Its end troubles many viewers as they demand clarity where there can only be mystery... They insist upon an answer where there can only be a question... Every viewer had a different explanation of the mysterious end of Kubrick\'s film\x85 But for those who can accept mysticism, the climax is deeply moving...', u'0.475194', u'\nLike a Circle around the human condition, 2001 starts at the beginning, skips the middle, and proceeds to the ending, right back where we started. Noting the weakness of words compared to image(s), Kubrick wisely dispenses with dialogue, preferring the power and essence of the scenery, and allowing the intelligence of the audience to do the deciphering.  Or not, depending on the audience.\n\nA monolith in cinematic history, 2001 is a high water mark of direction, execution, and achievement.  If one considers the ambition of the film (a film about everything), and the measure of success the film achieved to that end, a very sound argument for this being the greatest of all films can be made.\n\n\n', u'0.569419', u"A whimsical, often spectacular view of a future in which advances in technology dominate the world. It is well shot and although slow-moving it is intense and enjoyable throughout. The featuring of classical music to establish atmosphere works brilliantly; it provides a feeling of awe, mystery and intrigue \x96 the same aura that Walt Disney worked in creating 'Fantasia'. The special effects, both sound and visual, are still spellbinding by the standards of today's technology. Aside from the technical pluses of the film, it stands strong as it is one of not many films out there that has something important to say about humankind, and where the human race is heading in terms of our increasing reliance on machines and our unquenchable thirst to discover. Despite an ending that is hard to understand, it is even harder to overlook this film a true cinema classic.", u'0.813914', u'\nI normally keep my movie thoughts to myself but this movie affected me to the point of voicing myself out.\n\nMovies are typically evaluated via (i) more/less objective attributes (plot, ideas, action, cinematography, etc.) and (ii) emotional impressions they leave. While the latter is extremely personal and diverse, some convergence can be achieved in the former. Unfortunately, this piece greatly fails in it: no plot, no original ideas, no action, horrible cinematography, and a very repetitive soundtrack. As far as the emotional impression goes: well, in my case, it gave me a highly unpleasant aftertaste: a very pretentious schizophrenic nightmare...\n\nWhy is it so overrated then? I\'d hypothesize that it is for the same reason as in the case of Malevich\'s "Black Square". When one sees something a piece of "art" of that type, there seem to be two typical reactions: (i) "There is nothing there, it is junk." and (ii) "There is nothing there but it must be great because everyone else thinks it\'s great. Then it must be an art." So what created this mob fame effect for this movie? I don\'t know for sure but it might have been the big names of S.Kubrick and A.Clark. Once such a "snowball" starts rolling down the hill and picks up the momentum, it is more difficult to stop it than to roll with it.\n\nPlease trust your own independent feelings. Things don\'t become better because a million of other people say they are brilliant. Cheers.\n', u'-0.178306', u"2001 is the perfect movie for a certain group of people. You know who they are. Over the internet, in your college maybe--a student or possibly a philosophy/art/film professor. A person with a passion for avante-garde films with wacky imagery and little else. They're the type of people who find a college thesis' worth of material from the dialogue in the Matrix sequels, they're the ones that boldly declare a film 'art' and anybody else who disagrees with them 'just didn't get it.' 2001 is art alright. The kind of art that I can only liken as being assaulted and nearly beaten to death by an Andy Warhol painting. Yes this movie is art, and you will hate it for that.\n\nThis is a shame since normally I like Stanley Kubrick movies, but 2001 is an experiment in film-making and nothing more. The plot is incredibly vague, revolving around monkeys battling a black monolith, a mission to space, and a computer program called Hal going insane since that's what most self-conscious computer programs do. The film is then peppered with other psychedelic imagery that are supposed to convey grand ideas. They'll only convey those types of things if you're pretentious and into that kind of thing, otherwise you'll view it as utterly pointless.\n\n2001 revolves around these whacked-out, LSD-induced images to string together some kind of story that interests you. It does not. A parade of shots that have little to do with one another and randomly show things happen does not a movie make.\n\nThere are no doubt going to be people out there who will try to explain 2001's plot and why you should accept it as being a wonderful film. The thing is this: much like if you have to explain a joke then it isn't funny, it's the same thing with movies. If you have to explain to someone the plot and its various interpretations, then it isn't a good movie.\n\nUltimately I can't change the opinion of the viewers and critics that loved 2001, but if 2001 proves anything it's this: keep your art to yourself.", u'-0.117962'], u'tt0095765': [u"\nMovies can wield a strange power over those who sit in the darkened seats of a theatre.  The truly great ones manipulate your perception of reality, suspend your disbelief, and ultimately either alter or affirm your view on life.  NUOVO CINEMA PARADISO is just such a movie.  It is the near-perfect melding of direction, acting, script, sound track, and cinematography. Phillipe Noiret and Salvatore Cascio give the kind of performances usually associated with much more recognizable actors.  The supporting cast looks like they could all be full-blooded Sicilians.  The location shots add depth and realism to the entire production.  Ennio Morricone's music is simply the most appropriate and emotive I have ever had the pleasure to hear in a theatre.  Tornatore's script and direction are a joy, a breath of fresh air.\n\nI will not spoil this story by repeating it, nor will I give away the ending, although it matters not a whit.  I could disclose fully everything in this movie, and in seeing it, all my words would evaporate.  There is nothing like the experience of sitting through it, becoming engulfed by it, and in the end, being changed.", u'0.474101', u"I seldom watch Italian movies, (i saw it today for the first time) being Italian maybe i'm biased, but this one really stands out. A real masterpiece; i can't remember another movie so moving like this one, maybe Schindler's list; it makes you laugh and it makes you cry, yet it is so simple and straightforward. Maybe there lies its magic: no Hollywood superstars, no special effects, just pure emotions and feelings, love, fear, grief and regret, nostalgia for childhood and youth, memories of places and times that will not come back, memories of the loved ones. Some movies are there to entertain, some to scare, some to question. This movie is there to affect your feelings. Definitely to be seen.", u'0.402258', u'It is by now well known that there are two versions of this film that differ greatly, the original 3 hour Italian cut and the heavily re-edited 2 hour version which was the version that charmed the world in 1989. It remains a wonderful experience, but the director\'s cut is so much richer, deeper, satisfying,well,everything. This review is of the director\'s cut which may not be the greatest film in the world but is my favourite film of all time ever since I came out of the cinema in which I first saw it in back in 1994 crying my eyes out. Never has a film effected me as emotionally as this one. Cinema Paradiso is many things- a touching story of a friendship, a wonderful portrayal of a Sicilian village, a loving tribute to the cinema, amongst other things, but the longer cut is I believe the most moving and romantic love story ever. For my money, you can forget Casablanca,Dr Zhivago,Titanic,Romeo and Juliet,etc {great as some of them are}, this is the one that does it for me.\n\nDivided into three sections, it is the first section that was left almost intact in the short version. It is of course primarily concerned with the relationship between young Toto and the projectionist of his local cinema, Alfredo. It is full of delightful touches,such as Toto stealing a frame of film from behind Alfredo\'s back, or when Toto helps Alfredo during an exam so he can be allowed into the projection booth, or perhaps best and simplest of all of all Toto\'s spellbound face as he watches the footage that will be censored by the town priest. The cinema is portrayed as almost being the centre of life in the town Giancaldo in which the film is mostly set. The actual sequences set in the cinema are full of wonderful observation and even some belly laughs. There\'s the man who only goes to the cinema to sleep and is always awoken by kids, the couple who see each other for the first time because everyone else is cowering from Dr Jekyll And Mr Hyde, the old man who says "no, this is IMPORTANT" when everyone else "booos" the news-all human life is here, with more observations and insights than in any Mike Leigh film. This section climaxes in a scene which is simply magical, when Alfredo projects a film onto the wall of a house so everyone can see it.\n\nAs the film moves forward several years to show Toto as a 16 year old, the wonderful cinema scenes are still present. Who can forget the cinema usher telling off a group of young boys for playing with themselves while watching Brigitte Bardot and then sheepishly giving his own manhood a little touch? Director Guiseppe Tornatore also subtly reminds us of changing times, such as when television is first shown in the cinema. However, it is mainly concerned with Toto\'s {now called Salvatore} courtship of the girl he is in love with, Elena. No one who has experienced the pangs of first love can fail to respond to such scenes as Salvatore ranting on to Elena on the phone how much he loves her and realising he\'s actually been talking to her mother, or the beautiful first kiss and embrace in the projection booth {of course}.\n\nIt is in the final section, as Salvatore, now a great film director, returns to Giancaldo as a 50ish man to attend Alfredo\'s funeral,where the humour all but disappears {well, life gets more serious as one gets older, does it not?} and the pace does slow-be warned. It is possibly the most emotional hour of cinema ever, and was cut to about 15 mins in the short version. Salvatore\'s reunion with Elena, which also displays absolutely brilliant acting from Jacques Perrin and Brigitte Fossey, is so painful a sequence, as the two characters pour their hearts out to each other. As Ennio Morricone\'s love theme swells up {a truly heartbreaking piece of music},it ends up being one of the most beautiful love scenes ever filmed. Salvatore\'s reunion with his mother and his exploration of the cobwebbed, dilapidated, cinema are also extremely moving. As for the final scene, where Salvatore opens a certain gift Alfredo left him-well,there\'s been too many spoilers already in this review, but suffice to say it is matchless, simply matchless. It was moving in the short cut, but is three times more meaningful in the director\'s cut.\n\nCinema Paradiso has been called sentimental, but in the director\'s cut it is a darker, deeper kind of sentimentality. Maybe it is still "a love letter to the cinema", but it is also shows that obsessive love of something such as films can also result in sadness and regret. Think of what happens to Alfredo in the film, and as for Salvatore, well, his curse is that he has two loves in his life but success in one of them comes at the expense of the other. The uncut Cinema Paradiso is more then anything else about life and the effect of the decisions we make. O, and the greatest, most heartbreaking love story ever {have I already said this!}', u'0.517701', u'\nWhether you are a professional or an amateur it is always wise to avoid superlatives with regard to a movie critique ... but I cannot. \'Cinema Paradiso\' is simply the finest movie I have ever seen. Like many who have posted at this site before me I have seen it many many times. It reaches within me to places other movies have never reached and I have often wondered why. Perhaps it is because of it\'s simplicity. It contains no expensive special effects, it has no gratuitous sex or violence, it has no "multi-millon dollar per performance" actors that I\nknow of, it is arguable whether it even has a story line, and yet it soars far above the nonsense that film makers are producing these days. It\'s characters are portrayed by each and every actor in award winning style and the music is not only beautiful but absolutely perfect for this film.\n\nIt is quite simply the story of a human life and it\'s tragedies and triumphs within the context of a vocation. A young boy matures and gradually learns the lessons of life, cultivates his passion for the cinema, and is rewarded with professional success; however, he remains unfulfilled for true love has escaped him only to return in the form of a gift of love which transcends time, space, and death to reveal at the closing of the film Toto\'s one true mistress.\n\nA staggering triumph of both the cinematic art and of story telling and yet there may be found people who do not like this movie .... I tend to keep such people at arms length and  maintain a wary eye fixed upon them at all times.', u'0.3372', u'\nI have seen this film at least a dozen times and each time I am carried away to a small village in Italy, where the dreams of a small boy come true and we can join his spellbinding journey.  The Italian language (it is subtitled) adds to the film\'s beauty and music, the characters are so real you can almost smell them.  I am absorbed into "Paradiso" each time I watch it, so that when it is over, I am shocked into the realisation that I haven\'t actually been anywhere except right there, in my theatre seat. I am not a huge "art house" film fan or indeed enjoy subtitled films (it is hard on the old eyes!) but "Paradiso" is a gem and is worth seeing again and again.', u'0.583593', u'Cinema Paradiso is a profoundly important movie because it deals with identifiable emotions/issues that could be considered universal on so many levels. The entire story is retrospective similar to Fellini\'s style as well as a love story that pulls in the viewer on an emotional level. The film also attempts to expose an inkling of Sicilian life, language,(different from Italian) and how "history" has intruded upon and shaped the mentality of the Sicilian people; to also show that traditional concepts of what is "moral" or right is not to be taken for granted because of the people and their particular history. For those who do not fancy history or non-fiction, the film attempts to educate the "outsider" not familiar with Sicilian history as it pertains to the WWII era. I watch it again and again and see more and more details that pertain to the story. I did see it on the big screen at a local theater back in 1991 and it was a hit with the audience. I have several scenerio that I think could make it more interesting and am very curious about the uncut version and what is different about it. Finally, the movie does make me cry because it is after all a love story and it is clear at the end that Toto (aka Salvatore)is still in love with Elena and that is why he never married or settled down "..to love one person. . . " as his mother says to him after his 30 year absence from home. The final scene of the credits also shows him looking at Elena again and the look on his face is telling. This film has many little "hints" that serve to inform the viewer and give just a little more info. about the story. Truly, one of the best films I have ever seen !!! These characters come alive and we feel like we know them--personally. Viva Giuseppe Tornatore for his masterpiece!', u'0.430168', u"Giuseppe Tornatore's Nuovo cinema Paradiso (Cinema Paradiso) is everything good about the movies. It is a story about love. The love between a Father and Son, an Individual and his home, and the love for the movies. Even if this is not your favorite film, if you are a filmmaker, you have no choice but to say this is your all time favorite film (if not one of the greatest films ever made). If only for the movie's ending, this is a great film. The ending answers all of your questions and completes the story. The missing love from a Man's life. The missing pieces to all the stories (movies) found and made into a whole. The final message from beyond the grave, the ending is perfect. If the musical score doesn't put you in tears, the amazing visuals will push you over the edge. This is what all movies should be about. Terrific.", u'0.411559', u'\nThis movie is very sentimental, so if you are proud of your cynical side, stay away. \n\nIf you are scared of foreign movies and start foaming at the mouth at a subtitle, stay away.\n\nFor the rest of us, this is a masterpiece!  Enjoy the movie and enjoy yourself!  The end is so beautiful that it is almost unbelievable.\n', u'0.508033', u"\nI continue to be moved and deeply touched by this beautiful film from Italy, and I never tire of watching it. I share the lives of Toto and Alfredo, the small Sicilian boy, who loses his father in the second world war, and the older man who runs the projector at the local cinema. Toto lives in a world of make believe, movies, adventure. His dreams take him away from the small Sicilian village where he lives with his mother and sister. Alfredo becomes for him a surrogate father, and the movies, his paralell existence. It is a\ndeceptively simple film, which sweeps you up and carries you along. You never want it to end. And, when it does end, it is with such heartbreaking simplicity, I cannot help being moved to tears. Young Salvatore Cascio is a\nmarvel as the small Toto, a mischievous, impish, adorable child. Phillipe Noiret is unforgettable as the sly and heart-warming Alfredo. You grow up with Toto, until he becomes a famous film director in Rome, and returns to the small village after many years for Alfredo's funeral. It is the story of life, lost love, devotion, friendship, and family. It is unforgettable.", u'0.833342', u"This 1988 Italian film (released in the US in 1990), is back with a full 51 minutes added on. This seemed like a stupid idea...there was nothing wrong with the original. The directors cut (which was 1/2 hour longer) was considered a mess. Also, for this release, an extra 1/2 hour was added! I expected the worse. Well, I was pleasantly surprised that this 3 hour version is better than the 2 hour one.\n\nThis story follows the life of Salvatore. He's born in a tiny Italian village and we see him as a little boy in the 1930s, an adolescent in the 40s-50s and an adult in the 80s. It basically is about his love of movies and the one true love of his life--Elena. They are in love but she comes from a rich family and he lives in poverty. How can they be together?\n\nPOSSIBLE MINOR SPOILER IN NEXT PARAGRAPH!!!!\n\nThe cut movie in the US excised a lot of the Elena subplot and concentrated on Salvatore's love of movies. There's nothing wrong with that, but Elena disappears quite suddenly. This full version explains what happened between them and fleshes out the characters more. It also reveals a crucial surprise at the end.\n\nThe performances are all fantastic--especially by the gorgeous young actor playing Salvatore as a teenager. Elena is also stunning. The film has beautiful cinematography and a haunting music score. The 3 hours flew by for me. I didn't want it to end! \n\nSo...beautiful music, attractive stars, good acting, compelling story and some incredible romantic sequences. A must-see!!!!\n\nBring plenty of Kleenex though--I cried a least 5 times!", u'0.181295', u'After seeing this special edition DVD which shows the entire 174-minute film (in addition to the 121-minute one that most of us had seen over the years,) my rating of this film was elevated. This review is of the longer "director\'s cut."\n\nMost of the new footage involved the main\'s character\'s romance while he was a young man. The story then is continued years later when that character comes back to his hometown for a funeral and runs into the woman he was in love with but never was able to get for his own. It turns out to be a somewhat tragic love story.\n\nThe first part of the film, with Salvatore Cascio as "Toto" a young boy is a love story about two people sharing their love of movies: the kid and an adult "Alfredo" (Phillpe Noiret) who runs the local movie theater. Their love of film bonds them for life.\n\nThe word "love" is used repeatedly in this review because that\'s the dominant theme: the love people had for others and for the world of film, something all of us on this website share.\n\nThe second and third parts of the film are the above-mentioned love story of Toto (Marco Leonardi as an adolescent and then Jacques Perrin as an adult) and "Elena" (Agnese Nano/ Brigitte Fossey). The first third of this director;s cut edition is much livelier and interesting, frankly, than the last two-thirds. Although not boring, it does drag in a few spots but the longer version is better in the long run because it makes the whole story much more meaningful.\n\nIt\'s very nicely filmed and you get a real feel for the Italian people and their little town. The director of the movie, Giuseppe Tornatore, went on to make other great visual films, two of which I also like: Malena and The Star Maker.....but Cinema Paradiso, I believe, is considered his "masterpiece."', u'0.646001', u'This movie definitely is one of my all time best movies. Director Giuseppe Tornatore placed himself in the list of the best directors. The usage of an excellent background score is a trademark of his movies and this movie is not at all a different case.\n\nHe is also a master in getting best performances out of children and adolescents. Marco Leonardi was the pick of the whole cast. Also watch Melena for those trademarks of Tornatore.\n\nThe character of Alfredo is one of the most unforgettable characters. The way emotions captured in a camera is way beyond naturality.\n\nOverall, this is a great movie with ultimate teamwork with everyone contributing. I just loved the movie very much.', u'0.598637', u'\nSpoiler warning for anyone who hasn\'t seen this classic yet...ok? Don\'t read this review if you haven\'t seen at least one version of Cinema Paradiso.\n\nFirst of all, I was born in Italy, so I was extremely proud when Cinema Paradiso won the Oscar for best foreign film as well as the hearts of all movie goers when it was released. Also, I am a hopeless romantic who absolutely adores movies! So this movie was right up my alley on many levels!\n\nI saw the shorter version as most of us did when it came out in the US, and only recently saw the full uncut Director\'s version.  It is one of my all-time favorite movies ever--and still is--but I must admit that I did not experience near the same magic or euphoria that the shorter original version gave me many moons ago! Don\'t get me wrong, I enjoyed the extra 51 minutes because I wanted MORE of a great thing, but as the old saying goes, sometimes less is more! Nothing, I repeat, nothing can match the power of the imagination and thus there in lies the magic and the power of the shorter version! By cutting out the extra scenes, we, the audience, were all left up to our own devices and forced to fill in the blanks ourselves with our imagination and our heart! By seeing everything the way we do in the full blown version, well, despite how sweet it was, it left something to be desired. I enjoyed the reunion (al though the whole flashing light effect grew VERY tiresome after awhile) but I could have done without it.\n\nAlso, the thing that has been eating away at me is the whole question about why in the world Alfredo would (or could!) interfere with his supposed adopted son\'s first true love! Sure, I\'ve been trying to come up with angles and reasons for his insanely cruel action, but nothing will convince me that the writer/director simply screwed up and should not have made the character do such a dastardly deed! Period! I loved the whole notion that he loved his "son" so much that he forced him to leave town and made him promise never to come back again...because we all knew that Alfredo was right...the only way Toto was going to achieve his dream was by leaving their small town and son of a gun if Fredo wasn\'t right! However....for him to be the main reason for the breakup of Toto\'s great love spoils the whole story. I will never watch this version again. I bought the DVD and pray that the original shorter verson that I saw and fell in love with is on the DVD!!!\n\nP.S. Some of my all-time favorite scenes come from this movie: The kiss in the rain (which is the cover on the DVD!) The dialogue where Alfredo tells Toto "I don\'t want to hear you talk anymore. I want to hear people talking about you!" The montague at the end of all the kisses and censored scenes. The haunting images of Elena on Toto\'s little movie projector...\n', u'-0.0905', u'I just saw the director\'s cut after an hiatus of about 10 years since the last time I saw the shorter version of the Cinema Paraiso. The difference between the two versions does not take away from the immeasurable quality and sublime way of telling a story of either film. The director\'s cut does change the focus from the prominence of the love of Alfredo for Toto (Salvatore) in the shorter version to the love between Salvatore and Elena in the longer version. The shorter and longer versions are like watching two movies for the price of one.\n\nThe subtle change of extended story line between the two versions should be studied by all film students who want to take up editing as a career. It is amazing how the absence of some material and the addition of others can develop to such equally impressive but different conclusions. In the first film the closure of Elena\'s role turns out to be final. In the second and longer version the doors are reopened slightly and maybe, just maybe, they may reunite and dispel some of Salvatore\'s lonely existence later on in his life. The shorter version is certainly more of a devised film (in a very good way). Gaps are left for us to fill in with our own interpretations of what could or could not have been. This is true of all art where the author of the work leaves us some space to imagine our own input or contribution to the film. The second film is more cathartic than the first, or more expositional \x96 letting us identify more with the elements of the story than invent them where we seek explanations. Case in point, again, the relationship with Elena: we imagine that she disappears and marries, under her father\'s orders, to some miserable "banking" husband and is lost to the bliss she could have had with Salvatore (at least, that is my invention of what could have happened to her). In the second version she seeks Salvatore so much she marries the next best thing she can find: Boccia \x96 the closest person she can get that approximates him, especially after he has disappeared to Rome.\n\nPhew\x85, that the two versions can become two different movies at the same time and still leave me weeping\x85. Wow! I don\'t even want to start on the excellent photography, the music score, the subtlety of the story telling and the tremendously gifted cast. I kneel and then prostrate humbly before the makers of this most exquisite work of art.', u'0.22185', u"\nSpoilers herein.\n\nAlthough this film has been universally praised in both its short and long versions, I must lodge a converse opinion. And express concern about a viewing public who would so applaud.\n\nThis film was conceived with an intelligent framework, indeed one that I'm disposed to like regardless of the quality of execution. This is a film about films, but instead of the usual star and filmmaker end, it focuses on the effect on the viewer. It further merges one element of film -- visible passion in the kiss -- with the `real' life story depicted. More: it is set in Sicily where we can exploit dry villages and warm North African faces.\n\nBut then it squanders all this wonderful foundation and expends all of its energy on mere sweetness. My gosh, we have the cute imp, who drags his mentor from a burning building! We have that wise man, now blind imparting the mysteries of life. As long as we stuck to the little boy, the charm was tolerable, but it went on and on and on like a triple load of cotton candy. Yes, there is some charm. Yes, there are a few lovely shots (including fireworks). Yes, some of the characters are endearing.\n\n\nBut the director treats us like his portrayed villagers: as long as there is something on the screen, we in our simple lives are supposed to be mesmerized.\n\nThis is the worst sort of film, one that soothes with palliative images and a romantic otherworldiness. If film for you is all about a pleasant escape, this is your movie. If film is instead a means for expanding your world and exploring ideas, stay away. This is Hallmark emptiness, and almost any other Italian (besides Benigni) will do better.\n\nTed's Evaluation -- 2 of 4: Has some interesting elements.\n", u'0.243566'], u'tt0056172': [u"I first saw this film on its release, aged 13, and it forms an important part of my transition towards adulthood. I am pleased to see that it consistently rates 20something in the IMDb listings, even from others (whom I envy, for I can't see it with fresh eyes) who are seeing it for the first time. Pleasing too is that some of those are also teenagers, for whom a forty-three year old film must itself seem part of the past. As for the minority who are bored by intentionally slow pacing (and for whom punctuation, paragraphing and grammar are a lost art), I suggest they learn a little about the history of film-making (from which it may become apparent that much of today's fast editing techniques were invented in the 1920s: try Eisenstein's October, for example).\n\nFrom the universally admired cinematography of Freddie Young, the long shot of Omar Sharif's floating mirage entry, the pre-CGI battles and pan-up scene changes, to O'Toole's florid but career-defining performance and the (then) novel time-shift narrative, this film set standards not matched even by Lean himself, and, as many reviewers have commented, financially and practically unlikely to be attempted today. I too have rarely seen such clarity of image outside of Imax, and in my view the script by Robert Bolt (and I now have learnt, an uncredited Michael Wilson) is the finest in cinema. Maurice Jarre's music and some of the acting style now seem a little excessive, but repeated viewing (around 35 times in my case) does not diminish the impact and quality, and the restoration and now DVD release still, after all these years, approaches the effect of that first 1962 viewing.\n\nIt is rare that repeated watching of a film (as opposed to a live performance) does this, and the reasons go beyond the photography, performances and editing. In my opinion, it is because the characterisation and storytelling encourage an appreciation of the ambiguity and inconsistency behind our motives and behaviour, and, in a wartime scenario, in the contrast between political expedience and personal morality. For a 13-year old, this opened a window into the adult world, and it explains why the story has resonance far beyond its setting. The film doesn't require an understanding of middle-east politics (though it does have some very current relevance), but it does require an ability to look, listen and understand. The fact that so many people rate it so highly says everything about its wider impact. When The Matrix and even Lord of the Rings have slipped out of the ratings (and the adolescents who inhabit these pages have grown up), I believe this film will still be in the 20s or 30s, perhaps enabling young people to once again see the world through adult eyes.\n\nLike Ali, I fear Lawrence. I fear the power of art to change us, to challenge our preconceptions. Every time I see this film I learn a little more, discover something new. When I was 13 I didn't understand much, but this film helped me to see that I wanted more, knew more, than my peers. I can't rate it more highly than that.", u'0.150663', u'It is, in a way, depressing to watch this movie today. One winds up contrasting it with the sort of technologically slick and aesthetically shallow spectacles, like "Titanic", that garner the sort of adulation that a truly great movie like "Lawrence" received in its day, and one realizes how far we have fallen.\n\nIgnore David Lean\'s painterly technique, the way he fills the screen like a canvas. Ignore Freddie Young\'s stunning cinematography in fulfillment of Lean\'s vision. Ignore the fabulous score by Maurice Jarre. Ignore the stupendous cast. Ignore the topnotch script.\n\nWhat we have, beyond all this, is an absolutely gripping and psychologically perplexing character study of a uniquely enigmatic individual that keeps us on the edge of our seats for the full length of the movie. "Lawrence", at over 200 minutes, goes by faster than many a movie of half its length, due to Lean\'s brilliant pacing and direction, and superb acting all around. To make a comparison in the world of music, this movie, like Mahler\'s 8th symphony, is a universe contained within itself.\n\nOf course, it is an exercise in self-denial and philistinism to watch this movie in anything other than the wide-screen - or "letterbox" - format, due to Lean\'s complete use of every inch of the wide screen. To watch it otherwise is to miss half of Lean\'s intention.\n\nTo use a hackneyed phrase, they simply don\'t make \'em like this anymore.', u'0.0155642', u'I first saw this movie on a scratchy VHS almost twenty years ago (I was 10). Liked it (sort of-enjoyed the battle scenes and the train blowing up), but didn\'t understand why my dad was so crazy about it.\n\nThe next time was on laserdisc (remember those?) almost 10 years ago and I was hooked. I finally got it - the conflict, the performances, the music, the dialogue - all mesmerising.\n\nBut it was only in 2002, when I saw the 40th-anniversary reissue on 70mm that I was completely blown away seeing the scale, the enormity of Lean\'s accomplishment. There were scenes that gave me goosepimples (the opening credits, the cut from the matchstick to the desert sunrise, "nothing is written" - others too numerous to mention).\n\nThe point of this rather rambling review is this - a movie that can evoke such passion in its admirers stands by itself, beyond reviews or criticism. If you haven\'t seen it yet I envy you, because you get to experience it for the first time.', u'-0.00762204', u'I first watched "Lawrence of Arabia" when I was about 11 years old. Being a big fan of Steven Spielberg at that time, I was sort of awed by the fact that this was his personal favorite (check the "conversation with Steven Spielberg" featurette in the special features disk and you\'ll really see Spielberg\'s affection for that film)\n\nOver the years, Lawrence remained among my DVD collection, and I can\'t say I actually watched it since that first time, when, by the way, I didn\'t really like it. But "time does things to movies", and when I watched it again last year, I found my eyes to be weeping at the end. It instantly became one of my favorite movies.\n\nSince then I learned a lot about the history of cinema, and I also learned a great deal about the movies of Sir David Lean. I found my self watching films like "Brief Encounter", "The Bridge on the River Kwai", "Doctor Zhivago", "Ryan\'s Daughter", and the underrated, "A passage to India". Lean became one of my favorite directors, and, just a few months ago, I decided to watch Lawrence with some friends. Although I had seen it a couple of times before, this time it was a different experience altogether: from the starting credits, to the blowing of the match, the crossing of the Nefud dessert, finding Gassim and bringing him back to the camp, the invasion of Aqaba, his torture and rape (?), Lawrence\'s laugh after the slap by the "outrageaous" guy, his being left alone, to the final gaze to the motorcycle. I sensed something when I watched that film, which leaves my with the undoubted feeling that "Lawrence of Arabia" is the greatest film ever made. For me, this is it. Ever since \'62, it\'s been a downfall. No other film has managed to reach Lawrence in its poetic greatness. Few do come very close (Vertigo for instance).\n\nIf we are to classify the two complete different cinematic styles, it would be those of Hitchcock and Ford. Hitch was a very "confined" director. He captured his movies from the point of view of one character. His movies took place, most of the time, in closed spaces. In a sense, Hitchcock\'s films were a journey in people\'s emotions and a study in people\'s characters. On the other hand, Ford was an open director. He wasn\'t confined to one character, or one location, his films where actual journeys. His basis was mostly on theme, and his main ability was to amaze with his imagery. Thus, these are the two different shooting styles....Well, Lean combines both.\n\nWhich is basically why his best film, Lawrence, is the best film of all times. But not only in terms of style. Also, in terms of content. The intelligent script written by Robert Bolt, the powerhouse performances by O\'Toole and Shariff (a shame they didn\'t get the statuette), but also, the ultimately heroic yet tragic figure of T.E. Lawrence, contribute in making this the most visually and emotionally sweeping film of the last 111 years.\n\nSuch a shame that Lean retired for 14 years after "Ryan\'s Daughter", there\'s no way to know where he would have gotten.', u'0.282135', u"\nI am totally amazed by some of the negative responses to this film. Yes it is a long film; a very long film. Perhaps this is a symptom of the short attention spans of people today. But you know what? I wish it was 3 or 4 times longer. Every time this film finishes I compare it to the badly acted special effects laden rubbish that passes for 'epic' cinema these days and wish that T.E Lawrence had his motorcycle accident at 93 (rather than 47 as he did in 1935) so I could have had more of Peter O' Toole's electrifying performance.\n\nThe cinematography is acknowledged as being some of the the best in any film ever. When Mr Lean wanted to capture a sun rise, he stood in the dark (in a REAL desert) and waited for the sun to REALLY rise (No computerized nonsense in this film). As for the reviewer who thought Lawrence looked like a homosexual because he had a 'effeminate' walk, well ... I can only hope that one day he joins the 21st century; hero's aren't all musclebound apes, leaders aren't all fluffy paragons of virtue, and so what if he did turn out to be homosexual?\n\nIf you and you dad like watching a man being whipped before being violated there is, I believe, a wealth of material available to cater for your taste at your local pornography shop.\n\nIn my opinion its one of the best films ever made and certainly the best film I've seen based on real events.\n\nForget the length feel the quality.\n", u'-0.068881', u'\nThe definitive epic of the cinema\'s history. "Lawrence of Arabia" is hands-down the finest production of the 1960s and makes a strong case as the best movie ever made. The titled character (Oscar-nominee Peter O\'Toole in his career-defining role) dies in a freak motorcycle accident in the early-1930s in his homeland of England. In spite of being honored by the nation, many knew nothing of him. Some loved him, others despised him, but no one seemed to know the man at all. Flashbacks immediately start as we meet the character during World War I. He is a lieutenant assigned to mundane duties, but suddenly he is thrust into a greater role in North Africa. He is to assist a Saudi Arabian prince (Alec Guinness). The goal is to fight off the dreaded Turkish regime that poses a threat to the Arabs. If the Turks take over this land in Africa, what will it mean for the English? This concern leads to those in charge (most notably Claude Rains) wanting the titled character to help the Arabs to win their freedom back from the Turks. With the help of allies Omar Sharif (Oscar-nominated) and Anthony Quinn, among a whole host of others, O\'Toole starts to assist the Arabs in their all-or-nothing task. An ambitious American journalist (Arthur Kennedy) wants to tell O\'Toole\'s story in the hopes of getting the U.S. interested in the war (basically trying to get his nation involved in World War I by presenting them with a larger-than-life hero). During the venture O\'Toole becomes a bit war-crazed and looks at himself as a sort of Christ-like figure who thinks of himself as immortal. O\'Toole proves to be someone who is very at home in combat and when the combat is over, will he be able to function properly? Franklin J. Schaffner\'s "Patton" benefited greatly from David Lean\'s (Oscar-winning for directing) masterpiece. This Best Picture Oscar winner from 1962 just grows in importance as the years pass by. "Lawrence of Arabia" is a thinking person\'s film that is much, much deeper than it appears on the surface (and it appears deep on the surface to start with). The film deals with a slice of history that really did not seem that important back during World War I, but the situations in the Middle East now are greatly due to T.E. Lawrence\'s acts nearly a century ago. Did leading the Arabs to freedom make the world a safer place? This is the main question that Lean\'s film raises. Guinness\' character is someone who changes almost immediately near the end of the production and it is a somewhat frightening foreshadower of things to come. A monumental milestone in film-making that stands so tall against all the other great productions of all eras. 5 stars out of 5.    ', u'0.34082', u'Sweeping, epic and literate version of British adventurer and soldier T E Lawrence\'s experiences in Arabia during the First World War. Lawrence, miraculously well played by Peter O\'Toole, "went native" when sent into the desert to find Alec Guinness\'s Prince Feisal. Before long he was striking out himself against the Turkish Ottoman Empire, which still held sway in the region at the beginning of the last century. Lawrence\'s efforts to unify the various Arab factions are particularly prescient.\n\nLawrence became an inspirational warlord whose neutral presence amongst the Arab tribes, lead by Omar Sharif and Anthony Quinn, amongst others, served to glue together shifting and uneasy alliances. As well as wrestling with himself, with his own demons, and with the cruel desert environment, the Englishman was also faced with culture clashes which pitted not only the imperialists against the indigenous populations, but also the mercenary practices of the Arab guerillas against the discipline of the British army. In the end, Lawrence himself does not know which side he is on, nor which party he belongs to. Set against a backdrop of the Arabian desert, the nomadic allies under Lawrence\'s direction, attack and disrupt the Turks\' efforts to maintain control of the territory, whilst the elephant - the British army and its heavy guns under General Jack Hawkins - pushes ever deeper into the area: not until his job is done does Lawrence learn that the French and British governments have carved up the middle-east between them and that the battle-lines for the 21st century are already being drawn.\n\nScripted by the inimitable Robert Bolt and directed by David Lean, Lawrence of Arabia is one of those films without a weakness, despite drawing complaints for its near four hour length. The dialogue, cinematography, soundtrack and especially direction are superlative; likewise the supporting actors. But it is O\'Toole at his charismatic best who steals the show in his starring debut; he never looked back. It may take an effort to watch this movie, but is well worth the ride and will, by the bye, provide some insight into the fractious and volatile world of Arab politics. \n\nOne of the best films ever made.', u'0.422622', u'The fact that 744 people on the Internet Movie Database gave Lawrence of Arabia a "1" one the the 1-10 scale is outright obscene. Not only is Lawrence of Arabia one of the best cinematic achievements of all time, and historically intriguing to boot, it\'s a just plain great film with a little bit of something for everyone, including a rich historical plot, vibrant characters, great setting, and plenty of fabulously choreographed battle scenes. The film is also topical for today\'s society, for example: "Why is terrorism so popular in the middle east today? Well, it might just have something to do with the fact T.E. Lawrence encouraged the Arab tribes to deal with their Ottoman occupiers using bombs and machine guns." How anyone with eyes and ears could dislike this movie that much is beyond my comprehension.', u'-0.1654', u'David Lean\'s "Lawrence of Arabia" is one of the few films that legitimately deserves to be called great\x85 It appears on virtually all "ten best" lists and reveals deeper layers of meaning with repeated viewings\x85 \n\nLean, a man devoted to the art, gives "Lawrence of Arabia" its spectacular values... He unifies the sand and the sun to flame out the silver screen... Maurice Jarre\'s terrific music escorts the appearance and disappearance of the sun below the horizon in the sleepy desert...\n\n"Lawrence of Arabia" is a prodigious labor, a masterful mixture of fact and artistry, a masterpiece of intimate moment and spectacular largesse, a film that literally excites the senses... In a visual sense, Lean combines a sure sense of place with an approach to the action that he borrows from an unlikely source\x97John Ford\x85 Lean turns his vast desert canvas into another Monument Valley, and when his Bedouins ride across it, they are not far removed from Ford\'s cavalry\x85 In many of the early scenes, the stately gait of the camel\'s walk gives the film a slower pace, and this is precisely what Lean is trying to achieve\x85 Lean even manages to surpass Ford with his understanding of the relationship between his characters and the landscape; how the desert changes those who go into it\x85\n\nThe film is the story of a solitary adventurer who always knew he was different, but in Arabia he discovers that his proportions are heroic... Perhaps this is the secret of Lawrence of the legends \x97 that at the bottom of all the violent action is a protagonist about whom one cares... A puzzling personality whom one glimpses but never fully understands... Throuhout the picture one has a sense of a man discovering his own unique dimensions...\n\nLawrence\'s mission, largely his own creation, is to unite the feuding Bedouin tribes under the leadership of Prince Feisal (Alec Guinness), and to keep the British politicians, as personified by Mr. Dryden (Claude Rains), from putting the Arabs under their colonial thumb after World War I is over\x85 It is accomplished through a semi-episodic series of battles and raids where Lawrence is sometimes accompanied by Ali (Omar Sharif) and Sheik Auda (Anthony Quinn), and equally difficult bureaucratic struggles he faces with Gen. Allenby (Jack Hawkins).\n\nAll the conventional elements of the genre are at peaks of excellence here: The stretch desert with its white golden sands; peril, anywhere and everywhere; danger\x96for Lawrence of Arabia is a film about guerrilla warfare; prowess\x96Lawrence crosses Sinai on foot; physical torture\x96Lawrence in the hands of the Turkish bey; impossible mission\x96 Lawrence takes the seaport of Jordan from behind; ruthlessness\x96Lawrence shouting \'take no prisoners\' leading his men to put to death a Turkish column... \n\nEvery component is here, everything one needs for a great adventure film, many spectacular sequences, each of them so perfect: Lean cuts to the sun again and again, turning it into a character; the scene in Feisal\'s tent when Lawrence first talks with the king; Lawrence striding on top of a captured train, parading before rows of cheering Arabs; the scene between Lawrence and Ferrer illuminating Lawrence\'s strange perversity, a mixture of masochism and repressed homosexuality; the scene when a Beduin prince appears on his camel, an exceedingly long take in which a strange figure is first resolved out of waves of heat and then, as he approaches, becomes a frightening threat to Lawrence\'s escort at the desert well...\n\nThe photography, the script and the acting are so superb that "Lawrence of Arabia" becomes a lavish epic winner of 7 Academy Awards for Best Picture, Directing, Color, Cinematography, Sound, Muscial Score and Film Editing...', u'0.374222', u'\nWhen it come to making epics, David Lean is the master and what better proof than this masterpiece.  "Lawrence Of Arabia" was first shown in 1962 and after almost 40 years later, it is still beautiful.  The story of T. E. Lawrence is wonderfully brought to us by David Lean, director of another masterpiece called "The Bridge On The River Kwai".\n\nDavid Lean has shown us a man\'s long, yet never boring (at least for me) journey into the deserts of Arabia.  Lawrence (Peter O\'Toole) is an ordinary man that becomes a hero (at least in my eyes) during his extensive tenure in Arabia.  He becomes a traveler, a great man, and a leader to the people that he has associated with.  Only director David Lean could have given us a movie experience like this.\n\nAn assortment of phenomenal actors are collected for this movie and what a cast!  Peter O\'Toole, Omar Sharif, Anthony Quinn, Alec Guiness and so much more portray their characters with intensity and believability.  Never have I been so impressed. As Lawrence, Peter O\'Toole plays the role of which his name is most associated with and is surprising for me that he made the role his own because before I got a chance to see this movie I imagined a man opposite from someone like Peter O\'Toole.  Omar Sharif as Ali is one of the most charismatic characters in film history.  I will not say anymore about the cast because I\'m allowed only 1,000 words to use in my comment.\n\nWill all do respect to classics such as "Gone With The Wind" and even "Bridge on the River Kwai"this is without a doubt the most exciting epic of all time.  I highly recommend it!', u'0.455588', u'LAWRENCE OF ARABIA, released in 1962, is one of the best motion pictures ever made. Be that as it may, LAWRENCE OF ARABIA contains one particular scene that is my favorite out of all the thousands of movies I have viewed over the past 50 years. To my mind, this scene is the most beautiful, most joyous and wonderful cinematic experience.\n\nSo I would like for you to experience this scene from LAWRENCE OF ARABIA as well, but you must do the following. Watch it on the biggest and best screen available to you, turning up the sound to movie theater volume. Additionally, the scene won\'t be appreciated unless you watch LAWRENCE OF ARABIA from the very beginning, including "The Overture".\n\nThe scene begins at night, just before sunrise. Lawrence and his "army" have succeeded in crossing the "sun\'s anvil" portion of the Nefud desert. Lawrence then notices there is a camel with no rider. It is Gassim\'s camel; perhaps Gassim fell asleep and fell off the camel and could not catch the camel in time to remount? Lawrence decides to turn back and rescue Gassim if that is the case.\n\nThis is where the scene begins. It ends when Lawrence, completely exhausted, looks at the ground and falls onto a mat into a deep sleep. Everything that happens in between is the most enjoyable piece of cinematic art I\'ve ever seen and is now there for you to discover and enjoy. This is all I will reveal.', u'0.187546', u"This film requires no introduction. It's one of the greatest movies ever made if not the best. Truly inspiring. It leaves me with the feeling that I would have liked to have met Lawrence but being born 37 years after his death regrettably this will never happen! I went to see the movie in the National Film Theatre, London in order to see the panorama on the big screen. Well worth the trip even if you have seen the movie on DVD. He was arguably one of the greatest englishmen to walk the earth. Why doesn't anyone make films like this anymore?! Thank God for David Lean's work. Looking forward to viewing this film again and again on DVD.", u'0.274146', u"Spoilers herein. \n\nThere are films that define a time. There are films that define a genre. There are films that define cinema. 'Lawrence of Arabia' defines all of the above. Within its frames 'Lawrence of Arabia' captures the essence of a man, a time and place with unparalleled cinematic magic. Though a winner of 7 Oscars and one of the Top 100 ticket sellers of all time, most people were not able to see 'Lawrence of Arabia' the way it was intended until 1989 (and I still imagine most people have only seen it during one of its annual Christmas TV viewings). Steven Spielberg, Martin Scorsese and Robert Harris deserve massive applause for their efforts to restore this film to its 2.20:1 widescreen, 220 minute glory. \n\nI, myself (thankfully) have never seen any other version of this film. So when I first saw the film it was in its untainted glory and it's an experience I shall never forget. Never before had I seen a film that blurred the lines between storytelling and art so much. Never before had I seen a film so assured in visual storytelling. Never before had I been so transplanted into a film's world. The awesome acting, the stupendous story, the remarkable visuals, the sublime script, the fascinating dialogue and majestic music all combine to make a film like none other.\n\n'Lawrence of Arabia' is played out in five acts, each one of them represents a different part of Lawrence's psyche. The first act is Lawrence's introduction into Arabia where he is very much an Englishman \x96 albeit an outcast. The second act concerns his assimilation into Arabia, the taking of Aqaba and his rise to deity. The third portrays Lawrence at the peak of his military career and his growing egotism. The fourth act is his capture, torture, mental breakdown and dissertation of his troops. The fifth concerns his comeback, revenge and both his greatest and most flawed accomplishment: the slaughter of Turks and the liberation of Damascus. Every scene in these acts is essential to the development of his persona. Lean and Bolt raise the question of who Lawrence was, but they never answer the question. This is one factor that brings me back to the film time and time again \x96 each time I watch the film I am left with a different perception of Lawrence's character.\n\nThe film contains an all star cast including Peter O'Toole, Omar Sharif, Alec Guinness, Jack Hawkins and Claude Rains. Only 'JFK' rivals it in my view. Of course, there was been many all star casts that haven't performed to their usual standards, but it is not the case here. Everyone is on top of there game especially Peter O'Toole who gives the greatest cinematic performance I have ever seen. From extremes of joyous extremes and heated contempt he dominates the screen with undeniable screen presence and charisma. Many an actor would be lost on screen amidst all the sand, but O'Toole never is. Watch Lawrence's scene in the mess hall near the beginning then watch his immense 'No prisoners' scene \x96 the change is remarkable. Omar Sharif is also superb and it is easy to see why he became a big international star following his charismatic performance.\n\nI have never been a fan of desert films and find the majority of them boring, but Freddie Young's 70mm widescreen photography brings the desert alive in such an exciting and absorbing way. The film is simply full of memorable and beautiful scenes such as Sharif's introduction, the long pan over the assault on Aqaba or the glorious reveal from a purple flag of Lawrence and Sheriff Ali leading their final army. 'Lawrence of Arabia' is a unique visual experience and one you will not forget in a hurry.\n\nAlthough it comes in at over three and a half hours, 'Lawrence of Arabia' never lulls and if not for the forced DVD intermission I doubt I would move at all while watching it. The innovative editing (including some of the most famous examples of direct-cutting) keeps the film moving at a brisk pace. There are no gratuitous scenes. Every scene is a required piece of the puzzle. Maurice Jarre's phenomenal music also helps keep the film going. I'm sure some of the scenes of people crossing the desert would have been tedious without his music, but with his majestic music transplanted over the images they are simply compulsive viewing. \n\nThe epic action scenes are breath-taking in their scope and execution. But what gives them their impact is that Lean (perhaps limited by censorship laws) is not concerned with the visceral thrill of battle, but rather the effect they have on the battlers. What drives men to war and what do they get from it. And thankfully the action scenes are succinct and progressive with no blasted shaky-cam or CGI troops. Everything you see on screen is real and was performed, which just adds to the gob-smacking sense of the shots. It is this sense of realism that deepens the experience.\n\nIf one's respect for 'Lawrence of Arabia' is not enamored after viewing the film, perhaps it will be when thinking that we will NEVER see a film like this again. No studio would take the risk of a project this big that excludes many of their 'key demographics' and 'film rules'. There are no talking parts for women. There is no love interest. There is no happy ending. 'Lawrence of Arabia' a product of Hollywood showing its balls, which for many a year it seems to have lost. 'Lawrence of Arabia' is an awe-inspiring Goliath of cinematic perfection. The best film I can lay claim to having seen.", u'0.225738', u'The moment David Lean makes you aware you are in the hands of a master comes early on in "Lawrence of Arabia." Lawrence (Peter O\'Toole) holds a lit match close to his lips and with one quick puff of air blows it out. Before the action is even completed, however, Lean has cut to a shot of a desert vista, with the sun slowly rising over the lip of the horizon. It\'s one of the most famous elliptical edits in cinema history, second maybe only to the bone/spaceship cut in "2001: A Space Odyssey." And it\'s only the first of countless memorable moments in "Lawrence of Arabia." The appeal of David Lean epics has always been his ability as a director to maintain an equilibrium between the scope of his films and the characters in them. Character development is never sacrificed to massive set pieces or knock-your-socks-off action sequences. "Lawrence of Arabia" has these elements too, but at heart it\'s a character study of one remarkable man. Lean seemed to understand that impressive landscapes alone are not inherently interesting; but if you place a fascinating character among those impressive landscapes, you can have movie magic.\n\n"Lawrence" feels unlike other historical epics of its time. In most "big" films--I\'m thinking of movies like "Ben-Hur," "Spartacus," "Cleopatra," all movies that premiered roughly around the same time as "Lawrence"--one gets the sense that directors framed compositions based on how much they were able to fit into their widescreen lenses. One rarely sees characters filmed from anything closer than a medium shot, and usually the background is stuffed to overflowing with garish art direction. Everything feels static and wooden. But in "Lawrence," Lean keeps his frames constantly alive by juxtaposing huge landscape shots with extreme close-ups of actor faces. In one especially brutal scene, after a battle that results in the slaughter of many people, the action cuts to a close-up of O\'Toole, looking panicked and crazed, gripping a bloody knife in his hand as if he\'s reluctant to drop it, obviously both disturbed and titillated by the carnage he just witnessed. It\'s moments like that---not just an impressive battle scene but a character\'s reactions to the results of that scene---that set "Lawrence" apart from other standard epics.\n\nAnd of course, I have to reserve space in my review for the performance of Mr. O\'Toole. He is perhaps my favorite actor, not one of the most prolific, but certainly one of the most unpredictable. He has a flair for choosing eccentric characters that give him almost unlimited room in which to perform. He carries "Lawrence of Arabia" almost singlehandedly on his slim shoulders. That\'s not to say the supporting cast isn\'t great, but O\'Toole towers above them all. O\'Toole understands that the most influential figures in history could also be the most difficult and ruthless when they needed to be, and he gives Lawrence an incredibly complex characterization, leaving his audience in doubt as to whether he should be worshiped or feared, or perhaps both.\n\nLean would never direct an equal to "Lawrence of Arabia" again. His later films are certainly more than watchable, and "A Passage to India" is even quite remarkable in its own way, but we would never get another "Lawrence." Even more reason to appreciate it now.\n\nMy Grade: A+', u'0.186564', u"A man has an inner drive that makes him peculiar and intense. He goes to the desert and falls in love with it and its people. Gaining powerful sponsors, he has a grand vision that he accomplishes by inspiring and directing thousands. But in a very short time, that grand work is compromised and disassembled by fat cats in offices who are concerned with different values.\n\nTrue of both Lawrence and Lean. The legacy of Lawrence is still in violent disarray (I write this a short time after the Sept 11 attacks on New York). But Lean's vision was saved, and what a vision! Of this picture, it can be said that it is perfect if only because it is so visionary that it defines its own rules.\n\nLean's vision is also lean, with vast zones of sonic and visual silence -- several meditations on the unperceived. Though there is a story (who are you?) this is really a film of TE's 'Seven Pillars,' which creates a romantic vision of sculpted natural forces. So powerful a depiction that Islam experienced a faddish attraction in the West, a place now enjoyed by Tibetan Buddhism. That was before.\n\nSee here the original Obiwan, every intonation, movement and dress. See here Peter O'Toole's personality become completely entwined with the character, who is as fictionalized by our eye as by Lowell's. See the most expressive, anthropomorphic train wreck in history.\n\nWatch a particularly interesting brand of acting by the 'Arabs.' Macho men are acting anyway, so an actor can play an actor when he lands such a role.\n\nThe star of the film is the clever eye of God, not the clockmaker or judge of the west but the chess player of the mirage. Its face is clearest in my mind when the Turk holds TE down for torture and smiles. Its hand in the creaking of Feisal's tent -- who would ever imagine the wind acting? (Kurosawa's 'Ran' at the beginning is the only other example I know.)\n\nI have a few films I admire for various. mostly intellectual qualities. But in the direct matter of visual storytelling, this one tops my list.", u'0.203353'], u'tt0071853': [u'\nThis is perhaps one of the greatest, funniest parodies in the history of film. I think the greatest definition of irony is that to be believably stupid on screen, you have to be very intelligent. This is a rare occasion where something can be so stupid that it\'s funny, with the addition of feeling you got your money\'s worth at the end. Examples of failures would be anchorman, austin powers, scary movie etc. The gore and clich\xe9s of three headed, and goofy "NI!" yelling knights are what give this movie discreet beauty.\n\nDid I mention that the acting is also very good for a movie of this sort. All of the main characters, as they do in the series, take on numerous characters, all of whom are well established and each have their quirks about them. This was a well written, well thought out, and perfectly directed, low budget comedy. The funniest of any monty python film, and amongst the top comedies of all time. I laughed from beginning to end and bruised one of my lungs. I highly recommend this film to anyone. This is living proof that all you need is a good script and good actors.\n', u'0.486713', u'\nWell, this is unquestionably one of the funniest movies ever made. The first time a saw it I laughed to tears and this is the only time that counts. The first time you get the best experience. I really envy those who haven\'t seen it yet. \n\nFrom the opening scene to the sudden ending this one won\'t let you leave the room. Especially the opening scene: "Are you trying to say that coconuts migrate" or when John Cleese trying to be Tarzan, hanging on the rope said: "Can somebody give me a push." An absolute masterpiece.\n\n\nConsidering the low budget that the creators of the movie had at their disposal would probably make "The Holy Grail" the best movie in this genre-silly nonsense kind of stuff. It shows the great creativity and acting capabilities of the Monty Python crew. It comes to say that a movie can be made with a little bit of money - a great movie. 10 out of 10\n\n', u'0.228321', u'\nKing Arthur and his Knights of the Round Table set out on a quest to find the Holy Grail...as told to do so by a cartoon God that lives in the clouds... \n\nEasily the most hilarious and original comedy ever made, Monty Python and the Holy Grail claims it\'s undisputed throne through insanely ridiculous situations and characters that will very likely never be duplicated. Pure comedic genius that doesn\'t go stale with age or decades of competition having been released. Simply seeing the way comedy films are made today, this film will very likely have a long reign before anything can even hold a candle to it. An absolute belly-laugh fest that never lets up.\n\nOnly the cast of Monty Python could have pulled this film off, with each actor playing many different characters...all hilarious! The genius in the actors\' lines themselves are truly to be admired. The comedic style of talking in circles is one technique that most comedies do not try to do, simply because they can\'t compete with the genius of this film, which uses it flawlessly. Those that do try usually fall flat on their faces. Two particularly excellent examples of this can be seen in the beginning scene, in which the characters discuss the origins of coconuts.....and the other when Lancelot breaks into the swamp castle to save the "damsel in distress."  This is merely one technique that the cast has perfected to conjure up laughs consistently throughout the entire film. The only way that I can imagine that someone might not like this film is if they simply do not enjoy it\'s type of humor. Too bad for them.\n\nAnother hilarious technique used in the film is the use of comedy in the background. From people slamming cats against poles for no apparent reason, to people filling up baskets with mud in the fields....all very strange and hilarious at the same time. It\'s also simply amazing that all of the characters are played by the same group of actors, which shows the great range all of them have. Some are simply unrecognizable from one character to the other and it sometimes takes a good eye to pick them out, which makes it fun. And I don\'t want to ruin it for anyone, but this film takes some turns that no sane person could see coming.\n\nRidiculous characters in ridiculous situations equals ridiculous laughter.\n\nThe epitome of all-star comedy that will no doubt continue to stand the test of time. Kudos to Gilliam and the rest of the Python crew. If you haven\'t seen it yet, make it your first priority in life!', u'0.160449', u'\nMonty Python have long been a source of amusement ...and from the opening scenes of this film with the never tiring *gallop gallop* of the two coconuts substituting horses it is so very easy to see why Monty Python and the Holy Grail will forever be classic that any aspiring comedian should view for FLAWLESS comedy...this film has everything one could wish for, 5 of the best comedians performing superb sketches in a feature length film..the one liners are memorable and the locations even more so...the rabbit is my favourite....arggggggggh!', u'0.950808', u"The first time I saw this was on CBS at 11:30 on a Friday night. I had seen a few Monty Python shows on PBS, so I knew who they were, and I was very interested in seeing this.\n\nThis film shows you just what all around comedy is all about.\n\nIt starts during the opening credits and ends in a way you don't see coming. The songs are....memorable. The drawings/animation are imaginative for its time and the Monty Python troupe was at its shining best playing a host of characters from the days of King Arthur. If you don't laugh at this today, you have no funny bone! Many other reviewers here hit this film on the nose, there isn't much more to add to how brilliant this piece of work it.\n\nThis is one of my all time favorites and is one of the top 10 films of all time.", u'0.153464', u"\nMonty Python and the Holy Grail is hilarious. It was sort of my introduction to Monty Python and I became hooked on it after watching this. It's just so funny! We've all heard the story of King Arthur and how he pulled Excalibur out of the stone, etc. and in this movie, the Monty Python troupe basically parodies that legend. What more can I say? They're geniuses! Anyone who's ever seen 'Flying Circus' or 'Life of Brian' or anything else Python-related can probably back that up. If you want to become an addict (like me) this is a good place to start. You'll probably laugh hardest during the 'killer rabbit' scene.", u'0.33078', u"This is such a great film that a professor of mine actually used it in a Medieval Civilization class as extra credit. This was not because the movie was so historically accurate, but because the movie was so much funnier when we applied what we learned in her class to it! It was really hard to pick only 10 funny lines!\n\nTo anyone that watched it once and didn't quite get it or got frustrated the first time, here is a tip: Catch it on DVD with the subtitles or closed-captioning on. That way you will be sure to catch all of the French insults and the other one-liners that fly by so fast! I don't recommend doing that with kids in the room - my 7-year-old picked up a couple of words on the screen that he had missed previously...\n\nEnjoy!", u'-0.179795', u"In the Realm of King Arthur, the Monty Python team set out on a quest to recruit the best Knights in the kingdom and find the Holy Grail.\n\nThis is Classic Python Mayhem, where we encounter Killer rabbits, Knights who go Nee! and Horny Nuns who lure the unsuspecting in with there Grail Shaped Beacon.\n\nThe Cast all give Typically Hilarious Performances, bringing another must see to the Python Loving Audience.\n\nIf You Like Monty Python, you'll love it, if you don't then stay away.\n\nIf you've never seen Monty Python before then give it a try, yes it's dated but its still great fun.\n\n9/10\n\nAlso see, The Life Of Brian and The Meaning of Life", u'0.443714', u'I do know, however, that Monty Python and the Holy Grail is one of the funniest movies ever made. Let\'s face it, if the Python hadn\'t showed up in 1969, someone would have created them by now, or the world would be a much sadder place. Alongside Life of Brian, which is the sextet\'s masterpiece, Holy Grail is an excellent start if you want to get addicted to their surreal humor.\n\nAs suggested in the title, the film deals with the Arthurian stories, freely reinterpreted by the Python ensemble: after recruiting his knights, including Sir Lancelot (John Cleese), Sir Robin (Eric Idle), Sir Bedevere (Terry Jones) and Sir Galahad (Michael Palin), King Arthur (Graham Chapman) embarks on a mission from God (also Chapman, voice only though): to seek and find the Holy Grail. No need to say, the journey is going to be perilous, but also hilarious, our heroes doing their "best" to screw everything up.\n\nAs in Life of Brian, there are so many good bits choosing just one or two feels reductive and disrespectful, given the material. It\'s pure comedy gold from start to finish, a non-stop gag marathon: from the mock Scandinavian subtitles in the opening credits to the argument about swallows, from the Killer Rabbit to the Black Knight and the jaw-dropping epilogue, you will keep grinning like never before (if you\'re unfamiliar with these comedians, that is). Actually, after some serious thinking I can select two particular sequences as particularly memorable: the Knights who say "Ni!" and the Bridge of Death. The rest of the film is ace too, but those two scenes are the ones I can\'t stop thinking of fondly whenever the movie is mentioned.\n\nOh, and let\'s not forget Terry Gilliam\'s vital contribution: he doesn\'t appear that much as an actor (his Bridgekeeper is absolute genius, though), but he compensates that with the remarkable animations used to depict part of this epic adventure. Speaking of epic, this picture has one of the most brilliant tag-lines in comedy history, if not film history in general.\n\nOh yes, the world wouldn\'t be quite the same without the Monty Python. Even the most miserable person on the planet will laugh like a lunatic after viewing any of their films.\n\nP.S. Ni!', u'0.241144', u'From a technical viewpoint, "Monty Python and the Holy Grail" could be called a seriously flawed and impaired film. Filmed on location in the UK with a minimal budget and regular "Python" cast members, I seriously doubt that anyone working on the project at the time had believed it would spark such a cultural phenomenon. And revisiting the movie now, post its release 28 years ago, is magical.\n\nFirst-time viewers may be puzzled by the film\'s odd opening--in fact, stories of those who thought that they had entered into the wrong screening room come in abundance. But as soon as the voice of the coarse British man is audible the viewer realizes that he or she has been duped once again by the Python Troupe.\n\nKing Arthur and his Knights of the Round Table have been sent on a most glorious quest by God Himself--to seek and maintain the Holy Grail, the legendary cup that Christ drank from during The Last Supper, prior to His execution, and which later caught His blood as he was left danging upon the cross.\n\nBut the seriousness surrounding the Holy Grail is left wholly untouched by the members of Monty Python--instead, we follow King Arthur and his men as they come upon an odd assortment of characters, including The Black Knight, Dennis, The Knights Who Say "Ni!", and The Killer Rabbit, all of whom hinder the daring soldiers in their quest for the Holy Grail.\n\nMany people will find the humor of "Monty Python and the Holy Grail" ingenious, while others will find the exact same jokes and stints repetitive and ridiculous. I myself did not enjoy the film the first time I saw it as a child, but over the years I have come to appreciate its humor a bit more. I still find the jokes a bit too stretched out at times, and certain gags, though hilarious the first ten times, get a bit humorless the twentieth time around (the coconuts, for example, which are amazingly silly when first introduced, soon become tiring when they are treated as the highlight of a joke repetitively). However, often enough the jokes introduced at certain points in the films are merely played in the background further into the film--for example, the fact that the men do not ride on horses is quite a major idea the first time it is revealed, and becomes the central subject of a conversation between Arthur and the man atop the castle battlements. But later on the notion of no horses is played smaller and in the background as so we can concentrate on the current jokes at hand, as well as the missing horses as an added bonus.\n\nThere is absolutely nothing to truthfully discuss about "Monty Python and the Holy Grail," other than to say that at first it seems quite obnoxious, but it starts to grow on you. And this movie has definitely made a deep dig into our culture. In fact, on the commentary track for the newer DVD, John Cleese mentions that a pro American football player (or "footballer" as the English call them) and his buddy were thinking of a plan in the midst of a serious game. Their strategy was this on the field: Run away! Run away!\n\nThere are countless classic scenes, including the battle between The Black Knight and King Arthur ("I\'ve had worse!"); the scene where Sir Lancelot the Brave (or Launcelot, as the script for the film names him) storms the Swamp Castle in hopes of rescuing a fair maiden and, in result, ends up destroying everything in his path (including the candle mounted along the wall leading to the spiralling staircase), saying that he gets a bit frantic and over-excited in this genre; Sir Robin and the Three-Headed Knight ("...when danger reared its ugly head he bravely turned his tail and fled..."); The Knights Who Say "Ni!" and their request for a shrubbery; the Killer Rabbit\'s attack on Arthur\'s merry men. That\'s just to name a few memorable scenes.\n\n"Monty Python and the Holy Grail" may be the silliest film ever put on celluloid. It rarely makes sense, sometimes falls a bit flat, but always puts a smile on your face. And that\'s an achievement.', u'-0.0664022', u'Well, if you want original humor, meaning something different than what you normally see - this is your ticket. The above statement was true 30 years ago, and still holds. It\'s just silly, far-out humor.\n\nIt\'s not all winners, no comedy is, but there are enough of them, and enough classic bizarre scenes that it\'s always a hoot to re-visit this film from time to time. The only problem I have with it are the cheap shots in gives - in typical 1970s fashion - of anything Biblical. But, it\'s not that bad and most of the film is pretty innocent.\n\nIt\'s pretty much one ludicrous scene after another. I mean, where else do you see a knight fighting on after his legs are chopped off, then his arms?!! Or a killer rabbit? It was almost like watching a Marx Brothers film 40 years later with \'70s irreverence.\n\nDon\'t let the PG rating fool you. This would be an easy PG-13 today with all the blood, some cursing and the violence. I know some young kids, however - nice kids, too - who love this film as much as adults, so it can\'t be too offensive. \n\nIf I had to describe this movie in one word it would be "lunacy."', u'-0.00640162', u'I heard a lot of things about Monty Python and the Holy Grail from my friends who had seen it. They said that it was the funniest movie that they had ever seen, and so I suggested that I must pick up this movie on DVD and watch it. So, I sat down, watched it and I agree that this is probably one of the, if not, "the" best comedy ever made.\n\nSTORY: Monty Python and the Holy Grail follows Arthur, King of the Britons (Graham Chapman) and his servant Patsy (Terry Gilliam); who they\'re looking for some knights to join them at Camelot. When they meet, King Arthur gets a message from God that he and his fellow knights must go on a quest to find the Holy Grail. When they do that, they come across very ridiculous, but rather amusing encounters.\n\nMY THOUGHTS: The humor in Monty Python and the Holy Grail is so silly and clever that it blows every American comedy that has been made in the last couple of years out of the water. British comedy literally isn\'t painfully dumb than American comedy, although ridiculous, the humor in British comedy can make you laugh. That\'s what I liked a lot in Monty Python and the Holy Grail; is the humor.\n\nSome of the animations are beautifully drawn and it gives a way to set up the subplot; just excellent. The way they used coconut halves and banging them together to make it sound like a horse trotting is so amusingly clever. The encounters were so funny and genuinely amusing, especially the encounter with The Black Knight, which I think is one of the silliest scenes in the history of comedy ("\'Tis but a scratch." "Just a flesh wound."). And the part where King Arthur and his knights come across a French soldier who is taunting, another very hilarious scene ("I fart in your general direction. Your mother was a hamster, and your father smelt of elderberries."). There is also more, which I won\'t give away because I don\'t want to spoil the whole movie for everybody who hasn\'t seen this movie.\n\nThe main characters and a few of the supporting characters like Tim the Enchanter and Prince Herbert are very likable, hilarious, and well-developed. Although the rest have short appearances, they were funny as well. There were a lot of silly moments in Monty Python and the Holy Grail that I suggest that people should definitely check out.\n\nTHE ACTING: The acting in this is excellent and very funny. Graham Chapman, John Cleese, Terry Gilliam, Eric Idle, among the other guys from "Monty Python", they do excellent playing multiple roles.\n\nIN CONCLUSION: Monty Python and the Holy Grail is \x96 without a doubt \x96 the best comedy ever made. I can\'t recommend this movie enough. This is definitely worth checking out.\n\n10/10', u'0.412694', u'This has got to be one of the side-splittingly funniest films of all time.No one can deliver such cerebral humor as the pythonians,and this is truly their finest hour(OK,so its about an hour and a half).This film doesn\'t even wait for the show to begin to start you laughing,it goes for the throat during the opening credits(sorry I don\'t want to ruin it for you).It made me laugh till my tears were crying.If you are a single chap, and you want to know if a certain girl is right for you,then try this.Bring her to your home,cook her a wonderful meal,complete with a great bottle of wine,then plop her down in front of the telly and start this video(or DVD,whatever).If she is not laughing hysterically within ten minutes,then turn off the box,and break up with her immediately,as she has an impaired humor center in her brain(and will only cause you tremendous misery in the coming years).I only wish I had known of the "python Challenge" during my dating days.It would have saved me years of unremitting heartache(as well as thousands in legal fees). Please trust me on this one,it might just save your life.I give this movie an unrepentant 10,but would give it a 20+ if it were an option.', u'-0.439647', u'\n*MINOR SPOILERS*\n\nGod, how I love this movie. And perhaps even more so for being a fan of the time honored myths and legends this film so skillfully lampoons.\n\nThis is not so much a film as a collection of sketches - the narrative is not so tightly strung together as in the other Python classic, The Life of Brian, but how could this matter when there are so many moments of knicker-wettingly brilliant hilarity? There\'s the \'Invincible\' Black Knight ("I\'ll bite your kneecaps off!")....the Castle Anthrax ("Can\'t I have just a little more peril?") and, my most oft quoted moment, the French who defeat Arthur and his knights, by first taunting them and then slinging farm animals over the castle walls. I post on message boards here quite often, and still tend to pull out "Your mother was a hamster and your father smelt of elderberries!" as an insult when the going gets tough!\n\nThe Python\'s strength lies in the fact that they are masters of humour in all it\'s forms. They are equally at home with schoolboy smut as they are with high brow satire - and the result is a film which constantly throws the audience curveballs and leaves them wondering what to expect.\n\nMy favourite Python, the wonderful John Cleese, excels yet again in multiple roles as the noble Lancelot, the Black Knight and Tim the Enchanter, among others. You get the impression of barely contained rage hidden within Cleese\'s rangy form, and I often wonder how he would make the transition to dramatic performances. Robin Williams has made the jump, while Steve Martin has had less success - and they are two comedians who\'s on screen personas are considerably more "cuddly" than Cleese. The scene in which Lancelot storms the castle to rescue Prince Herbert from his impending wedding, believing that there is in fact a princess held captive, is a highlight for me. This is purely because of Cleese\'s rather gentlemanly reaction to news that he, in his onslaught, stabbed the bride\'s father in the head - "Oh dear. Is he alright?"\n\nAnd then there\'s the Holy Hand Grenade of Saint Antioch. "And he, being naughty in my sight, shall snuff it!" And the witch trial, featuring some incredibly dense peasants...."She turned me into a newt.....I got better!" Then there are the communist peasants..."I didn\'t know we had a king! I thought we were an autonomous collective!" And, of course, the Knights Who Say Ni.\n\nIrreverent, childish....utterly hilarious. Complete class from start to finish.\n', u'0.197815', u'Delightful as well as hilarious satire about King Arthur and his knights embark on a low-budget search for the Grail, encountering many very silly obstacles . This is an imaginative , glamorous , chaotic fantasy based on a haunting journey carried out by King Arthur (early deceased Graham Chapman) and his botcher knights . \n\nMonty Python and the Holy Grail (1975) results to be a spectacular legendary tale filled with irony , slapstick , adventure and fantasy ; being efficiently directed by Terry Gilliam . Irreverent and often sidesplitting nonsense comedy/satire of Middle Age movies that will probably like to nutty humor fans , including many Political and Social comments . Both John Cleese and Terry Gilliam performed all their stunts during the duel between Black and Green Knight , they both had to learn to manage big and heavy swords and to do some acrobatics, though never being recognizable, wearing both heavy armors and full helmets . The French tactic of pelting Arthur and his knights with livestock echoes the relatively modern legend of a medieval siege of the fortified southern French town of Carcassonne ; said to have been near starvation, the townspeople used the last of their food to pelt the besieging army to convince them, suffering likewise, that the town was well stocked with food and that the siege was hopeless. Adequate production design , he interiors of Camelot and Swamp Castle, and exteriors of Castle Anthrax, French Castle and the opening castle were all shot at Doune Castle . Recently-rebuilt Castle Stalker was used for the Castle Aarrgg ; however the Scottish Department of the Environment withdrew permission for the Pythons to shoot within their castles, saying that the film\'s script would be "incompatible with the history and fabric" of the castles . The flick was imaginatively directed by Terry Gilliam , an expert on wonderful , surreal atmospheres such as Baron Munchausen , Twelve monkeys , Time bandits , Brazil , Fisher king , Jabberwocky and Heath Leger\'s last film : Doctor Parnasus . The film might be described as an extraordinary Medieval fantasy full of imagination and color . Six cast members played various characters such as Graham Chapman , John Cleese , Terry Gilliam , Eric Idle , Terry Jones and Michael Palin who plays the most characters , 12 . Though the movie has been directed by Terry Gilliam and Terry Jones , there were a lot of the frictions and conflicts .\n\nLively and evocative Original Music , including jolly melodies . Colorful as well as evocative Cinematography . The motion picture was well directed by Terry Gilliam and Terry Jones . In 1965, with his friend Michael Palin, they made The Late Show (1966) for television, which was his first success and he wrote for many other TV shows . But Terry Gilliam\' greatest success was the zany Monty Python\'s Flying Circus (1969-74) (with Palin, Graham Chapman, John Cleese, Terry Jones and Eric Idle) and other hits such as Jabberwocky , The meaning of life , and especially Life of Brian and this Monty Python and the Holy Grail and this Life of Brian , among others . Rating : Good , better than average . Worthwhile watching .', u'0.324122'], u'tt0066921': [u"It's hard to judge a film such as this. Its cold and hard, yet can be exhilarating and sarcastic. It can be average, yet it can be visionary. Exploitive? Satirical? Too many questions to consider when one watches this film.\n\nEven after 34 years, this film still speaks volumes about our current culture, which many ideals are ringing true today. The younger generations are out of control due to lack of parental control, junk culture is becoming commonplace, violence is desensitizing the masses, and we all seem to be enjoying the ride on the way down. It's very difficult to find movies which can make such startling commentary, yet hold on to such accusations for an extended period of time. Nowadays, films are focused-grouped to death, conformity is more powerful than artistry, and money is far more important than quality. Kubrick took a huge leap with this film, challenging society to take a hard look at itself. Unfortunately, society wasn't ready for this film, which is why it is revered now more than ever.", u'0.0414025', u"\nA Clockwork Orange is the finest film that has ever been made, in my view. Stanley Kubrick has made so many masterpieces, and is by far the best director that ever graced our world. A Clockwork Orange is simply his finest hour!\n\nThe film grabs you and glues you to your seat from start to finish. Malcolm McDowell gives us a shining example of superior acting, and the movie is as perverted as any of Kubrick's masterpieces (and then some!). It contains horrifying violence, extreme emotions, perversity and weirdness at it's very worst. It all boils down to serve you a plethora of thoughts for you to take with you and contemplate, after the film ends.\n\nHowever, with all the perversity bursting out of this film, you will probably NOT like this film the first time you see it. I know I didn't. Fortunately, I gave it a second chance, and thought: Hey, it was actually not bad at all. After the third time, I was lost for words.\n\nAfter the fourth time, there was little doubt in my mind, that this was the finest film ever made, and regardless of how many great masterpieces I see, A Clockwork Orange still towers above them. I'm sure you'll agree, if you give it the chance it deserves, although it may require for you to see it more than once.\n\n", u'0.329862', u'\nStanely Kubrick\'s "A Clockwork Orange" is one of the first movies that proved that cinema can be the most enlightening and amazing art form around. Movies have always been a true love for me, but it wasn\'t until this film challenged me that I fell deeply in love.  The first viewing left me speechless, unable to describe how weird and terrible I felt.  I thought it was the film that left me in this mood, so of course that was the easy target to blame.  It was just a bad movie, overrated and stupid and a waste of time.  But upon further thought, I realised the film did exactly what it was supposed to.  It showed how the world can be a weird and horrible place, and how this young man who goes around torturing people and being a wicked person ultimately doesn\'t have to pay for what he does.  And it\'s funny too. So this film brilliantly satirises this world, showcasing pure evil and people who ordinarily do not perform such evil are forced to laugh and observe what we all hate to admit is the truth.  It\'s sick, but at the same time brilliant.  And when one gets down to the core, you can\'t really explain it.  It just is what it is.  It\'s real.  No one really sees it very often, but it is out there and everyone knows.  And no one does anything about it.  In essence, "A Clockwork Orange" is the ultimate satire, and one of the ultimate film experiences.  It\'s art, it\'s life, and in a funky way, it\'s entertaining.', u'-0.118124', u'Few films are as sensational or infamous as Stanley Kubrick\'s "A Clockwork Orange". It\'s impossible to sit through ACO and not have a reaction; whether it be shock, disgust or amazement. The savage tale of a brutal young droog and his subsequent "reformation" by the government is as shocking and thought-provoking as ever. \n\nWhile the film\'s depictions of violence and sex are what it\'s most known for, ACO works on far deeper levels. The disturbing portrayal of youth and its satirical depiction of a government\'s attempts to create a better society are brilliant, but the most fascinating aspect of ACO is the questions it poses about good and evil. While the crimes Alex commits at the beginning of the film are atrocious, what the government does to him is worse. The film presents the absolute worst aspects of man, but shows that even these are still favorable to a man without the choice. People can denounce the film because of its brutal content, but the importance of the questions it poses can\'t be denied. \n\nEqually excellent to the film\'s content is the effort by the crew. Kubrick\'s perfectionism pays off well, as ACO in one of his most visually striking films. Malcolm MacDowell is nothing short of amazing as Alex. Kubrick\'s use of surreal imagery and set pieces, as well as the ingenious use of music to compliment the on-screen action, creates a world that perfectly reflects the protagonist\'s behavior and the government\'s policies. \n\nA Clockwork Orange is by no means an easy film to get through, as many will be turned off by the scenes of violence and rape. But this masterpiece is far more complex than a simple romp through a world of youthful violence. It\'s a rare example of film-making that demands that the viewer actually think. Real horrorshow all around, Oh my brothers.', u'0.295334', u'\nI would say that the movie is really a gem of an art piece. The use of excellent imagery coupled with pretty out-of-the-place background score tells us about the uniqueness of this movie. Stanley Kubrick has really applied a lot of thought into this.\n\nThe director wants the audience to feel something as bad not because he is showing it as bad but because it really is bad. The background music accompanying the ultra violent scenes is comical, and not dramatic or anything else that is commonly associated with such scenes. This gives the viewer an opportunity to feel the bitterness not because the music hints so but because he himself feels so. Viewer\'s emotions should arise irrespective of what the director is trying to show, and this is one of the greatest successes of the movie.\n\nAnother glorifying feature is the central idea of the movie. If a human is striped of the choice to choose from good and evil, he no longer remains a human, he becomes a clockwork. When Alex is brain-washed and "programmed" to choose only good, he wasn\'t accepted by the society and this shows the irony in the objectives of the British Government. The word Orange from the title presumably comes from the word "Ourange" that loosely means man. And hence the title is so appropriate to the movie.\n\nThe artificiality in dialogues and sets give the movie a unique feature and enhance the grip on it. This also means that the viewer has to get more involved. This is definitely one of the best technically shot movies, another masterpiece of Kubrick like the Space Oddessey.\n\nFor the uninitiated, set in near future Britain, the movie shows Malcom MacDowell as the head of a group of youngsters involved in sexual violence. Turn of the events leave the protagonist in the hands of the police. Worried by the growing number of prisoners the British Government devises a method of "programming" them so that they always choose the good. Alex is chosen as one of those on which the new system is to be tested. The rest unfolds as a saga of the very human characteristic.\n\nLastly, I would like to say that you may be compelled to leave the movie in between, but if you are watching it for art and cinematic experience, I recommend you to sit through.\n', u'0.346744', u'To say that the Alex character from Stanley Kubrick\'s "A Clockwork Orange" is unlikable is like saying the Manson family was sort of bad. He\'s not just unlikable; he\'s despicable, terrifying, sick, twisted, and ultimately a haunting embodiment of all our greatest realistic fears and worries. But Alex does not see himself as a sick person. The key to this is in his voice-over narrative.\n\nAlex does not see himself as a pervert, just as we do not see our own flaws and Ramond Babbitt did not see his own autism. To us, we are all normal, which is a scary thought.\n\n"A Clockwork Orange," which was originally released in 1973 after an appeal for an R rating (that was granted after originally being tagged as an X-rated motion picture), had been banned from Britain for close to thirty years. Most film fans in Europe will tell you that they had seen the movie on grainy bootleg videotapes years ago when they were young and curious.\n\nBut for those of us lucky enough to enjoy (or squirm through) "A Clockwork Orange" in its entire odd splendor, it is an experience you are likely to never forget. Its characters, its style, its subject matter, its explicit material--all of it combines to create a marvelous whole that will stay with you long after the credits stop rolling.\n\nEssentially a tale focused on Alex\'s journeys in jail and his process of being re-submitted to the world after inhumane treatments to cure the evil out of him, "A Clockwork Orange" is indeed as offbeat as its title.\n\nAll tales of redemption involve characters that we gradually come to appreciate, or like, or--at the very least--learn to tolerate. Not "A Clockwork Orange." Our narrator remains the same throughout the movie, always an incarnation of everything wrong in today\'s modern world. He goes through no cleansing process and by the end of the film we like him less than we did at the beginning. That\'s daring.', u'-0.0563187', u"i just saw this movie about a day ago, and it completely blew me away, namely the main character, protagonist, hero? Alex. we love, hate, and or just plain utterly confused about how we feel of Alex. Alex is the greatest villain ever because he is ourselves, he is the worst of ourselves. hes the deep dark place inside you that rises to the surface eventually, and then pushed down just as fast because it terrifies you. the way Alex stares into the camera in the first scene just freaks me out, he has a little smirk on his face that seems to say you may hate me, but you'll never be rid of me, because there can never be good without the bad, and i am the bad.", u'-0.7048', u"A disturbing but yet very beautiful piece of film-making, Kubrick has created the ultimate study of mind manipulation in this film. It is a protest against reform programs that take away freedom of a choice, and the message of the film in terms of paying for one's sins in all eternity is inescapable, evident to a large extent in the sardonic nature of the tale. Although set in the future, it hardly feels like it is, this being because the message of the film is overwhelmingly powerful and capable of applying to any age. The film has a number of possible hidden meanings to it \x96 a feat equaled on scale only by Kubrick's former film '2001: A Space Odyssey'. Besides for the meaning behind the film, there are still the marks of a masterpiece. Kubrick's direction is superb alongside the good photography, capturing shadows and angles needed to establish tone. The editing is excellent too, done in a flashy, brainwashing style at times to have relevance to the film. The choice of cast is again inspirational, however the film achieves the most in terms of music. Kubrick manages to use one of the earliest forms of art, classical music, and give it an unforgettable style and importance in the film. It is truly a difficult task to explain what is so great about a film such as 'A Clockwork Orange' \x96 it is maybe best explained by watching the film itself.", u'0.802181', u'\nA CLOCKWORK ORANGE (1971) ****\n\nStarring: Malcolm McDowell, Patrick Magee, Michael Bates, Warren Clarke, and Adrienne Corri Written and Directed by Stanley Kubrick   137 minutes    Rated R (for strong explicit sexual content and rape, perverse nudity, brutal violence, and some language)\n\nBy Blake French:\n\n\tStanley Kubrick\'s "A Clockwork Orange" holds the recent record of being the number one film of all time on my charts. The film is everything that you\'ll never want to watch. The scenes are disturbing, gut wrenching, mind twisting, and way over the top. In result, "A  Clockwork Orange" has the most powerful and overwhelming dramatic impact that I have ever experienced in a mainstream film. \n\n\t"A Clockwork Orange" is the story of a young man named Alex DeLarge, who is, by day, a regular student who lives with his parents at home, but, by night, a homicidal rapist/killer with his accomplices who dress up like demented clowns at a bleak freak show. He and his buddies weasel their way into the happy homes housing innocent people by chanting the same deceiving phrase every night: they scream that their friend has been critically wounded in an accident near by--and plead to use their telephone to call for help.\n\nFor a few unfortunate souls, this devious trick proves to be successful in nature. One night, however, a woman known as "The Cat Lady," refuses their plead, and calls the police in suspicion. Alex, being both smart and sneaky, somehow manages to break into this perverted woman\'s home, while his accomplices wait outside. Once indoors, a fight begins. A struggle featuring a sex toy owned by "Cat Lady," one that not only causes panicked arousal, but also is featured as the weapon of her graphic and disturbing murder. Alex quickly flees the scene once the police sirens reach his shaky ears, but when he gets back to his pal\'s waiting outside, they return their experiences with him by bashing him over the head with a hard object, allowing their jumbled escape, but his certain demise.\n\n\nAfter the process of being sent to prison, Alex grows to learn to tell offices and guards what they like to hear. He reads the bible, is never involved with any major fights or complications, and almost volunteers for a new kind of experiment. An experiment so probationary it is still being tested and held under wraps. What it does, though a series of "sessions," is cure a violent individual from his sickness; he will feel terrible pain if involved in any sort of violence after the medicine takes place.\n\nThe scenes involving the "cure" of Alex\'s disturbances are truly emotionally troublesome. They are so explicit and detailed that I myself felt tempted to look away from the screen at points. This is not a film for those who are prone to walk out of movies, those who are easily offended, or especially for those with week stomachs. This is the most grizzly enumerated film I have even screened, but it happens to be one of the most perfect and precise in message.  I definitely don\'t recommend the production to everyone, though. \n\nThe soundtrack to "A Clockwork Orange" is one of the most inspirational and spirited ones I have ever heard; right up there with the turns to "The Graduate" (1967). Although the actual music is far from fitting each individual scene, the overall presence is not only worth listening to, but also worth the purchase price.\n\nHere, a young Malcolm McDowell explores the character of a lifetime with vivid imagination and tremendous description. His character fits him very well as an actor. Even though the character is meant to be despised, I couldn\'t help but to be very convinced and interested in his sick, demented, psychotic mind. Most of this is because of the flawless point of view the film contains, one that both provokes empathy and involvement. It investigates the mind of a killer, rapist, and a confused, somewhat harmless, adolescent--all existing in the same character. This is no doubt the character, and the performance, that inspired a generation.\n\nAs well as being a movie of violent and sexual repulsion, Stanley Kubrick\'s direction to "A Clockwork Orange" also forces us to investigate deep down in ourselves and chew on the idea of us being in the character\'s shoes. There is a scene in this movie that forces two parents to make a decision of a lifetime. After receiving the treatments he volunteered for, Alex returns to his household only to discover that the only mom and dad he\'s even known have rented his old room out to some strange college kid, who is said to have been there for them during many hard times--like a real son. His parents must make a choice: to throw their only son, who has suffered for years in turn for making others suffer, out of the house for good, or allow him to return with open arms trusting that he is "cured." Well, dear reader, what would you do? Brought to you by Warner Bros.\n', u'0.137205', u'This is just possibly the most "perfect" movie ever made. There is no meaningless dialog; not a single extraneous character; and every plot twist is rational and reasonable. Not to mention a superb soundtrack. Because of the intense violence, particularly against women, it is a disturbing and difficult film to sit through. But if you care about the cinema, you must watch without interruption! Characters get what they deserve...in the beginning and at the climax. Let Kubrick take you on the emotional rollercoaster of your cinematic life. And don\'t forget to breathe.', u'0.324436', u'Stanley Kubrick has a way of telling stories about violence without actually exploiting them, or going into exaggeration. In DR STRANGELOVE, OR HOW I STOPPED WORRYING AND LEARNED TO LOVE THE BOMB violence as war was discussed, overheard, never truly seen until the final reel when a flurry of atomic bombs exploded into bright mushrooms as the song "We\'ll Meet Again" lovingly played in the background. In 2001: A SPACE ODYSSEY Hal-9000 terminates an entire crew in a most chilling way and all we see is a computer screen indicating the termination of life. Now, in A CLOCKWORK ORANGE, Kubrick actually brings a story about violence, and even then it is art directed within an inch of its life.\n\nAlex DeLarge is the leader of a band of \'droogs\' who move from location to location terrorizing their victims, putting them under outrageous acts of violence. When two of his \'droogs\' refuse to follow Alex\'s path of destruction, he turns on them and beats them, until an act of reversal turns against Alex and he is brought down by the medical industry who decides to "reform" his heretofore sociopathic tendencies. One he is cured, an interesting chain of humiliating events that bring Alex even farther down ensue: he is, for example, now attacked by his very ex-mates, now policemen, and his ex-victims. Sometimes the cure is far worse than the illness. Karma is a bitch.\n\nKubrick has a particular way of visualizing his films. A CLOCKWORK ORANGE has a look and feel completely out of its time, closer to sometime in the future, and its torture sequence in which Alex is regenerated also looks straight out of a science fiction movie. However, this is not a science fiction film. It\'s actually quite difficult to categorize CLOCKWORK because it\'s something of a social satire, something of a drama, has comedic moments and deconstructs a musical for a horrifying rape sequence; however, its approach to the material gives it the feel of a hybrid out of time, out of place, but visually arresting and impossible to take for granted. It\'s this approach that makes the work the product of a master of direction -- it can be seen multiple times and every time a different perspective arises, and all one can be left with is with the notion that this is pure, ultra-modern cinema.', u'0.0519973', u"\nIt's funny, after you watch a film many times you begin to fall in love with it. This is true with a lot of films but for Clockwork Orange, I only had to watch it 2 subsequent times to fall in love with it. There are so many elements of this film that bring it together and make you totally enjoy the story. The music in the film is one such example, at times it's beautiful and at times dark and disturbing, setting the right tone for the scene. Technically this is a sci-fi film because it does take place in the future and there is the plot which involves brainwashing.   When many people think of Stanley Kubrick, they think of 2001 and this film. It's because this film stands out as possibly the scariest image of the near future", u'0.56005', u'\nWithout a doubt, my absolute favorite film of all time. I first saw this movie three years ago and I have been in love with it (and Stanley Kubrick) ever since. I never get tired of seeing this movie. Why it remains so underappreciated (at least by "casual" movie viewers) is beyond me. Everything is great; acting, direction, cinematography, the sets, everything. \n\nSomething that I don\'t think anyone else commented on was the Russian motif. The names of the droogs (Alexander, George, Peter, and Dim...short for Dimitri) are decidedly Russian. The singer referenced in the record store, Johnny Zhivago, has obvious Russian overtones. The statement made by the Minister of the Interior about the "peace-loving citizens" is a direct reference to the name that Soviet government representatives applied to their people when talking about the Cold War. Red seems to stand out from other colors. And, of course, who could forget Nadsat, the Russian slang language? I wonder what Burgess and Kubrick were trying to suggest about the future of Ingsoc (those familiar with "1984" will understand)?', u'0.25113', u'"A Clockwork Orange" starts out with Alex and his gang of "droogs" sitting in the Kerova milk bar drinking the milk plus... Then the camera starts slowly to move back and we see naked female statues and drink machines which purl out the milk through their breasts...\n\nMcDowell is splendid as the star-child Alex... He is simply a vicious and amazing sadist monster, lethal in his sincerity, taking delight in rape and violence... Never such a vile character has been so charismatic and attractive... \n\nHis life is perplexing, questionable and terrifying... He doesn\'t show the slightest regard for other\'s rights or morality... He doesn\'t even regard his victims as human beings...\n\nHis paradoxical character is in nearly every scene... McDowell captures Alex\'s human and inhuman side with equal skill... Alex is a victim at the mercy of an uncaring society, condemned to the physically unbearable "dislike therapy" and preyed upon by his former targets...\n\nSet in England in the near future\x96 a future which vaguely reflects our own, but it seems that society has started to crumble and at night the streets are driven with teenage gangs who run free of parental control...\n\n"A Clockwork Orange" is too strong for some people to accept and is still too powerful today... It is an extremely disturbing meditation on the violent nature of man... Kubrick emphasizes the human element by paradoxically dehumanizing the characters...\n\nViewers see images they may not have wanted to see, but will never be able to forget... He presents violence in a confusing and increasing fashion that makes it alarmingly attractive... He invites us to join Alex in raping and pillaging into London urban jungle to show that violence and power are invariably attractive... He makes good use of the camera, showing, in strange ways, the furious underworld of Alex... \n\nKubrick is the driving force behind "A Clockwork Orange." The film is without exception his picture... He took the novel of Anthony Burgess re-shaping it to fit his own vision... Images and sound pull in different directions, stimulating conflicting emotions... \n\nIn a bizarre juxtaposition of often classical music with violence, we see ourselves manipulated into cheering for Alex, despite his brutal and amoral nature... We are forced to really think about the implications of the events with no answer...\n\nThe film serves as a battleground for philosophical arguments making comments without forcing an opinion instead preferring that we ourselves decide what to make of the satire... Exposing themes to think about, significant prediction, liberalism of society, sexual acts gaining acceptance, violent films in higher degree, alcohol-currently legal, accounts for many acts of violence, crime out of control, violence in schools, television, illustrating the inconstant nature of public opinion, raising questions, themes and ideas that many people would prefer not to confront...\n\nStyle has always been one of Kubrick\'s strong points... He maintained a reputation for an obsessive attention to detail... He was known for getting the most out of his actors... Distinct images often play a significant part in his films...\n\nWith its dynamic bizarre sets and pulsating classical music score, and with a word of warning on how bad violence is and should be watched very closely, Kubrick\'s motion picture is unsurpassed with intellectual content... It is a film described often as the sociological masterpiece of the decade and, often as dangerously vicious\x96 a film with more violent sex and dangerous thugs than any other I can remember, a film which daringly brought to larger-than-life those areas of the unconscious mind which some people felt were best left hidden\x85\n\nIt is also highly dramatic, extremely graphic, compelling and provoking... It is frightening and intriguing masterpiece with a powerful message about the reality of human nature...', u'0.0447644', u"\nWith the sudden death of Stanley Kubrick recently a part of my love for film died along with him as I recognized the unfortunate fact that there was no other director alive to closely heed the call for attention to detail and visceral content.  The thought of looking to Steven Spielberg for future answers was almost unbearable as I remembered that his originality often gives way to family fare (The Pinnochio finale of `Artificial Intelligence') in an attempt to pad his already overloaded wallet.  I thought about Sam Mendes and cringed as I remembered that for him art was a floating grocery bag with unclever teenagers clamoring around it in `American Beauty.'  No one could replace Stanley Kubrick and after the intitial tears I bought his boxed set and tried to make the best out of a bad situation.  And it was then that I rediscovered his greatest achievement `A Clockwork Orange.'\n\nWhat inspired me to watch `A Clockwork Orange' all those years ago was initially it's `X' rating.  I knew that mom would have a fit and I had to see why it was so provocative.  For the better part of the 1970's it was also banned furthering my desire to see it.  I was surprised by the `X' rating until I witnessed the hilarious in-out rape scenes and was somewhat amazed at the blatancy and sheer delight of the slow-motion pummeling of his droogies by the sweet looking but awfully scary Alex De Large (Malcolm McDowell).  Upon further viewing a new love and passion grew for the film until I became part of the passionate cult that remains inspired by `A Clockwork Orange' more than any other films on the AFI Top 100 of all time list.\n\n`A Clockwork Orange' was a very sad film for any lawmaker who adores social order and loathes freedom of speech in 1971.  The response of lawmakers who banned this critical statement on social order proved their fear by banning it almost immediately though it still managed an Academy Award nomination for Best Picture and Best Director and deservedly so.  Ironically, Kubrick's most original piece was a witty and insightful adaptation of the terrific Anthony Burgess novel.  I believe that Burgess would have loved what Kubrick did with it.  There were subtle changes and Alex ultimately failed to become a do-gooder in the film but it was all for the best.  You almost never like the movie more than the novel but this is a film where Kubrick works overtime to bring his imagination to the proceedings and the movie is better than the novel.\n\nWith every Kubrick film comes the feeling of eating Turkish food.  As a principle Turkish food can be presented with a taste that is somewhat unedible.  More importantly is the idea of presentation and the experience requires elegance and an amazing contrast of color.  This as opposed to taste makes for quality food.  Similarly, Kubrick often shied away from telling a fundamentally coherent plot and concerned himself with the details of visual artistry.  `A Clockwork Orange' was his best effort on the silver screen because he was able to finally incorporate a fantastic story with the elegant presentation of color, a task that surely kept him at night as he tossed and turned searching for a perfect balance of the two.\n\nWhat truly makes this adaptation of the Burgess novel a success, is what Malcolm McDowell brings to the screen.  He is Alex De Large and you can't help but kind of adore his urgent needs for a little of the old ultra violence each night as he unexpectedly makes his house calls through the neighborhood and pounces on innocent women.  You also can't help but appreciate his interaction with his good old mom and dad as a tiny snicker forms when he insists on not being able to attend school and a sad but sweet look of confusion and sadness innocently appears as his parents introduce him to their replacement son and he finds himself homeless and in need of his droogies.  His interactions with his droogies are a delight as he goes from `singing in the rain' to a mad villain beating up the little groupies in slow-motion.  There is a sense of sadness as he ironically goes from being Beethoven's number one fan to a botched suicide that leaves him with broken limbs abounding but the same clever smile and good attitude.  The finale is quite possibly the best ever in cinema as sweet Alex cannot help but think of a little of the old in-out as the nurses attempt to curtail his ultra violent tendencies.  The slow smile that appears on his innocently despicable face is a sheer delight.  The incredible accent makes it all the better.\n\n`A Clockwork Orange' was a film that was so far ahead of it's time in 1971. The Kordova Milk Bar was a trendy little place we can only picture existing in the future.  The fascinating way that his crime was dealt with could be the wave of the future should the capital punishment issue cause too much disagreement.  In short, a little of the old ultra violence is what propelled this film to high rankings and what will eventually allow all of us to allow our children to see it, once their 18 of course.\n\n10/10\n\n", u'0.271578'], u'tt1853728': [u"I only had one thought on my mind for this Christmas: see Django Unchained. Quentin Tarantino's latest opus, a Western set two years before the Civil War, concerns a former slave named Django (Jamie Foxx). He is freed by bounty hunter Dr. King Shultz (Christoph Waltz) in order to help him with a bounty. Quite quickly, Shultz takes Django under his wing and trains him as his partner. But he made him a promise: that he would rescue his wife from a plantation owned by the ruthless Calvin Candie (Leonardo DiCaprio). And rescuing her is not going to be all that easy.\n\nWhat pains me the most about Django Unchained, as a die-hard Tarantino fan, is just how sloppy it all seems. I enjoyed every minute of it, but I could never shake the feeling of how messy and thrown together it all feels. Portions of the film feel episodic (the search for the Brittle Brothers, mentioned heavily in the trailers, begins and ends practically within minutes), and some scenes just seem to play out just for the fun of it. Another scene from the trailers involving a lynch mob with bags covering their faces seems added for comedic purposes, and has no real point of actually existing. More than any of his films before it, Django feels like Tarantino simply making a movie for sheer pleasure and with no outside motivations or controllers. \n\nThe film threatens to go totally off the rails at any given moment, and lacks any real sense of direction or focus. It may sound ridiculous, but the loss of editor Sally Menke confirms a sneaking suspicion I always had about Tarantino \x96 he needed a steady right hand to help encourage him as to what was needed and what was not. I do not want to criticize Django's editor Fred Raskin, but it is obvious he is no Menke and that works against the film heavily. It lacks the polish we have come to expect, and is practically stripped of the glossy/cool texture so prevalent in Tarantino's work up until now.\n\nBut then maybe that was his intention all along, and perhaps Tarantino is airing out his frustrations with life and film in general. Django is deliberately shot on film (or at least from the print I saw), and looks very gritty and messy at all times. It is significantly more brutally violent than anything he has worked on before (the borderline cartoonish Kill Bill included), and has a very go for broke attitude about itself. The film seems to revel in how brilliantly it can splatter all the blood and gore (done through the use of squibs and no digital!), and how uncomfortably numbing it can make the violence. I know he does not care what people think of his films, but this movie especially seems like an emphatically raised middle finger to the establishment. And for all of my complaints about how messy it all feels, I was never once bored or felt like the movie was dragging itself out. The staggering 165-minute running time shockingly flies by faster than you might ever imagine.\n\nActing wise, Tarantino stacks the deck with a number of recognizable character actors young and old for roles that vary in size. Most have very few lines, if any at all, and seem to just stand by, just as content as the audience is to watch the action unfold. It is a little off-putting, especially with how important some of these characters are initially made out to be. Washington as Broomhilda von Shaft (one of the most subtle references he's ever dropped) does well as the helpless victim and frequent dreamlike object \x96 but she never really gets to show off any of her acting prowess outside of her facial reactions. They are increasingly effective, especially during horrific flashback scenes. But her work here feels ridiculously stunted in comparison to the other leads. Samuel L. Jackson, much like Tarantino himself, seems to just be having fun in his role as Candie's adviser Stephen. He plays on every ridiculous stereotype he ever has been associated with and then amps it up to a near ludicrous state. He is frequently hilarious, but the role seems to border on parody more than anything else.\n\nSurprisingly, Foxx takes a very long time settling into the leading role. It may just be the character, but it is quite clear from the on- set that he is not very comfortable in Django's shoes, and leads credence to why Will Smith, amongst so many others, dropped out of the picture so quickly. But once he finds his footing, he does a fantastic job walking the thin line between empathetic and sadistic. It is not an easy character to play, but Foxx makes it his own, bringing a sense of style and grace that are virtually absent from the rest of the film. And of course, he gets all the best lines.\n\nWaltz and DiCaprio are the clear standouts however, nailing every nuance of their sadly underwritten characters. While Waltz plays the straight man, DiCaprio is delightfully unhinged and vicious. Both are playing directly against type, yet are strangely comfortable in the roles. Watching them act circles around the rest of the cast, Foxx included, is the true highlight of the film. I just wish they were both given additional emphasis and more to do. \n\nFor all of its numerous faults, I had a blast watching Django Unchained. It is hilarious, it is a lot of fun, and is wildly enjoyable. I genuinely think it could have been a lot better if there was more focus and direction, but this is very clearly a picture Tarantino wanted to make on his own terms. And for that, I applaud him for the effort. It is not his best work, but certainly not his worst. \n\n8/10.", u'-0.0388293', u"Merry Christmas to all you Tarantino fans out there. I hope you made a Tarantino checklist so here we go.\n\nWitty dialogue, check. Excessive profanity especially use the word 'nigger', check. Excessive violence including testicles getting blown off, check. Soulful musical score, check. Sometimes non-linear narrative, check. Shots of women's feet, check. Very great character driven plot, check. An actual spaghetti western, even though it takes place in the American South, check.\n\nThere are four standout characters played by the top billed actors.\n\nJamie Foxx plays Django, a freed slave who becomes a bounty hunter. Even though he is the titular character, he gets downplayed when in the presence of the other actors. Still he delivers a solid performance, in fact hes very convincing. We all know Jamie Foxx as this golden voice RnB singer and comedian with a very clean cut image. He was able to pull off the whole transitioning from a timid slave to a menacing bounty hunter. Not only that he had the whole look down too, with all the facial scarring and the messy hair.\n\nChristoph Waltz plays Dr. King Schulz, a German dentist turned bounty hunter who frees Django so he could help pursue his previous owners who are targets. Waltz is a very charismatic actor, and thats how he does this role. Presents every line with finesse.\n\nLeonardo Dicaprio is in his best yet. He plays a plantation owner, Calvin Candie, and is the owner of Django's wife. This is a very different role. We've seen Leonardo in gritty roles before but never did he play this lecherous antagonist. We were all used to Leo being this teen idol, who looked like a member of Hanson. Here he's this Southerner with discoloured teeth and a scruffy beard.\n\nFinally Samuel L. Jackson who plays Steve, a house slave who you could say is the secret antagonist here. For all the screen time that he has he dominates. Sam usually plays boisterous roles as a tough guy, but it was very interesting seeing him play a devious and manipulative old man.\n\nThe only gripe here was that this film was a little too long exceeding the three act structure, but its an epic western film so I'll excuse Tarantino for that. Yet again he made another great film with a lot of flair and carried well by the four big hitter actors. Well done Mr. Tarantino.", u'0.284749', u"Absolutely loved every minute of this movie. Usually I'm not too crazy about Tarantino's movies, but this one is definitely the best one I've seen in a long time. The actors were picked perfectly. The overall experience of a movie is amazing. When we first went to watch it, I was a bit skeptical and thought I'd end up leaving an hour into the movie (it's a 3 hr movie), but it grabbed my attention from the very beginning and I didn't even wanna get up to go to the bathroom, afraid to miss something. I'm usually very particular about the movies, nothing can hardly satisfy me, but this one is definitely in the top 5. Soundtrack was perfect. When I got home, I've done some more research on it and loved it even more! Overall, I would highly recommend this film!", u'0.528919', u'Quentin Tarantino, one of the most iconic directors of the 21st (and late 20th) century, why? Simple. Because of masterpieces like this. Tarantino defies the laws of film, he shoots them in his own way, however he wants. Tarantino has always focused upon the action thriller genre from Reservoir Dogs up until Inglourious Basterds. However, Django Unchained is Tarantino\'s first look at the Western genre, his first attempt at it and he executed it beautifully. The scenes were shot perfectly alongside an amazing soundtrack as well as his own small cameo.\n\nDjango Unchained tells the story of Django (Jamie Foxx), a slave who is soon picked up by bounty hunter Dr King Shultz (Christoph Waltz). The story follows on as Shultz takes on Django as his "deputy" during their tasks of bounty hunting, in return Shultz says that after winter he will help find Django\'s lost wife, Broomhilda. This takes them to a huge plantation in Mississippi owned by Calvin Candie (Leonardo DiCaprio), from here they plan up a scheme on how to get away with Broombilda.\n\nThe cast boast out amazing performances, particularly Christoph Waltz (also famous for his previous collaboration with Tarantino on Inglourious Bastards as Colonel Landa). Both Foxx and DiCaprio\'s performance are both equally amazing. All three are able to add some light-hearted humour in the mix to make sure it doesn\'t stay too serious, as well as having comic actor Jonah Hill play a member of the KKK.\n\nThere\'s a reason the film has been nominated for 5 Oscars.', u'0.455796', u'Quentin Tarantino\'s 8th film "Django Unchained" is one hell of a movie. A brutal, bloody, terrifying, hilarious and awe-inspiring western disguised as a buddy movie that is so great that if John Wayne and Sergio Leone were alive now, they would\'ve approve of this movie. It\'s designed to shock you, polarize you, test you and maybe even surprise you. But let me clear on this: If you are not a fan of bloody violence and the running length of 165 minutes, see a shorter movie. But if you love to see what Tarantino can do with movies like this, then you\'re in for a treat. Set during slavery in 1858, the movie follows Django (Jamie Foxx), a slave who is found by a bounty hunter disguised as a dentist named Dr. King Schultz (The always reliable Christoph Waltz) who hires him as a bounty hunter and a free man to find the Brittle Brothers. After finding them and hunting them down at a plantation run by Big Daddy (a remarkable Don Johnson), they relax for the winter only for them to go on a mission to find and rescue Django\'s wife, Broomhilda (Kerry Washington) who is owned by Calvin J. Candie (Leonardo DiCaprio) a man who runs a plantation known as Candieland. He even has a renegade slave as a servant named Stephen (A nearly recognizable Samuel L. Jackson, hidden in makeup and some prosthetics), who will have a part to play in the last half of the movie. I think Quentin Tarantino has outdone himself once again. Being in the filmmaking game for 20 years now, you can\'t deny and even reject his style in what he is bringing to the screen (He also has a cameo in here as well). His dialogue is like reading a book that grabs you and makes you want to know what happens next. The look and scope of the film is magnificent, thanks to a brilliant Oscar-winning cinematographer Robert Richardson and the late production designer J. Michael Riva. The performances in this film are brilliant. Having won an Oscar for "Ray", Jamie Foxx continues with his breathtaking performances that wows us. Here as Django, he is certainly fearless, baring his soul (and body) playing a man who is free from slavery, but can\'t be free by the rules and limitations of slavery. Christoph Waltz looks like he was born to be a part of Tarantino\'s entourage after his Oscar-winning performance for "Inglorious Basterds". Here, once again he brings humor and vulnerability to Dr. King Schultz. Never before have I ever seen an actor go that far and doesn\'t go over-the-top like Leonardo DiCaprio. As Calvin Candie, DiCaprio is certainly Oscar-worthy as a man who runs a tight ship by running a place where male slaves fight to the death and female slaves are being prostitutes and he seems to be the kind of guy to like even though he is a villain and he speaks Tarantino\'s dialogue like a pro. When he has a scene in which he reveals three dimples from a skull that belongs to his father, he is literally terrifying. Kerry Washington is superb as Broomhilda and Samuel L. Jackson is the real scene-stealer. The supporting cast is great from Walton Goggins, Jonah Hill, Michael Bacall, Michael Parks, James Remar, Robert Carradine to a small cameo by Franco Nero. "Django Unchained" has a lot of things to say about slavery and how cruel it is. But at the same time, it provides the fact that if Tarantino rearranged history by shooting Adolf Hitler to a pulp while everything blows up at a movie theater, he can do it again by having a former slave whipping a man who used to beat him and his wife. Now, that\'s entertainment. This movie really is off the chain. It\'s not only one of the most captivating films of the year, it\'s one of the best films of the year. Go see it, it will be worth your time. Keep in mind though, there are characters, especially Django, Stephen, Candie and Schultz that uses the N-word numerous times in this movie. That seems relevant to the time period, don\'t ya think?', u'0.269332', u"At first I didn't want to see this movie because of some political remarks made by Jamie Foxx and Samuel Jackson, two of my previously favorite actors, but Quintin Tarentino is a great director, so I broke down and saw it. Glad I did. This was absolutely one of the best movies of the year. Although Jamie Foxx has top billing, this film would not have been anywhere as good without Christoph Waltz. He stole every scene he was in. Brilliant acting and great comedic delivery. Leo was great too. Lots of blood, something expected in most of Quintins movies, but a great story. Also expect to hear the N word about 2000 times. Cristoph Waltz should get the Oscar for his performance. Should get nominated for best picture. This is absolutely a must see.", u'0.458787', u'I know there is a law against talking about internal logic with regard to QT-movies. But I\'m quite a bit fed up with sloppy, dyslexic screen writing and I\'m feeling kind of outlawish, so here I go: Initially Schultz (Christoph Waltz) asks for Django\'s help, because Django is an acquaintance of three fugitives, the bounty hunter Schultz is after. A "Dead or Alive"-handbill with its sketchy description and drawing is not very reliable and shooting the wrong guy can easily happen and it will just as easily get yourself hanged. Therefore the recruiting of Django does make perfect sense. Looking for another wanted man Schultz enters the next town, where he\'s never been, meets him, who is now the sheriff of this town and whom he\'s never seen, and kills him after a few seconds, without even talking to him. This is the moment "Django Unchained" stops making sense.\n\nSchultz is a cold blooded serial killer who murders people because some sheet of paper tells him that he\'s got the right to do so. He is a hypocrite, he gets mad at someone who also executes his state approved right to kill, but with sadistic pleasure. Murder is fine as long as the state tells you so and you do it for business, not for fun. In the original Spaghetti Western a guy like that would have always been the villain, many of the heroes were "Wanted Men" themselves. In "Django Unchained" he is the only human and sympathetic figure and without any doubt the main character. In many ways the spirit of "Django Unchained" is the exact opposite of that found in the movies Tarantino tried to emulate.\n\nThe story of the bland eponymous Django\'s development from slave in chains and rags to sharp dressed gunslinger with sunglasses is above all ridiculous and boring. So after Schultz\'s exit this excessively overlong movie becomes even more of an ordeal, although you get to see the explosion of a queer, ugly old geezer, who really deserved to die. He is played by QT himself and that\'s only something to look forward to and no spoiler, because naturally it has little plot relevance.\n\n"Django Unchained" is about hating a whole ethnic group, just like "Inglourious Basterds", where Tarantino made sure to avoid the impression that there could be a German (a "Nazi") who wasn\'t devilishly evil. The nice young Zoller turns out to be a wannabe rapist and the clever detective Landa (Waltz) turns into a monster, strangling a helpless woman to death. After all Tarantino wanted his viewers to enjoy the butchering of hundreds of Germans in a cinema hall. In "Django Unchained" the murderous Schultz is the only decent white guy. All the others are preoccupied with torturing and humiliating blacks, so there is no need to dehumanize them any further. Will some savior please rise and rid the world of this evil? \n\n"Django Unchained" tells the sentimental education of this savior, Django, that ends with the exit of his teacher. Now the Hate is strong with this one. He uses it for the righteous cause, to kill white people. All of them. The murders of the self-righteous are always cool and justified, right? Hypocrisy is the new religion. Tarantino is one of its high priests, "Django Unchained" is a High Mass. Enjoy! \n\n"Once Upon a Time in the West", "The Good, the Bad and the Ugly", "Pat Garrett & Billy the Kid" - those are masterworks. "Django Unchained" is the work of a slave, designed to debase its audience.', u'-0.298193', u'I have never been a fan of Quentin Tarantino, but I know that other people think he\'s great so I decided to give him another chance and actually paid $3 to see "Django Unchained." I was surprised to find that I liked the first part of the movie. It was interesting, funny, suspenseful, and actually seemed to have a point. Some of the story strained credulity (look it up), but it stayed within the bounds of believability... until the German bounty hunter shot DeCaprio. Then believability went out the window.\n\nThe movie didn\'t even make sense within itself. The entire film built up Dr. Schultz as not only a great shot, but also an extremely cunning strategist. And yet, he shot DeCaprio and then just stupidly said, "I couldn\'t help it!" and stood there waiting to be killed. (Which he was.) But his derringer had two barrels, which presumably means two bullets, so why didn\'t he whirl around and shoot the guy who was standing there with a gun?\n\nHe could have, but then there wouldn\'t have been the bloodbath that follows, which I guess is Quentin Tarantino\'s "signature." The movie quickly degenerates into a stupid, pointless bloodbath. White guys come out of nowhere to be shot, blood gets spattered everywhere, and so what?\n\nThen the film gets even worse! The black guy who killed so many white people is in the hands of his oppressors, yet instead of torturing and killing him, they decide to send him off to a (allegedly horrible) mine, thus giving him the opportunity to escape and wreak his horrible vengeance. Does this seem believable to ANYONE? \n\nAfter that, it\'s completely predictable. I don\'t need to tell you what happens because you can figure it out for yourself. But think about this: the movie makes a big deal about how nobody in the South back then was used to seeing a black person on a horse. For most of the film, the white Dr. Schultz accompanied Django and helped smooth the way. But at the end of the movie, Django and his (black) wife ride away on horses -- in Mississippi before the Civil War! So they\'ll just wander through the South to freedom? Really?? What a great happy ending! I could criticize this piece of sh*t on many more levels, but I\'ve wasted enough time on it.\n\nI actually liked the first 3/4 of this film. I absolutely HATED the last section. And ultimately, Quentin Tarantino\'s popularity says something troubling about the state of American culture.', u'-0.212478', u"In Quentin Tarantino's Django Unchained, there is a scene in which Django (Jamie Fox), soon after being freed by the incredibly likable dentist turned bounty hunter, Dr. King Schultz (Christoph Waltz), shops for new clothes to wear. \n\nSchultz tells Django to pick out whatever he likes. Django looks at the smiling white man in disbelief. You're gonna let me pick out my own clothes? Django can't believe it. The following shot delivered one of the biggest laughs from the audience I watched the film with. After the white man confirms that yes, he is indeed letting the black man pick out his own clothes, we cut to a wide shot of Django riding his horse, now decked out in his very own (outlandish) cowboy outfit\x97an all blue with white ruffle get-up. \n\nIt's a great little scene that provides humor and allows the viewer to further warm up to the two main protagonists. But it also does more than that. It's a simple scene that speaks for the whole film. It's an affirmation that this man of color is now free and able to make his own decisions. The choice he made concerning his extravagantly loud outfit acts as a warning to those that plan to stand in his way\x97watch out, here I come, I ain't gonna be quiet no more.\n\nAnd the humor the scene provides echoes the entire film\x97it wants us to get comfortable with our hero. Tarantino knows that a man of color makes an unconventional hero in a revenge- flick\x97that's why he made the film. When was the black man going to get his revenge film? It's been long overdue. With Django Unchained, that film has finally arrived and it has arrived in style. Beautifully shot, wonderfully acted, and meticulously written, it's Tarantino at his most epic.", u'0.316624', u'I rarely bother to give reviews after watching a movie. But holy crap this was a good movie. I\'m pretty sure it is the best movie i\'ve seen all year. and yes i saw dark knight rises, avengers, flight, Argo, hobbit, etc... Tarantino delivers and then some.. Every actor is on point. Awesome performances, great story, it will definitely take you on a ride full of surprises. I would recommend everyone to go watch this film, it is truly a great film.. unless you\'re a little kid.. don\'t go watch this movie if you\'re a little kid. I\'ve seen all of Tarantinos movies and I have to say this has been my favorite. It is just awesome in every way. I\'m usually very harsh on movies. I mean ill watch just about anything, but for me to think a movie was actually "good", takes a whole lot. DiCaprio was like i\'ve never seen him before, and being one of my favorite actors, it was a little weird at first. But he does an outstanding job at selling his role within seconds of his first appearance. Waltz delivered as i knew he would. and Jaime Foxx, well he did not fall behind. Last but not least Jackson was hilarious and also did an amazing job... Go watch the movie, it is worth it.', u'0.396329', u'Modern exploitation guru Quentin Tarantino serves up historical revenge once again. His last film, INGLOURIOUS BASTERDS, had the German Nazis getting theirs, and now, with a good German on board (in fact he\'s the villain from the last film) we\'re out to set things right in the American Deep South, two years shy of the Civil War\x85 \n\nAlthough the first half takes place on the road from Texas to Mississippi as bounty hunting dentist Dr. King Schultz recruits a slave named Django to help him find three outlaw brothers (Django alone knows their appearance). These are the more spirited and deliciously cutthroat segments as our heroes partner up and, as Django puts it, "Kill white people for money." Christoph Waltz (Schultz) and Jamie Foxx (Django) are a good team, and while making mince meat out of their targets, the bloodshed is something to marvel. \n\nBut Tarantino throws in awkward bouts of humor, derailing the intensity of the moment. One particular scene where a group of rednecks complain about not seeing through masked eyeholes (including a very distracting cameo by Jonah Hill) feels like Mel Brooks clumsily intruding Sergio Leone.\n\nAfter Django helps Schultz with his job, it\'s time for the doctor to aid his more-than-capable partner rescue Django\'s wife Broomhilda, who resides at "Candyland," an infamous Antebellum plantation run by the sinister though much too youthful Calvin Candie.\n\nWhile Leonardo DiCaprio has more than capable acting skills, and savors the gloriously tyrannical racist dialog, there could have/should have been a backstory on why the owner of a plantation looks fresh out of finishing school.\n\nFor a man who\'s supposed to have a lifetime of seething venom oozing from his veins, those desperately piercing blue eyes seem more confused and frustrated than cold and calculating, making Tarantino\'s purposely overboard racism more of a crutch than weapon for the DiCaprio character (perhaps Don Johnson, who played a wily brothel owner in a previous scene, could have taken this role\x85 he had the age going for him and with that, soulless eyes that look like he\'s seen \x96 and been through \x96 pretty much everything).\n\nBut Leo\'s not alone. He\'s helped along by the most wicked of Uncle Tom\'s played by Samuel Jackson, whose spitefully cantankerous Stephen figures things out before his boss. This is a nice role for the QT stock actor, who has sleepwalked through many roles post PULP FICTION and JACKIE BROWN. Although his feeble mannerisms often slow down the performance.\n\nThe main problem with UNCHAINED is how long Tarantino stretches scenes with dialog. While the actors, especially Waltz and DiCaprio, have a blast with colorful monologues, you\'ll often forget there are other characters on board \x96 and most of the speeches fail to serve the plot. That being: the duo pretending to buy Mandingo slave fighters when they really want the girl.\n\nWith all the deals and discussions going on, the much-anticipated reunion of Django and Broomhilda is lost in the mix. Not even Django\'s surreptitious trigger finger (whenever she\'s treated badly) adds worthy suspense, which, during this overlong stint at Candyland, is very much needed.\n\nBut there\'s not all downtime at the mansion: a particular Candie lecture involving a slave\'s skull does successfully perk things up, providing DiCaprio a good five minutes of sheer unapologetic villainy. Then, after a shocking twist, it\'s Django alone who must save his girl.\n\nJamie Foxx, having played a quietly brooding second fiddle to Waltz so far, makes up for lost time with heated gusto. This third and final act involving a group of Australians being duped by Django, who\'s learned the art of waxing poetic, is replete with the bare-knuckle action we\'ve anticipated all along: although the large chunks of bloody guts flying off each gunshot victim seems like Tarantino doing an imitation of himself. \n\nThere are some really neat montage sequences and beautiful locations, but some of the music, especially that of the rap nature, seems too modern for the time portrayed. And the editing feels somewhat limp without QT\'s longtime collaborator Sally Menke, who died a few years back: Particular flashbacks and hallucinations are often confusing and awkward.\n\nA pretty good ride, much better than Quentin\'s last two films (BASTERDS and DEATH PROOF), yet there needed a much tighter/sharper vehicle for our title hero to deserve the fanfare of the literally explosive finale.\n\nFor More Reviews: www.cultfilmfreaks.com', u'-0.0634799', u"I saw Django Unchained with the expectation of any Tarantino fan. But I left shaking my head in disappointment. This is not a bad film, but I'm not saying it's a good one.\n\nThe length of the film is one of the main flaws. There are many scenes that do not serve a purpose to its characters and story. Which leads to its pacing problem. These irrelevant scenes exist in the film that often slows it down. It is very unbalanced.\n\nMostly, it's the characters and performances. Many are giving praise to Christoph Waltz and Leonardo DiCaprio. Waltz, first of all, is in similar territory when he was in Inglorious Basterds. He and his character served their purpose and Waltz was just fine in the role, but nothing to highly praise. DiCaprio as Calvin Candie was nothing worth noting. Either its in the performance or the script, I never really invested in him. It's as if Tarantino wanted to write a great movie villain and that's what DiCaprio took as his only direction. There is a scene where he gets the evil monologue, but it comes very forced with ultimately ends up destroying the character. \n\nJamie Foxx, first of all, was the right choice for Django, but I believe that Tarantino did not trust his protagonist. It takes a long while to get invested in him, but at that point, why bother? BUT, the standout for me was Samuel L. Jackson. He takes his character Stephen is able to go beyond the material that is given. There is fun in his performance which is what the film should be.\n\nI am well aware that I will be in the minority, when it comes to disliking the film. How people will try to tell me that there was more to the story than meets the eye, how it's a great revenge tale, how the characters were great and well written etc. But this is not a good Quentin Tarantino film. \n\nThe film is too long, with characters that hold the most minimal of interests. I will be really dishearten to see this film receive awards and praise. Maybe it's the love of Quentin that will jade people. I know it will. But after coming out of a strong year for film, Django falls flat.\n\nThe movie lacks the confidence of character(s) and story in a hyper active world. It loses it's identity somewhere along the line and the little scenes of greatness cannot save it. Most of all it does not have the joy of film that often add life to Tarantino films.", u'-0.0942383', u"I am a hardcore Tarantino fan and I must say I had great expectations for this movie. I can now honestly say that in my opinion Django Unchained is Tarantino's worst film to this day. \n\nLets start with the first major flaw. The soundtrack. Usually Tarantino has great taste for his soundtracks and on most of his movies (pulp fiction, reservoir dogs, kill bill) it actually is a fundamental part and complements the film. On Django it seems that Mr. Tarantino got Lil Wayne to choose some of the tracks. Hip Hop in a western?? Completely ruined the movie for me. \n\nSecond, the length of the movie is ridiculously long... Almost 3 hours. Usually films of such lengths have intricate plot lines and/or are made to tell an exceptionally long story. Not in this case. The movie could have easily been 100 minutes long. If it wasn't for the excessive and unnecessary dialogues, the useless KKK scene, the first 45 minutes of the movie which have almost nothing to do with the main plot line. The last 30 minutes of bloodshed serve to no use and I guess is just a fetish of the director. Mr. Tarantino seems to lose the sense of time and you can never tell where his ego ends and the plot begins.\n\nThird, bad acting. Jamie Foxx is impalpable. Besides a few punch lines and some dramatic moments Foxx doesn't portray the slave from the pre-civil war era but mostly comes off as a thug from the hood. Di Caprio is too pretty-faced to seriously be the villain in this movie and if it wasn't for the horrors happening around the character (Candie) you could hardly tell he's the bad guy. Waltz and Jackson on the other hand with their excellent performances keep this movie together. I was really hoping Tarantino, with such an all-star cast, could have pulled off a both socially relevant and at the same time entertaining film, but again I was mistaken.", u'-0.224296', u'Jesus, where to begin. Completely juvenile, rabbit trails galore, slow moving, get to the firkin point. The way the scenes drag and the endless explaining and talking. This movie was so distasteful, predictable and irritating. First of all, Foxx was miscast, he does not do period well, at all, totally unbelievable here, after years of slavery he\'s suddenly the fastes gun in the west, PLEASE! \n\nThe music, what are we to make of the modern day music with the period events here, you can\'t take any of it seriously. I had to laugh was so absolutely silly and out of place. I have lost all respect for writer/director, the actors I can only hope were in it for the money, but they lose my vote now too.\n\nOpen your EYES folks, for god sakes this is all about bringing division, "I wanna shoot white people and get paid for it". WOW, talk about the globalist elite wanting to distract and divide, this is one of their vehicles. Good for you Hollywood and Washington DC, add another notch to your ugly crown.', u'-0.362053', u'In his previous film "Inglorious Basterds" Tarantino presents two worthy scenes - the one with the Nazi officer in the French farmer\'s house, and the one in the bar where the British and American spies are in German uniforms talking to a suspicious SS German officer and a shootout follows.\n\nIn the first mentioned scene the Nazi officer explains how one has to think like a rat in order to find "rats." The offensive reference is to Jewish families trying to escape Nazi extermination (whom the Nazi officer chases in the movie).\n\nIn that scene the Nazi officer, maybe inadvertently, describes himself as a rat, trying to play wise guy. So does Tarantino.\n\n"Django" is actually proof that Tarantino is a talented Hollywood "rat" that feeds on popular trends packaged in politically correct radicalism. The mixture is gratuitous violence, popular concepts of "just revenge" and butchering of history and the importance of historical fact. Jews killing Nazis in "Inglorious..." Black man killing whites in "Django..." Tarantino is a torture-porn specialist, hiding behind badly disguised ridicule of the magnitude of human suffering in historical dramas like the Holocaust or the issue of slavery in America. One just has to remember his "Hostel" achievements and it all comes home.\n\nThe Tarantinonites can knock themselves out with Django - another trashy movie with a spice of genius in it, to excite the perverted tastes of Hollywood. Evil genius. That smells like a rat to me.', u'-0.232332'], u'tt0033467': [u'\nIt\'s a difficult undertaking for someone of my generation to watch a film like CITIZEN KANE.  Not because it\'s "too old" or "too boring", but because it has been hailed--almost universally--as the single best motion picture ever made.  And while the anticipation of seeing a film with such overwhelming acclaim may be quite exhilarating, actually watching it is ultimately an intimidating and somewhat disappointing experience.\n\nThis isn\'t to say that I thought CITIZEN KANE was a bad film; in fact, I thought everything about it was downright brilliant.  From the enchanting performances right down to the meticulously planned camera movements and clever lighting tricks, there isn\'t a single element of CITIZEN KANE that isn\'t a stunning achievement in all areas of filmmaking.\n\nCITIZEN KANE\'s storyline is deceptively simple.  Even though the plot unfolds by jumping in and out of nonlinear flashbacks, it is surprisingly easy to keep track of.  The straightforwardness and relatively fast pace of the story are what make it seem intimidating.  Because everything moves smoothly along without any standstill, it feels like we are being fooled-like there is something much greater that we just can\'t seem to grasp.  As a first-time viewer, I knew from its reputation that there must be *something* that separates this movie from all the others; something buried within its simple plotline that everybody else has seen, but that I just could not seem to get a handle on.  And then, during those final frames, that something was revealed, and it all began to make sense.  To me, it was these moments of confusion and uncertainty followed by a sense of enlightenment and appreciation that made watching CITIZEN KANE such a meaningful experience.\n\nBut no matter how great of a movie CITIZEN KANE really is, it can never live up to one\'s expectations.  Although I do feel that it is deserving of its acclamation, the constant exposure to its six decades worth of hype and praise will invariably set most modern viewers\' standards at a height that is virtually unreachable--even if it really *is* the best movie of all time.', u'0.346247', u"OK look, let me settle something between those who love and hate this film. A lot of people hail this film because it is technically brilliant and ground breaking. Director Orson Welles did a lot of things visually that no one had ever done before. Nearly every film maker was in some way influenced by this movie. This movie also had a great impact in its time. The title character was based on media giant William Randolph Hearst. He was that generations Donald Trump. He opposed this film so much he did everything in its power to stop its release and almost succeeded. Lastly this film contains some of the strongest and most common themes in literature; Life versus death. It is for these reasons why this film is so revered.\n\nOn the contrary people who hate this film mainly complain that it is boring. Which is a legitimate complaint. The story is slow compared to today's standards, and there is no real Hearst character alive today in which to relate. So yes, the story on the surface is outdated. However, this does not make it a bad movie. It was not made as a Matrix/Star Wars type of movie which can be enjoyed even at surface level. This is not pure entertainment. Remember there is more to film than storytelling. This film was designed to be cinematically beautiful and to tell a basic story of love and redemption. There is much more to the story than the thinly veiled attack on Hearst, one just needs to look deeper. Look at Shakespeare or Hawthorne for example, their literary works are universally loved. Yet, many people blow them off because they refuse to look past the outdated language into the beautiful prose and simple ubiquitous themes. Just because something is outdated does not mean it lacks worth in today's world.\n\nMy advice to those who did not like it the first time or have not seen it yet is simple. Watch it again for what it is. Do not expect to be on the edge of your seat for two hours. Watch it for the cinematography that alone makes this film among the best (I don't agree with AFI's number one ranking but I think it still ranks high). Look deeper into the story and try to connect with it on some level. At the very least appreciate how influential this film was and where the industry would be without it. If you can do this, then maybe some of the naysayers will change their minds. Again, you do not have to love Citizen Kane, but at least respect it for what it is.", u'-0.0692803', u'What do you say about a movie more analysed than is enjoyed, more envied and despised than any other piece of cinema: well documented for its perceived portrayal of William Randolph Hearst, and his efforts to have it destroyed....It has survived and now stands at number one on the AFI\'s top 100 list, for a movie that didn\'t even win the Oscar for its year of release.\n\nWhat can you say about the cinematography and direction and acting, that hasn\'t already been said? The lighting, the camera angles, the new visual techniques and trick photography used for the first time in an American movie to great effect. Special mention has to go to the acting of a 25 year old Orson Welles, an aspect the least highlighted.\n\nThe grand-daddy of the American Soap Opera, it tells the life of Charles Foster Kane, from his humble beginnings, his mother\'s giving him up to a wealthy guardian, and his building of a newspaper/radio empire. It sees Kane go from an idealistic journalist to a powerful mogul able to manipulate history through his media empire. \n\nDespite all his money and power, Kane is not immune to the hand of destiny, and oh how she slaps Kane the old American way. A married Kane is caught through pure "innocence" with a "singer" and a scandal erupts, costing Kane the state governorship; you can guess the instigator of the scandal-mongering: the incumbent governor.\n\nIn the first part of the movie, we see a Kane adored by the public and employees but we don\'t see the reason why his relationship with his wife deteriorated, shown in a powerful film sequence of spouses drifting apart through the years. In the second part we see his relationship with the "singer" whom he took as his second wife, and how he uses her to try and manipulate public opinion of himself, just as he had used the media empire previously. The only problem is that his second wife isn\'t as competent as the media empire was in gaining respect or adoration; she is just terrible as an opera singer. But Kane wants to prove to the public that the "singer" who he was caught with, was more than "whore" and that he had the power to shape public opinion; she even told kane that she didn\'t want to be a singer. It is the cruelest thing any man could have done to another human being; manipulated for his own ends. William Randolph Hearst was said to have been less angry about his own portrayal than that of his mistress, Marion Davies.\n\nThe movie broke new grounds for cinema also, in its story-telling: we see first the death of a recluse Kane in his old age, and then there are flashbacks from newsreels and investigations and interviews of reporters piecing together the life of Charles Foster Kane and his dying word "rosebud".\n\nThe reporters never found out what his dying word meant, but the audience is shown what it "is". No single word can describe a man\'s life after all, so what does it mean??? lost childhood innocence and happiness?? \n\nThis movie bred a bunch of copycats like "The Carpetbaggers" and "Valley of the Dolls", and inspired the great TV soapies like Dallas and Dynasty. Many other movies from different genres have copied and perhpas bettered the camera work and lighting and yet this movie has stood up well through the 60 years from its sheer brilliance and originality.\n\nDespite its greatness, Citizen Kane seems to have taken some victims along the way. At age 25, Orson Welles starred, wrote and directed his masterpiece, but because of various reasons, political, envy, hatred, he was never able to match it. The other victim seems to have been Dorothy Comingore as Susan Alexander, mirroring the career of Marilyn Monroe who came after her.\n\nA great movie thats stood the test of time. See it for what it is: a fantastic piece of story-telling firstly, only then can you see its greatness.', u'0.0486438', u"\nCitizen Kane is majestic, elegant and noble.  It begins at the end, we see a\nman of obvious wealth and power breathe his last, and then the mysteries of his life are unraveled via a series of anecdotes, barely remembered scenes and highly subjective memories.  The boldness of this approach cannot be overemphasized.  At the time that this film was made Hollywood was for the most part used to creating straight-forward stories with clearly identified heroes and villains.  Kane dared to present Man as he is, rife with confusions, internal contradictions and uncertainty.\n\nAs the film progressed, we see Kane, loosely based on William Randolph Hearst, the famous newspaper tycoon slowly sacrifice his ideals in order to build his financial empire, losing his friendships with those who believed in him until ultimately he looses everything he has, his marriage, his friends, and his integrity.  Though he is the richest man in the world he lives his remaining isolated in his privately built mountain estate where he has surrounded himself with material pleasures, alone and despairing, one senses that he welcomes death.  The film takes the view that wealth and power are inherently  destructive of human values.  Kane himself states `If I hadn't been born rich I  might have been a really great man.\n\nWhat is so masterful about Kane is its ambiguity.  We never are certain if Kane really did believe in the values that he professed.  At the same time that he sets himself up as above the world, he longs for the affection of the common people.  This is symbolized by his exploitative, and patronizing love for a chorus girl, Susan Alexander (Dorothy Comingore).  Her character is given a paper-thin characterization, the only obvious flaw in a nearly perfect movie.\n\nOrson Wells gives a bravura performance as Kane, both identifying with and condemning the man.  This film was his first venture into movie making after the infamous War of the Worlds radio broadcast that threw America into an uproar.  Wells, a child prodigy, had a background in Shakespearian theater, offering modernized adaptations of the Classics, a bold and unusual gesture at the time.  He brought that kind of sweeping tragic romantic sensibility to his first film.\n\nUnconstrained by Hollywood's traditions, he broke all the rules.  The deep focus photography that gives Kane its theatrical look was one of his innovations.  A mastery of sound, gained from years of working in the radio was another.  Kane is an avalanche of technical innovation, unmatched in any other Hollywood film.\n\nDespite the film's pessimistic outlook, it is studded by moments of joy, beauty and emotional truth.  The supporting cast of characters, most of them regulars from Wells' Mercury Theater are also superb.  Joseph Cotton is memorable as Jed Leland Kane's close friend who believes in him more then he does.  And Everet Slone is wonderful as Kane's would be mentor Mr. Bernstien.\n\nSo many scenes in this movie linger forever in the memory, one is left with a stirring vision of the frailty of the human condition, the film gives us no easy answers and while being fiercely critical of many of it's characters is universal in it's compassion and sympathy, this is perhaps the most vital ingredient for great art.\n\nKane was one of the most controversial films ever made.  Hearst, offended by his portrayal, offered RKO a small fortune to destroy the film.  When that didn't work his newspapers embarked on a campaign of defamation against Wells, thus proving that the film's criticism of the power and corruption of the press were precisely on target.  Wells was never given a free hand to direct how he liked again and American Cinema was deprived of the one of the greatest geniuses to adopt it as a medium of self-expression.\n\nIt's influence, was immediate, incalculable and mostly unacknowledged, the film was a box office and critical failure due to Hearst's efforts and it was not until years later that this film got the respect it deserved. Nowadays there is not one living film director of serious artistic intent that has not been deeply influenced by Citizen Kane.  It's not just a masterpiece it's a creative touchstone.\n\nOf course there were other talents at work in making Kane, Hermann Mankiewicz's efforts on the script were indispensable and Bernard Hermann, the composer most famous for working with Hitchcock provided the films beautiful music.  Still, the film remains most obviously the work of Orson Wells, a veritable hall of mirrors reflecting the great artist's dreams, obsessions and fears.  Citizen Kane is not just one of the great works of cinema it is one of the greatest artistic creations of the century\n", u'0.364675', u'Well as a media student myself , i have come across this question many times in books and during lectures. There are simply 3 reasons the film, which was considered as the "Mona Lisa of all films" , created such a legendary appeal upon release in 1941: 1) This was Orson Welles first cinematic debut , even though he had been a huge star in theater , he was given an opportunity few first time directors were permitted to having. He had full artistic freedom and above all power, to direct , produce, write and even star in his own picture. Therefore the film industry and RKO pictures had absolutely no influence in the making of the film and were not to know what was happening on set .Of course this was bound to generate a number of problems as businessmen were curious about the nature and plot of the film , which takes us to the second reason the film caused controversy.\n\n2)One of the main reasons the film posed contentions was because the main character , Charles Foster Kane(Orson Welles), featured a range of similarities with real media mogul and newspaper journalist William Randolph Hurst . Therefore the film was seen as depicting the life , problems and personal relationships of a real person thus fictionalizing his life. Some of the similarities between the two persona\'s are:\n\nKANE: newspaper tycoon , worked for New York Inquirer , known as the Kubla Khan of Xanadu ,married talentless singer Susan Alexander Kane, he was a political aspirant to presidency by campaigning for governor, bought his wife the Municipal Opera House, Financier Thatcher, and threat Getty\'s. Hurst: yellow journalist , worked for New York Journal, political aspirant to presidency by becoming governor, married acress Marion Davies, bought his wife Cosmopolitan Pictures, financier JP Morgan , and threat Tammany Hall.\n\n-differences: Susan Alexander Kane( Dorothy Comingdore) leaves Kane later in their life however there was no marriage breakdown for Hurst and Marion.\n\n3) The last reason and most pivotal of all to why the film was regarded the way it was , was due to its technical and stylistic innovations . The film upon its release was misunderstood and unappreciated by critics as they couldn\'t comprehend many of its elements and were too concerned with its dark and mysterious nature which is one of Welles\'s characteristics in his films. The film after all was 20 years ahead of its time and was only regarded as a triumphant success upon its second release after the American Film Noir era in the 1950\'s. His most prominent artistic inventions were: -the low angled camera movements -extreme facial closeups -long uninterrupted shots -chiaroscuro lighting -overlapping dialogue , giving a realistic effect to conversations -subjective camera angles -deep focus shots and depth of field -flashbacks that make up most of the film All the above and more constitute to why the film is so influential to all would be film directors and for why many people regard it as the best film of all time. Lastly we musnt forget the exceptional score by Bernard Herrmann who had collaborated also with the best known director of all time, Alfred Hitchcock , and made him the chillin sounds of strings in Psycho and Vertigo to name a few . In addition the superb photography of Gregg Toland in regards to Welles\'s unique eye on details. After all he wanted to put in each shot everything the human eye can see if they were present.\n\nThere are many areas of the film which are crucial , these are some of the most important , and as you can see there is never too little or too much that you can add to this masterpiece .', u'0.325538', u'I know why you\'re reading this. You\'re smart, you have great taste, a passion for cinema, and you see CK near the top of every \'Great Movie\' list ever compiled. So with great anticipation you borrow a DVD copy and sit down for a real treat, and... you can\'t get through the first half hour. You fall asleep.\n\nSurprised, you think, \'It must be me, maybe I\'m tired,\' so a month later, you try again. But you don\'t even get as far as before, and wake up drooling out the corner of your mouth as a bloated Orson Welles, with really bad age make-up, groans \'Rosebud, Rosebud\'. \n\nIt doesn\'t make sense. You\'re perplexed. You\'ve watched other films on the lists... Casablanca made you stand up and cheer, cry, laugh, feel connected to all humanity. You even adore films on the list that some might consider oblique, like 8 1/2, which you reckon reinvented cinema language, weaving in and out of memory, dreams, psyche, reality, putting the human spirit up on the screen, making you cheer, laugh, and feel connected to all humanity. \n\nSo why does CK leave you so cold? You wonder, \'What\'s wrong with me? Am I stupid or something?\'\n\nYour borrowed DVD copy gathers dust (notice how the lender never asks for it back?), taunting your unquiet mind: "You must watch me: I\'m the greatest film of all time!" But you shudder at the thought. Life\'s too short and, after all, there\'s more engaging things to do - like scraping plaque off the dog\'s teeth.\n\nYears pass. Finally, you can take it no longer. You think, \'To be a serious film lover I MUST watch Citizen Kane! Maybe I was too immature before - yes, that must be it!\' So you gird your loins and sit - awake! - through the whole thing. The whole turgid, ponderous, dull, vacuous, plodding, dank catastrophe. It\'s even worse than you feared. An emotionally and intellectually empty story. Your average six year old can invent a more complex, engaging tale.\n\nGenuinely puzzled, you ask people who name it as one of the greatest films of all time why they like it, and with barely concealed superiority that phoneys are wont to adopt, they wax lyrical talk about the haunting mystery of the final words, "Rosebud, rosebud". You notice there\'s no feeling behind what they say. They also talk a great deal about Gregg Toland\'s cinematography, with liberal references to "deep focus", and you appreciate this, you really do, the cinematography was damned fine, best thing about the movie. That shot which started outside the window then tracked back into the room was really cool. But you just don\'t believe a movie is made great by cinematography alone. \n\nIn all your inquiries, you never once hear the following phrase, spoken from the heart: "God, I love that film".\n\nSo here you find yourself, reading IMDb comments.\n\nWell, let me tell you this: There\'s Nothing Wrong With You! You Are Right! It\'s Overrated Flashy Unintelligent Rubbish!\n\nOne day, perhaps (one can but dream), the coolest, greatest, most admired film being in the world will point out the bleeding obvious nakedness of this bloated Emperor, and the assorted film critics, film studies teachers, and others who need to be told what to think by an authority figure, shall squirm, and CK shall drop off the lists once and for all. \n\nUntil that great day, don\'t be afraid to speak the truth.', u'-0.125181', u'I have an observation concerning Rosebud (and I don\'t mean that story about Marion Davies). Everyone seems to assume that Kane saying "Rosebud" means he was thinking of the one time in his life when he was totally happy and had what he wanted. For years I have also assumed that. The other day something occurred to me and I am curious to know if it has occurred to anyone else.\n\nWhen Kane first meets Susan Alexander he says he is on his way to (or coming from? I don\'t recall which) a warehouse where his childhood belongings are stored which he has not seen in many years. He doesn\'t mention the sled, but presumably that is the one thing which drew him to the warehouse. Kane is splashed and Susan laughs at him and one things leads to another. But my point is this: Kane would never have met Susan but for Rosebud. If Kane never met Susan he would never have been caught in the "love nest" with her and lost the election for governor. Kane might have had another mistress, but this seems unlikely. Kane is not very interested in sex - perhaps because he feels he is making love to the whole world. His interest in Susan is primarily idealized and not physical. So but for the meeting Susan, Kane would likely not have had a scandal and would have been elected governor. We are told he would then have almost certainly been elected President. Also he would not have lost his wife and his son would not have been killed in the car accident. As President, Kane could have been the most powerful man in the world. Instead he loses this chance, loses his wife and loses his son - all because he happened to be on a certain street at a certain moment. And the reason he was on that street at that moment was Rosebud!\n\nSo maybe when Kane says "Rosebud" he is not thinking of when he was a carefree lad playing in the snow. Maybe he realizes that because of Rosebud his whole life went spinning in a completely different direction from what it otherwise would have taken. By pure accident Rosebud ruined his life and shut him off forever from everything he otherwise could have been and could have accomplished. And maybe that is why "Rosebud" is the last word he speaks.\n\nBut if this is true (and it seems quite logical to me) then why does no one else comment upon it? Why has no one spotted it? Or has someone I just don\'t know it? Or could it be that this is the kind of truth that no one wants to face? That all of our lives are determined more by blind, idiot accident than by design or purpose.', u'-0.387655', u"I've heard so much told about Citizen Kane and Orson Welles, so I finally decided to get the film, and find out if it really is all that it's cracked up to be... I must say, it's great. The plot is great, and the way it's told is amazing. The story is first summed up in a matter of minutes, about 15, to be more accurate, and then the rest of the film has characters telling the story through flashbacks and retelling. We hear just about every opinion about Charles Foster Kane, apart from his own. The story is told after his death, and we see everything important that leads up to it, and only in the very end do we understand him, only then do we fully understand who he was, and what made him so. The ending also reveals one of the very most important things in any man or woman... one thing that everyone needs and knows of. I won't reveal it here, as it would almost be a crime to spoil the experience of this film to anyone. The acting is excellent; Welles himself is stellar as Kane, and his impressive appearance, along with his commanding voice, makes the character a forceful sight, nay, experience. The characters are well-written and credible. The character of Kane is probably the most well-rounded and perfectly built up I've seen in a movie, ever. The cinematography is excellent... the editing is great. I can't praise the angles, pans, zooms and transitions enough... it just has to be experienced. Now, for the one thing I can criticize in the film; the pacing. It's only two hours long, but it feels like much, much more. There were portions of the film where it felt like it didn't move at all. When there weren't great dialog or something equally as good in the film, it dragged terribly. There were too many scenes where the dialog seemed pointless, as well, I think. It didn't seem to be leading to anything. However, this criticism is so minor, due to the ending more than making up for it, that I still give this film a perfect score. I can't do anything but agree with its placing at the top of the top #250 films of all time, here on IMDb. As I'm writing this, it's #11. That's pretty much what it deserves, in my opinion. Not higher, not lower. Not the greatest film of all time(that pretty much still belongs to The Godfather, I think... at least, I haven't seen a better film than that, yet), but definitely far up there. I recommend this to any fan of film in general, and anyone who thinks they can understand it; it has a truly profound point that any man(and woman) should know of(preferably through seeing the film for themselves). Don't let the fact that it's old and black & white deter you from seeing this masterpiece. A true cinematic masterpiece, in every sense of the word. 10/10", u'0.34632', u'Kane "Citizen Kane" (1941) was Orson Welles\' film debut, and in it he created an enduring masterpiece that is considered by many to be the greatest movie ever made.\n\nStory: \n\nShortly after "Citizen Kane" opens, we see aged newspaper tycoon Charles Foster Kane (Welles) softly drawl the word "Rosebud" and die. Sensing that there\'s a story behind Kane\'s dying word, a magazine editor shows a reporter a newsreel obituary that chronicles how Kane created a business empire, married a U.S. President\'s niece, ran unsuccessfully for Governor of New York, divorced his first wife and married a second, collected art, built a fabulous estate called Xanadu, and divorced his second wife. The reporter is then assigned the task of ferreting out the significance of "Rosebud." As the reporter\'s investigation progresses, fascinating details about Kane emerge.\n\nMy opinion: \n\nCitizen kane is maybe for a lot of people (myselve not included) not a real entertaining movie, But there is no doubt about it that aws one of the most important movies ever made.\n\nThe visual style of "Citizen Kane" looks stunningly fresh and inventive even today, and the unconventional narrative structure of the Oscar-winning screenplay still seems daring. Welles\' portrayal of a character who gradually ages from 25 to old age is unexcelled, and the movie\'s supporting cast, most of whom had worked previously with Welles on stage and radio productions, is superb. In short, everything came together in "Citizen Kane" to make it one of the greatest character studies ever captured on film.\n\nCitizen kane is also one of my favorites and is listed in my top 5 of all time: 9.5 / 10 Masterpiece !!!', u'0.704174', u"\nThe movie Citizen Kane was loosely based on the life of William Randolph Hearst. The movie begins with the death of Charles Foster Kane, who was the editor of the New York Journal.  He says the name rosebud and drops a crystal ball, which falls to the ground a shatters.  News clips are shown about the different occurrences in Kane's life depicting how Kane acquired his fortune.  Throughout the whole movie reporters are trying to figure out what the word rosebud meant and why it was the last word he said before he died.  The reporters find people who knew Kane throughout his life trying to get information from them that would put some sense to Kane saying `rosebud' as his last word.  Many of the stories told by the people interviewed show the audience a lot about his life through flashbacks. One of the opening scenes is that of Kane's mansion called Xanadu.  It has a sign that says `no trespassing' that is hung from the outside gate.  The shot is very dark and gloomy, hinting that maybe Kane's life was the same way.  He was a very power-hungry man that went from being at the top to rock bottom.  Many other movies have definitely taken note to style and effects of this movie.  The camera work, lighting, acting a music contributed to making Citizen Kane one of the best American movies of all time.  Orson Welles deserves all the credit that he receives from this movie.  He was the leading character, producer and director; basically a one man show that still many of us appreciate.  I thought that this movie was well done.  It had so much symbolism that made the movie unique, although if you didn't know what was symbolic during the different scenes it would be hard to follow, but most of the symbolism is easily recognized.  One of the best symbolic scenes that also foreshadows is when Kane is at the top of the stairs and he is told that he lost his position and as he walks down the stairs the camera is shooting from at the top and it looks like a spiral showing that Kane's life and career are out of control.  Citizen Kane was very dramatic and all who took part in the movie played their roles well.  The characters seemed very real and believable making this movie very memorable.  This film has features that every movie should try to incorporate; symbolism, great actors, interesting storyline, excellent camera shots, lighting and sound techniques.  I think everyone should see this movie at least once in their life time because it is one of the greatest American movies of all time.\n", u'0.154803', u'\nI have tried to watch this movie 3 times.  Each time I promise myself that I\nwill watch it through to see all the facinating camera angles and light shading.  I want to see the last ten minutes of the film and be awed and amazed as I realize that Rosebud is something extraordinary.  I want to recognize Mr. Wells\' genius, daring, and inventivness.  I want to feel the passion, emptiness, and all the other powerful emotions that the actors and "unique" cinematography portray in this movie.\n\nI have not been able to make it yet.  This is the single most boring hard to watch movie that I have ever tried to watch.  I can usually watch about any movie at least once, but not this one.\n\nI don\'t need exciting special effects, car chases, shoot outs, or sex scenes to keep me interested.  I just need the movie to be interesting. This film is not interesting to me.  I love history and I watch many older movies and I appreciate most of them for what they are, and in the time frame that they were made.  But this one is just very hard to watch. If you have to have a college professor,(who himself has had to read a book about it to understand it) explain a movie to you so that you can appreciate it, then I\'m sorry folks but then it just "ain\'t good".\n\nI have enjoyed thousands of movies, and I have disliked many also, but very few have I never been able to finish watching and this is one of them.\n\n', u'-0.196653', u'"Citizen Kane" was a dazzling movie debut for Welles, a twenty-four-year-old infant terrible whose brilliant work for stage and radio had already made him famous\x85 \n\nRKO had given him carte blanche, and with the collaboration of writer Herman Mankiewicz and photographer Gregg Toland, he had produced a masterpiece\x85 \n\n"Citizen Kane" is the story of Charles Foster Kane, a rich young man who decides to build a newspaper empire and in doing so sacrifices his professed high ideals on the altar of yellow journalism\x85 His personal, political ambitions are ruined when his extramarital liaison with a young singer becomes public knowledge and his efforts to make her an international opera star bring him nothing but ridicule\x85 Having alienated his friends and wives and lost a good part of his fortune, Kane spends his last years alone in the enormous art-filled palace he has had created in Florida\x85\n\nTold primarily in flashbacks, the film begins with Kane\'s death: after dropping a paperweight that simulates a snowfall when it is turned upside down, the old man whispers a single word, "Rosebud," and dies\x85 Immediately a strident Mach-of-Time newsreel begins, reviewing the highlights of Kane\'s career as the camera had recorded them over the years\x85 It is, however, an unsatisfactory record of a man\'s life, and a group of journalists decide to probe deeper in an attempt to discover the truth about Kane\x85 Perhaps, they speculate, the word "Rosebud" offers a clue... Then ensues a series of interviews with the key people in Kane\'s life, each of whom relates the man\'s story as he or she knew it... \n\nThe portrait that eventually emerges is one of a grasping, vain, selfish, and ambitious man... "He never gave you anything," an old friend recalls bitterly, "he just left you a tip." In the film\'s final moments, workmen in Kane\'s palace are seen destroying unwanted junk\x85 One of the items they toss into the furnace is a child\'s sled; as it burns, the word "Rosebud" can be seen painted on it\x85\n\nThe story of Charles Foster Kane is engrossing but not particularly profound\x85 The movie is a superb piece of film-making, nonetheless, because the techniques employed, although not necessarily new, had never before been used together to such startling effect\x85 Welles and Toland made brilliant use of deep-focus photography and of an arsenal of lighting effects\x85 \n\nIn the course of the film, flashbulbs pop, spotlights play, the sun\'s rays pour down into darkened rooms, beams of light are emitted by a movie projector, lightning flashes, and smoke, fog shadows, rain, and snow all contribute to the almost tangible atmosphere\x85 Quick, dramatic cuts occur throughout\x85 In one famous sequence, Welles employs six fast scenes to portray the disintegration of Kane\'s first marriage: each shot shows Kane and his wife at the breakfast table, but in each they are clearly more estranged until, in the final shot, they sit in silence as she reads a rival newspaper\x85\n\nToland\'s constantly moving camera is somewhat obtrusive, but it is nevertheless mesmerizing\x85 In the famous sequence at the opera house\x97the occasion of the second Mrs. Kane\'s disastrous debut\x97the camera shows the anguished vocal coach in the conductor\'s box and then moves upward to the flies, where one stagehand expresses his critical opinion of the performance by holding his nose\x85 Welles\' use of sound, ranging from thunder to a cockatoo\'s screech, reflects his experience in radio\x85\n\nThere had never been a picture like "Citizen Kane." It openly satirized a wealthy and powerful living American, it deliberately antagonized Hollywood\'s ruling elite, and it bravely ignored conventional cinema technique\x85 Innovative, aggressive, and fascinating, "Citizen Kane" electrified a complacent industry\x85 Welles dominated Kane\x85 He had become, in a single stroke, the most admired, envied, praised and detested man in Hollywood\x85 Unhappily, the movie industry never learned to utilize Welles\' quixotic genius, and his career never rescaled the heights it had reached in 1941\x85', u'0.178838', u'Okay. First of all, I DO like many old movies. 12 angry men, Casablanca, Where Eagles Dare, Psycho, The Treasure of Sierra Madre, The Great Dictator, Some Like it Hot and more. They\'re all brilliant and I enjoyed them throughout.\n\nBut Citizen Kane...I just can\'t see what\'s so great about it. It made no impression on me whatsoever. When it comes to plot, camera-angles, themes, characters, acting and such, it seems like few movies are as praised as this. Still, when I read reviews on other classics, for example Casablanca, it feels like they say many of the same things.\n\nI\'m not an expert on what makes some films objectively better than others, but if the other classics with most of the other "greatnesses" actually ARE interesting and fun to watch, then Citizen Kane should also be able to entertain as well as just being "great".\n\nYou can say what you want about movies, but no matter how well they\'re made, they should also entertain in some way or another to be classified as great. And I\'m not one of those guys who only like action movies. An example of a great movie is Requiem for a Dream. It\'s disturbing, repulsive and scary as h*ll, but I couldn\'t keep my eyes from it, and it made a brutal impression. Other examples of movies that are deep, makes an impression AND are entertaining could be One flew over the Cuckoos Nest, The Visitor, American Beauty and Eternal Sunshine of a Spotless Mind.\n\nBut entertainment isn\'t all. I see that. If Citizen Kane had made an impression it wouldn\'t fail no matter how uninteresting. Taxi Driver is another movie I bored me through, and don\'t want to see again, but still I find it good because I couldn\'t stop thinking about it afterwards. It made an impression. Citizen Kane doesn\'t do that either.\n\nAnd to all you die-hard-fans who hate me, wants to disgrace me, and finds it horrendous to call a classic "not entertaining" I\'ll just quote the great Ingmar Bergman: "Citizen Kane is a total bore!" To call me retarded or something like that would be to call one of the greatest directors of all time the same. In addition it\'s clear that many more agree as well. It\'s not long since the feature was in the top 3 on IMDb. Today it\'s number 29.\n\nSo all in all, I may not know how to judge objective qualities of movies, but I\'m certain that movies that doesn\'t leave any impression whatsoever AND isn\'t entertaining at all aren\'t great no matter what. And that\'s why "the greatest movie ever made" fails for me. 3/10', u'-0.0149475', u"\nCitizen Kane, the film, is many things.  It is a brilliantly crafted series of flashbacks and remembrances.  It is an engaging story of a dynamic man in a dynamic world.  It is a remarkable statement for the wide range of time periods that it covers.  It is a deceptively simple story centering on perhaps the most meaningful word in all of moviedom.  Behind all that, Citizen Kane is the American cinema.  There is not a major director today who has not been influenced by the genius Orson Welles put forth in his debut masterpiece.  The film centers around a group of reporters investigating the origin of the dying newspaper tycoon (loosely based on William Randolph Hearst), Charles Foster Kane's last word: Rosebud.  The movie begins with an unforgettable newsreel montage summarizing the man's life.\n\nFrom there on, the viewer is thrown into a gloriously chaotic world of flashbacks upon flashbacks, in which the viewer slowly learns just about everything about Charles Foster Kane's enthralling life.  From his trying childhood to his rise to power to the pinnacle of his success to his marital difficulties to his fall from grace, the story of Charles Foster Kane is presented for the viewer in a way that few other movies can offer: magically.  Citizen Kane, undeniably, is THE triumph of the American cinema, and one of the greatest films every created.\n", u'0.686147', u'For the life of me, I have tried hard to understand how and why this movie could possibly be considered the #1 film in the first 100 years of American film-making. The first time I tried to watch it, I got a few minutes and hated it; I couldn\'t make myself care. I tried again, because it\'s a "classic" made by a "genius", and I sincerely wanted to understand how it could possibly be voted higher than Casablanca.\n\nIt is boring and noisy and the makeup is horrible. I will never understand why this movie was voted #1. I wouldn\'t even put it in the top 100.\n\nIt has failed in every way a film can fail. I don\'t care about the protagonist. I find it clich\xe9, obnoxious and dull. Perhaps in its day it was fresh, but it doesn\'t stand the test of time the way Casablanca does.\n\nI don\'t care what anyone else says about this movie; in my opinion, it is the worst thing a movie can be: boring. I will never force myself to watch it again.', u'-0.561382'], u'tt0075314': [u"\nA towering classic of American cinematic power.  Martin Scorsese teams up with one of the most intense actors of that time to create a masterpiece of urban alienation.  Paul Schrader's magnificent script paints a portrait of loneliness in the largest city of the world.  Travis never once enters into a meaningful relationship with any character anywhere in the film.  He is the most hopelessly alone person I've ever encountered on film.\n\nHe is alone with his thoughts, and his thoughts are dark ones.  The film fools you on a first viewing.  Is Travis an endearing eccentric?  Sure, he's odd, but he's so polite, and he's got a quirky sense of humor.  His affection for Betsy is actually rather endearing.  But on a second view, you see it for what it is.  The audience comes to see Travis's psychosis gradually, but there's actually far less development than one might think. When he talks about cleaning up the city, the repeat viewer knows he doesn't mean some sort of Giuliani-facelift.  This is less a film about a character in development as it is a kind of snapshot.  To be sure, it takes the stimulus to provoke the response, but does that imply some kind of central change in the character?\n\nTremendous supporting roles are brought to life through vivid performances by Keitel and Foster especially.  Shepard's character, Betsy, is little more than a foil to highlight Travis's utter alienation from society, but she is still impeccably portrayed.  With only two scenes that don't center on Travis, it is unavoidably De Niro's show.  The life with which the supporting cast imbues their characters is a credit to themselves, and to the director's willingness to let the film develop from the intersection of diverse ideas and approaches.  What would the plot lose by eliminating the Albert Brooks character (Tom)?  Nothing at all.  He makes almost no impact on Travis's life, which is where the plot lives.  But his inclusion makes the film as a whole much richer and fuller.\n\nAs a piece of American cinema history, this film will live forever.  But far more important than that, this film will survive as a universal, ever-relevant examination of the workings of the alienated mind.  The story doesn't end when the credits roll.  We know Travis will snap again.  But the story doesn't end with Travis either.  It continues today in the cities and in the schools.  The film is about the brutal power of the disaffected mind.\n\nThis film didn't cause the incidents in Colombine, or Hawaii, or Seattle, or wherever you care to look, even with all of its disturbing images of violence.  It didn't cause those things.  It predicted them.\n", u'0.115947', u"\nTaxi Driver is one of the best films ever made. This is one of those films that you do not get tired of seeing and every time you watch it you realize a little detail that you have not seen before. Excellent actors, a good director, an impressive soundtrack and a real story are the main appeals of this film.\n\nThis film is about loneliness, about the isolation of a man in a society full of scum. His objective is to finish with the scum of the streets. The story uses a taxi driver as a metaphor of loneliness and it has some kind of irony because we can see that a city which is full of people can be the most lonely place for a man. The long nights in the city, the night environment full of whores, junkies, pimps and thieves are the main elements of the world in which Travis Bickle lives. Travis is an misunderstood guy who is seeking desperately for some kind of company because as he says 'loneliness has followed me all my life, everywhere' but at the same time he seems not to do anything to avoid his situation and it is seen when he goes with Betsy (Cybill Shepherd) to a porn cinema. At the end of the film the character makes real his most violent fantasies, with a look of certain soldiers from Vietnam, and he behaves like this because of his loneliness, his alienation and because he does not find any sense to his life. The violent behaviour becomes Travis into a hero, although he had killed many people and he could do it again. Although he acts with an extreme violence the spectator understand him and the reasons why he acts that way. The soundtrack of the film, which is composed by Bernard Herrmann, inspires some kind of loneliness and sometimes it is absolutely terrifying like in a horror film. This music and the slow camera showing the streets help to introduce the spectator into the world of Travis, to know what he is thinking about.\n\nIn general I cannot say any negative aspect of this film because I have not found anything bad. Although it is a film of the 70s it is not an old-fashioned movie because the essence of the story, the reality that is shown on it, can be perfectly referred to the current society. This film has the privilege of having made famous the sentence \x91You talking' to me? You talking' to me?' which will remain in the history of cinema. This is an authentic masterpiece.\n", u'0.215403', u'\nIf a picture is worth a thousand words then this movie (moving picture) is worth a million words, which is why it has probably generated at least a million words.\n\nWhat can one say. The obvious: that "Taxi Driver" is great, it is. That it is a masterpiece, it is. What sets this film apart from so many other films, including great films, is that it is an enigma. Every time I watch this film I see something else, I notice something else, I feel something else, I wonder something else. And I am, clearly, not the only one who reacts to the film this way that is why it lends itself to endless speculation and discussion.\n\nSince so many positive reviews have been made, rather than add my own red hot glowing review I thought I would address those people who have written that they don\'t like "Taxi Driver" because, they say, they find it dull and boring, hard to follow, etc. These people miss some important points about the film.\n\nONE, "Taxi Driver" is NOT an action film. If you want an action film watch "Die Hard" and its numerous sequels, or "Lethal Weapon" and its sequels, not to mention "Rambo" and thousands of other "action flicks."  Nothing wrong with them, per se. Nothing wrong with liking them either. But is wrong to put down "Taxi Driver" because of what it is not.\n\nTWO, "Taxi Driver" is about loneliness and loneliness is characterized by an almost crushing boredom and emptiness and Travis Bickle\'s character reflects that. His life is dull and boring, hardly anything happens to him and that is what "Taxi Driver" shows - Bickle\'s pathetic life.\n\nTHREE, some people say that they don\'t understand the plot, Bickle\'s attitudes and behaviour, etc. But that is because "Taxi Driver" is about a man who is profoundly emotionally disturbed although he (and his buddies) don\'t seem to know it. His actions aren\'t rational because he isn\'t rational. His actions make no sense because he makes no sense. Offhand, I can\'t think of any other film that has depicted mental illness as well as "Taxi Driver" and no film that attempts to show the world as seen by someone like Travis Bickle.\n\nThere you go: three reasons to address the most common criticisms of the film with one notable exception, its controversial ending, but THAT is a whole topic in itself which is just more proof of why "Taxi Driver" is so worthwhile - when viewers aren\'t sure what actually happens in the end (Is Travis hallucinating as he is dying? Is that what the slow moving overhead tracking shot suggests? Or does he really become a hero in the media and get realeased back into the world with his buddies? Etc, etc.) The questions and issues raised by "Taxi Driver" just go one and on.\n\nNow if after reading the above you still don\'t think "Taxi Driver" is a great film, I can\'t help you. I am NOT saying you have to like (or love) "Taxi Driver" just appreciate it or at least acknowledge its greatness even if it isn\'t your cup of tea. Actually, I don\'t love "Taxi Driver" because it doesn\'t lend itself to love. It is too disturbing a picture precisely because it is way too close to reality, it cuts too close to the bone for my comfort (or rather, discomfort). It is not comfortable to watch because it isn\'t supposed to be. So if "Taxi Driver" makes you feel uncomfortable and uneasy it should because real life is uncomfortable and uneasy (unless you are born rich or something).\n\nFinally, after watching it again for the nth time I have begun to notice (and feel) just how smooth "Taxi Driver" is. The overall feel and flow of the film is incredibly smooth in which not only each scene but each and every movement and gesture flows into the other imperceptibly. Sometimes I play back scences and sequences over and over to catch how it happens. In fact, I see it happening and still can\'t quite figure out how it is done but I have a hunch - DeNiro. DeNiro is just amazing in this film. If you haven\'t done it already, watch it with the remote in your hand and play some of the scenes in slow motion and you will SEE what I am talking about. Only DeNiro could do what he does. The sheer minimalism of his performance is just stunning. How he gets so much from so little never ceases to amaze me. DeNiro\'s performance in "Taxi Driver" only reminds me of what sports announcer Curt Gowdy exclaimed after one of Baltimore Orioles third baseman Brooks Robinson\'s incredible plays in the 1970 World Series,"This guy is another world!"\n', u'-0.200411', u'\nDespite what some might see as limited by technical flaws and/or as an overly simplistic plot, Taxi Driver deserves its critical reputation as a cinematic masterpiece. Some 23 years later, the existential plight of Travis Bickle, "God\'s lonely man," continues to pack a hard emotional punch. In fact, it\'s hard to know where to begin when praising the elements of this film - such elements as the dark location shots of a (now gone) seedy Times Square, the cinema verite settings of the cabbies and campaign workers, the magnificent Bernard Hermann score, Paul Schrader\'s fine script, the memorable performances of Jodie Foster, Harvey Keitel, and Peter Boyle all must be mentioned. However, the brilliance of this film is primarily a result of the brilliance of De Niro and Scorsese, one of the greatest actor-director teams in movie history. This is an unforgettable film and rates a 10 out of 10, in my estimation.', u'0.903527', u'The script of "Taxi Driver" is built like a diary, the diary of a very ordinary guy who gets hired as a night taxi driver back from Vietnam, because he can\'t sleep at night. A very ordinary guy who tries to break his isolation, but can\'t, while violence accumulates inside him. One of those unnoticed people with dark things on their mind, one of those who break up the news one day with some extraordinary outburst of rage, to fall back immediately into anonymity.\n\nThe gradual transformation of man into beast in this movie is chilling. It\'s still funny and pathetic when the hero threatens himself in front of the mirror ("you\'re talking to me?"), but when he comes out with a mohawk hairdo and dark glasses, it is obvious that nasty stuff is going to take place. As in "A Clockwork Orange", violence is recuperated by society depending on what purpose it is used for. Whereas he was about to murder the candidate for presidency, "god\'s lonely man" fails and instead kills a vicious pimp who exploits teenage prostitutes. The potential criminal becomes a hero for a day.\n\nSuch stories happen everywhere of course, but it seems that the bewildering atmosphere of New York City\'s summer night was the best choice. "Taxi Driver" gives us a very realistic approach of New York, in a way that is not seen on screen so often, at least not anymore, whilst that city is probably the one in the world that has been filmed the biggest number of times.\n\nMost of the movie takes place at night. The credits open on the blazing lights of the yellow taxi cab moving slowly in the dark rainy streets. A kaleidoscope of neonlight appears through the dripping windows as the driver\'s eyes blink in the front mirror. The night is the hero\'s universe, it\'s the time when "all the animals come out", as he says. By contrast, the few daylight scenes look somewhat off-key, but this was definitely intentional.\n\nThe final scene still appears today as extremely violent, but at least, it shows murder for what it is. Brutal, ugly, crude. It is something one tends to forget about after seeing so many police series where people get shot so often that it gets casual. Real violence is not casual when you face it, and here is a film that makes you face it.\n\nThe directing is first class and deservedly made path for Scorsese as a world renowned artist. Some techniques he used here are unusual for American cinema, like focusing on details for a few seconds. The movie is enhanced by an excellent music soundtrack by jazz composer Bernard Herrman who died before the picture was even released.\n\nTwo of the actors also deservedly made it to stardom. Robert de Niro plays a very unglamorous character, but his presence on screen is so intense that it\'s no wonder it made such an impression. As for Jodie Foster, she already appeared in films as a child, but playing a teenage prostitute was certainly not an easy challenge, and probably it was that role that really turned her into a major actress.\n\n"Taxi Driver" was a big hit when it came out, both for the public and the critics. It won the Palme d\'Or in Cannes, and served as a trend setter for many later films, like for instance Quentin Tarantino\'s and Abel Ferrara\'s. But even today, the original model seems difficult to emulate, probably because achieving a masterpiece is a rare thing, by definition.', u'-0.0317366', u"A lonely Vietnam veteran who has insomnia spends his nights as a taxi driver in the dirty streets of New York, where he encounters a young prostitute who he tries to help make a difference. \n\nThis is a very good film and one of Martin Scorsese best (Goodfellas being my fave). An excellent portrayal from Robert De Niro as Travis Bickle the cabbie and good performances from Jodie Foster as the child prostitute Iris Steensman, Cybill Shepherd, Peter Boyle and Harvey Keitel as a pimp called Sport. \n\nYou actually get drawn into the isolation and anger that Travis is feeling towards these lowlifes and because of that you really feel sympathy for him. Though after a while the loneliness and the city really starts to haunt Travis's mind, causing violent instincts and paranoia. \n\nThis film is filled with such memorable lines e.g.Travis Bickle 'You talking to me? Well I'm the only one here.' and the many powerful scenes that stay in your head after it's finished. The hypnotic cinematography is a standout, as if your seeing the harsh & gritty New York streets and twisted people through the eyes of Travis when he is driving his cab. A great screenplay, a stunning score by Bernard Herrmann and a superb atmosphere created. \n\nThis is a brutally compelling and bleak look at a decaying and corrupt society of the 70's. An unsettling gem of a film. \n\n5/5", u'0.436059', u'Travis Bickle is a Vietnam veteran who cannot sleep at night and just ends up travelling around. To try and use the time effectively he becomes a taxi driver. Things start to look up for him as he works nights and slowly starts to live a little bit. He meets a girl, Betsy, and arranges to see her a few times despite the fact that he is a little bit out of the ordinary \x96 a quality that seems to interest her. His connection to the night allows him to see young prostitute Iris being bullied by her pimp Matthew and he begins to see his role to perhaps save her \x96 him playing his part in cleaning up the sewer that he feels New York has become. However when his view of normal life puts Betsy off him he starts to retreat more and more into the night, looking for meaning in his life and growing more and more outraged by the world he is part of.\n\nHardly the most uplifting of films it is engaging and impressive and truly deserves the reputation it has. Martin Scorsese and Paul Schrader have produced a film that convincingly portrays a man cut out of society who has the slightest connection to normality before finding it eroded away. The script is brilliant because the detail is engaging but it is this descent into a very modern type of madness that drives the film forward. Travis has just enough about him that is recognisable that it makes it so easy to go along with the rest of his madness. A major part of this is getting the feeling right about living in a cesspit; a city that seems to have forgotten its way morally \x96 New York is the strongest example but elements of it could be parts of any city I suspect. In painting this world in such a real way, Scorsese has made Travis all the more convincing and, to a point, all the easier to follow in his fall. Like I said it is not a film to morally uplift you but one that is depressingly fair. There is no redemption in this modern world and although it appears that the violence at the end somehow redeems Travis in reality by showing "society" accepting his action it drags the rest of us down nearer the world that he hates and has become part of. I love King of Comedy for the same reason albeit in a different world.\n\nScorsese injects a real understanding of the place and a real sense of foreboding into even the earliest scenes. He inserts clever and meaningful shots into scenes that other directors might just have filmed straight and his choice of scene and shot compliments the script is depicting Travis descending into madness. What makes the film even better is De Niro showing the type of form that makes his recent form such a major disappointment. He is outstanding as he moves Travis from being relatively normal to being eaten up from the inside out. His eventual implosion is impressive but it is only as impressive as the gradual slide he depicts over the course of the film. Although he dominates it, others impress as well. Foster stands out in a small role, while Keitel makes a good impression as the pimp. Shepherd is not quite as good but her character was not as well written as the others so it isn\'t all down to her. Regardless, the film belongs to De Niro and although the quotable scenes are the ones that are remembered it is in the quieter moments where he excels and shows genuine talent and understanding.\n\nOverall an impressive and morally depressing film that deserves its place in cinematic history. The portrayal of a city and a man slipping into moral insanity is convincing and engaging and it shows how well to "do" modern madness and the effects of the moral void of parts of society. Scorsese directs as a master despite this being at an early stage in his career and De Niro is chillingly effective as he simply dominates the film in quiet moments and quotable moments alike. I rarely use phrases like "modern classic" because I think they are lazy but this is one film that certainly deserves such a label.', u'0.235551', u"\nSo much has been written and talked about 'Taxi Driver' that it seems almost redundant to add anything more. But watching it again the other night for the nth time I was, as I have been every single time I've seen it, struck by just how perfect this movie is. It is as powerful and disturbing now as it was twenty-five years ago. It has not only NOT aged, it gets better and more relevant every year. This is without doubt a modern classic, and one of the handful of truly great, timeless movies.\n\nScorsese and Schrader went on to make other great movies after this, both separately ('The King Of Comedy', 'Light Sleeper') and together ('Raging Bull', 'The Last Temptation Of Christ'), but this is easily the best movie of their careers. And Robert De Niro's too. He has yet to top his stunning performance here as the deeply disturbed and alienated Vietnam veteran Travis Bickle, cabbie and would be assassin. This character has not surprisingly entered movie legend. \n\nScorsese surrounds De Niro with a first rate supporting cast, including small but effective roles from Harvey Keitel ('Reservoir Dogs'), Peter Boyle ('Hardcore'), the underrated Victor Argo ('The King Of New York') and Joe Spinell ('Maniac'). Albert Brooks and Jodie Foster are also very good, and even Cybil Shepherd, the butt of many jokes, is fine as Bickle's obsession.\n\n\nWhen you combine these actors, Schrader's outstanding script, and Scorsese's brilliant direction, with the stunning cinematography (Michael Chapman) and haunting score (Hitchcock fave Bernard Herrmann's final effort), you have yourself a truly unforgettable cinematic experience. If you haven't seen 'Taxi Driver' I urge you to do so immediately. It is a masterpiece, pure and simple.\n\n", u'0.360452', u'The impact that "Taxi Driver" had in its day hasn\'t diminished, on the contrary, it has acquired a relevance of Shakesperean proportions. Travis\'s loneliness is a hyper representation of the same loneliness most humans have experienced at different times in different measures. It is always associated with a nightmare and Martin Scorsese delivers it like a nightmare. Travis, possessed by Robert De Niro at the zenith of his powers, cruises in his taxi enveloped in Bernard Herrman and we, well, we\'re the passengers and everything looks terrifying and familiar at the same time. Paul Schrader sensational screenplay comes to life with the jolting force of a rude awakening. Like it happens, more often than not, with masterpieces, it signed in a rather direct way the lives of the ones who live it in a movie theater and the ones who made it. Scorsese being the giant that he is, survived it and will continue startling us I\'m sure but I also bet that for years everything he did was compared to this movie. De Niro and his "You looking at me" became such an iconic phrase that even he himself ended up impersonating it. Jodie Foster awoke the insane devotion of a real life would be killer and New York, the greatest city in the world was shown with its underbelly up. A work of art, a superlative reminder of what film could actually give us and very rarely does.', u'0.736677', u'Taxi Driver, the classic that made Robert DeNiro Robert DeNiro. It\'s amazing to see how far this man has come in cinema, some of my friends ask me questions about films and advice, one of my friends had asked if they wanted to see where Bobby got the big notice I usually recommend Taxi Driver, granted he was in The Godfather Part 2 and was incredible, but Taxi Driver made him stand out as a strong lead actor. Taxi Driver is just all together a great film that is absolutely perfection. Martin Scorcesse who also was just really starting out made this movie that brought us back to the film noir genre. He made this great classic and I don\'t even think he realized how much it would stand against the test of time, to this day we still know this film and even if you don\'t know it, you know the infamous speech "You talking\' to me?". This is a film about isolation, loneliness, and self destruction at it\'s worst.\n\nTravis Bickle who claims to be an honorably discharged Marine it is implied that he is a Vietnam veteran is a lonely and depressed young man of 26. He settles in Manhattan, where he becomes a night time taxi driver due to chronic insomnia. Bickle spends his restless days in seedy porn theaters and works 12 or 14 hour shifts during the evening and night time hours carrying passengers among all five boroughs of New York City. Bickle becomes interested in Betsy, a campaign volunteer for New York Senator Charles Palantine. She is initially intrigued by Bickle and agrees to a date with him after he flirts with her over coffee and sympathizes with her own apparent loneliness. On their date, however, Bickle is clueless about how to treat a woman and thinks it would be a good idea to take her to a sex film. Offended, she leaves him and takes a taxi home alone. The next day he tries to reconcile with Betsy, phoning her and sending her flowers, but all of his attempts are in vain. Rejected and depressed, Bickle\'s thoughts begin to turn violent. Disgusted by the petty street crime that he witnesses while driving through the city, he now finds a focus for his frustration and begins a program of intense physical training. He buys a number of pistols from an illegal dealer and practices a menacing speech in the mirror, while pulling out a pistol that he attached to a home-made sliding action holster on his right arm "You talking\' to me?". Bickle is revolted by what he considers the moral decay around him. One night while on shift, Iris, a 12-year-old child prostitute, gets in his cab, attempting to escape her pimp. Shocked by the occurrence, Bickle fails to drive off and the pimp, Sport, reaches the cab. Later seeing Iris on the street he pays for her time, although he does not have sex with her and instead tries to convince her to leave this way of life behind. But after her rejection as well, Travis decides to take things into his own hands, "Pow!".\n\nThis is one of the most memorable movies of all time and has really stood it\'s ground. It\'s personally one of my favorites and made me fall in love with Robert DeNiro all over again. The script to Taxi Driver is just so incredibly powerful and the performances were just perfect. Jodie Foster, this little girl at the time was such a presence on screen, she pulls in what was a very tricky performance and was hauntingly beautiful. Cybill Sheppard was also very beautiful and I was absolutely in love with her character and felt so bad for her. Everything about Taxi Driver is just great, I don\'t know how much I could go on about the love I have for this film. It\'s a film that you will never forget and trust me, if you haven\'t seen it, go out and rent it immediately, you won\'t regret it. It\'s bloody, it\'s twisted, it\'s crazy, but it\'s one of the best films of all time.\n\n10/10', u'-0.0311539', u'"Taxi Driver" starts off with a beautiful and perfectly fitting score from composer, Bernard Hermann, as we see the blurred city of New York as the fast paced lights from cars and signs are distorted and put into slow motion. "Taxi Driver" is one of Martin Scorsese\' finest achievements as he teams up with Robert De Niro. Travis Bickle (De Niro) is the title character. The acting as a whole is exceptional. Harvey Keitel has an extremely small part as a pimp named Sport, and he brings a forgettable character to center stage. Keitel is so good in this you wish you would get to see more from his character. Jodie Foster plays the prostitute under Sports rule. Iris, is 12 years old, and for a 14 year old actress (at the time), Foster deals with some heavy and extremely adult material, and she handles it incredibly well. Keitel and Foster have a scene together where Sport holds her and slowly dances with her as he whispers into her ear about how lucky he is to have a woman like her. It\'s an utterly repulsive scene. The look on his face mixed with the calm and safe look on the face of Iris, is pretty disgusting. It\'s extremely well acted even though it\'s a pretty quick and minor scene. In this one scene we see the type of control Sport has over the young, impressionable child that he abuses and takes advantage of. These are the kinds of things that set Travis Bickle off. The film is a classic that dissects the fallout of one mans loneliness and his thirst for acceptance, recognition and notice. The editing is very good, the direction is great, but it\'s carried by a magnificent script from Paul Schrader and a great lead performance. This probably stands as De Niro\'s second best work to "Raging Bull," and among the finest acting performances of all time. \n\nTravis Bickle is the self proclaimed, "God\'s lonely man." Bickle walks amongst the people on the filthy, crowded streets of New York City. Wherever he goes, he goes unnoticed; like a ghost meandering through life\'s morbid boredom of repetitiveness as each day endlessly runs into the next. Bickle suffers from an inability to sleep so he goes to the porno theaters after 12 hour shifts. His mind is constantly racing as he takes various forms of pills and abuses alcohol. The former Vietnam Veteran has a damaged psyche that continues to get worse and worse as the disgust for the lowlifes of New York eat away at his consciences. The first act of the films starts with a normal looking man, with a regular hair cut and regular job in an irregular city. We watch Bickle go through everyday routines and his work habit is the main focus to derive attention away from his bloodlust. We don\'t see much wrong with him other than some signs of frustration and restlessness. He decides that his body needs some fine tuning as he reverts back to his days as a Marine. He meets up with a gun dealer and buys three pistols and a .44 magnum. He\'s ready for war, and the table is set. \n\nThe ending of the film is controversial for its vagueness and its inability to state a clear purpose of reality or fantasy. The film strongly suggests a dream-like state as we watch with a long running overhead shot (possibly signifying Bickle\'s departure from the world?) of the carnage left in Bickle\'s wake. Then there\'s the music of a dream inducing state at the end of the scene, which is the strongest hint towards a dream like state. What we do know is that Travis Bickle takes the lives of lowlifes, degenerates, and the scum of the earth. He\'s treated as the hero and glorified by the media for his actions. This is a slap in the face to the media for finding that a vigilante did the right thing because it was for a good cause: Kill 5 scumbags, save 1. The final scene of the film is also controversial. We see Betsy for the first time since their big fight and she\'s no longer disgusted with Travis. Now the media has changed her opinion of him too. Travis has reverted back to the same look he spouted in the first act of the film. He\'s quiet, reserved and humble. He looks harmless. As the ride home goes along we find out that Palantine has won the nomination. After, Travis drops Betsy off, he leaves without taking her money and with a smile on his face he gives her a simple, "So long." As Travis drives off, he menacingly looks back into the mirror, representing a problem still exists, then we fade back to the start of the film. With the symbolic scenes throughout the film depicting Bickle\'s brooding, boiling, rage within; symbolizing the fact that nothing has changed. The near death experience doesn\'t cure him. The accolades from the media and the recognition from everyday people doesn\'t make it any better. He\'s still ready for war.', u'-0.0635038', u'\nScorsese\'s best.  Not too many hyper-critical reviews of this film have anything near as intelligent to say about what the director and the screenwriter had in mind when they created this American gem.\n\nTo those people that have seen it and thought it was "slow" or the pacing was sub par, they don\'t know what they\'re talking about; "Taxi Driver" is about the gradual and eventual take-over of insanity, and not about violence, action-shoot-\'em-up \'slash\' car chase... or whatever they expected from it.  The modern audience today is expecting everything--comedy, drama, unbearable suspense, spfx--all rolled-up into one-stop entertainment... and no, I\'m not anybody\'s grandfather, or here to tell you that movies were great in my day, but, viewers, lighten up already.\n\nDe Niro, and the rest of the cast, do a serviceable job in this micro-cosmic window into the life of Travis Bickle--a Vietnam vet--who, true, writes mind-numbing entries in his diary, leads a, for the most part, dull existance as a cabbie, and strikes out with a female political campaigner who, after Travis becomes a hero, discovers she is indeed attracted to unstable, sometimes violent chauffeurs.\n\nThe rest of this movie\'s story is for the less initiated viewer; decide whether you\'ve truly become desensitized to sexual and violent content in today\'s films...  Ah, forget it!  You have to have lived at least some of which goes on in "Taxi Driver," or you\'ve just been plain lucky in this life so far. ', u'-0.0575179', u"\nDespite having an unsurpassed shoot-out bloodbath and despite having a timeless and touching storyline, the aspect that I like most about Martin Scorsese's Taxi Driver is the music. Bernard Herrmann, who died shortly after completing the score, provides a melancholy feeling to the movie. This is perfect because Travis Bickle's loneliness is the heart of the story.\n\nRobert DeNiro's performance in Taxi Driver as Travis Bickle is one of the best I have ever seen. DeNiro does every pause, smirk, and stare in exactly the right time. He transformed a despicable and psychotic character into a lonely and desperate man, who the audience can relate and understand. His scenes talking to himself in the mirror is entertaining, at the same time, terrifying.\n\nTravis Bickle is a Vietnam veteran who cannot sleep at nights, so he decided to work long shifts at night driving a taxicab. As Travis drives around New York City, his feelings and emotion soon show: he is disgusted and angry at sleaze in the world, he hates pimps, and he is prejudiced against blacks.\n\n\nTravis then falls to a beautiful campaign worker named Betsy (Cybill Shepherd), and he persuaded her to go on a date with him. Betsy is clearly intrigued by Travis' character, so she agreed. Their relationship is going well, but when Travis made a mistake on bringing her to an X-rated movie, she decided to ignore him.\n\nIn a later conversation with a fellow cab driver named Wizard (Peter Boyle), it is shown that Travis is on verge of going psychotic. The next sequences show Scorsese's genius. We clearly see how Travis slowly creates his plans and how he prepares himself. DeNiro's narration shows signs of breakdown, saying things like `here is a man who cannot take it anymore' and `loneliness has followed me all my life.'\n\nTravis also befriends a twelve-year-old prostitute named Iris, played by a young Jodie Foster. Travis tries to convince her that she is hanging out with scums, and that she should be at school and making friends. One of the best acting scenes I have seen is when Travis talks with Iris in a restaurant. As Travis tries to convince Iris to give up prostitution, she manages to keep a steady face but clearly is suffering inside. Travis' emotion is clearly anger but he tries to hold it because he does not want to scare Iris. Foster and DeNiro play the scene with wonderful realism and emotion.\n\nTaxi Driver is a good example of how great a film can be if it was made by talented persons. Paul Schrader's script is intense, Martin Scorsese's direction is watertight, Bernard Herrmann's music is beautiful, and the actors' acting is superb. Taxi Driver can relate to a lot of people and clearly is one of the greatest movies of all time.\n", u'0.256484', u'I mean, seriously. What is it with this movie? I\'ve seen it twice, read stuff about it, got a lecture on it, and I still can\'t see how anybody could call this movie a masterpiece. So Scorsese shows us a shot of an empty hall while DeNiro is talking on the phone. So what? And is the fact that he constantly makes us aware that we\'re watching a movie a sign of Scorsese\'s greatness? Even when it doesn\'t serve any real purpose??? I particularly dislike the ending - the lack of comment on the violence and the way Travis turns out to be a hero. Is this a critique of violence or a celebration of it? It is clearly not very hard to imagine someone inspired by Travis\'s resolution to "clean up the streets".\n\nBesides, I thought the film was pretty boring. Especially the second time I watched it.\n\nI think "Taxi Driver" is hugely overrated. But that\'s just me, of course...', u'-0.0401217', u'\nMartin Scorsese and Robert De Nero deliver another hard-hitting, gritty urban classic from their long-time partnership as director and star. De Niro plays a Vietnam veteran who works as a taxi driver, who becomes obsessed with cleaning up the politics and crime in his city.  He becomes more and more paranoid and insane as the film goes on. The other stars of the movie all give excellent, realistic performances as the people he comes into contact with in the city. This is a disturbing and terrifying film, but it should definitely be seen as one of the all-time classics.  You should also check out Scorsese\'s other work such as "Raging Bull", and "Goodfellas". ', u'0.29463'], u'tt0050825': [u'\nI think that Stanley Kubrick is the greatest of all film directors, and in my opinion "Paths of Glory" is Kubrick\'s best film because:\n\n1.  It is FAR AND AWAY the most realistic, most emotionally draining, and most beautifully photographed movie ever made about trench warfare in WW I, which has to be considered to be one of the significant episodes in all of human history.    The story is fiction, but the events are patterned after some actual mutinies in the French army that took place in 1917.\n\n2.  I first saw this film 46 years ago, and it not only made me an avid Kubrick fan for the rest of my life, it made me want to watch it over and over again -- more than 250 times over the years, and every time I see it, I cry at the end (when Kubrick\'s future wife, and the only woman in the film, sings "The Faithful Hussar", causing the audience of French soldiers to change from a jeering crowd to a hushed, teary-eyed group of lonely men).\n\n3.  Everything about the movie is PERFECT!!  There are no flaws in the acting, the pace of the movie, the photography, the dialogue, etc.  Scene after scene is more powerful and ironic than the preceding one, building to a shattering climax.  It is simply a gem.\n\n4.  Try as I might to think of actors that could have been substituted in their places, I think the casting for each and every part in the movie really could not have been any better.   No one could have been better in their respective roles than George Macready, Adolphe Menjou, Kirk Douglas, Ralph Meeker, and all of the others.   Many of these actors appear in Kubrick\'s other films.\n\n5.  Has there ever been a better scene than the one in which one of the condemned soldiers (Ralph Meeker) stares at this cockroach and cries that tomorrow that bug will still be alive and he will be dead.  Whereupon one of the other condemned men (the fatalistic Timothy Carey) squashes the cockroach and says "Now you got the edge on him".\n\n6. You could probably change a few things in most of Kubrick\'s other masterpieces to slightly improve them, but I DEFY anyone to single out anything in "Paths of Glory" that could be improved upon.  I could go on and on raving about the beauty and pathos of this film, but I think I will stop here.', u'0.24386', u"\nAt only 29 years of age and in only his second major studio release, Stanley Kubrick showed the world that he was a force to be reckoned with. By the time he died 42 years later his films were epochal events waited for breathlessly by his large band of devotees who considered him a director without equal. He seldom disappointed them.\n\nThis movie is set in World War I amidst the incredibly destructive and futile trench warfare between France and Germany. Kirk Douglas plays Frenchman Colonel Dax, who is ordered to make an impossible assault on a heavily-fortified enemy position. The only reason this charge is being made is that his commanding general, played by George Macready, believes that capturing the position will earn him a promotion. When the assault does not go forward under heavy enemy bombardment, the general is infuriated and demands that three men be arbitrarily chosen to stand trial for cowardice, an offense punishable by death. Col. Dax defends these men at their court-martial.\n\nThe battle and trial scenes are about as good as have ever been filmed and the high level of tension is sustained throughout the movie. After the film's climax has occurred, Col. Dax goes looking for his troops and finds them relaxing at a cafe. What he and the viewer witness there is possibly the most affecting scene I've ever seen on screen.\n\nLooking at this film in perspective, it's easy to see Kubrick's trademarks even at this early stage of his career. The attention to the composition of his shots reflects his background as a still photographer and foreshadows his other great films to come. I find myself most impressed today with the way he could handle a dramatic story like this one without any innovative techniques or unusual special effects to hide behind, then turn around and make such totally different films like '2001...' and 'Dr. Strangelove...' Other films like 'The Shining' and 'Barry Lyndon' combined a strong story line with breakthrough film techniques. His versatility astonishes me.\n\nAdolphe Menjou also stars as the general who convinces Dax's superior officer to risk the ill-fated charge. Ralph Meeker, Timothy Carey and Joe Turkel give strong performances as the men on trial. Turkel turns up 23 years later in another Kubrick film, 'The Shining,' playing the bartender.\n\nYou can take your pick: 'Paths of Glory' can rightly be described as one of the greatest war movies of all, or one of the great anti-war films, or as one of Kubrick's best. Or simply one of the best, period.\n", u'0.380675', u"Almost one hundred years later the concept of that static war of the trenches that was the Western front of World War I is almost unfathomable. After the French army stopped the German offensive at the Battle of the Marne, the French and British armies faced the Germans in a line of trenches that stretched from Belgium to Switzerland. About a quarter of France was occupied for four years in that time. The casualties ran into the millions in that stalemate that gains were only measured in meters.\n\nIt was always just one more offensive over the top charging into automatic weapon fire that would break the other guy. Just such an offensive was planned one day in 1916 against a German stronghold dubbed the ant hill. \n\nGeneral George MacReady, promised a promotion by his superior Adolphe Menjou, orders a beaten and tired battalion to charge the ant hill. The attack flops and MacReady looks for scapegoats. He decides after coming down from shooting 100 men to a selected three drawn by lot. The unlucky three are Joseph Turkel, Ralph Meeker, and Timothy Carey.\n\nThe commander of the three Kirk Douglas asks to serve as their counsel and he makes a good show of it at the kangaroo court martial they have. But the fix is definitely in.\n\nExcept for Spartacus, Kirk Douglas rarely plays straight up heroic types in film. Even his good guys have an edge to them, a dark side. But as Colonel Dax, Douglas is at his most heroic. He may be one dimensional here, but he's great. Especially in that last scene with Adolphe Menjou when he tells the man off in no uncertain terms, mainly because Menjou has misread Douglas's motives. \n\nMenjou and Macready portray two different military types. The arrogant MacReady as versus the very sly Menjou. Not very admirable either of them. Menjou was not very popular at this time in Hollywood because of the blacklist. He favored it very much, his politics were of the extreme right wing. Nevertheless he was a brilliant actor and never better than in this film, one of his last.\n\nThe enlisted men are a good bunch also. They're kind of like the posse in The Oxbow Incident, just an ordinary group who become ennobled in martyrdom as they go to the firing squad for the sake of politics.\n\nPaths of Glory is one of the best anti-war films ever made. It ranks right up there with All Quiet on the Western Front which showed the war from the German point of view. Both will be classics 200, 300, a thousand years from now.", u'-0.107325', u'\nWhat to say that hasn\'t already been said. This astonishing cinematic work of art (no kidding) unquestionably is the GREATEST FILM EVER - bar none.  I deeply and passionately LOVE this brilliant early Kubrick production. Congratulations to expert screenwriters (and unique pulp writers of the 5O\'s) Calder Willingham (who also penned his own excellent adaptation of "The Strange One"; highly recommended) and Jim Thompson ("The Grifters" "The Killer Inside Me"; which strongly influenced Tarantino), who both present a superbly incisive script with powerfully effective dialogue that really rings more than true.  If only we had more real writers and scripts like this remarkable achievement, we\'d be writing far more favorable reviews. "Paths of Glory", alone, would serve as anyone\'s lifetime achievement award.\n\n I don\'t care how much you HATE B&W films - put this one on your MUST-SEE. Compelling cinema-verite photography creates astounding visuals from a varity of incisive angles; like the famous mobile wide-angle tracking shot of Dax (probably Kirk Douglas\'s most stirring and important performance) moving through the squalid and horrifying trenches as the battle begins with explosions breaking out all over.  The suspense and tension is frightening, but almost beautifully eerie in the most compelling ways as Kubrick takes us through the deadly limbo of no-man\'s land - the \'paths of glory\' which finally leads to the grave.  The action, skillfully combined with powerful moral and existential themes are amazingly conveyed through the bleak yet articulately stunning visuals.  THIS IS A FILMMAKER\'S FILM!\n\n The moral outrage of the sadistic injustice of the military courtmartial never fails to make my blood fully boil.  The hypocrisy and corruption is degradingly infuriating.  If anything will make a cynic out of you, it\'s this appropriately pessimistic and depressing cinema chronical based on a true stupid incident in WWI.  What\'s even worse is how POG, in many perceptive ways, serves as an allegory for all the B.S. in real life: Pig-headed leadership in the parasitic hands of the superior greed freaks, two-faced deceptive manipulations, double-standards, backstabbings, social bigotry, arm-chair warriors, egotism, corrupt politics, the militaries\'s abuse of too much power - and it\'s destructive desire at satisfying it\'s lust for vainglory (sounds a little like Hollywood) - Did I leave anything out?  You name it, POG has it - and I\'m not being sarcastic.\n\n The entire ensemble cast is superb with special mention to George Macready as the utterly pompous power-mad glory-seeking "soldier", General Mireuo (who thinks nothing about ordering his troops to open fire on his own men for not charging out of the trenches and dying for his "country"; which smells a bit like ME ME ME).  Don\'t worry, you\'ll throughly hate his guts. It truly is true method acting.  Again, kudos to Macready,  a fine actor who was always too good at playing highly unethical villians. (Incidently, this was a favorite film of a young 195O\'s Marlon Brando and old salty Winston Churchill, who praised Kubrick\'s incisive authenticity in the exciting battle scene, which does resemble news footage).\n\n Timothy Carey (also ultra-offbeat-cool in Kubrick\'s other exceptional early flick, "The Killing") is morbidly humorous and gut-wrenching as one of the poor fools coldly picked to be executed; all in the ruthless \'patriotic\' name (and amoral game) of \'glory\'. ARE ANY OF OUR LEADERS LISTENING?  Too bad that Carey\'s memorable talents were so underused by Hollywood, but that always seems to be the unfortunate norm.  A little like what ironically happens to him in this intriguing but downbeat story.\n\n Ralph Meeker (who was also memorable as the brutal and ruthless Mike Hammer in the 5O\'s cult gem "Kiss Me Deadly" - a complete opposite role that shows a true range of his acting abilities) delivers another wretching performance as the true brave soldier unjustly sentenced for "Cowardice in the Face of the Enemy".  (Maybe he should have turned \'about face\', but it would have still been \'damned if he did and damned if he didn\'t\' - another grim moral theme here).  His breakdown scene right before he is to be taken out and shot is terribly heartbreaking, for I felt so wanting, but helplessly unable, to come to his help.\n\n Take my word for it, everyone else is awesome; a true actor\'s dramatic show with dark satirical overtones.  POG goes beyond the mere preaching anti-war diatribe (though it does convey that almost naturally, like going without having to say).  It\'s a great classic morality play that will really make you stop (many, many times) and truly make you think (many many times). Airheads not allowed.  Moreover, this haunting and disturbing masterpiece is top entertainment, something too many art films aren\'t.     >\n\n It will really make you question things about our troubled, convoluted world and how things are to often immorally and inhumanly run all in the sick name of greed and destructive power. Not too lovely, for the director pulls no punches.  This film really has grown more profound (and currently pertinent) since its initial release.  Also the editing is taut and concise; there isn\'t a single wasted moment.  Count the number of films on one hand that has accomplished that miraculous feat; that most critics and user commentators are always rightfully harking on.  I\'ll shut up now.  Go see this one-of-a-kind film, then see it again - and again, etc.  >\n', u'0.164871', u'\nI consider Paths of Glory as one of the most memorable of Kubrick\'s entire output. The most remarkable aspect of this pioneer anti-war film is the complete absence of any persons depicting the "real" enemy. Therefore, the significance of the film lay not so much in its anti-war message, but in its brilliant expose of the "monsters within" the general staff, superbly acted by Adolphe Menjou and George Macready. The message here is that the enemy lurks much closer to home. In most war films, whether they glorify or condemn the carnage, there is rarely any venturing at all into the darker side of the politics. This film is a tour de force in its unabashed depiction of just how misguided is the quest for glory as an end in itself; and in the portrayal of the leaders who would shamelessly sacrifice others for their own self aggrandizement. Truly, one of my all time favourite movies.', u'0.226177', u"\nIn France, in the First World War, the insane and ambitious general Gen. Paul Mireau (George Macready) orders Colonel Dax (Kirk Douglas) to lead his men in a suicide attack against Germans in the unattainable Ant Hill. After a massacre of the French soldiers, Gen. Mireau orders his artillery to drop bombs between the French front line of attack and the trenches, to avoid the soldier to return to the protection of the trenches. The commander of the French artillery refuses to accomplish the order. Gen. Mireau asks his superior, Gen. George Broulard (Adolphe Menjou), to send three men to Court Martial and execute them for cowardice through shooting, as an example to the other soldiers. Colonel Dax, a former lawyer, defends his men in the unfair trial. Yesterday I watched this outstanding masterpiece for the first time and certainly it is among the best movies of the cinema history. The disgusting story shows the insanity of a war, where men are treated like numbers and not as human beings. The reality of the battles scenes is amazing. The cast has a stunning performance, highlighting the trio George Macready, Adolphe Menjou and Kirk Douglas. The lack of sensibility and respect for the human life and the cynicism in the dialogs of the two generals are fantastic. Two other points that called my attention are the fancy reception for the general staff, while their subalterns are fighting in the front and the misunderstanding of the real intentions of Colonel Dax by Gen. George Broulard. A must-see movie! My vote is ten.\n\nTitle (Brazil): `Gl\xf3ria Feita de Sangue' (`Glory Made of Blood')\n", u'0.135254', u'An arrogant French general (a superb George Macready) orders his men on a suicide mission and then has the gall to try to court marshal and execute three of them for cowardice in the face of the enemy. A former lawyer turned colonel (Kirk Douglas in his prime) is the voice of reason against gross injustice. This excellently staged and wonderfully acted production is as much an acting showcase for Douglas as it is a directorial masterstroke by a young Stanley Kubrick who adapted this to the screen from a novel based on actual accounts.\n\nKubrick displays a great control of sound effects and camera movement in the brief but effective battle scenes that expertly depict the controlled chaos that was trench warfare during WWI. Things get juicier during the ensuing courtroom battle where the deafening disparity between the elite who propagate and profit from war and the common citizens who suffer and die in war is shown with great lucidity.\n\nUnlike later Kubrick epics, this runs at a crisp 90 minutes, though suffers briefly from a slow and awkwardly staged opening ten minutes before Douglas comes on screen. Ultimately, this holds up very well to modern scrutiny thanks to the flawlessness of Kurbick\'s craft, the amazing ensemble acting, and the surprising depth of its philosophical and psychological pondering. "Paths of Glory" is more anti-arrogance than anti-war, and is unapologetically sentimental and pro-soldier. As such, much can still be gleaned from its message.', u'0.238694', u'\n     "Paths of Glory" (1957) (and this is personal opinion of course) is Stanley Kubrick\'s first real masterpiece in what would be a long line of subsequent masterpieces.  I know that Kubrick had a reputation for making cold, unemotional films (which is a false impression, but that\'s the subject for another essay) but I don\'t believe there are many people who can deny how powerful this film is.  Through the editing, camera movement, incredibly realistic dialogue, and a now more fully realized use of irony, Kubrick creates an unforgettable anti-war parable.  I realize that my love for this film is incredibly obvious, but I\'ll try to focus on an analysis of the film rather than a review, but the movie is just so good!  \n\n     Francois Truffaut once said that there is no such thing as a true anti-war film because the battle scenes make the war look exiting.  "Paths of Glory"\'s scenes of battle are certainly gripping, but gripping in the way that a nightmare is gripping.  There is no way a person can see these scenes and wish they were participating (like the action scenes in say, "The Dirty Dozen").  I vividly recall the scene where three men try to sneak behind enemy lines in the middle of the night.  The battlefield is cloaked in darkness.  Someone shoots a flare.  Silently, a brief burst of light illuminates the field, revealing several corpses strewn over the ground.  Darkness quickly covers them up again.  Kubrick uses silence and sparse sound effects in this scene like a musical score.  Any actual music would be intrusive and rob from the moment, a flaw found in too many otherwise good films of the nineteen fifties (personal opinion of course). \n\n\n     Point of view is used very well in the film to illustrate the inner concerns of the major characters.  We see General Mireau\'s Point of view when he looks through the binoculars at the ant-hill he wants his men to take.  When he hands over the binoculars to Colonel Dax, we don\'t see his view of the ant-hill.  Later however, when Dax walks through the trenches before the big battle, we do see his point of view looking at his men.  This contrasts with an earlier scene when Mireau walked through the trenches and we did not see his point of view.  This clearly illustrates what is important to each man.  For Mireau, it is victory at all costs; for Dax, it is the welfare of his soldiers.  \n\n     For me one of the most impressive things about "Paths of Glory" was it\'s realistic, yet still poetic, and sometimes even chilling dialogue.  This is in sharp contrast to the clever yet purposefuly stagy dialogue of "The Killing".  \n\n     One scene sticks out my mind where a soldier is nervously rambling about what it would be like to get shot: "Most guys say that if they got shot they\'d want to die quick.  So what does that tell you?  It means there not afraid of getting killed, they\'re afraid of getting hurt.  I think if you\'re gonna get shot and live, it\'s best to get shot in the rear than in the head.  Why?  Because in the rear its just meat, but the head, that\'s pure bone.  Can you imagine what it\'s like for a bullet to rip through pure bone?"   When I first saw this film in a theater, there was some nervous laughter in the audience during this scene.  It\'s true, the scene\'s dark humour helps illustrate the insanity of the situation. \n\n\n     In my introduction I stated that there was great use of irony in the film.  Perhaps the greatest irony is the title.  In the end no one finds glory.  Dax, although he nobly fights to defend his men wrongly accused of treason, loses the fight.  Even though he is later offered a promotion, he turns it down because of his disgust for the army.  Mireau is found out to be the cad that he is for ordering his own troops slaughter, and is court marshalled.  The film successfully states that in a war even the supposed victors lose something as well.', u'0.0471377', u'\nI\'ve read some of the last comments and all I can say is that I think most of you missed the point in this film. No offense to everybody, but I\'ve never regarded this movie as an antiwar movie or something like that. The fact, that my interpretation is not corresponding with most of the others lies in the simple truth that 50% of work is done by the "author" and the rest is done by the audience.\n\nKubrick used his films as little pieces of the great image of mankind. In all his movies one can see one or multiple depictions of individuals or groups and their feelings and actions, which are not only typical for the protagonists, and antagonists, but also for the viewer.\n\nIn the Paths Of Glory this special feeling is perhaps the most ordinary of all: hope.\n\n From the beginning there is no hope in this movie. The battle is lost before it even started. Those three poor creatures are sentenced to death before even the trial had started. And still the audience hopes for a happy end, that the general may stop the execution in the last second. But nothing happens. At this point the viewer is as hopeless as the figures in the movie. The following breakfast scene leaves everybody in a state of paralization, nothing changes.\n\nAnd then at the end. this helpless and beautiful girl begins to sing a German folk song, which none of the present soldiers knows what it\'s all about. But the mood of the mob changes away from hate and anger and they all begin to cry like babies. In this very moment hope is reborn and comes back to the battlefield of feelings as the glorious winner. This is when we regain our hope.\n\nMany people wrote, that the last scene didn\'t fit in the film at all. I would say, that without this scene the movie would have never become the classic it is now. Of course the filming and actor performances are brilliant, but this specialty of the last scene makes this movie unforgettable.\n', u'-0.232925', u"The end sequence is beautifully symbolic.The soldiers in the bar watch as a frightened German girl is brought before them. As the poor lass struggles to sing her song (it really doesn't matter what song), they begin to realize that this hapless creature is enduring what their three executed comrades had endured themselves. Their three comrades were brought before the military tribunal as a formality before their execution. Now these soldiers are the tribunal for this pitiful girl who now stands before them awaiting their judgment. But unlike the cold inhuman justice that the French military machine has dealt to their compatriots, they watch intently as this German girl strives to sing in spite of all their cat calls and hoots and hollers, realizing that she is trying her best in spite of overwhelming opposition, just as they and their three dead friends had tried in attacking the ant hill. They cry because they see themselves up there on the stage.........a poor frightened soul that finds themselves in a situation they'd rather not face but is compelled to do so. Colonel Dax realizes this and allows this brief respite of humanity to engulf the troops before they are sent back to face the horrors of the war. This film is indeed one of the best war films ever made it simply overpowers the viewer with emotion.", u'-0.315107', u'\nPaths of Glory is one of the best movies ever made, and possibly the best "war" movie, period. Paths of Glory does not portray war as conflict between armies or individual soldiers arrayed against one another on the battlefield.  Nor does it portray the acts of great leaders and heroes of war. No this film takes a different tact. \n\nThe setting is the Western Front of 1916 in the trenches with French soldiers faced off against an invisible German force across a barren No Man\'s Land. The German\'s are never seen and the dramatic "combat" is between vain French officers as they vie for prestige and honors.  The victims are the innocent French soldiers under their command who suffer miserably because of their arrogance and ignorance.\n\nBrilliant, gripping, and definitely a "must see".\n\n   ', u'0.150832', u"Although Kubrick's films are marked by their massive variation of genre and tone, one theme that crops up again and again is a strong anti-war sentiment, and this was never stated more strongly than in Paths of Glory. A relatively early Kubrick picture and, despite coming before what is considered his classic period, it is one of his best.\n\nIn contrast to his previous picture, The Killing, a definite Kubrick style is beginning to emerge now. One notable example is the scene in which General Mireau tours the trenches, walking towards the audience with the camera retreating away from him. This technique would be repeated years later in Kubrick's other war film, Full Metal Jacket. There is also something about the arrangement of objects in the frame, as well the tracking and dollying which hints towards his more familiar later style. His recurring chess motif appears as well, albeit subtly. At the court martial the floor is chequered, and the soldiers on trial are seated with guards standing behind them as if they are pawns about to be sacrificed.\n\nThe light and contrast in this picture is put to good effect. The palatial officers' headquarters is light and airy with few shadows. The trenches are gloomy and cramped. Kubrick was becoming a real master at contrasting locations and getting the look of a place just right.\n\nThe use of music in Paths of Glory is bold and brilliant. The pre-recorded score is almost entirely percussive \x96 all rhythmic sounds with no melody. A weird kettle drum track is used to help build tension in the night patrol scene, while in the climactic scene the funeral march drumming instills a sense of dread, further heightened by having the shots edited in time to the beat. In the emotional final scene we get the complete opposite \x96 a beautiful vocal melody. This has all the more impact after hearing nothing but militaristic drums for the rest of the film.\n\nThe casting is absolutely flawless. While there are no big names apart from leading man Kirk Douglas and the now elderly Adolphe Menjou, there isn't a single weak performance. The despair and resentment of the condemned soldiers feels so absolutely real. In contrast the smugness and fake sympathy of the upper class officers is brilliantly portrayed.\n\nThroughout his career Kubrick never seemed to be particularly keen on blatantly emotional moments. Paths of Glory is the exception. The later scenes are incredibly poignant and moving, and the final moments in the soldier's bar are what makes it a masterpiece more than anything else \x96 the icing on the cake. However it's quite probable that Kubrick regretted this as an overly sentimental approach, as woolly sentimentalism was a major gripe of his when he worked on Spartacus. Whatever the case, he certainly reined in the stirring stuff considerably after this, to the point where his later films became characterised by their understatement of emotions.", u'0.329811', u'\nThis movie, along with the original screen version of "All Quiet on the Western Front" must rank as one of the most tragic versions of what war is really like. The arrogance and total disregard for the welfare of the soldier as beautifully portrayed by Menjou and McReady, in opposition to the care and concern of the Colonel so humanly portrayed by  Douglas adds to the reality of what the world was like in the days of the "Great War." Additionally, the roles played by Wayne Morris, Ralph Meeker and the self serving aide to McReady add to the greatness of this memorable motion picture. There is no "Viva La France" here.', u'0.256143', u"\nIf you can watch this movie all the way through to the final scene in a bar in which a German girl (played by Kubrick's wife!) sings a song and all the grizzled veterans in the room cry--and not cry yourself--then something's wrong with you. This is one heck of a powerful film and makes a better statement against the senselessness of war than many films with vastly bigger budgets. It blew me away the first time I saw it.", u'-0.136766', u"Paths Of Glory is a masterpiece without doubt. Usually a masterpiece is the pinnacle of a directors career. However when you are talking about Stanley Kubrick, you are talking about genuine genius. This is just one of his many masterpieces, but Paths Of Glory is probably as good a film as any of Kubrick's other best works. I have seen tons of war films in my life, many great ones. Honestly, this is my favorite of them all. When I first saw this film I didn't expect it to blow me away. After all it is an early Kubrick film, however it blew me away constantly, and completely. This is not only one of the greatest war films ever made, not only one of the greatest black & white films ever made, it is simply one of the greatest films ever made bar none. The film screams integrity, in each and every way. This film is a joy to watch, and in my estimation, Paths Of Glory will remain forever as one of cinemas greatest accomplishments.\n\n10/10", u'0.483474'], u'tt0012349': [u'THE KID (First National Pictures, 1921), a comedy-drama written, directed and starring Charlie Chaplin (1889-1977), plays an important part his screen career. Aside from Chaplin cast opposite Marie Dressler in TILLIE\'S PUNCTURED ROMANCE (1914), a Mack Sennett production hailed as the first feature length comedy, THE KID starts Chaplin with a whole new cycle of feature comedies, but releases coming once every two to three years. A comic genius who got his start in comedy shorts starting in 1914, eventually under the supervision and direction of himself, Chaplin\'s methods in movie making improved with each passing film. Like himself, Jackie Coogan, Chaplin\'s littlest co-star and title character, made such an impression with his initial performance, nearly upstaging his impresario, that he immediately found himself starring in movies on his own, becoming Hollywood\'s first important child star.\n\nTHE KID starts off with inter-titles, "A picture with a smile and perhaps a tear," followed by "The woman whose sin was motherhood," titles much to the liking of a D.W. Griffith directorial tearjerker starring Lillian Gish, yet, in fact, might have seemed more logical for a Griffith film than Chaplin\'s, whose very name personifies comedy. A young girl (Edna Purviance) leaves a charity hospital with a baby in her arms. who turns out to be an unwed mother whose father (Carl Miller), a young artist, never returns to her life. The mother places her baby in the back of a limousine and walks away. Crooks enter the scene, stealing the car, discover the baby and place it in a trash bin in the poor district of town. Noticing the infant wrapped in a blanket, Charlie tries to pass it off to someone else, but after stumbling upon a note which reads, "Please love and care for this orphan child," he decides to raise the child himself. Five years pass. The kid (whose name is believed to be John), now Charlie\'s adopted son and sidekick, start off each day with brand new adventures in raising money. As for the kid\'s mother, she\'s become "a star of great prominence," devoting her spare time with charitable work handing out gifts to the children of poor districts, where lives the kid. The paths of the kid and his mother meet on numerous occasions, unaware of each other\'s identities. When the kid becomes seriously ill and in need of immediate medical attention, a middle-aged country doctor, having discovered Charlie not the boy\'s true father, sends for the authorities from the County Orphan Asylum to take the child away.\n\nTHE KID consists of many ingredients to make this an everlasting product, especially for a silent movie made so long ago. Chaplin, who constructs his gags to perfection, has one difficult scene that comes off naturally, this being where Charlie cuts out diapers from a sheet for the infant as he\'s lying beside him in a miniature hammock crying out for his milk. The baby immediately stops after Charlie directs the nipple attached to a coffee pot (a substitute for a baby bottle) back into his mouth. Another classic moment, on a serious nature, is when Charlie is being held back by authorities, being forced to watch his crying "son" taken away from him. Charlie breaks away and goes after the truck as he\'s being chased by a policeman from the slanted roof-tops. The close-up where father and son tearful reunite is as touching as anything ever captured on film.\n\nChaplin and little Jackie (billed Jack Coogan in the opening credits) display their talents as both funny characters and dramatic actors. Little Jackie is especially cute as a miniature sized Chaplin, right down to his baggy pants. Chaplin giving one of his most sensitive performances, is so convincing that it doesn\'t take away his screen persona as the lovable funny tramp. From this point onward, he would become less characteristic as a slapstick comedian and more agreeable as an serious actor, at the same time, adding more plot, pathos and truly great comedy routines.\n\nAs much as the present showing of THE KID barely reaches the one hour mark, Chaplin includes enough gags and pathos to make it work. The dream sequence where he finds himself in Heaven surrounded by angels might appear trite and unnecessary for some, but actually makes it essential to the plot which fits into the scene that follows.\n\nTHE KID, which had been unavailable for public viewing for many years, was resurrected in the 1970s in revival movie houses with a brand new and wonderful orchestral score conducted by Chaplin himself in 1971. It would be nearly another decade for many to fully get to see and appreciate this little masterpiece when distributed to video cassette in 1989 as part of the Charlie Chaplin centennial collection, double billed along with a comedy short, THE IDLE CLASS (1921). In the DVD format, the two disc set includes rare out-takes and deleted scenes. Turner Classic Movies has brought forth THE KID as part of its movie library, where it made its debut December 15, 2003, during its weekly Silent Sunday Nights, hosted by Robert Osborne, and later in March 2004 when Charlie Chaplin was selected as its "Star of the Month."\n\nFor its age, THE KID holds up extremely well, thanks to the convincing performances of both Chaplin and Coogan. There\'s no doubt Jackie Coogan (1914-1984) became an overnight star with this one film. He was a natural. While the paths of Chaplin and Coogan would never meet again, on screen anyway, without them, there would never have been such a true classic from the silent screen era as THE KID. (****)', u'0.267985', u'\nIt is hard to find such delightful and adorable movies these days as "The Kid". It is a silent movie but so rich, winning and beautiful that you don\xb4t nead words. Chaplin and 6-year old Coogan are possibly the most charming pair I have ever seen in my life. The film succees to be nicely light and full of joy but also overwhelmingly sad and sentimental. I always get my eyes full with tears of saddness and happiness. And I really never cry in movies. And the music...its simply Oscar-level! The movie is sympathetic, full of feeling, touchingly funny moments. It is truly a masterpiece showing how extraordinary talented person Charlie Chaplin was considering this film is respectively over 80 years old! So don\xb4t you miss it because of it\xb4s age, don\xb4t miss it. ', u'0.346433', u'\nWhile perhaps not as celebrated now as some of Chaplin\'s later features, "The Kid" is an excellent achievement and a thoroughly enjoyable film.  Charlie and young Jackie Coogan make an entertaining and unforgettable pair, and there is a lot of good slapstick plus a story that moves quickly and makes you want to know what will happen.  Chaplin also wrote a particularly good score for this one, and most of the time the music sets off the action very nicely.\n\nWhile it\'s a fairly simple story, this is one of Chaplin\'s most efficiently designed movies.  Every scene either is necessary to the plot, or is very funny for its own sake, or both.  Except for Chaplin and Coogan, most of the other characters (even frequent Chaplin leading lady Edna Purviance) are just there to advance the plot when needed, and the two leads are allowed to carry the show, which they both do extremely well.\n\n"The Kid" is also impressive in that, while the story is a sentimental one, it strikes an ideal balance, maintaining sympathy for the characters while never overdoing it with the pathos, which Chaplin occasionally lapsed into even in some of his greatest movies.  Here, the careful balance makes the few moments of real emotion all the more effective and memorable.\n\nThis is one of Chaplin\'s very best movies by any measure.  If you enjoy silent comedies, don\'t miss it.\n', u'0.857645', u'Wow, is this a memorable film! It is one of the most famous silent movies ever and justifiably so. That fact that it still entertains over 80 years after it was made is quite a testimony. \n\nIt is a wonderful blend of humor and drama. Charlie Chaplin\'s unique humor, combined with an involving storyline and strong sentimentality make this one to remember. Chaplin\'s humor ranges from pure slapstick to some clever stunts.\n\nThe "kid" - Jackie Coogan - is just as memorable, maybe even more so. He is unbelievably cute, especially in those old-time clothes he wore. Watching the expressions on his face, even as a baby, are fascinating and facial expressions certainly were a trademark of the silent era.\n\nSo, between Chaplin and Coogan, and a very involving story that can break your heart one minute and have you laughing out loud the next, it\'s an amazing piece of work. This is a very fast-paced story which lasts less than an hour.\n\nThe special edition two-disc DVD has a restored version of the print so the picture is very clear, actually astounding for its age. Excellent entertainment.', u'0.813141', u'"The Kid" is a powerfully emotional and wonderfully hilarious motion picture and was a tremendous breakthrough in Charlie Chaplin\'s oeuvre. Chaplin hadn\'t filled a film so fully with pathos since "The Vagabond" (1916), and then it was in a very limited way, subject to the confines of two-reel length. Additionally, "Sunnyside" (1919) was a failure. The feature length of "The Kid" also allows Chaplin to elaborate and refine the gags, pranks and set pieces, and with the support of Jackie Coogan, it\'s one of his funniest comedies.\n\nThe parent-child relationship has proved potential as sentimental entertainment, and, for me, not many have neared Chaplin in exploiting that formula in "The Kid". The sequence where they take the kid, for a workhouse, away from the tramp is probably the most powerful and endearing tearjerker moment in the film--or of all film. In addition to Chaplin and Coogan, Edna Purviance is also quite effective in the dramatic side of the picture. Furthermore, Chaplin and cinematographer Roland Totheroh\'s photography had by then improved vastly over their work at Mutual, and Chaplin was already an eccentric perfectionist, but the musical score added to the 1971 release, composed by Chaplin, taken from Tchaikovsky, gives the sentimental parts its most verve.\n\nOf the slapstick, one of my favorite scenes involves the tramp in fear of a bully. It\'s reminiscent of his Mutual short "Easy Street" (1917), which is made especially clear when the bully bends a lamppost with one punch. There are many other great moments of humorous pantomime and farce in this film. Yet, "The Kid" is much more than that, which makes it such a breakthrough; the slapstick fills the plot, and there is more of a developed plot here than in Chaplin\'s previous work. This was the beginning of the tramp as the sympathetic, pitiful hero, as well as clown, that\'s so recognizable and beloved to this day.\n\nMoreover, the dream sequence is an ingenious plot device; it adds dimensionally to the narrative and asserts its themes while delaying the inevitable conclusion of the outer narrative to poignant effect. It\'s also funny in a silly way. It\'s somewhat analogous to the outer reality story, although with much ambiguity. I wasn\'t always sure Chaplin was making any clear point, such as with the Christ image earlier in the film, but that seems unimportant; "The Kid" affects the emotions and isn\'t especially aimed at engaging the mind. At six reels, with more sets and a developed plot, this film was already an expansion compared to Chaplin\'s previous films; the dream sequence satisfyingly expands the narrative depth, thus making "The Kid" Chaplin\'s first complete feature.', u'0.453806', u'\nIs there a way to name the greatest filmmaker of all time? Probably not, to different people it\'s gonna be different person, so I can speak only for myself. Let me try to describe my favorite contestant for this award:\n\n\nThis man is the true embodiment of the "American Dream": Having grown up in poverty and misery and virtually without parents (without a father and with insane mother), moving to America with basically nothing but his ability to speak English (in the era of the silent movies), this man manages to establish his own film company (United Artists) and becomes one of the creators of Hollywood. He produces, directs, writes, plays the leading role and composes the music for his movies. He is the creator of the most famous movie image on the earth-the Little Tramp. As you all probably know I am talking about sir Charles Spencer Chaplin. \n\nThere are attempts, sometimes I read, to make Buster Keaton candidate for the Chaplin\'s throne. Well, I won\'t comment on that for I am not familiar with Keaton\'s work; I grew up with Chaplin so you could say I am being biased, however I would mention only one fact here: the only time the two meet on the screen is in a Chaplin\'s movie "Limelight." I think this says a lot.\n\nWhy did I choose the movie "The Kid" as a podium for my tribute to the great Charlie? I have to say I like all of his movies, mistake, I love all of his movies, but this one is the true purl in his work to me. I don\'t think of any other movie, not only Chaplin\'s, that made me cry, I mean really cry, and laugh, I mean really laugh, like "The Kid." The closest I can think of now is another Chaplin\'s masterpiece "City Lights" but unlike the later one in the former one that is only him, the tramp, and the kid; and everything is silent. Think about it: the movie making at its purest.\n\n\nI don\'t know whether I could make my point with this review-probably not. There are not enough words to describe the respect and gratitude I feel towards Chaplin. To me he is simply the greatest filmmaker of all time.\n', u'0.331991', u'I\'ve always thought there\'s a great beauty and poignancy to the best slapstick comedies, even unsentimental ones like Keaton\'s "The General" or Laurel and Hardy\'s "Way Out West." The latter comedy has a scene where L&H perform a soft-shoe dance; it always brings me to tears. Why? Maybe physical comedy has the same kind of effect on me as a dance performance. Both art forms are very expressive; the fact that I\'m laughing doesn\'t dilute the emotional charge.\n\nOne of many things that made Chaplin a genius was his understanding of how close slapstick is to pathos already. Why not marry the two things? That\'s what he did in some of his early short films, and that\'s what he does in this feature comedy. The Little Tramp finds an abandoned baby and raises him into boyhood. But the authorities find out and want to take little Jackie (Jackie Coogan) away. Meanwhile, the mother who abandoned him has since become a wealthy singer and doesn\'t know if she\'ll ever find out what became of him.\n\nJackie Coogan (about five in this film), with his charming manners, his talents as a mimic and his adeptness at physical comedy, is one of the all-time great child actors. Want more evidence of Chaplin\'s genius? Coogan doesn\'t steal the film from him. This is true even though Chaplin, as producer, star and director, makes every evident attempt to spotlight the boy\'s talents. Coogan is even better here than he is in his own vehicles, like "My Boy" and "Oliver Twist."\n\nChaplin\'s storytelling\x97even with the foolish sub-Dickensian plot twists, such as Jackie suddenly taking ill\x97deftly draws out the comedy and pathos for maximum effect. The individual scenes themselves are flawlessly constructed. The window-breaking scene, the flophouse scene, the dream sequence, the trying-to-get-rid-of-the-baby scene\x97they\'re perfect. Chaplin\'s celebrated pantomimic skills are examples of storytelling in themselves.\n\nWant me to criticize something? How about those thudding attempts to link the mother with Jesus? But you know, I can\'t even complain about that. It\'s too sweetly na\xefve. And the movie as a whole is too good to allow us to sneer at the (very) few flaws.\n\nOne important note: children love this movie. Show it to them while they\'re young, and you\'ll make Chaplin fans of them. And that\'s better than their becoming fans of almost anything that\'s being peddled to them.', u'0.304848', u'It\'s easy to call Charlie Chaplin a genius, but I\'ll say it once again: the man was a genius, if only at doing a certain particular kind of film. You wouldn\'t ever see Charlie Chaplin doing a silent horror film, or at least one like out of Germany, or even a big epic that ran Griffith lengths. His artistry was concerned with those who could just about afford the price of a ticket back in the 20s and 30s to see his films and he combined pathos that was incredible and unique in and of its spectrum of humor and compassion. Some may call films like the Kid and even City Lights sentimental, but they may miss the greater picture at work which is that any sentiment is orchestrated and (the usual kicked-around word) manipulated amid the comedic set-ups. Earned sentiment is different than faux sentimentality chucked on to the viewer, and if any case could show this distinction better it would be hard to find a better example then the Kid.\n\nAs it stands even at 50 minutes, which was trimmed by Chaplin himself 50 years after its original release and including a new musical score, it\'s just about a perfectly told tale. It is short in either cut form but its so simple a story to tell that anything else would just likely be padding; even that \'Dreamland\' sequence towards the end of the film is crucial and allows for Chaplin to let loose on a wonderful light-and-dark examination of all the major characters in the picture- now with angel wings and devil horns! What it\'s about, in complete basics, is that a woman leaves her baby in the backseat of a car thinking she won\'t be able to take care of him, and the baby winds up by chance in an alleyway the Tramp is at, and the Tramp decides to take care of him (he even names him, in one amusing aside, John). Then it cuts to 5 years later, and the two are an intrepid duo as they break and fix windows, eat lots of pancake, and the Tramp nearly gets pummeled by an "Older Brother" of a kid John gets in a fight with. Meanwhile, the mother is now a success, not knowing her child is somewhere- right in front of her nose.\n\nThis may sound like a bit of story, but it\'s told briskly and without a missed beat in editing, and Chaplin\'s re-edit tightens it to a point where we\'re mostly with the Kid and the Tramp. Their scenes are everything that Chaplin wants them to be: playful, absurd, cute, and bittersweet to a degree. We know this can\'t exactly last, but the moment the poor maybe-sick Kid is taken away to the orphanage becomes one of the most tragic (and yet partially triumphant) sequences in the movies. It\'s in a case like this, where we as the audience tear up, more or less, as the Kid is being carted away crying his eyes out, and then inter-cut with Chaplin\'s daring dash across the roof-tops to save him, that we see the genius of comedy and tragedy combined and working off each other. This is assisted greatly throughout by child actor Jackie Coogan who may be one of the very best child actors in any film, silent or otherwise; that it\'s silent adds to the challenge and success of pure pantomime that without fault feels true: even a beat with the Kid playing with toys, an obviously "cute" bit, is great, and up for the task of playing off a quintessential clown like Chaplin.\n\nFeaturing some excellent set-pieces just unto themselves (aside from Dreamland there is the fight between Chaplin and the Brother with that belly-laugh part with the repetitive brick-hit to the head, or when Tramp and the Kid stop to sleep for the night at the home and have to sneak around to try and not pay an extra coin), an absolutely beautiful musical track from Chaplin, and excellent performances from all supporting cast (including frequent Chaplin star Edna Purvivance), it\'s altogether an awe-inspiring feat. To see this or City Lights or Modern Times to an extent is to see ideas and character outlasting far beyond their time and place as something far more valuable to the public consciousness.', u'0.498454', u"Charlie Chaplin was perhaps the most innovative auteur of the silent era and certainly the most famous. His character, the Tramp, is now a cultural icon and will forever be a symbol of poverty and travesty that was American society in the early 20th century, but something all of us can overcome.\n\nIn one of his first roles with this character, he played opposite a very young Jackie Coogan, who would go on to play Uncle Fester in the cult TV series The Addams Family. Taking himself and this very talented young boy, Chaplin made a masterwork; one that he truly could call his own as he wrote, directed, starred in and composed the score for this film.\n\nHere, Chaplin feeds to one of the most basic of all human desires: to care for a child and be needed and loved by one another. The Tramp finds an abandoned baby in an alley and in order to not be caught by a policeman he takes the child in as his own. He hasn't got much but he does have love, which is more than can be said for the child's mother.\n\nFlash forward five years, and now the mother wants her son back. Circumstances arise and soon the Tramp is fighting for the right to keep his little companion. Even so, the story is thin but I believe Chaplin was going for something more deep and meaningful. This also gave him a chance to work on some different visual styles and comedic gimmicks, things not used much at the time in the movies. Using these little tricks and ideas, Chaplin creates a real persona not just for himself but also the supporting cast and involving us in the story.\n\nHowever, at the heart of the story are the emotions about fighting for the right to be a parent/guardian; someone the kid can look up to and sleep beside and confide in. It tugs at your heart all while making you laugh, sometimes in the same scene. This shows the work of a true genius; someone who knew what he wanted to create and the style in which he wanted to portray it.", u'0.294423', u"\nCharlie Chaplin's study of a tramp teaming up with a street kid (the cute little Jackie Coogan) has a fine line to tread between humour and pathos, and true to what you would expect of his best work, does it superbly.  The tramp always manages to wring the hearts of his viewers and adding a little boy to the mix was the finishing touch.  Look out too for little Lita Grey in the angel sequence, who would become Chaplin's 2nd wife four years after this film was made.", u'0.985966', u'When watching this, I wanted to give the film a 7 rather than an 8, simply because I do not think it is as good as "Modern Times" or one or two others. However, taking into account that this is 1921 and the film technology is not all there, I will give it a little extra bump because it is so clean and well done, it could have been made a decade later and looked the same.\n\nChaplin has to, of course, be given a lot of credit for producing, writing, directing and starring. Being a great comic actor is one thing, but being able to run your whole production takes a special skill. And young Jackie Coogan sells the picture. The film succeeds or fails depending on your casting of the kid, and they nailed it -- he\'s adorable, emotional, and seems able to handle any situation.', u'0.43685', u"What makes a feature film different to a short? It isn't just length. After all, some of Charlie Chaplin's later shorts were as long as forty-five minutes, while The Kid is barely an hour. No, when Chaplin made his graduation to full-length features, he also strove to broaden the scope, scale and above all the dignity of his work. The Kid is not just the addition of another fifteen minutes of funny business; it is truly a turning point in Chaplin's career.\n\nThe Kid begins with a bit of backstory, as a few of Chaplin's shorts do, but never before has he conceived one as professional looking as this. Here we have the opening of a drama, and yet one written and staged with such simplicity that it does not overbalance the rest of the picture, and does not leave us waiting too long to get onto the comedy. Two shots and a title card tell us that the woman in this story is the mother of an illegitimate child. A couple more shots tell us that the father is now out of her life, and revealing him to be an aspiring artist gives us an idea of why she may have been attracted to him, and why perhaps their relationship was passionate yet brief. Of course, such seriousness was the sort of thing to be lampooned in a Chaplin short, but here that wouldn't be appropriate. Instead we are eased gradually into the comedy world, but having the pair of hoodlums who steal the car slightly buffoonish characters \x96 they are by no means laugh-out-loud funny, but they certainly don't belong in a straight dramatic setting. And throughout while the drama remains very genuine Chaplin takes care never to allow any environment to become too serious, for example having Henry Bergman turn up as a flamboyant impresario in the dressing room scene.\n\nAnd never before has the effort gone into directing actors been so evident in a Chaplin picture. The performances in The Kid are full of subtle gesture and timing in ensemble pieces. Edna Purviance demonstrates a good sense of dramatic realism, with a little too much melodramatic exaggeration, but still very natural by the standards of the time. And of course, little Jackie Coogan is astoundingly impressive, his movements, expressions and timings all spot-on, so much so that it almost looks impossible for a child to be acting with such apparent awareness, and he appears more like a human cartoon character. Coogan steals the picture with ease, and for once the normally egotistical Chaplin steps graciously aside.\n\nThis too is an important difference with The Kid. Chaplin had always resisted anything verging on a double act, famously severing his partnership with the funny-in-his-own-right Ben Turpin back in 1915. Now however he allows his rapport with Coogan to become the main basis for gags. Notice how there are very few protracted comedy sequences in The Kid that feature Chaplin on his own. The few examples, such as the routine with the policeman's wife and the window ledge, are often hilarious and Chaplin could easily have filled the picture with such material. However, he does the bulk of the comedy in duet with Coogan, in material which is perhaps not quite as funny but also has that endearing touch to it, and Chaplin willingly sacrifices his own time in the limelight to bring this out.\n\nToday The Kid can be looked upon as the ancestor of the successful feature-length spin-off. If you look at something like the 80-minute Christmas special of The Office, it similarly broadened out the scope of the TV series by adding some serious dramatic and emotional elements, and has become recognised as a masterpiece \x96 better than the series. By comparison The Simpsons will always be best remembered as a TV show because The Simpsons Movie just felt like an extra long episode. Chaplin's full length features however were far more than just spin-offs, and have always been revered and regarded as the most important body of his work.", u'0.352493', u'The Kid became a critically hailed international hit. A tramp (Charles Chaplin) brings up an abandoned baby (Jackie Coogan), and later loses him to his mother (Edna Purviance); but there is a happy ending.\n\nThe film is a sentimental silent comedy set in the slums. The comedy is sparingly laid on, but the overall effect is much less painful than the synopsis would suggest. The production is comparatively smooth, young Coogan is sensational, and the film contains much of the quintessential Chaplin. Chaplin had difficulties getting The Kid produced. His inspiration, it is suggested was the death of his own first son, Norman Spencer Chaplin a few days after birth in 1919.', u'0.373686', u'The simple, lovely story of an abandoned kid and found and raised by the little tramp is executed by Chaplin with an incredible sensitive touch. I\'d say that it is as much funny as sad, and the music score couldn\'t be more accurate.\n\nPerhaps the most delightful surprise was to "In the dreamland" scene. So full of symbolism and lyrically narrated, the scene made me question myself if, at the moment, I was watching Bu\xf1uel and not Chaplin. \n\nIt is not my Chaplin\'s favorite, but it\'s for sure one of his bests. Totally recommend to be watched. Chaplin will never disappoint you, that\'s for sure. If you watch this one, also with "City Lights" and "Modern Times", you\'ll be ready to enjoy his talkies: "The Great Dictator", a classic, and the perfect, touching till tears, "Limelight".', u'0.500222', u'Charlie Chaplin\'s first full length feature film, and his biggest success up to that date, is a remarkably heartwarming story , which makes the surprising connection between slapstick comedy and dramatic tragedy. It begins with a woman who\'s "sin was motherhood," who gives birth to a baby she can\'t support at a Charity Hospital which is kept pad-locked from the inside. She is forced to abandon it in an alley, and before long Chaplin wanders by and what follows is one of the best sequences of the film, as he is casually strolling by and then, through a series of odd but entirely believable situations, he is unable to get rid of it. \n\nIt is no secret that little Jackie Coogan nearly stole the show from Chaplin (who was in top form) playing the little boy at 5 years old. Charlie\'s life is thrown into turmoil by the unexpected arrival of the baby, but eventually he sort of organizes his life and when the kid gets a little older they make a nice living together, the boy breaking windows and Charlie selling replacements. Soon the police notice so they have to cut and run, because there are other conflicts approaching which will warrant screen time much more than how they make money. \n\nIt is interesting to watch the film oscillate back and forth from Chaplin\'s traditional slapstick comedy and a much more developed, dramatic story. The film is interspersed with pure slapstick and some genuinely moving moments (sometimes simultaneously, if you can believe that), but overall it is a truly heartwarming tale of friendship and family and survival, and it is never once predictable, all the way until the last frame.\n\nThere is a quick scene where the kid gets into a fist fight with another little boy, and in between "rounds, " Charlie is rubbing the kid down and congratulating him on fighting so well, and giving him hints for the rest of the fight. Meanwhile, the other kid\'s brother shows up, a massive oaf of a man who looks more like Frankenstein\'s monster than anything else. What follows is a pretty funny fight that looks startlingly similar to the fight between Charlie and the town bully in Easy Street. This is a slapstick set-up that is so simple that it could have been thrown in just to take up screen time, were it not for it\'s direct relevance to the story.\n\nAt another point, there is pure slapstick taking place in their little shack of a home, as the 1921 version of Child Protective Services shows up to tear the young boy crying from Jackie\'s arms. I think this is the only time in any film that I\'ve ever seen genuine, low-brow slapstick so seamlessly combined with a truly sad and heartbreaking incident. This combination, not just here but throughout the film, is The Kid\'s biggest achievement. \n\nThere is a dream sequence near the end of the film that I am really not sure what to think about, although my understanding is that volumes have been written about it\'s symbolic meaning, both within the movie and in reference to Chaplin\'s personal life. And speaking of which, supposedly there were some legal issues involving money and divorce for which Chaplin sped the film stock to Utah for editing. I don\'t know which story to believe, that it was because of Chaplin\'s painful divorce or because he was unhappy with his salary (I would bet it\'s a little of both), but the film is here and I guess ultimately that\'s all that matters. \n\nIn the five or six times that I\'ve seen The Kid, I am always a little uncomfortable with that kiss that Charlie gives the kid when he finally rescues him from the back of that truck, if only because I am conscious that he is not the tramp\'s real son, either on screen or off. Then again, I am looking at it with 21st century eyes. Some of Shirley Temple\'s early films are also a little disturbing to me, although for not quite the same reasons. \n\nBy this time, Chaplin was fully on the road to his career in full length feature films, and after 36 short comedies for Mack Sennett at Keystone Studios and a dozen or so more for Essanay and Vagabond (along with a few assorted others), Charlie was fast on the way to establishing himself as one of the greatest stars in the history of the cinema.', u'-0.0897046'], u'tt0405094': [u'Because this movie deals with recent German history, some German comments about it get sidetracked into minute historical discussions. Forget them; Das Leben der Anderen is an outstanding movie that should be seen everywhere.\n\nThe former East Germany, a relatively small country of 16 million people, was controlled by the most sophisticated, cunning, and thorough secret police the world has ever seen, the East German Ministerium f\xfcr Staatsicherheit, or "Stasi." The Stasi had about 90,000 employees -- a staggering number for such a small population -- but even more importantly, recruited a network of hundreds of thousands of "unofficial employees," who submitted secret reports on their co-workers, bosses, friends, neighbors, and even family members. Some did so voluntarily, but many were bribed or blackmailed into collaboration.\n\nDas Leben der Anderen, ("The Life of Others") German director Florian Henckel von Donnersmarck\'s debut, builds this painful legacy into a fascinating, moving film. In its moral seriousness, artistic refinement, and depth, Das Leben der Anderen simply towers over other recent German movies, and urgently deserves a wide international release. The fulcrum of the movie (but probably not its most important character) is Georg Dreyman, an up-and-coming East German playwright in his late 30s. Played by the square-jawed Sebastian Koch, Dreyman is an (apparently) convinced socialist who\'s made his peace with the regime. His plays are either ideologically neutral or acceptable, and he\'s even received State honors.\n\nAlthough he is a collaborator, he is also a Mensch. He uses his ideological "cleanliness" to intervene on behalf of dissidents such as his journalist friend Paul Hauser (Hans-Uwe Bauer). These unfortunates must contend with every humiliation a totalitarian state can invent: their apartments are bugged, friends and family are recruited to inform on them, and chances to publish or perform can be extinguished by one stray comment from a Central Committee member. The most recalcitrant can be kicked out of the country and stripped of their citizenship, like the singer songwriter Wolf Biermann.\n\nDreyman lives in a shabby-genteel, book-filled apartment with his girlfriend Christa-Maria Sieland (Martina Gedeck), a renowned actress who often appears in his plays. At the beginning of the movie, Dreyman himself comes under the regime\'s suspicion, for reasons that become clear only later. The fearful machinery of the Stasi rumbles to life: his movements are recorded, and his apartment bugged. The Stasi had bugging down to a science: a team of meticulously-trained agents swoop into your apartment when you\'re not there, install miniscule, undetectable listening devices in every single room -- including the bathroom -- and vanish in less than an hour, leaving no trace. Agents set up an secret electronic command post nearby, keeping a written record of every joke, argument, or lovemaking session.\n\nThe "operative process" against Dreyman is overseen by Stasi captain Gerd Wiesler, played by Ulrich M\xfche, an actor from the former East who was himself once in the Stasi\'s cross-hairs. Captain Wiesler starts the film as a colorless, icy, tight-lipped professional who shows no mercy in fighting the "enemies of socialism": if he needs to interrogate a suspect for 10 hours without sleep to get a confession, he will do so -- and then place the seat-cover the suspect sat on in a vacuum jar in case the miscreant should later need to be tracked by bloodhounds. At night, Captain Wiesler returns to his tiny apartment in an grubby, anonymous high-rise. He settles himself among his inexpressibly drab furniture, eats a meal squeezed out of a plastic tube while watching reports about agricultural production, and then goes to bed alone.\n\nAs Captain Wiesler listens to Dreyman and his girlfriend he begins to like them, or perhaps envy the richness and depth of their lives in comparison with his own. Perhaps he also begins to wonder why a stranger should have the right to become privy to Dreyman\'s most intimate secrets: his occasional impotence, his girlfriend\'s infidelities, his artistic crises. At the same time, though, Wiesler is under pressure: a Central Committee official has made it clear to Wiesler and his toadying supervisor Lieutenant Colonel Grubitz (Ulrich Tukur), that Dreyman has to go down. \n\nI won\'t discuss more plot details, as there are unexpected twists. Each of the main characters is drawn deeper into the conflict between Dreyman and the State, and each is torqued by loyalty conflicts that intensify as the pressure increases. The cast is outstanding. Sebastian Koch finds the right combination of poetic detachment and watchful sophistication for Dreyman. Martina Gedeck, as his girlfriend, has the most challenging role, since she\'s buffeted from all sides: by her suspicious partner, by Stasi agents trying to turn her, and by a lecherous Culture Minister. Ulrich M\xfche plays the Stasi agent\'s transformation with reserve, only hinting at the stages in his character\'s secret, but decisive, change of heart.\n\nDirector von Donnersmarck, a blue-blooded West German, has re-created the gray, drained look of the former East, and the nature of Stasi intimidation, with a fidelity that has earned the praise of East Germans. His pacing is relaxed, but doesn\'t drag; although there are a few longueurs, most scenes unfold at just the right pace, and there are several great set-pieces. One is a bone-rattling episode in the Stasi canteen in which a young recruit is caught telling a joke about East German premier Erich Honecker. Another is the penultimate scene, a masterstroke in which Dreyman gains access to his massive Stasi file, while reading it, suddenly understands episodes of his own life which had never made sense to him before. The ending is perfectly judged; bittersweet and moving without swelling strings or teary confessions.\n\nDas Leben der Anderen is an outstanding movie, probably a great one. If it\'s not picked up for international distribution, it will be a bitter loss for thousands of potential moviegoers in other countries.', u'0.0405386', u"Holy cow! What a terrific movie! I am a voting member of the Academy (actor's branch) so I get all the films for free. I've seen everything---60 films. This was one of the last 3 films that I saw---because I was completely unfamiliar with the title. This film slowly gripped me, but by the end, the grip was merciless. The lead actor, who should be doing The Life Story Of Peter Jennings, was wonderful. Everybody was terrific. Congratulations to the writers for their perfect structure---and to the director for his flawless storytelling---and his eliciting of top performances from his actors. How well cast it was. \n\nBut now I'm totally bewildered. Why haven't I heard anything about this film? Where was this film at the Golden Globes? I haven't even seen any reviews about it. Nothing! What's going on? I'm very active in the film business. I follow this stuff. This film (that I never heard of) took me by surprise as no other film has ever done. \n\nNote to the IMDb: This is not a spoiler. \n\nJesse Vint III", u'0.112209', u'I do agree with all the other positive comments, and just need to add that this is the very first movie about the former GDR I saw that is not something like a comedy. Flicks like "Sonnenallee" or "Good bye Lenin" definitely were great and funny, but unconsciously left myself (a West German) with the impression that the GDR has been a sort of "Mickey Mouse State" full of stupid but charming characters, not really to be taken seriously. After seeing "Das Leben der Anderen" this impression shifted quite a bit: there actually was suffering, killing desperation and a terribly claustrophobic atmosphere behind that wall. This might well be the most realistic depiction of the dark side of the former East Germany. Thanks to the Producers, actors and director for making this movie. 10 out of 10.', u'0.154949', u'East Berlin, November 1984. Five years before its downfall the GDR seeks to maintain its power with the help of a merciless system of control and observation. When Oberstleutnant Anton Grubitz puts loyal Stasi-Hauptmann Gerd Wiesler on to the famous writer Georg Dreymann and his girlfriend Christa Maria Sieland who is a famous actress herself, he expects career advancement for himself. For most important politicians are responsible for this "operative act".\n\nWhat Wiesler did not expect: the intimate view on the world of the ones he\'s observing changes the snitch as well. Looking at "the life of the others" makes him aware of the beggarliness in his own life and enables access to a so far unknown world of love, free thinking and speaking he is hardly able to elude. But the system can\'t be stopped anymore and a dangerous game, which destroys the love of Christa Maria Sieland and Georg Dreymann and Wieslers present existence begins. \n\nUntil the fall of the wall each of them has paid a big price. After that a whole new world begins.\n\nMy personal opinion - though it doesn\'t count that much - is that this one a an absolute Must See. I can hardly remember such an intelligent and moving German movie especially not including the whole topic of GDR history and the dealing with it. I think this is the first German movie which shows this system as it used to be (which has been confirmed by several contemporary witnesses) and not turns it and its people into comedy though there have been several good ones, of course.', u'0.425288', u"I wonder why there has been so little written and publicized about this movie. This should be seen in every country and its merits trumpeted from the skies.\n\nIt starts off slowly and the locale is the former East Germany, inhabited by 16 million people who are being spied upon relentlessly by their secret police. In this very real world of the Berlin Wall, there are many Stasi, 90,000, overseeing the populace, aided and abetted by hundreds of thousands of informants. Many of these snitches were blackmailed or other pressures exerted (threats to children and loved ones) and a few obliged voluntarily.\n\nWhat is truly amazing is that this is Florian Henckel von Donnersmarck's directorial debut, and he maintains a masterful hand throughout and keeps the story and the tension rolling from the first scene of interrogation which is filmed back and forth between a tape educating new Stasi as to interview techniques and to the actual cell itself where it was recorded.\n\nThe movie circles around three main characters and there is a wider circle of the powerful who pull the puppet strings for a variety of reasons which become clear as the movie unfolds.\n\nFirst is Georg Dreyman, a playwright on the verge of celebrating his 40th birthday. Sebastian Koch, a tall,handsome actor dressed in writerly rumple, shares an apartment with his actress girlfriend, Christa-Maria Sieland (Martina Gedeck), and exists within the strictures of the state-sponsored theatre. He is a decent man, and tries to win support for his blacklisted friends.\n\nFor reasons that become quite clear, Dreyman falls under suspicion and the whole sophisticated Stasi spying system comes into play in the era of 1984. His whole apartment is bugged and every sound is monitored.\n\nThe man in charge of all this is Captain Gerd Wiesler,(Ulrich M\xfche). Ulrich's performance is nothing short of stunning. He starts as an almost robotic presence, dressed in gray, he almost disappears into every scene he's in. But one detects a clear intelligence in his bright eyes, the only part of him that's alive. Captain Wiesler lives in a non-descript arborited apartment, much like himself. He squeezes his food onto a plate from a tube.\n\nBut the captain starts to awaken slowly as he listens surreptitiously on the state of the art equipment secreted in the attic of Dreyman's building. He starts to fall in love with the couple and then pressure from above is brought to bear on him to dig for the dirt in Dreyman's life.\n\nAnd he is in a dilemma now, as he is drawn further and further into the life of Dreman and his girlfriend.\n\nI won't throw spoilers down. Suffice to say is that the story is enthralling right down to the very last frame. The acting is superb, the direction impeccable and the world of East Germany meticulously drawn with the viewer respected enough to find his or her own emotional path through the plot.\n\nThe ending is truly one of a kind. So right and true that I was left nodding, it was the only one possible.\n\nA must see, I will sing the praises of this film to all I know. 10 out of 10 from me. Right up there in my top 50 of all time. I find it so disappointing that these movies don't get wider release AND compete for an Oscar in the best picture of the year and not just for best foreign film. Now there's a heretical thought!", u'0.0687769', u'Germany has produced some very good movies recently ... but this one is in a class of its own. The main power of a quality movie, for me, has always been two things, a good story and mood - and this film has both. The story keeps you interested through all 139 minutes. You actually feel yourself transported to the 1980s of the former German republic. They have carefully chosen locations that looks east-germanish ... lots of "Trabant" cars on the streets :-) and the general grayish mood is very well recreated. The ordinary peoples fear of the Stasi is realistically portrayed. And i just love the twist in the story in the last 20 minutes or so. A brilliant movie that anyone even remotely interested in non-mainstream movies should see.', u'0.478775', u'I saw this film in its North American premiere in a packed theater at the Toronto Int\'l Film Festival this past week and was pleased to be part of a standing ovation at the end for the director and star, who were both on hand.\n\n"The Lives of Others," set in East Germany not long before the fall of the Berlin Wall, tells the moving story of a police investigator forced to confront himself and the work he does. In a society poisoned by secrecy, fear and the abuse of power, a number of the movie\'s characters -- artists, actors, writers -- must look deep inside and decide what they are made of; none more so than the investigator.\n\nThis is a movie that took me to a place and time that felt very authentic, for a tale that was very satisfying.\n\nUlrich Muhe, who plays the investigator, is mesmerizing, and the young director is to be applauded for this, his first full-length film. Some have compared "The Lives of Others" to Coppola\'s "The Conversation" but the two have completely different story arcs and are only superficially similar.\n\nBoth my companion and I felt this was our favorite of the six films we had a chance to see at the festival.', u'0.247144', u'having had the joy - while not living in the old gdr itself - to have some "accidental" run ins with the good old stasi then, i found it awkward that a German director from the "west" would have the guts to take on the subject of this "ministry of greyness".\n\nwriter/director florian henkell von donnersmarck (nice name for a teutonic director, me thinks, very fancy - makes you bang your heels) not only survived this bout of pretension which could have let him drowned in a swamp of reproaches and allegations about executing the "justice of the winners", but he transformed the tale into a story that can and will be understood anywhere in the world: a tale about power, treason and the almost anarchistic potency of emotions.\n\nwhile at the same time not falling into the trap of moralizing with a waving finger but showing us "the system" as an bureaucratic nightmare powered by - eventually - once even good intentioned human robots of socialist self-righteousness who actually destroy all real positive socialist impulses in the ones they plague, this film is - even if one disagrees with it\'s premises - probably the most important political drama coming out of Germany for years.', u'-0.478309', u'This was my favorite film at Telluride. Everyone with whom I talked had the same feeling. It generated the most "buzz." I hope it has a wide audience in the US. The acting by those who experienced the Stasi was moving and believable. Ulrich Muhe as the Stasi Officer was brilliant. Most of us cried during the final scene. Florian Henckel-Donnersmarck\'s direction with its twists and turns kept the audience glued to the screen. Because of the film\'s popularity, it was scheduled again for another showing at the festival. Both Muhe and Henckel-Donnersmarck were present and were stopped where ever they went during the festival. I recommend this film and gave it a 10.', u'0.185117', u'This film utterly blew me away. Full disclosure: I\'m a German born (Munich born) German-American who left Germany in 1986, before the wall came down. I cannot describe the feeling I felt as the last few words were spoken on the screen. I could not look at the subtitles ( a habit of speaking two languages ) because my eyes were so full of tears. I cannot tell you how I was so sorry I did not experience the wall coming down. This film healed a wound that may have been left by the nightmare years of 1938-1945, my own great uncle being a Nazi war criminal, convicted in Nuremberg in 1946. Yes, we are mensch too. We have the potential for greatness (of character) in spite of our history. Thank you Florian Henckel von Donnersmarck, for giving me back half of my lost soul in this single "es ist f\xfcr mich". I am reminded again that the difference between ourselves and beasts is that we have a choice.', u'-0.26813', u"I've been taking German lessons for about 2 months now, and since movies were great in helping me learn English language I'm always looking for German films to watch (as well as German music to listen to) in order to educate my ears.\n\nAnyway, I went to this place where I get all sort of rare movies and this one caught my attention... and I had no idea it got the Oscar for foreign language film this year! So I watched it without prejudice and... what did I find? A MASTERPIECE! This is the kind of movie that gets your attention from the first moment, and makes you interested in understanding the characters' psyche, which is very varied: you have the idealistic good guys, the idealistic bad guys, the people that broad their minds understanding that no political dogma is better than individual freedom, etc. And even though the movie has very tough moments it is all so well done and presented with such a good taste that in the end you feel some sort of relieved.\n\nIn this present day, when the ghost of authoritarian regimes still fly over our heads (in my country we're getting closer and closer to that reality), this movie will make you think about how important love, life and freedom are.\n\nA must see!", u'0.527608', u'Memories of the 70\'s and 80\'s visits in the German Democratic Republic (GDR) flood my mind while watching this film. Some are revolting, some comical and others are frightening. As a student of German, I visited the GDR several times to see pen pal friends. I remember one friend looking around and whispering to me in the S-Bahn - just in case one of the many "IM\'s" (unofficial workers of the Stasi) was listening in.\n\nI visited a representative of a magazine for western countries about the GDR and spent one memorable weekend sightseeing with her. Near the end of my visit, she asked me if I would work for them regularly by writing my opinion of "GDR Review" and its suitability for readers in the West. I would be paid in GDR money to use during further visits. After politely refusing this "offer" ("The police at home might not like it!"), I always had a sneaking suspicion that that was an attempt by the Stasi to recruit me.\n\nYears later I applied to see my "Stasi File". I will never forget the feeling deep inside me when I read in it: ".\x85.is not suitable for our use due to his apparent connection to the police in his homeland." The beautiful, friendly lady in Dresden had been a Stasi informer all the time! All of my visits to the GDR and the people I visited were listed in that file. For me "The Lives of Others" is an authentic representation of that totalitarian state. I am glad that those times have ended. \n\nCongratulations on a well deserved Oscar!', u'0.222528', u"After seeing the outstanding Pan's Labyrinth, I could not understand how anything could beat it to the Oscar for Best Film, let alone the accolade of Best Foreign Film. That was until I saw The Lives of Others.\n\nPutting it simply, this is the best film released in years. The framework of the story surrounds a Stasi officer who is assigned to monitor a writer and his actress girlfriend considered loyal to East German regime. That is all I am prepared to reveal because this film operates on so many levels that I wouldn't know where to begin. On the surface this can be enjoyed as a taut drama but essentially it is a study of the human condition and the capacity for compassion and humanity exists in even the most inhumane people. All of this is shot against the backdrop of the greys and browns of communist East Germany.\n\nAs a film it is virtually flawless. The three central performances are nothing short of electric, with particularly Ulrich Muhe giving one of the greatest leading man performances since Al Pacino in The Godfather. None of this would be possible without a brilliant script and exemplary direction, that brings the characters to life extracting the best out of the actors. The result is no words are wasted, and every scene is relevant and expertly conceived. This manages to explore deep issues without being turgid, is moving without being draining and remains gripping and entertaining without being superficial.\n\nIn summary, this is film-making at its finest. It is the sort of movie that you'll go down on bended knee and pay homage to the inventor of cinema, because it is films like this that cinema was created for. You'll forgive a year of tedious sequels and cash cows, for the one day that films like this get released.\n\n10 out of 10 is too modest.", u'0.604518', u'When I first heard about Florian Henckel von Donnersmarck\'s film "Das Leben der Anderen" and the issue it dealt with, I instantly tipped it to be one of the must-see films. As a great cinema-goer and a genuine admirer of the European cinematography, I was overwhelmed with a notion that a succession of thought-provoking German films would be continued with this moving insight into the lives of others at a very delicate period of the 80s in East Germany. After months of waiting, the Serbian audience was presented with "Das Leben der Anderen" during The Belgrade Film Festival and we related to it to the extent that whilst leaving the cinema many of us commented on how pleased we would be to see it win the Oscar. And it did, the very same night.\n\nWhat makes "Das Leben der Anderen" so brilliant to me is the choice of topic- an account of the years of dangerous living in East Germany, during which almost everyone was dubbed suspicious by the Stasi, until after careful and detailed examination the opposite was proved, the obsession with the non-existent enemies of the non-existent prosperity, the overall greyness of the atmosphere in East Berlin. And then, there is also the process that the character of Wiesler undergoes, unveiling the emptiness of his own existence, the process presented with the subtle pace that Donnersmarck dexterously set. The ending is one of the most powerful ones that I have ever seen, containing just the right words- It is for me- spoken by a man who for the first time in his life seems to be doing something for himself, a man who had no life of his own, who lived through other people\'s lives, but also- It is for me- the words spoken to denote that somebody out there (Dreyman) actually dedicated something (Die Sonate vom guten Menschen) to him.\n\nA gripping story of what happened somewhere in East Berlin to somebody else, not us, or maybe a reminder of what happened to many of us at some other place, at some other time, a reminder that came to life through the lives of others somewhere in Berlin.\n\nSo powerful, so beautifully crafted. A true gem.\n\n10/10', u'0.604859', u'"Who knows the secrets of the human heart?" Col in The Crying Game \n\nWhenI saw 2006\'s Oscar winning Departed, I was satisfied it could be the best picture of the year; then I saw Pan\'s Labyrinth and thought it imaginatively superior; then I saw Lives of Others, the Oscar choice for best foreign film, and I knew it was the globe\'s best film of the year, no argument.\n\nLives of Others is what all movie making should strive to be: interesting characters, thrilling plot, superb acting, and thematic weight. It\'s set in East Berlin, 1984, five years before the Wall\'s fall and Gorbachev\'s "glasnost" and still felling the tremors of Nazism, in this case the Stasi, a government agency similar to the SS. Capt. Gerd Wiesler (Ulrich Muehe), a Stasi teacher and coldly efficient information gatherer, surreptitiously watches playwright Georg Dreyman (Sebastian Koch) and his actress girlfriend Christa-Maria Sieland (Martina Gedeck) to get compromising details that would damn Dreyman and open the romantic way for the culture minister, Bruno Hempf (Thomas Thieme). Oddly for an artist, Dreyman is loyal to socialism, so it is through Sieland that the information must come.\n\nThe dramatic hub of this absorbing intrigue is the growing affection Wiesler gains for the actress and coincidentally the underground freedom movement, mostly as it is represented by artists and their friends. While his efficiency is amply evident in his cool detachment, similar to that of Rafe Fiennes in Schindler\'s List and Serg Lopez in Pan\'s Labyrinth, his humanity seeps out at the edges as he becomes vicariously involved in the artists\' lives. First-time director Florian Henckel von Donnersmarck misses not a beat in slowly revealing the hearts of all his principals while he creates a plot remarkably interesting for a character-driven piece.\n\nFew films could mine the rich conflict between the totalitarian state and artists who yearn for freedom of expression, between the loyalties of friends and lovers and the crushing exigency of survival. Lives of Others shows how difficult it is to watch others\' lives unfold and not be drawn to their passion. It\'s rough out there: No other film of 2006 showed that clich\xe9 better. Here\'s looking at you, best film of the year.', u'0.498273'], u'tt0043014': [u'Until 1950, American films were strictly entertainment, some deeper than others. Studio executives were very protective of image and star-making. In essence, everything seemed perfect. Billy Wilder, Charles Brackett, and D.M. Marshman, Jr. created a stunning work of art that splits the Hollywood sign in two and exposed a dream factory for what it really is: a struggle to both gain and keep notoriety in the limelight. "Norma Desmond" and "Joe Gillis" are at opposite ends of this warped Hollywood mindset, with Gillis, played by that most cynical of actors, William Holden trying to pay the rent and Norma (Gloria Swanson) living a lie as a silent queen whose star burned "10,000 midnights ago". How a picture with such a snide look at the industry could come out in 1950 is simply mind-boggling, considering some of the light fodder that came out of Hollywood at the time. It has inspired many modern day disciples such as Altman\'s THE PLAYER, and Sonnenfeld\'s GET SHORTY, both of which took their vicious, hilarious parodies to the jugular of the movie capital of the world. SUNSET BLVD is the father of all socially oriented pictures regarding the movies and is by far the best.\n\nThe images of this beautiful black and white powerhouse are fascinating and unforgettable: the dead writer floating in a pool, eyes wide open, looking right at us at the beginning; the eerie pipe organ that plays by the breeze in the middle of one of the most deep and dustiest sets ever; the funeral ceremony of the dead monkey in Norma\'s courtyard ("That must have been one important chimp. The grandson of King Kong perhaps." says Holden in a delightfully crisp and wise voice-over.) Holden pulls his car into a driveway off of the boulevard that will change his life forever. He is the emblem of the struggle to get notoriety. He has only a few B Movies to his credit. Swanson as Norma Desmond is the symbol of lost fame and has become the talk of legend. What is ironic about her character is that she may be playing herself in an odd way. She WAS an actual silent star whose career went down the tubes after the talkies came about. Her madness combined with Holden\'s last drop of naivet\xe9 combine to give us one of the most electrifying "give and take" between actors I\'ve ever witnessed.\n\nBoth lead parts were passed over by several actors. Holden was eventually forced into it as a contract player. How could you pass on such a script? Even "wax figures" (as Holden calls them) Buster Keaton, H.B. Warner, and Anna Q. Nilsson come to Norma\'s to play bridge, of course being Hollywood outcasts themselves, after the invention of sound in film. Some of the dialogue takes a swing at actual movies and people (GONE WITH THE WIND, Zanuck, Menjou). This must have brought the house down in Hollywood screening rooms throughout the town. Louis B. Mayer even condemned Billy Wilder for "ruining the industry". The film is sad and darkly humorous depicting the antics of Norma, who is quite insane, and Holden who is going along with what Norma is giving him, but has plans of his own. Another wax figure still alive and kicking in 1950 appears as himself in an important role. Cecil B. Demille, who once directed Norma/Gloria back in the silent heyday, tries to set her straight, telling her pictures have "changed". They had indeed, especially after this searing comment on celebrity status. I wonder if they knew what they were creating while making this gem.\n\nScenes are shot right on the lot of Paramount Studios (even the front gate), and Norma\'s mansion is an unforgettable piece of history and gloom with a floor that "Valentino once danced on." There is so much to discuss, but little to enlighten you on how great SUNSET BLVD is without you seeing it. Just two years later, films began to crop up with the same tainted view of Hollywood, most with varying degrees of deception. SINGIN\' IN THE RAIN, one of the all-time entertainments quietly had a nasty taste in its mouth regarding celebrity and the invention of sound movies. Watch these films closely and see the skeletons of the modern Hollywood bash films.\n\nRATING: 10 of 10', u'0.0374689', u'\nThis is such a great film on so many levels I can\'t really settle on where to begin.  It is so beautifully shot (in that stark black/white that only nitrate negative could achieve), has a witty, clever and extremely well-written script, features some of the best acting in film\'s history, acrobatically balances the main plot/subplots with expert precision, contains some of the best characters on celluloid, has many true-to-life parallels (Swanson\'s career/real life cameos/DeMille\'s involvement/etc) and is peppered with such great dialogue/narration that today\'s film writers should take note.  If that weren\'t enough, there\'s even a cameo by silent film great Buster Keaton (among others).\n\nOne of the most appealing aspects of this film is how, in the story, an aging, forgotten star is trying to recapture a bygone era (the silent film era).  What\'s interesting is that now, so many years later, we\'re looking back at her looking back.  To present day viewers, Gloria Swanson of the 1950\'s is a long forgotten lost gem and to experience her own longing for the 1920\'s is especially captivating (and a little chilling, I might add).  I don\'t think this film could have had that same effect when it debuted and maybe this added dimension holds so much more appeal for today\'s audiences.  We all know that nothing lasts forever, but we don\'t often consider the abandoned participants; much like the veterans of a past war.\n\nIn response to the famous Swanson line (while watching one of her silent films): "...we didn\'t need dialogue; we had faces", I\'d like to also add that they "didn\'t need movies; they had films."\n\nThey truly don\'t make them like this anymore. 10/10', u'0.0356263', u"\nI have yet to see a Billy Wilder film that I haven't loved, and Sunset Boulevard is definitely one of those films.  It's interesting to watch the film during different times in one's life \x96 when I was a child watching this film, I thought the story was good and that Norma Desmond (Swanson) was a pretty scary lady.  In my teens/college years, I appreciated it as a certified classic and for its commentary on Hollywood.  Now, in my late 20's and early 30's I found it to have a different impact on me \x96 I was saddened by Desmond's mental illness, and when she makes her final descent down her staircase and utters her famous line as the camera pans the faces of the people around her, so full of pity, and the care her butler/ex-husband takes to make sure she's happy for maybe the last time in her life made more of an impact on me than any other time in the 20-odd times I've seen this film.  There are only a small handful of central characters in Sunset Boulevard and they are so richly written that this film will remain timeless.  There are not a lot of `dated' themes in this film \x96 the circle of life that is Hollywood isn't going to be much more evolved in 2050 than it was in 1950.  If you haven't seen this film, watch it because there is something for just about anyone in this film.\n\n--Shelly\n", u'0.328336', u"\nUsually, Cinema is considered as the most delicate form of art because it has the biggest potential to become 'dated' one day. Once a movie thought as 'mind-blowing' can easily become a 'turkey' a decade later.\n\nThis is not the case here. Sunset Boulevard still remains as one of the most eerie film in the cinema history and still a realistic depiction because of its reflection of Hollywood. It can give you the idea of the dream land's transformation into a nightmare.\n\nThe film is about a troubled script writer 'Joe Gillis and a forgotten silent film star Norma Desmond's weird relationship and the madness that surrounds them and the people around them. Don't wanna give much of the plot, on account the fact that it is a pure gem that should be invented without knowing nothing. But I can talk about the cinematic aspects of this movie.\n\nThis movie has some very eerie moments because of using a great cinematography. The moments of burying the dead monkey and watching the old film of Norma Desmond are exquisitely presented. The movie has some one of the most innovative scripts of cinema and that is certainly justified by the unforgetable and memorable lines captured from the film. The directing is top-notch but who are we kidding it is Billy 'the great' Wilder. The end of the movie is one of the most chilling part of the movie and it can truly give you some nightmares about insanity. The narration of the movie by the head character was probably done by this movie at the first place and this influenced so many movies afterwards.\n\nOne of the reasons that this movie is still not dated is because of its courage. The Hayes code was at its peak at the beginning of fifties which manipulates the producers to limit their bad thoughts on one subject, especially on Hollywood. The movie got 11 oscar nomination but only got 3 of them. Apparently, the reason was its harsh criticism on Hollywood.\n\nThere are some arguements about Sunset Boulevard's genre. It is considered as the greatest film-noir of all time. I don't think it is a film-noir at all. For some aspects, the movie has some noirish elements such as the black and white German-expressionist cinematography and an 'on the edge of insanity', femme-fatale but these two are not enough to make a film-noir. I\nthink this is a psyhcological drama with some horror(the end is horrifying for me) and with some very very dark comedy.\n\nOverall, This is truly a classic and one of the best movies of cinema history that will never lose its effects on cinema. Heavily influences American Beauty and Mulholland Drive, also making those movies a must see. 10/10\n", u'0.18333', u'Although this movie was made 8 years before I was, I saw it for the first time yesterday and I was blown away! I have spent my life missing what has just become one of my favorite movies of all time.\n\nThe acting was superb, the storyline riveting and the characters were people you could care about. Max was my personal favorite. There was a quiet, tragic dignity to him. I expected something to be revealed about him but was not prepared for the truth.\n\nI\'ve always liked William Holden but my experience with Gloria Swanson was limited to her brief role in "Airport 75". I will now look for more movies by her. What an expressive face.\n\nIt was fun to try to recognize some of the old time actors that were portraying themselves. \n\nAn all around excellent movie. One I truly regret having waited this long to see. But it is definitely a case of better late than never.', u'0.274545', u'The plot has been discussed at length in other comments.\n\nTo me SUNSET BOULEVARD has it all. The comedy is sly, the drama is of epic proportions because it\'s not JUST a story about Hollywood or an aging actress. It\'s really about the giving up of dreams.\n\nNorma\'s dream of return, held to for 20 years, is ironic because Norma so closely parallels Gloria. That Norma cannot make a comeback in 1950 even with connections to DeMille is sad. The sadness is due to Norma\'s refusal to accept her aging or the politics of Hollywood that worship youth. It\'s ironic that Norma has no place in Hollywood (the parade has passed by) but DeMille is still working and in the scenes from Samson and Delilah we spot other old-timers like Henry Wilcoxon and Julia Faye--still working but not as STARS. The final irony here is that Gloria did make the comeback that Norma couldn\'t make.\n\nNorma has a thing about STARS.... she says at one point... "the stars are ageless." Well this is true in a filmic sense. I can still watch Gloria Swanson in THE LOVE OF SUNYA or MANHANDLED and yup, she is ageless. She is still twenty something. That screen image is forever held up like a bad mirror to the reality of being 50. On another occasion Norma says "nobody leaves a STAR, that\'s what makes one a STAR." True again, but it\'s not just Gillis who is leaving Norma, her fans have already left. Hence if one is left, one cannot be a STAR.\n\nGillis also gives up his dream (temporarily) of being a writer, Max gives up his dream of directing, and even Betty gives up her dream of love with Gillis. Scary stuff.\n\nThe film is also about LOVE. Look what these people have done for love: love of another person or love of fame or whatever. Max loves Norma. Norma loves Gillis. Gillis loves Norma and Betty. Betty loves Gillis and Artie. Artie loves Betty. And all of them love Hollywood.\n\nEveryone is crushed at the end of this film..... The scene of Max "directing" the scene as Norma descends the staircase is one of the all-time great scenes in a film. Norma\'s final speech, which sums up everything ("there is nothing else"), is devastating. Can she really be insane and make this lucid speech? If she\'s NOT insane then she has knowingly killed Gillis to prevent his leaving her (a STAR)....... Also the shots of Max blinking away tears as Norma descends (supposedly into madness) and also of Hedda Hopper crying are equally as devastating as Norma\'s speech about "being back" and "all those wonderful people out there in the dark" (which of course includes us every time we watch the film).\n\nI cannot think of any other film (possibly CITIZEN KANE) that works on so many different levels. And Gloria Swanson gives the greatest performance in film history!', u'0.216152', u'Every time I go to L.A., which isn\'t too often, I look at these palm-bemused, once smart stucco facades, and wonder if a Norma Desmond from a later era might be hiding from the world inside them, buttressed by cable TV (AMC or TCM, no doubt), a poodle named FiFi or Sir Francis, walk-in closets full of leopard-print Capri pants that haven\'t fit in decades, and a world class liquor cabinet that has seen heads of state under the table on a good night. It is because of Sunset Blvd., for certain, that my mind could ever go there. It is one of the most indelible films you will ever see.\n\nThis film is great for many reasons, not the least of which is because it is Hollywood\'s first look back at itself. In the milieu of this film, the silent era is only 22 years behind us. The people left behind by the rush to sound can still palpably TASTE the fame, the accolade, that particular past being not so very dim and distant. The sadness of their lives was real, and at that point in history, all around, if hidden. Way more has been made of the supposed "savagery" of this film vis a vis the faded star than I think exists now, or ever did. The often cynical Wilder is deeply in touch with the tragic here, as much as the grotesque.', u'-0.0506314', u'Hack screenwriter Joe Gillis (William Holden) accidentally falls in with faded screen legend Norma Desmond (Gloria Swanson). She lives in a crumbling old mansion with her butler Max (Erich von Stroheim). She refuses to believe that she\'s no longer remembered and will never make another movie. She gets Gillis to stay with her and rewrite "Salome" which she thinks will be her comeback. Gillis has no other choice and things slowly get out of hand.\n\nA VERY cynical view of Hollywood--especially for 1950. It shows what Hollywood does to people like Norma--it makes them stars, tells them that they\'re great and dump them coldly when they\'re no longer needed. It also takes swipes at directors, agents, screenwriters, even entire studios! It has a tight quick script, is appropriately filmed in gloomy black and white and is masterfully directed by Billy Wilder. Everybody thought this was a bad idea when it was being made. It was believed to be too cold and vicious for the public. Also Holden was warned it would ruin his career by playing a younger man kept by an older woman. But it turned out great and is now rightfully considered a classic.\n\nThe acting is almost all good. I never thought Nancy Olson was that good. Her character is too pure and sweet to be believable. Everybody else is right on target though. Holden is just great in his role. You see the pity, anger and helplessness on his face when he realizes Norma is falling in love with him--and he\'s trapped. von Stroheim was equally good as Max who encourages Norma\'s delusions. Swanson however is just magnificent! She has a very showy role and could have overplayed it--but she doesn\'t. She\'s mad for sure--but you only see it peeking through every once in a while. When she loses it completely at the end it\'s frightening. If she had played it like that all through the movie it never would have worked. How she lost the Oscar that year to Judy Holliday for "Born Yesterday" is beyond me. This is a must see and a true Hollywood classic but VERY cold and cynical. A 10 all the way.\n\n"I am big--it\'s the pictures that got small". "All right Mr. deMille--I\'m ready for my closeup".', u'0.0205727', u'\nThis movie deserves all the accolades it has gotten here, as well as "Maltin\'s" four stars. It certainly ranks up there as one of Hollywood\'s greatest achievements. Seeing it again only reinforces my opinion that William Holden was one of the truly great actors of the last [!] century. Gloria Swanson, however, steals every scene she\'s in; you can\'t turn away from watching her, even though she makes you really uncomfortable - it\'s like watching a train wreck. I don\'t know if the black & white was an economic or an artistic choice, but the film would never have been as effective in color. The opening shot - the floating, dead body of Joe Gillis, eyes wide open, shot looking up from the bottom of the pool - is one of the great shots, and an unforgettable opener, matched perfectly by the unforgettable closing closeup of Norma Desmond. To have Cecil B. deMille actually play himself was an inspired touch. Throw in Eric von Stroheim and you have an unbeatable combination. Truly one the all-time must-see films, although I don\'t know how to classify it - film noir? black comedy? Hollywood fable ? horror story? psychodrama? Who cares; just see it.', u'0.444656', u'In Hollywood of the 50\'s, the obscure screenplay writer Joe Gillis (William Holden) is not able to sell his work to the studios, is full of debts and is thinking in returning to his hometown to work in an office. While trying to escape from his creditors, he has a flat tire and parks his car in a decadent mansion in Sunset Boulevard. He meets the owner and former silent-movie star Norma Desmond (Gloria Swanson), who lives alone wit her butler and driver Max von Mayerling (Erich von Stroheim). Norma is demented and believes she will return to the cinema industry, and is protected and isolated from the world by Max, who was his director and husband in the past and still loves her. Norma proposes Joe to move to the mansion and help her in writing a screenplay for her comeback to the cinema, and the small-time writer becomes her lover and gigolo. When Joe falls in love for the young aspirant writer Betty Schaefer (Nancy Olson), Norma becomes jealous and completely insane and her madness leads to a tragic end.\n\n"Sunset Boulevard" is a bitter and tragic masterpiece of the genius Billy Wilder that exposes how Hollywood uses people and forgets them when they get old and are considered decadent by the industry. Further, it also shows the consequences of the lack of adaptation of a former star to the end of a successful career, being forgotten by fans and the industry, and the price that some persons accept to pay to join this business. The last time I saw this film was on 22 September 2002 and even having watched "Sunset Boulevard" for maybe five or six times, I still get excited with most of the scenes and I dare to say that it is in my Top 10 movies ever. The DVD has an interesting documentary called "Sunset Blvd.: A Look Back" (a.k.a. "The Making of Sunset Boulevard" with the presence of a still impressively beautiful Nancy Olson telling peculiarities about this awesome feature. My vote is ten.\n\nTitle (Brazil): "Crep\xfasculo dos Deuses" ("Dusk of the Gods")', u'0.152474', u'I just watched SB again -- three times -- this past week, for perhaps the 100th time.\n\nThe film is virtually flawless, IMHO. (Except for the distracting shadow of the camera on William Holden\'s back as he moves to Norma\'s bed to wish her, "Happy New Year, Norma . . . ," a technical flaw I\'ve never understood: why wasn\'t the move re-lit and re-shot, since everything else in the film is perfect?) But what continues to haunt me is Swanson\'s performance. Her silent-screen "theatricality" is always remarked upon. Yet there are several moments of utterly contemporary "naturalism" that show she knew exactly what she was doing as an actress (and Wilder, as director).\n\nHer sweetness in her "bathing beauty" scene, where she recounts her days in the line with Marie Prevost and Mabel Normand, then leaps onto the sofa beside William Holden -- is so beguiling that you completely understand her sex appeal and warmth (for a moment). When she asks for his match (for a moustache for her Chaplin impression) and tells Holden to close his eyes, "Close \'em!" -- the "Close \'em!" is clearly an ad lib that is so real and intimate that it is almost instantly lost in the macabre sequence that follows -- all flashing eyes and volcanic eruption that C.B. DeMille himself hasn\'t phoned her.\n\nSoon afterward, believing she will be making "Salome" for DeMille, there is the astonishing montage of Norma\'s marathon beauty treatments in preparation for her "return." Extreme closeups of Swanson\'s face, without makeup, reveal a still-youthful, lovely woman with flawless skin. Even under the magnifying glass, even with the "worried" expression of Norma Desmond, Swanson is stunningly beautiful for a few moments. Ironically, for the rest of the picture, she had to be made up to look older. Yet here we get a glimpse of the real Swanson at 50-whatever, and she looks merely a few years older than Holden.\n\nFinally, the entire sequence when Holden returns to find Swanson phoning Betty Shaefer to tell her the truth about Joe Gillis, Swanson is in cold-cream and "wings" to smooth her cheeks and eyes -- an actress completely exposed and without vanity.\n\nShe plays the entire sequence "naturalistically" and in complete contrast to her theatrical, "I AM big. It\'s the pictures that got small," style.\n\nHere, in her bed, caught by Holden, realizing she\'s going to lose him, she begs him, "Look at me!" The desperation and helplessness, the momentary admission of reality as Norma acknowledges her fears and insecurities and pleads with Holden, are heartbreaking. Swanson\'s playing in the scene is astonishingly courageous for any actress, and deeply true to the character.\n\nFinally, as Joe packs to leave her and Swanson pleads with him to stay -- grabbing his luggage and begging, "What do you want? Money?" -- again her playing is ratcheting up emotionally into madness, yet is still as contemporary as any Stanislavski method.\n\nEveryone tends to remember Swanson\'s over-the-top stylized performance: yet her total control as an actress, and her naturalistic moments and emotional nakedness, however fleeting, are something to behold.\n\nSwanson\'s is truly one of the most astonishing performances on film. Her range here is jaw-dropping.\n\nWatch her transitions in the Chaplin scene alone, in one continuous take, from heart-rending comedy to blind rage. No cutaways. Amazing.\n\nI happened to see Swanson live at the Huntington Hartford Theatre in Hollywood, on Vine, in the late sixties, in a stage show written especially for her, called "Reprise." This piece-of-fluff comedy about a famous movie star returning to her home town was hardly Tony-Award winning. But from her first entrance, you were in the presence of a great actress.\n\nBarely five feet tall, she swept in and immediately established a bodily "line" that commanded attention from then on.\n\nHer performance was delightful. Even more so when, after intermission, the second act began with her character giving a Q&A session at the local Rotary Club.\n\nSwanson walked down steps and into the actual audience, greeting "old friends" (that night\'s audience members), reminiscing about her career -- even sitting in a man\'s lap and "teasing" him for not remembering when they "dated" -- as real film clips from her silents played on a giant screen onstage.\n\nShe was outrageous and girlish (she was approaching 70 at the time) and delightful, poking fun at herself and her "character\'s" career.\n\nIt was a brilliant bit of stagecraft and an impressive revelation of the "real" Gloria Swanson.\n\nAudiences were captivated and irresistibly charmed by this still-stunning-looking yet down-to-earth "young fellow" -- over fifty years after she first took the world by storm.\n\nSwanson was the antithesis of Norma Desmond. She was entrancing, magical, adorable, and everybody wanted to take her home.\n\nHonestly, perhaps the only other two live theatrical performances I\'ve ever seen (and I\'ve seen hundreds) that could compare to Swanson\'s sheer talent and charisma were Maggie Smith in "Lettuce and Loveage" and Vanessa Redgrave in "Orpheus Descending." Believe it.\n\nNot every actor understands the difference between film and stage performance, nor can every actor deliver that difference vocally and physically (this was WAY before the days of amplified body mikes). Swanson did.\n\nI was in first grade when "Sunset Boulevard" was released. I was in my 20s when I saw Swanson onstage in "Reprise" in Hollywood.\n\nYou could still see the magic that had made her the global phenomenon she had been in silents. You could still see the technique that astounded audiences with "Sunset Boulevard" three decades later.\n\nYou could understand where Billy Wilder got his line: "She was the greatest star of them all." Every time I watch SB, I think: "She probably damned well was."', u'0.388071', u'Although at that time she hadn\'t appeared in a film for several years and wasn\'t to make one for several for several more, Gloria Swanson remained a presence in the Hollywood of the thirties, the only legendary silent star to sustain an image and continue to interest the film studios, which put her under contract and announced her to star in a series of projects\x97none of which were realized\x85 While she wasn\'t to regain her former eminence until her celebrated comeback as Norma Desmond in Billy Wilder\'s "Sunset Boulevard," a scathing satire on Hollywood and the self-delusions of its former heroes, she maintained her silent-screen image as the personification of glamor, and as such wasn\'t the initial choice for the role of the faded silent star\x85 \n\nLike many small people who achieve greatness, Swanson was a powerhouse of energy, vitality, ambition and shrewdness, untroubled by insight humor to slow down her pace\x85 \n\nThe key to her success, the charm of her personality, the glamor of her career and the secret of her survival was superbly captured by herself in one of the best autobiographies, Swanson on Swanson\x85', u'0.95543', u'"Sunset Boulevard," Billy Wilder\'s barbed take on the Hollywood studio system during its heyday is by turns volatile, funny, suspenseful, and--at its core--more than a little creepy. By today\'s standards, this 1950 film still takes some relevant shots at an industry that seldom acknowledges its superficiality, but is also just as dated in other regards. Wilder takes a truly original concept, bending Film Noir, satire, comedy, and pathos in the telling of Joe Gillis (William Holden), a down-on-his-luck screenwriter (the repo men are threatening to take his car, for Pete\'s sake!), who winds up all but imprisoned in the lonely, secluded mansion of Norma Desmond (Gloria Swanson), a washed-up silent-film starlet harboring delusions of a comeback. When drafted to revise Desmond\'s self-scripted version of "Salome," Joe becomes very aware of his unhinged provider, and quickly begins a collaboration with the young, rhinoplasty-friendly Betty Schaefer (Nancy Olson). While Holden and Olson are--in the midst of this send-up--fresh-faced stars, "Sunset Boulevard"\'s axis of madness hinges squarely on Swanson\'s full-bore performance, a blend of incestuous sexuality and mid-life crisis (she makes Baby Jane seem warm and cuddly by comparison) that makes her advances on Holden genuinely unappealing. The performance is a bit more tricky than one might give credit--as a woman whose fame has declined, her sustained hunger for it fuels her delusion, therefore rendering Norma Desmond an actress who literally acts out her everyday reality, to the point where any semblance of humanity is absent (her actions and words possess the overt dramatics of a woman seeking the Best Actress Oscar). While the film is beautifully photographed and performed, the sheer ambition of the project is something of a flaw--with so many genres represented, "Sunset Boulevard" is problematic in synthesizing a coherent vision. But what is here is quite influential, and certainly worth a look.', u'-0.0440006', u"\nWidely heralded as a classic upon its initial release, the Billy Wilder-Charles Brackett production, Sunset Boulevard, is a superb piece of work in nearly all departments; and yet at some levels it disappoints upon repeated viewings. This is not an easy movie to love. The people in it are unsympathetic, as the leading male character is a hack screenwriter turned gigolo; and the woman he lives with is a mad former silent movie star who pins all her hopes on this third-rate writer's ability to write her 'comeback' picture. Neither is an amiable sort, but he is at least sane; and though he has an understanding of decency, he never quite achieves it. His goal is success. That he decieves two women who care for him deeply bothers him from time to time, when it is an inconvenience, but doesn't otherwise seem to bedevil him or prey on his thoughts. \n\nAs a cynical picture of postwar Hollywood the movie is flawless. It captures the moment when the the studio system was at its absolute peak as well as at the start of its decline. The secondary characters are more likeable than the major ones, notably Erich von Stroheim's butler. Yet the film is not a satisfying portrait of mental illness, as the insane Norma Desmond, while superficially credible, has no inner life, or even a hint of one, as her demons appear to come more from her neglect by others than anything to do with herself. Her gigolo, Joe Gillis, is believable as a hustler but seems, in his narration and occasional asides, to be brighter and wittier than his behavior suggests. The characters, in other words, go through their motions, as the plot dictates; and while they are very interesting in what they do or fail at, they seem to have no life outside of the story. This is a movie about Hollywood rather than people; an immoral 'moral tale', it sometimes leaves a bad taste.\n\nFor all its flaws, though, the movie works like a charm even when it is not itself charming. As Norma Desmond, Gloria Swanson is magnificent, larger than life, and every inch the former silent movie queen she plays in the picture. Her final scene is priceless, and the best shot in the movie. William Holden made a new career for himself thanks to Sunset Boulevard. For over a decade he had been playing rather bland, boy next door types, and his work here was a revelation. Joe Gillis was his best performance thus far, and made Holden overnight a hot property, and shortly thereafter the biggest male star in the business. His dry, almost affectless Midwestern delivery of dialogue and, especially, narration; his mixture of good manners and ambivilant morals; and his ability to command the screen with a flicker of expression, put him immediately into the major leagues. Sunset Boulevard does not in the end tell us more about Hollywood than the Selznick-Wellman A Star Is Born, but it does its job better, with pungent dialogue, brilliant acting and a sense of style rare in movies of the time and unheard of today.\n", u'0.0378278', u'On my first viewing, I wasn\'t particularly impressed with this movie but I liked it a lot more on the second and by the third - when it\'s magnificently transferred on DVD - I was fan, too. This is a good visual film, particularly when it shows the inside of this incredible mansion where a lot of the scenes take place.\n\nTo those who have never seen it, you are warned that it is not an easy film to view, it being a portrait of a pathetic has-been silent movie star who still thinks she can come back after a long hiatus and be a star again. \n\nGloria Swanson, who plays the role, overacts and certainly is not appealing, even bordering on grotesque at times, but she isn\'t supposed to look good. That\'s one of the points of the story. Anyway, a young William Holden, in his first starring role, is okay and also provides the narration.\n\nThe most interesting figure in the film to me was the ex-husband-now butler, played by Eric von Stroheim. He\'s amazing in this film. In supporting roles, I also enjoyed the wholesome Nancy Olsen and the young Jack Webb of "Dragnet" fame.\n\nThis combination of drama-soap opera-film noir is one of the professional critics all-time favorite films. Odd how they love movies and Hollywood stars so much, yet relish films that tear them down, as this does.', u'0.357535'], u'tt0086190': [u"I noticed that A NEW HOPE and THE EMPIRE STRIKES BACK are in the TOP 10, but that this one isn't even in the TOP 100.\n\nThis movie has a bad reputation because of Ewoks, but there are so many reasons to love this movie:\n\n-The Rescue of Han Solo from Jabba: This official wraps up the Han Solo in debt sub-plot that was established when we first met the character in A NEW HOPE.\n\n-The Emperor was Finally Revealled: Well alright this might not work as well now that the prequels are out but this was the first time we saw The Emperor as kids.\n\n-The Speeder Bike Chase: Alright, so this was a special effects moment. But it was definitely one of the most memorable and exciting moments in all the films!\n\n-The 3 Part Climax: 1) The Battle of Endor (Led by Han and Leia) 2) Luke Confronts his Father & The Fall of the Emperor 3) The Destruction of the Second Death Star (Lando's Moment)\n\n-The Final Celebration with Our Heroes: Like I said, this movie gets a lot of crap because of the Ewoks but I think it's kind of cool that while the entire galaxy celebrates the FALL OF THE EMPIRE, our heroes are having their own private party in the woods with each other.\n\nAll in all this was a great final chapter for our heroes and a fitting end to the STAR WARS story.", u'0.494447', u'A long time ago, in a galaxy far, far away.....There was a boy who was only two years old when the original "Star Wars" film was released. He doesn\'t remember first seeing the movie, but he also doesn\'t remember life before it. He does remember the first "Star Wars" themed gift he got...a shoebox full of action figures from the original set. He was too young to fully appreciate how special that gift would be. But years later, he would get what to this day goes down as one of the best gifts he\'s ever received: another box full of action figures, ten of the final twelve he needed to complete his collection. It\'s now legendary in this boy\'s family how the last action figure he needed, Anakin Skywalker, stopped being produced and carried in stores, and how this boy went for about ten years (until he got into college) trying to track one down and finally bought it from someone on his dorm floor for a bag of beer nuggets (don\'t ask...it\'s a Northern Illinois University thing).\n\nI can\'t review "Star Wars" as a movie. It represents absolutely everything good, fun and magical about my childhood. There\'s no separating it in my mind from Christmases, birthdays, summers and winters growing up. In the winter, my friends and I would build snow forts and pretend we were on Hoth (I was always Han Solo). My friends\' dad built them a kick-ass tree house, and that served as the Ewok village. They also had a huge pine tree whose bottom branches were high enough to create a sort of cave underneath it, and this made a great spot to pretend we were in Yoda\'s home. I am unabashedly dorky when it comes to "Star Wars" and I think people either just understand that or they don\'t. I don\'t get the appeal of "Lord of the Rings" or "Star Trek" but I understand the rabid flocks of fans that follow them because I am a rabid fan of George Lucas\'s films.\n\nI feel no need to defend my opinion of these movies as some of the greatest of all time. Every time I put them in the DVD player, I feel like I\'m eight years old again, when life was simple and the biggest problem I had was figuring out how I was going to track down a figure of Anakin Skywalker.\n\nGrade (for the entire trilogy): A+', u'0.0684126', u'\nI\'m sick of people whining about Ewoks!  True, they\'re not the best thing that ever happened to Star Wars, but they DID happen, so deal with it! Besides, they ARE cute, and I don\'t care if they\'re marketable.  Yubb Nubb!\n\nThis movie always leaves me in tears.  It\'s perfect.  The end could not be better.  I\'m excited for The Phantom Menace because it will suddenly throw the focus of the whole story from Luke to Anakin.  I love how he is revealed at the end - it would be too unresolved any other way.  So those of you who are complaining that Vader\'s helmet was removed, take a moment to think about it.  It\'s very effective.  Vader, the man who hid behind a mask for 20 years, is finally revealed as a sick-looking man.  He is not entirely machine - he\'s vulnerable.\n\nI don\'t know how the casting director happened to pick such good actors in A\nNew Hope.  They all do so well.  They are believable characters.  Hamill does an excellent job with his dramatic character development.  Fisher does a fine job being a female role model (I mean, come on!  She killed Jabba even when so many others had failed!).  Harrison Ford - need I say more?\n\nThe music is once again brilliant.  It\'s so very touching and significant when you can pick out character themes at different parts of the movie. The best climax is when Luke shouts "NOOO!" and jumps out to fight his father in the Final Battle.  John Williams is nothing short of a genius!  What an amazing man!\n\nAlready, the movie has so much more meaning for me because of Episode I. I\ncan\'t wait to finally see it in the theatres (CAN I WAIT???) and then watch the original trilogy yet again.\n\nBravo!', u'0.0753629', u'\nPerspective is a good thing.  Since the release of "Star Wars Episode I: The Phantom Menace", claims and counter-claims of just how Episode\'s II and III will eventuate has taken the spotlight off the \'original\' Star Wars films, making them part of a cohesive whole, rather than segregating the older and new films into separate trilogies.  What the new films have done is allow fresh perspectives to be placed on the older films.  This new outlook allows us to greater appreciate what has often been viewed as the weakest of the original trilogy: "Return of the Jedi".  Often derided for its overly \'cute\' factor, ROTJ is in a sense as strong as the original and only slightly less impressive than the nearly perfect "The Empire Strikes Back".  Indeed the \'cute\' element of ROTJ, namely the Ewoks, remains a weak link in the entire series.  Did George Lucas place the furry midgets in the film purely for the merchandising possibilities?  Only he can answer that question.\n\nThis cute factor aside, the film is a brilliant full circle AND evolution of the saga.  Following on from the conclusion of "The Empire Strikes Back", Luke Skywalker (Mark Hamill) follows his Rebel Alliance friends to Tatooine, his home planet, to rescue Han Solo (Harrison Ford), the space pirate turned Rebel hero who was captured by Jabba the Hutt for overdue debts.\n\n\nSkywalker is a changed man since leaving Tatooine with Ben \'Obi Wan\' Kenobi (Alec Guiness) to fight the evil Empire.  Now swathed all in black, Luke\'s discovery of his origins have left him confused and torn.  His psychological make up is not as strong as his outward appearance would suggest.  While he might aim to always assist his Rebel friends, he yearns for another chance to confront the evil Darth Vader again, despite his unassuredness as to whether he will destroy him or eventually turn to the Dark Side and join Vader at the Emperor\'s side.\n\nEarly scenes in Tatooine are impressive, from Jabba\'s lair, to his floating palace and the \'almighty Sarlac\' - an intenstine that lives in the sand. Lucas\' CGI enhancements to the film in 1997 actually worsened the overall effect of the Sarlac, making it look fake and overdone.\n\n\nThe battle scene on Tatooine is outstanding, and is one of the more memorable of the saga.  Luke almost singlehandedly anihiliates Jabba and his cronies, proving his prowess as a Jedi is now almost complete.\n\nWhen Luke returns to the Degobah system to visit the ailing Yoda one more time, the viewer is let down by Yoda\'s distinct lack of screentime. Undoubtably the star of "The Empire Strikes Back", Yoda is all but erased from the story as the progression of Luke\'s destiny is played out on screen.\n\n\nROTJ really is Luke\'s film, perhaps even more so than the original.  His journey carries the movie as he moves closer to his confrontation with Darth Vader and his fate.  The other Rebel characters certainly work in his shadow.  The romance between Leia (Carrie Fisher) and Solo is all but non-existant, unlike in "Empire".  In fact only Leia\'s character is developed in ROTJ, Solo\'s character seems to fade as the facets of his personality have become too familiar in the first two films.\n\nTheir roles are consigned to working alongside the Rebels to destroy an all new Death Star that nears completion.  This time the Emperor himself is overseeing the final stages of construction.  The Empire intends to crush the Rebellion once and for all, while the Emperor himself schemes to bring the now powerful Skywalker to his side to work alongside (or is that replace?) Darth Vader.  The Emperor is a different kind of evil for this film, less cunning than Governor Tarkin (Peter Cushing) from "Star Wars", more deeply psychologically dark than anything else.  Played brilliantly by Ian McDiarmid, the Emperor is just one of those characters you love to hate.\n\nAll the other actors are well entrenched in their roles.  Hamill surprises as the more wisened Luke, making his character\'s progression from whiny teenager, impatient student to enlightened warrior one of the few real character developments of the series.  Ford\'s role is waring thin, as all his charm and charisma was spent in the first two films -- he was the REAL star of the first film after all.  Fisher\'s Leia is more of a prop, at least unti the end of the film where she learns things about herself that she was never sure about...  Add in favourites like Alec Guiness as Kenobi, Yoda and the loveable Chewbacca, C-3PO and R2D2 and the series resembles a family more than a cast.\n\nDespite the film\'s corny forest battle involving the Ewoks and the Empire, it ends well and includes a three way battle sequence: on Endor, in space and on the Death Star, each with very impressive special effects.  The music, as always, is brilliant and captures the mood perfectly in every instance.  Just as the \'Blue Danube\' worked perfectly for "2001: A Space Odyssey", John Williams\' score is as much a part of "Star Wars" folklore as light sabers and the Force.\n\nLucas left the ending open to interpretation, meaning there could have been more episodes made.  Indeed sci-fi fans have created their own versions of Episodes VII, VIII and IX in their heads over and over again.  ROTJ works when given a chance, and furry cute animals aside is a good finish to the series.\n\nWhen all six episodes get to be viewed together, this saga could well be the best ever made.  Is it already?  The addition of Episode I changed the landscape of the series.  This is why "Return of the Jedi" can now be viewed in a different light and be given a whole new appreciation nearly 20 years after its release.', u'-0.121577', u"\nMy five children were growing up but all still at home when 'Return of the Jedi' came to the theater. While there had been other Sci-Fi movies with a theme of conflict in outer space, the 'Star Wars' trilogy filled our imaginations like no other movies before them. The fantastic, strange worlds were presented almost like we were there too. Aliens sitting around a tavern, enjoying drinks and speaking in all sorts of languages. Nothing before had approached the sheer size of the space ships depicted here, huge cities traveling all over the galaxy. And how about the jump to hyper speed, then disappearing from the screen as the speed exceeds light speed! And the light sabres of the Jedi Knights. The Jedi Knights, a striking parallel to the Japanese Samurai.\n\nAfter the fantastic 'Star Wars' and 'Empire Strikes Back' (now called parts IV and V on DVD), the last episode 'Return of the Jedi' was bound to be somewhat of a let down, but not much of one. It was made to achieve resolution. Of the rebels' battle with the evil Empire. The relationship between Darth Vader, Luke Skywalker, and the Princess, and her relationship with Han Solo. We witness Luke's Jedi training at the hands of Yoda, as Luke becomes the Last Samurai, I mean Jedi. The DVDs finally came out last month, and they are near perfect, as we should expect from Lucas Films and THX. The bit rate is high, and the picture is nothing short of superb. As is the Dolby EX surround track. \n\nMy wife and I watched all three of the movies on DVD this week -- Star Wars, Empire Strikes Back, and Return of the Jedi (now on DVD called parts IV, V, and VI) -- compliments of our local public library. It was an appropriate reminder how good these movies are, and still ahead of their time. Nothing else has been made to compare to them.\n", u'0.057961', u'\nAfter "Star Wars: A New Hope" redefined science fiction, and "The Empire Strikes Back" redefined "Star Wars", it\'s hard to believe that the third and final film of this trilogy can manage to be as good as the other two, but this one really does a nice job.  The first part of the film resolves the cliffhanger left by the previous one, with an elaborate escape plan that is in keeping with the incredible suspense and action of the first two films. Then the film moves back to the rebel alliance and what\'s going on in the war.  There is a lot of action in the scenes building up to the rebellion\'s final confrontation with the Emperor.  When the battle begins, the audience is already on the edge of their seats from everything leading up to it, and this final battle is even more intense than those from the other films. This climax is definitely more dense with action than any other part of the trilogy, with the most at stake for the rebellion.  This is continually changing between a ground battle between the rebel strike crew on land (including Han Solo, Chewbacca, and Leia), the battle raging on in space (including Lando), and a confrontation between Luke and the Emperor on the new Death Star, which leads up to another duel with Darth Vader.  It is really intense since the rebels constantly seem to be losing the battle that will determine the outcome of the war, and there seems to be no escape. Although I think the idea of Ewoks overpowering stormtroopers is a bit far-fetched, it didn\'t seem very unrealistic since they were more of a distraction that the rebels could use, rather than an actual threat to the stormtroopers, although they did have some luck fighting them.  There is also a twist or two at the end that nobody saw coming, which may not be quite as stunning as that of "The Empire Strikes Back", but still complete a very spectacular trilogy very well.  With the light tone of "A New Hope" and the more sinnister tone of "The Empire Strikes Back", this film really completes them by combining the two in this grand finale.  The Special Edition for "Return of the Jedi" concentrated on what would have been nice to change, since not much of the original really needed it.  Fifteen years of technology advancements didn\'t seem to make up for fifteen years of deterioration as far as the rancor scene is concerned, and there still is the occasional disappearing TIE fighter, but other than that it was good. The gaping non-threatening Sarlaac\'s mouth was given moving tentacles and a huge fly-trap looking head that emerged, which definitely added to the suspense.  Also, the disco was taken out of Jabba\'s palace, and the lame ending of the original was replaced by a huge victory celebration spanning the entire galaxy, instead of just a small Ewok village, which was the case of the original and that didn\'t really end a story this big the way it deserved.  It\'s hard to say which of the three films was the best, but since it\'s all part of the same story, the over-all trilogy is like one big, outstanding film.  A THIRD must-see for film fans.', u'0.0833689', u'Up until the sixth and last episode of the Star Wars saga, which finally ended in 2005, I had always looked at this 1983 entry as my favorite film of the long-running series. The varied action scenes and really different characters (Jabba The Hut, furry woodland creatures, etc.) made this a particularly appealing movie.\n\nNone of the action ever focused too long in one spot, either. The last half hour exemplifies this the most as the scene switches every few minutes from the woods to the battle among space ships to the individual laser-duel between Luke Skywalker and Darth Vader.\n\nAnother nice characteristic this film had that the two previous did not was the absence of in-fighting between two of the stars. Gone was the incessant bickering between Carrie Fisher and Harrison Ford. Finally, everyone was on the same page! It was nice to see.\n\nIn the end, this was simply a wonderful adventure tale, more than anything else.', u'-0.000712581', u'This final entry in George Lucas\'s STAR WARS movies is often regarded as the weakest of the lot. However, this is not to say that it is a totally worthless entry in the series. On the contrary. Sure, it\'s not as groundbreaking as its predecessors and a bit more slow-going at times, but RETURN OF THE JEDI still offers a lot to warrant the price of admission.\n\nThe first third of the movie, where Luke and his friends rescue Han from the palace of Jabba the Hutt, is a classic. Jabba, a truly disgusting blob of bloated flesh who speaks in his own language, not only makes a great villain, but a memorable one, too. It must have been a nightmare to construct this giant puppet, much less give it the spark and life that we see on the finished product. Actually, what also makes this sequence fun is the clever use of puppets for the various members of Jabba\'s court, including the intimidating, slavering Rancor and scary Sarlaac pit monster. It builds masterfully to its climax and pulls punches all the while.\n\nThings get a little bit slower around the second act, where Luke discovers that he and Leia are related by blood and when we travel to the forest planet of Endor, home of the cuddlesome yet stalwart Ewoks. Most of the complaints about RETURN OF THE JEDI that I\'ve read seem to be centered on these furry creatures, in that they somehow disrupt the tone of the saga. I don\'t totally agree with that, although this moment is probably played out a bit longer than it should. However, their leader, Wicket (played by Warrick Davis) is a delightfully memorable creation, and watching how they handle the Imperial Troops\' technology with their simple, natural weapons provides a nice contrast.\n\nBy the time we get to the third act, though, the pace picks up again, as we intercut between the Ewoks battle against the troops, Lando and the Rebel Forces launching an attack against the Empire\'s all-new half-completed Death Star, and Luke\'s final showdown with Darth Vader and the Emperor. The latter ties with the Jabba Palace sequence as the highlight of the movie. Mark Hamill flexes his acting chops once again as Luke Skywalker in these scenes, and watching him as a fully matured Jedi Knight makes for an unforgettable performance. Also, as iconic as James Earl Jones\' voice as Darth Vader is, he is rivaled only by the shriveled, crone-like Emperor, played with deliciously raspy, frightening evil by Ian McDiarmid. The tension between this trio heightens the excitement of this climactic moment, which is appropriately darkly lit and menacingly underscored.\n\nThe STAR WARS movies have always set standards for special effects, and the technical work in RETURN OF THE JEDI can easily hold a candle to its predecessors. The space battle fights are as exhilarating as always, and the speeder bike chase through the forest is a knockout. Of course, given that this movie was made after A NEW HOPE and THE EMPIRE STRIKES BACK, it probably shouldn\'t be so surprising that the special effects have reached an even greater level of excellence. The acting is classic STAR WARS fare; Hamill, Harrison Ford and Carrie Fisher all mature and deepen into their roles, and Anthony Daniels provides more hilarious moments as C-3PO. Frank Oz\'s Yoda only appears in two scenes, but he makes the most of it. And yes, there\'s also John Williams\' music.\n\nAll told, while RETURN OF THE JEDI falters a little bit in the middle, the first and third acts deliver in style, making this a rather satisfactory finale to one of the greatest sagas ever.\n\nIn 1997, George Lucas re-released the classic STAR WARS in digitally restored (and revamped) "Special Editions", which featured added-in effects and/or shots as well as some enhancements. Of the three, RETURN OF THE JEDI appears to have caused the most commotion with STAR WARS fans. Perhaps it can be due to the jarringly out-of-place (albeit funny if you\'re not so easily offended) "Jedi Rocks" musical number in Jabba\'s Palace, which, although technically amazing, does disrupt the flow of the film. However, I DID like the ending montage scenes where we see victory celebrations occurring on the various planets of the galaxy. This DVD version features yet more tweaking--we get to see more montage finale scenes (notably on Naboo, where we hear what sounds like Jar Jar Binks screaming, "Wesa free!"), and, in what is probably the most controversial change, Hayden Christensen as the specter of Anakin Skywalker in the closing scenes. Probably due to the intense (and unfair) disdain fans have for his somewhat shaky work in EPISODE II: ATTACK OF THE CLONES it seems inevitable that fans would put this edition down for that alone. However, if you\'re watching the STAR WARS saga chronologically (and contemplating about it), chances are you may react a little differently. Nonetheless, it is an issue that fans have raised, so it\'s probably best to be warned beforehand.\n\nAs nice as it would be to have Lucas release the original versions of these three classic films, he nonetheless stands by what he said about these revamps being the "definitive" editions of his classic trilogy, and, when viewing the STAR WARS movies altogether as one complete saga (as Lucas intended), it actually makes sense to keep them technically and aurally consistent. The original films will always be engraved in our memories, but these new incarnations are just as much fun, if one can give them a chance.', u'0.197894', u'Despite the feelings of most "Star Wars" fans, in my opinion "Return Of The Jedi" is the greatest cinematic film ever created. Ever since the first time I saw it, it\'s depth, intensity, special effects, and moving story have overwhelmed me. The film was so well put together that it has been able to stand the test of time over the last 20 years. Filled with powerful action, as the climax of the original trilogy, George Lucas gives us a rousing finish of the "Star Wars" saga in "Jedi".\n\nFilm Summary (Contains Spoilers For Those Who Have Not Seen It)\n\nAfter "The Empire Strikes Back" left us hanging for 3 long years we finally find the end of the story in "Return Of The Jedi". Darth Vader, in emotional turmoil makes a surprise visit to a new uncompleted Death Star to oversee it\'s construction. The Emperor is first seen in this film as he has the ultimate plan to destroy the Rebel Alliance and bring young Luke Skywalker to the Dark Side. Luke, Lando, Leia, Chewie, and the droids all travel to Tatooine to rescue the frozen Han Solo from the crime Lord; Jabba The Hutt. After Han has been rescued, and Jabba defeated, Luke returns to Dagobah to find a dying Yoda where he learns the awful truth; Darth Vader is in fact his father. The rebel heroes regroup with the Rebel Fleet. Now joined by other species and races including the Mon Calamari the Rebels must make a all-or-nothing plan of attack to destroy the Death Star before it is completed. While Lando heads the space attack in the Millennium Falcon, the Rebel heroes must disable the Death Star\'s shield generator on the Forest Moon Of Endor. It is here that the Rebels happen upon the furry, but mighty Ewoks. During the the two part intense battle, a third battle must take place as Luke willingly delivers himself to Vader in an attempt to convince him to leave the Dark Side. In emotionally charged sequences Luke must face his father as the Emperor lures out his dark emotions. As young Skywalker is about to face his death at the hands of Palpatine, Vader turns on his wicked master to save his son\'s life. \n\nFilled with a deep timeless story of good vs. evil, "Return Of The Jedi" is a spectacular, emotionally charged film that redeems the good in all of us.', u'-0.209652', u"\nThis is the film that pretty much answers all the questions.  One thing that I did notice is that it dealt with the theme of redemption.  Luke pretty much wanted to redeem his father's good name and at the end Vader regains his humanity just in time not only to save his son Luke, but to destroy the Emperor, the man who cost Vader his soul.  I also liked the scene in the film where 3PO summarizes the events of the previous chapters for the Ewoks.  This also helps to tie everything together as far as the saga is concerned.  Also, even though many have called this the weakest film in the trilogy, it still has enough of a story and great special effects to put it on a par with the previous films.", u'0.330995', u"Return of the Jedi is certainly the most action packed of the series, and is a fine conclusion to the Star Wars Saga. With Han Solo imprisoned by Jabba the Hut and the Empire building a new Death Star, the rebel alliance is facing an uphill struggle against the dark side, and only our favourite heroes can pull it off.\n\nThe Opening sequence, set on Tatooine, we see Jabba's palace, a pit of slavery and scum, and new home to Han Solo, as Luke and the gang prepare for his rescue, and with Luke's Jedi powers, they have the edge.\n\nWe also witness a tremendous triple battle at the end. Han, Leia and Chewy battle it out on Endor, desperate to deactivate the shields protecting the Death Star. The Rebel Fleet led by Lando, battle with the Imperial Fleet while they wait for the shields to go down, and Luke has a final showdown with Darth Vader. An Epic end to a Classic Saga, and it's only just of the pace of the first two.\n\n10/10", u'0.0134949', u"After ''Empire strikes back'' ''Return of the Jedi'' is my second favorite movie from the Star Wars series.\n\nLuke went to Tattoine to save Han Solo from Jabba. At the same time, the Galactic Empire is doing in secret, the construction of a new space station like the previous Death Star. If this station stays totally constructed, it will be the end of the Rebel Alliance. Both Vader and the Emperor are impatient because of the delay of the new Death Star,and they need to kill many of their commanders to have the project made in schedule.\n\nR2 and C3po are inside Jabba's palace to send a message from Luke to Jabba,where Lukes pretends to negotiate Han's life. He gives R2 and C3po as a gift to Jabba as part of his plan. Jabba does not accept the negotiation,since he is using Han Solo as a piece of his palace's decoration.(Han still is frozen in carbonite) Lando is hidden as Jabba's guard and Chewbacca is also gave to Jabba by a reward hunter. When the same Hunter tries to save Han solo and makes him stay in human form again, we see that is actually princess Leia in a disguise. The problem is that Jabba discovers Leia's plan and takes her as his slave,while Han is thrown away in Chewbacca's cell.\n\nLuke comes as a Jedi knight to rescue his friends. At his first try to kill Jabba,he falls into Jabba's monster cell (Bantha),but easily kills it. Jabba stays angry and decides to thrown Han,Chewbacca and Luke to Sarlacc, a big creature from the desert who stays 1.000 years digesting it's 'food'. Luke,Han and Chewie has success in scape again, and even Boba Fett dies when Han accidentally throws him in to Sarlacc's mouth. Leia kills Jabba and goes after Han,Luke and Chewie as well c3po and R2. \n\nEverybody's safe again,Luke decides to go to Dagoba to complete his training as a Jedi,as well his promise to Yoda. The problem is that Yoda is too old and sick, since he already has 900 years old, and before he dies, Yoda says to Luke that he does not need more training,but to really be a Jedi, he must fight with Vader again. He confirms to Luke that Vader is Luke's dad, and that there is another Skywalker besides Luke. In his last moments, Yoda asks to Luke to remember his advices about the temptation of the dark side, and to Luke transmit his Jedi knowledge to other people. When Yoda dies,Obi wan's spirit shows up to Luke and tells him that Luke's father killed his good side Anakin to become Darth Vader, and also that he is more machine than a man since he became a sith. Luke stays worried about killing his own dad, and says that he feels that his father still has kindness. Obi Wan tells Luke that his twin sister is Leia, and says the reasons why Luke and Leia were separated since babies. He gives his last advice to Luke saying that if he refuses to kill Vader, the emperor will win the war.\n\nAt the same time, the Emperor says to Vader that he must give Luke to him when he shows up, since Luke is stronger than before, and they both needs to combine their efforts to bring Luke to the dark side.\n\nNow we are going to have one of the best battles from the star war series,when the Rebel Alliance plans to attack the new space station, the '' Death Star 2'', Luke will confront Vader and the Emperor, and Leia, Han and chewie needs to turn off the 'Death star 2' power field, with the help of the EWOKS. (little creatures who looks little bears)\n\nThis is for sure one of the most exciting star wars of all!", u'-0.287433', u"After watching A New Hope and The Empire Strikes Back, it's time to watch the final chapter of the Star Wars film franchise, The Return of the Jedi.\n\nIt stars Mark Hamill, Harrison Ford, Carrie Fisher, Billy Dee Williams, David Prowse, Frank Oz, Anthony Daniels, etc.\n\nThe Empire is more than halfway through construction of a new Death Star - almost twice as big, but more than twice as powerful. When completed, it will spell certain doom for Luke Skywalker (Mark Hamill) and the Rebels. Han Solo (Harrison Ford) is a prisoner of crime lord Jabba the Hutt, and Princess Leia (Carrie Fisher) soon finds herself in the gangster's hands. Luke Skywalker, aided by C-3PO and R2-D2, makes his way into Jabba's palace, hoping to secure his friends' freedom. But the Hutt has no intention of doing so and tries to kill them all. After escaping from Jabba and the sands of Tatooine, they regroup with the Rebel fleet, which is massing for an attack against the new satellite battle station at Endor. Lando Calrissian (Billy Dee Williams) is pressed into action to lead the Rebel fighter attack, while Han is put in charge of a group of soldiers to take out the shield generator protecting the Death Star. Luke, however, surrenders to Vader's soldiers on Endor, and is taken in front of Vader's boss - the Galactic Emperor - on the Death Star for final corruption to the Dark Side of the Force. The fleet of Imperial Star Destroyers ambushes the Rebels, cutting them off. Worse, the new Death Star begins turning its giant laser on the Rebel carriers. It appears that nothing will stop the Empire's triumph - unless things start to change quickly.\n\nI thought it was a great end to the Star Wars series.\n\nBut in 1999, the story took itself back into the beginning with Star Wars Episode I: The Phantom Menace and ended with Star Wars Episode III: Revenge of the Sith.\n\nSo far, I'm finished with the Star Wars original trilogies, and there will be more reviews in the summer.\n\nStar Wars Episode VI: Return of the Jedi gets 10 stars.", u'-0.318721', u'\n"Return of the Jedi" is almost on par with the previous "Star Wars" films. There\'s more special effects (some good, some cheesy) and more new characters and creatures, including the Ewoks.  What makes Jedi the least perfect, is that it\'s very routine -- more of a reworking of "Star Wars." There\'s more new surprises, though.  A victory is celebrated at the end.  New scenes are featured in the "special edition." The ending is very satisfying.  My evaluation: ***1/2 out of ****.', u'0.291972', u'\nI thought that ROTJ was clearly the best out of the three Star Wars movies. I find it surprising that ROTJ is considered the weakest installment in the Trilogy by many who have voted. To me it seemed like ROTJ was the best because it had the most profound plot, the most suspense, surprises, most emotional,(especially the ending) and definitely the most episodic movie. I personally like the Empire Strikes Back a lot also but I think it is slightly less good than than ROTJ since it was slower-moving, was not as episodic, and I just did not feel as much suspense or emotion as I did with the third movie.\n\nIt also seems like to me that after reading these surprising reviews that the reasons people cited for ROTJ being an inferior film to the other two are just plain ludicrous and are insignificant reasons compared to the sheer excellence of the film as a whole. I have heard many strange reasons such as: a) Because Yoda died b) Because Bobba Fett died c) Because small Ewoks defeated a band of stormtroopers d) Because Darth Vader was revealed\n\nI would like to debunk each of these reasons because I believe that they miss the point completely. First off, WHO CARES if Bobba Fett died??? If George Lucas wanted him to die then he wanted him to die. Don\'t get me wrong I am fan of Bobba Fett but he made a few cameo appearances and it was not Lucas\' intention to make him a central character in the films that Star Wars fans made him out to be. His name was not even mentioned anywhere in the movie... You had to go to the credits to find out Bobba Fett\'s name!!! Judging ROTJ because a minor character died is a bit much I think... Secondly, many fans did not like Yoda dying. Sure, it was a momentous period in the movie. I was not happy to see him die either but it makes the movie more realistic. All the good guys can\'t stay alive in a realistic movie, you know. Otherwise if ALL the good guys lived and ALL the bad guys died this movie would have been tantamount to a cheesy Saturday morning cartoon. Another aspect to this point about people not liking Yoda\'s death.. Well, nobody complained when Darth Vader struck down Obi Wan Kenobi in A New Hope. (Many consider A New Hope to be the best of the Trilogy)  Why was Obi Wan\'s death okay but Yoda\'s not... hmmmmmmmmmmmm.... Another reason I just can not believe was even stated was because people found cute Ewoks overpowering stormtroopers to be impossible. That is utterly ridiculous!! I can not believe this one!! First off, the Ewoks are in their native planet Endor so they are cognizant of their home terrain since they live there. If you watch the movie carefully many of the tactics the Ewoks used in defeating the stormtroopers was through excellent use of their home field advantage. (Since you lived in the forest all your life I hope you would have learned to use it to your advantage) They had swinging vines, ropes, logs set up to trip those walkers, and other traps. The stormtroopers were highly disadvantaged because they were outnumbered and not aware of the advantages of the forest. The only thing they had was their blasters. To add,  it was not like the Ewoks were battling the stormtroopers themselves, they were heavily assisted by the band of rebels in that conquest. I thought that if the stormtroopers were to have defeated a combination of the Star Wars heros, the band of rebels, as well as the huge clan of Ewoks with great familiarity of their home terrain, that would have been a great upset. Lastly, if this scene was still unbelievable to you.. How about in Empire Strikes Back or in A New Hope where there were SEVERAL scenes of a group consisting of just Han Solo, Chewbacca, and the Princess, being shot at by like ten stormtroopers and all their blasters missed while the heros were in full view!! And not only that, the heroes , of course, always hit the Stormtroopers with their blasters. The troopers must have VERY, VERY bad aim then! At least in Empire Strikes Back, the Battle of Endor was much more believable since you had two armies pitted each other not 3 heroes against a legion of stormtroopers. Don\'t believe me? Check out the battle at Cloud City when our heroes were escaping Lando\'s base. Or when our heros were rescuing Princess Leia and being shot at  (somehow they missed)as Han Solo and Luke were trying to exit the Death Star.\n\nThe last reason that I care to discuss (others are just too plain ridiculous for me to spend my time here.) is that people did not like Darth Vader being revealed! Well, in many ways that was a major part of the plot in the movie. Luke was trying to find whether or not Darth Vader was his father, Annakin Skywalker. It would have been disappointing if the movie had ended without Luke getting to see his father\'s face because it made it complete. By Annakin\'s revelation it symbolized the transition Darth Vader underwent from being possessed by the dark side (in his helmet) and to the good person he was Annakin Skywalker (by removing the helmet). The point is that Annakin died converted to the light side again and that is what the meaning of the helmet removal scene was about. In fact, that\'s is what I would have done in that scene too if I were Luke\'s father...Isn\'t that what you would have done if you wanted to see your son with your own eyes before you died and not in a mechanized helmet?\n\nOn another note, I think a subconscious or conscious expectation among most people is that the sequel MUST be worse (even if it is better) that preceding movies is another reason that ROTJ does not get as many accolades as it deserves. I never go into a film with that deception in mind, I always try to go into a film with the attitude that "Well, it might be better or worse that the original .. But I can not know for sure.. Let\'s see." That way I go with an open mind and do not dupe myself into thinking that a clearly superior film is not as good as it really was.\n\nI am not sure who criticizes these movies but, I have asked many college students and adults about which is their favorite Star Wars movie and they all tell me (except for one person that said that A New Hope was their favorite) that it is ROTJ. I believe that the results on these polls are appalling and quite misleading.\n\nBottom line, the Return of the Jedi was the best of the Trilogy. This movie was the only one of the three that kept me riveted all throughout its 135 minutes. There was not a moment of boredom because each scene was either suspenseful, exciting, surprising, or all of the above. For example, the emotional light saber battle between Luke and his father in ROTJ was better than the one in the Empire Strikes Back any day!!!\n\nFinally, I hope people go see the Phantom Menace with an open mind because if fans start looking for nitpicky, insignificant details (or see it as "just another sequel") to trash the movie such as "This movie stinks because Luke is not in it!" then this meritorious film will become another spectacular movie that will be the subject of derision like ROTJ suffered unfortunately.\n\n\n', u'-0.321337'], u'tt0056592': [u"\nTo Kill a Mockingbird is the movie based on the Harper Lee novel of the same name about Scout, Jem and their father, Atticus Finch who is an attorney in a small southern town.  It is both a coming of age story about the children as well as a hard-hitting drama, as Atticus defends a black man who is on trial for the rape of a white woman.  \n\nThis review is not an easy one to write, despite the fact that I have seen this film at least 10 times.  The reason it does not come easily is that this is one of the most personally important films I have ever seen and is in my personal `Top Five of All Time'.  I'm certain there is nothing that can be said about the film that has not already been repeated a multitude of times, so I guess the best thing to do is explain why the film is so important to me.\n\nI first saw this film several years ago and was so profoundly affected by it that I immediately watched it again.  Of course, the defense of a man wrongly accused of a crime is a common story line, but To Kill a Mockingbird stands out as an exceptional example for several reasons.  Among them, the date that the film was released:  1962, on the cusp of the civil rights movement in America, and the fact that it takes place in the south in the 1930's.  It is also far from the first film to explore the experiences of children and their own personal growth, but To Kill a Mockingbird stands out because of its sheer honesty and natural performances by the child actors portraying these rich characters.  \n\nBut most of all, this film is special because of Gregory Peck's portrayal of Atticus Finch, a true hero.  At the risk of sounding histrionic, my heart aches when I watch him on screen because he is such an incredible man, and is so inherently good.  No matter how many times I have seen this film, I smile when I see his interaction with his children, and I well with tears when I see his incredible strength of character.  (No easy feat to break through the armor of this cynical film geek who, if given the chance would remake at least a few dozen films with tragic endings.) I was sitting in my car listening to National Public Radio recently the day Gregory Peck died, and I'm not ashamed to admit that I sat and cried hearing the retrospective they offered \x96 mainly because the man who portrayed my own personal cinematic hero was gone, but also because Peck lived his life with the same conviction as his best known role; a fact that makes Atticus Finch all the more tangible.  The American Film Institute recently named Atticus Finch the number one hero of all time, a choice I consider both brave and insightful in an age where our heroes generally either wield weapons or have super human physical strength.  Atticus Finch fights evil as well, but with his strong moral fiber and his mind.  \n\nTo Kill a Mockingbird is generally required reading during the course of one's education.  If you have not read it, do so.  If you have not seen the film, do so; and share it with others.  It is an exceptional film that stands the test of time and will remain an important addition to film history for as long as the genre exists.  \n\n--Shelly\n", u'0.357001', u'TO KILL A MOCKINGBIRD is presented like a play in three acts. It is also from the children\'s perspective. Through the kids, we find that racism is a learned attitude or feeling. We also see a delightful coming of age drama as the young kids realize that there is no Boogeyman down the street and their father is capable of doing a lot more than they think. The great Gregory Peck plays Atticus Finch, a pillar of nobility, social conscience, and, rare for 1930\'s Americana, a single parent. Peck is such a strong presence, you believe everything about him. It is something you can compare to America\'s trust in TV anchorman Walter Cronkite. We always took his word for it.\n\nAct one puts Atticus in the background and allows the kids to flourish. Director Robert Mulligan was able to get such realistic performances from non-professional kids. They are amusing and fun to watch. The big mystery lies in the house down the street in this small Georgia town. Who is the monstrous, "6 and a half feet big" legend living in the end house? Some light suspense ensues, while the buildup to a stirring act two is happening. Atticus must defend an African-American man for the alleged rape of a white woman.\n\nAfter threats galore, an unshaken Peck takes to the courtroom jungle in, without a doubt, one of the top 5 court scenes in motion picture history. Brock Peters lends the film its best moments as the accused "negro" on trial. This man has a face chiseled with suffering and deep, deep sorrow. We know Atticus is a good man, a decent human being with a soul. He sees this in his client as well, and in a closing argument that must have roused the civil rights movement, implores the jury to vote justice. An all-male, all-white jury in the 1930\'s were tough listeners. Peters\' breakdown on the stand is one of the most realistic, emotionally saddening moments you\'ll ever see, especially in Hollywood films of the 1960\'s. The scene when Peck leaves the courtroom is now legendary as well.\n\nAct three produces a tragic death, an unlikely hero, and the bringing together of a family. The filmmakers have such a passion for the material, they seem to handle it with gentleness. Racism is a hard-boiled subject and it is depicted and dealt with through grace and patience. TO KILL A MOCKINGBIRD poses the injustice of race relations in the 1930\'s as a front for the events happening in the 1960\'s. The film came out during turbulent times and was also an adaption of a literary classic. I am one to judge a film solely by film only. The book is a separate art form and should not be compared to the film, an art form itself. It is important, it is enlightening, and it has not aged. Watch it.\n\nRATING: 9 of 10', u'0.173056', u'\nEnough good things can\'t be said about this movie.  It is undoubtedly one of the best and most moving films ever made.  No other racial injustice or discriminatory based movie can even compare with "To Kill a Mockingbird". This movie not only makes you sympathize with those who were being discriminated against, but also those who fought for those people.  One of the most moving parts of the movie is when Atticus Finch is leaving the court room and Reverend Sykes tells Scout to "stand up your father is passing".\n\nGregory Peck has always been one of my favorite actors.  This is definitely one of my favorite roles that he has ever played, and he does an excellent job at it.  Mary Badham and Philip Alford are excellent as Jem and Scout. Mary Badham became the youngest girl to receive an Academy Award nomination for best supporting actress for her role as Scout.  Although it had a short time on screen, Robert Duvall\'s portrayal of "Boo" Radley was one of his very first roles on screen and what better movie than "To Kill a Mockingbird" to kick off your acting career.\n\nA great movie of all times.', u'0.239598', u'\nHoo boy, am I a sucker for courtroom dramas. The wrangling of legal points and the investigation into the truth just gets my cinematic blood pumping (I s\'pose it\'s in response to my own dashed hopes of becoming an attorney).\n\n"To Kill a Mockingbird" rises to the top of the pile easily.\n\nYes, the courtroom proceedings are nail-bitingly engaging. But played out against the tapestry of bigotry and hate make the legal goings-on even more compelling.\n\nThe writing here is so beautiful, so lyric, so poetic. The Harper Lee-based screenplay captures wonderfully a time and a place that are absolutely real--where big brothers could solve the universe\'s problems in an instant and all the treasures of the world could be contained in a cigar box.\n\n"To Kill a Mockingbird" also contains three of the most impressive child performances I have ever witnessed--there\'s not a false or affected moment in any one of them. Until seeing "Ponette," a movie I would highly recommend, the kids in "Mockingbird" received my best child performance ever awards. "Ponette" has ratcheted them down one notch, but that doesn\'t diminish the achievement here. The scene in which Scout dispels the mob simply by identifying its individual members is one of the most powerful moments in filmdom.\n\nPeck more than deserved his best actor nod. His quiet dignity is a definite asset. Brock Peters, too, is terrific in what could have been a cliched role.\n\nIf you are a moviegoer who has a bias against black and white movies and who has therefore never seen "Mockingbird," I pity you. You\'ve passed on one of Hollywood\'s most unforgettable experiences.', u'0.200127', u"\nThe first time I saw To Kill A Mockingbird was at a drive-in theater.  I was probably about ten or eleven at the time.  Even at a young age I was captivated by this seemingly simple story told through the eyes of children that I could easily relate to.  Perhaps also it was the fact that the part of the story that dealt with Boo Radley, held a kind of mystery and an eeriness for me, much in the way a ghost story would.  I'm not about to make the pretense that I understood the social significance of To Kill A Mockingbird at the age of ten, or even the greatness of the film.  That would come later in life, after having viewed it in one of it's first network television broadcasts.\n\nOne of the things that makes To Kill A Mockingbird a truly great film is the love and respect everyone involved in bringing Harper Lee's novel to the screen had for the original source material.  It shows up on screen in every single frame.  Each performance in this film is beyond reproach.  Gregory Peck had many fine performances over his storied career, but none every approached the perfection he brought to his portrayal of Atticus Finch.  As Atticus, Peck brings us the depth of understanding as to how his love for Jem and Scout enables him to treat his children with respect and honesty.  He never talks down to them, but approaches them on a level in which children of their age can comprehend and learn from his own wisdom.  Yet, he is still able to retain the same no nonsense approach as other parents.  Atticus is also a man who believes in the integrity of justice, yet recognizes the failings of our justice system.  When called upon to do his duty, he does so, despite the hatred and venom brought to bear upon him and his children by the citizens of the town in which he lives.\n\nIn casting Jem, Scout and Dill, Producer Alan J. Pakula and Director Robert Mulligan faced a daunting task.  So much of the success of To Kill A Mockingbird depended on the pivotal role these characters would play in the film.  For Jem he chose Philip Alford, for Scout, Mary Badham, and for Dill, John Megna.  Alford and Badham were both southern natives who had never been in films before.  Megna was a New York native but was also inexperienced.  It is this inexperience and lack of polish that enables all three to shine on the screen.  Mulligan began filming by letting them act as if making a film was like recess, allowing them to play on the set, and only moving the camera gradually as they became accustomed to their surroundings.  It paid off in every way imaginable.  None of the three ever appear as if they are actors acting, and bring a childlike wonder and presence to their roles that I had never seen before, and will unlikely witness again.\n\nBrock Peters as Tom Robinson, the black man falsely accused of raping a white girl, also gives a performance which he would never again surpass.  You will not find anywhere a more memorable scene in any court room than when he testifies on the witness stand.  Because he dared to care about a white girl, he now faces almost certain death if convicted, and perhaps even if not convicted.  It is the first time I was able to begin to understand the effects of man's prejudice and hatred of a man simply because of the color of his skin.  Just as Jem and Scout came of age, and realized the significance of the injustices of racial hatred, so did I.\n\nEqually significant, is Collin Wilcox as Mayella Ewell. She makes it easy for many to hate her, but like Atticus, we see in her a person to be more pitied than hated.  She is a product of not only the times in which she lives, but even more so of her wretched upbringing.  Mayella is what she is, but only because of the deep cutting prejudices of those around her.  To Mayella, being caught enticing a black man into your house for relations, is the ultimate crime and the penalty for doing so is unthinkable to her.\n\n\nIn his screen debut as Boo Radley, Robert Duvall also brings to life the mysterious neighbor that once frightened Jem, Dill, and Scout so much.  Though on the screen for a short length of time, without uttering a word, Duvall shows us a man tortured by years of cruelty, mistreatment, and the gossip and whispers of neighbors.  He is a man who wants only to live in his own way, yet the bond that links him to Jem and Scout is significant.  They are the childhood he had never really known.  Just as Tom Robinson, he has never brought harm to anyone, yet suffers significantly just for the right to be able to exist.\n\nThe care with which To Kill A Mockingbird was brought to the screen can also be seen in the Art Direction by Henry Bumstead and Set Decoration by Oliver Emert.  They indeed bring to life what a small Southern Town would have been like in the early thirties. Cinematographer Russel Harlan's black and white photography brings it all vividly to the screen, especially in the way he captures the foreboding of the Radley house, the moments when Bob Ewell approaches Jem when he is left in a car alone, and even more noteworthy near the end of the film when Jem and Scout are walking home from a school play.  Elmer Bernstein's score is never boisterous, but yet is as important to setting the mood of many of the scenes played out before us.\n\nThere have been many eloquent words written in many of the comments on this board about To Kill A Mockingbird. Many of the words are far better than those that I have written.  Then again, maybe a few simple paragraphs cannot truly describe the significant achievement in film making that To Kill A Mockingbird is.  It will be forever remembered, long after you and I have departed from this world.  It is at this point that I usually grade a film.  I will skip that here, simply because there is no grade that I can give that could possibly do justice for To Kill A Mockingbird.     \n\n\n         \n\n        ", u'-0.159393', u'\n"To Kill A Mockingbird" is truly a much loved and critically-acclaimed film. It is a perfect portrayal of childhood innocence, racial prejudice, moral tolerance and courage. No other words can describe this film except marvellous. The film is so wonderfully done that the audience actually feels as if they were in Alabama during the 1930s. This is a must see for anyone of any age.', u'0.547073', u"\nAfter hearing nothing but critical acclaim for this film, and the book it was based on, I finally got to see it. I am quite amazed at how well done this film is, and how timeless the theme is. I haven't read the book, but I'm considering it, just to see if there are any details that were left out. The story is amazing and exceptionally told. As far as I know, the film is as close to the book as it could possibly be; some call it the most accurate book-to-film conversion ever. The plot is very good, it takes a timeless problem and presents it to us, through the innocent eyes of a naive child. The pace is very good; apart from The Godfather(the first one) and one or two other exceptions, this is the only drama where there was truly not one single moment that I found dull, boring or unimportant. Nothing seemed trivial in the film. The perspective that is forced upon us is that of a young child, naive and innocent. This is a brilliant idea, as the eyes of a child is without a doubt one of the most impressionable things in the world, and the film handles this perfectly. What really makes the film, apart from the brilliant and possibly unique perspective, is the fact that the children are likable, credible and charming. You couldn't help but like them; believe me, normally I really dislike children. I find them annoying, loud and egotistical. But with this film, I couldn't, for one second, muster up any tiny amount of aggression, or even annoyance. They come off as so likable, charming, and, most importantly, *real*. Almost every kid in any Hollywood movie is either a completely ridiculous stereotype/clich\xe9 of a brat, who does nothing but destroy things around him, or the exact opposite, a little angel. Everyone knows that no child is the latter all the time, and even I will admit that there probably doesn't exist too many children who are the first, either. In this film, the children are completely real. They are naive, innocent, they disobey what their father tells them, but ultimately, they obviously love and respect their father, and they never do anything, anything at all, with the intent to hurt or harm someone or something. That is what a child is; innocent. They do what they do because they do not know better. This film provides a perfect view into their world, or, rather, their perspective of it. The acting is excellent. The child actors exceed all expectations. I was amazed at how professional and convincing they were. The other actors all give great performances as well. The cinematography is excellent; once again, it gives a perfect perspective on what your surroundings look like when you're a child. The characters are well-written, credible and well-casted. The dialog was well-written. The script was excellent. A very memorable and beautiful film, should be viewed by almost anyone. I recommend this to anyone who likes dramas, and just about anyone who for one reason or another might enjoy this. Don't be scared off by it being over forty years old, or it being black and white; it's an excellent film, and just about anyone would enjoy it. Don't miss this perfect film. 10/10\n", u'0.333035', u'\nAfter studying the outstanding book of To Kill A Mockingbird at school, I viewed this film, and was on the whole very impressed. Scout and Jem are portrayed brilliantly, considering the ages of the children who played them, and they, as with everything else in the production, are true to the book\'s spirit. Gregory Peck is perfect as the unflappable Atticus Finch, and deserved his Oscar. The music is worthy of praise, especially for the climatic scene, and the raw emotion and feeling of the book is amply conveyed. All of the cast are well cast, and it\'s interesting to ponder how much this film, at the time, would\'ve shocked. That the book explores racism and outsiders in a southern town, through the eyes of a child is genius and works very nicely here. The only problems are minor- much of the book\'s counter-balancing humour was left out, certain characters are omitted (Dolphus Raymond and Aunt Alexandra), and some of the book\'s early characterisation is missed. Aside from these gripes, this is a magical film and a "must-see," as a companion piece to the classic novel. 9/10', u'0.654548', u'Very rarely, it happens that movies are made that are very simple in expression but possess monumental appeals and significant life lessons in a style only of the kind of their own that, we can\'t expect even. This fact is truthfully exemplified in this movie. It\'s not just a movie or even just a promising story in general, but all it portray\'s is "Innocence". A girl\'s recollection of her childhood days which are still at their full bloom in her mind, depicting the innocence of juvenile as well as as adult minds, a period where mostly immature minds become curious to the racial bigotry and sometimes mature minds become its prey and a time when harsh realities of life like intolerance, hatreds, prejudice and adversities of society gradually dawn upon them.\n\nAtticus Finch ( Gregory Peck ) is an absolutely Gentleman Lawyer whose wife has passed away and he has a son and a daughter. A Black man Tom Robinson is wrongly alleged of raping a poor white woman. In fact, he a victim of white woman\'s effort to hide her guilt by targeting his innocence and utilizing favors of racial attitude of unsocial society towards Negros. Finch decides to defend him on his principles realizing that the narrow minded society will turn against him and so it happened and townspeople started making his life agonizing. The whole story is masterfully out shined by the ingenuousness, purity and innocence of his children with with a unique inspirational interaction with their father.\n\nBoo Readly who lives in the town is mentally retarded and is sidelined by the society. He is a mark of fear and curiosity for children because he is different from others. But he is the one who marks the ultimate climax of this emotionally crafted masterpiece.\n\nIt\'s a must see movie for all ages in all times because it gives many priceless emotional and touching lessons for those who are sincere and perceptive.\n\nA Remarkably Simple and Simply Remarkanble Masterpiece!!!', u'0.0803253', u"'To Kill a Mockingbird' is one of the best books ever written but this film does it justice. The performances throughout are stunning, especially that of Gregory Peck (Harper Lee was so impressed she gave him her late father's pocket watch, a prop he uses in the film, to keep). This film will make anyone think hard about how they treat others and it is really heartwarming without being soppy. It isn't necessary to have read the book before seeing this film but it might be advisable. This is one of the classic films of its generation and very few films of nowadays come close to matching it either. A real must-see.", u'0.75128', u"\nHorton Foote's Oscar-winning screenplay is so good, it really supplants the 1960 Harper Lee book. I've recently re-read the novel, and it seemed weighed down and paced with backwoods vernacular and situations right out of the 1930s, that are shockingly removed from the 21st century. My goodness. I hope it doesn't strike others so, because the book is a gem too. It's just in need of ...updating perhaps, which is what the 1962 movie excels at; it translates the Depression Era for us. The characters (played, eg by Gregory Peck and Brock Peters in their signature roles) seem so much better-depicted on screen than merely in my own imagination from having read the book!\n\n\nOnly Arthur/'Boo' Radley (a peroxided Robert Duvall) seems at first a jarring casting choice to me; but in the end all seem terrific.\n\nNow THESE child actors, Mary Badham ('Scout'), Philip Alford ('Jem'), and John Megna (as 'Dill'), should've won Oscars. I'm sure they're all better than Haley Joel Osment, who strikes me as 'studied'. These kids are just natural, completely oblivious of the camera. Unbelievable. Actually, I wonder what genius DID do the casting, because the film gives no casting credit. I guess in 1962 the CSA didn't exist yet... That casting director deserves an Oscar too.\n\nThis is what great filmmaking is all about; when several areas of perfection are jointly present a film that reaches into your heart and yanks you up and down. Those were real acting jobs, not the cretinous drivel passing for 'work' these days. The reason we don't see too many better movies than Das Experiment is because post-modernism has long encamped in Hollywood (it set up a Starbuck's years ago).\n\nThe first scene instantly captures Scout's world. She's learning fast at the shoulder of her loving widower lawyer father that she shouldn't embarrass people who are even poorer than they are; and Jem is tantrumming up a tree because he can't brag about his dad's non-existent cool to his friends. Jem demands Atticus play football(!) for the Mets, or more uproariously as Scout tells it, for `the Methodists', hahahaha. (Can we picture Methodists in a sackrace? How many Methodists does it take to change a lightbulb?)\n\nThe Boo Radley story arc is much better paced in the movie than the book; but because I want to focus on the race-relations arc, I will only make passing comment on Boo: he is gently painted in both the book and movie as another previously dismissed but highly virtuous person, who deserves to be analogized with the fragile, hopeful beauty of the mockingbird.\n\n\nThe harrowing exploration of entrenched injustice through various acts of racist violence are adult themes that really couldn't be explored well in a\nbook constrained by the first person narrative of a 7-yr-old little girl. The movie is able to show the Tom Robinson court case much more objectively. Robert Mulligan's direction quickly telegraphs Bob Ewell's shifty creepiness with the scene of his slovenly leering at Atticus' children in the car. Collin Wilcox is also heartrending as Mayella, the ignorant, uneducated and abused daughter of Bob Ewell. Inexplicably, Gregory Peck's cross-examination scene is not quite as sensitive as Atticus is in the book; Peck never reveals that flash of pain at having to destroy Mayella's false testimony.\n\n\nLittle Scout's key scene, where she embarrasses the lynch mob (collectively no better than Tom Ewell alone) just with her amiable child's chatter, is EVERY BIT as powerful and stressful as in the book. Probably more, because body language is a much better form of expression for a scene like this.\n\nBrock Peters' Tom Robinson is the archetypal decent black man who, YES, felt sorry for a brutalized white woman, as we all ought to. Don't bother debating `what if he was guilty', because TKAM is not a whodunnit; it's an expose of what used to happen WHEN a black man was innocent. The heartbreaking destruction of Tom Robinson's proverbial mockingbird is our collective shame, even now, because similar dismissive laziness still happens. It's every person's character that matters, not whether they're `Methodists'.\n\nWe do construct our identities as part of various groups. But no group membership, or belief about it, makes any person categorically virtuous. That still hinges on a person's strengths, and crucially, their weaknesses. A person's bad character will overwhelm whatever beliefs they hold; their good character will enhance them. We are all free to act better, or worse, than our beliefs; we're NOT powerless over them, so no-one should ever die over a belief. Cooler thinking than mere violence must rule, or else objective justice will never materialize. And it's only justice if the judgement is accurate; but accuracy requires the abolition of the sort of intellectual/societal laziness that regularly befalls the weakest subgroups of society. Well, we all saw the intellectual rigour of that lynch mob. Would you trust them to tell the time? You might not feel happy trusting even the sheriff (Frank Overton), testifying in court but no better than a hick himself: `Oh, I guess that would make it her LEFT'. Those powerful imbeciles stood in judgement over some societally fragile people, like Tom, and yes, like Mayella.\n\nIt's still powerful how Tom's hammering as sarcastic legal argument by the prosecutor (William Windom) served to bring home Tom's societal fragility; and we're humbled at the quiet dignity of the entire black population who soberingly stood in the rafters to honor Atticus' failed attempt. The movie was made in 1961, some 7 years before the martyrdom of Martin Luther King Jr, yet in the light of recent gang-related violence, it's clear there are still many who think their group belonging excuses/masks their brutality as people. It does not. And the brutality came first.\n\nThis movie needs to be seen by the young, to open their hearts to humanity, and their standards for their own personal character, for the rest of their lives. 10/10.", u'0.0449225', u"When the American Film Institute polled its members and they selected Gregory Peck as Atticus Finch as the greatest hero on film ever, the selection was met with very few dissenters. I'm sure not going to argue the merits of the choice. But I do have a theory as to why.\n\nGregory Peck for the most part played decent honorable thinking men in his films. A few films like Duel in the Sun and The Boys from Brazil have him as a villain, but the public never accepted him really in those parts.\n\nFew of us in our lives can be Horatio Hornblower or spike the Guns of Navarone or command a submarine as in On the Beach. But Atticus Finch in To Kill a Mockingbird is well within our grasp. He's a small town lawyer, raising his children as a single parent and most of all trying to lead them by example. The performances of Mary Badham and Philip Alford show the kids have learned it very well as does the uncredited narration of Kim Stanley as the grown-up Scout.\n\nAtticus Finch is a very attainable ideal. It is I believe the secret of the popularity of both the book and the film. \n\nTo Kill a Mockingbird is the story of Atticus Finch and his family during the Thirties in rural Alabama. The action takes place over several months of a given year. The most important part of the film deals with Finch defending a black man for allegedly raping a white woman. \n\nIt's a thankless task and Finch knows it, because he knows the attitudes of the people there, those who would make up an all white jury. Still he proceeds with courage and determination. His summation to the jury is a film classic and Peck's innate decency is nicely counterbalanced by William Windom's prosecutor who smirks through out the trial knowing he just has to play the race card to win.\n\nOther outstanding performances are Brock Peters as the man Peck is defending, James Anderson as the father of the girl he's accused of violating, and Frank Overton as the county sheriff.\n\nThis film was the debut of Robert Duvall in the part of Boo Radley who plays the autistic neighbor of the Finches. No dialog at all for Duvall who conveys great and pained emotion with a series of expressions that are unforgettable. Duvall played a similar role in another Peck film, Captain Newman, MD.\n\nGregory Peck got the Best Actor Award for 1962. He was up against some very stiff competition that year. Peck beat out Jack Lemmon for Days of Wine and Roses, Burt Lancaster for Birdman of Alcatraz, Peter O'Toole for Lawrence of Arabia and Marcello Mastroianni for Divorce Italian style. \n\nNo doubt sentiment did play a part in the final award. Lemmon and Lancaster had already gotten Oscars and O'Toole and Mastroianni were relative newcomers. But I sure think the Academy selection that year has stood the test of time.\n\nThis film has sure stood the same test.", u'0.121011', u"This is why I watch movies. Every once in a while I stumble upon such a masterpiece which moves me to tears, because it reminds me that, all bad things aside, there is good in all of us - we just have to help each other search for it and bring it to light.\n\nThis is definitely one of the best films I've ever seen. Mary Badham is absolutely wonderful as 'Scout', and I think she deserves just as much credit as Gregory Peck for this picture.\n\nThe rest of the cast are great as well, and a special mention goes to Elmer Bernstein for his delicate and so appropriate score.\n\nI love this movie and recommend it to anyone. 10/10", u'0.510617', u"I first saw this movie, and read Harper Lee's prize-winning novel, when I was in High School. And the subject matter has stood the test of time...\n\n'To Kill a Mockingbird' would have to be one of the classic on-screen court-room dramas and Gregory Peck once said that his award-winning portrayal of Atticus Finch, a small-town lawyer during the Depression, was his crowning achievement as an actor.\n\nThe other character dominating the movie is 'Scout', Atticus' school-age daughter, who seems like she would rather be a boy at times. Her adult character (never seen on screen) acts as a narrator, quietly reflecting on and interpreting some of what we see.\n\n'Jem' is Scout's older brother. Jem and Scout's mother had passed away previously and there is a touching scene early in the film where the children quietly remember their mother and are overheard by Atticus. At the same time Sheriff Tate arrives to offer Atticus the most difficult case of his career -- that of Tom Robinson.\n\nTom is an African-American and race relations in the 'Deep South' is another major theme of the film. Tom has been accused by a white woman, and will face a white judge and white jury. Some might say that the movie points to social inequalities and the fallibility of our judicial system.\n\nThe movie is filmed in black and white and this seemed wholly appropriate given the subject matter and austere setting. It's a poignant movie that can be enjoyed many times over...", u'0.254226', u"I'm surprised that there aren't more comments on Peck's amazing depiction of Atticus Finch, the father. In this era of absent fathers, preoccupied fathers, abusive fathers, immature fathers, etc, etc, Peck's Finch gives us all a soothing view of the best of fatherhood. Where else do we get to watch a man sit up with his ill child, stand firm in his convictions, show patience and gentleness with his children, demonstrate an appropriate level of humility, communicate righteous values to his children, and give his children a picture of integrity to emulate. Every time I view this film I wonder how Peck was able to pull this off. Every time I view this film, it gives me hope for the future of fatherhood.", u'0.701175'], u'tt0095327': [u'I decided to watch Grave of the Fireflies yesterday. My friends told me it was extremely moving and sad. I hesitated at first, but then I said "Oh well, I\'ll give it a try." At the end of the film, I was crying my eyes out. This was the best animated film, I\'ve ever seen.This is a moving depiction of the fates of cast-off children who become casualties of war.\n\nThis movie isn\'t your regular Animated Film. Pixar and Disney put films out there with happy endings. I\'m not saying there bad films at all. They are also great pieces of work. But Grave of the Fireflies tells you the truth. This movie isn\'t trying to entertain you. It wants to inform you about how war is really like. There were many moments in the movie, that just brought me to tears.\n\nI am kind of upset, that this movie didn\'t get many awards as it should. In that regards, it is VERY underrated and it is kind of thrown apart. When it should really be respected and praise it. If this movie was made in our time period right now. I would be 100% sure this would of Won an Oscar for Best Animated Film. This is Studio Ghilbi\'s best movie they have ever released.\n\nI truly advice you to bring a handkerchief, cause chances are that you will cry.\n\nAn Emotional Epic Animated Film, that I recommend everyone to watch.\n\nQuite Simply 10/10', u'-0.0321105', u'\nI had the fortune of being able to see Hotaru no Haka on the big-screen in Seattle a couple of years ago.  It was truly the high-point of my film festival excursions.  At the end of the movie, there was silence, absolute and total silence in the theater - and then, only an occasional sniffle until the end credits had finished rolling and the house lights came up.  It would\'ve seemed almost disrespectful to profane the silence with words.\n\nSeeing a movie like this really changes attitudes about war - about who really suffers, and that the honor and glory is shallow comfort when you contemplate what has been lost in the struggle.\n\nI\'ve made the comment to my friends that if you ever see someone who isn\'t moved (usually to tears) by this movie, you\'ve found someone without a soul.  As difficult as it is to watch, turn off the phone, dim the lights, and immerse yourself in the film with ones you love - you will be a better person for it in the end.\n\nThere are many other reviews of this movie, and most of them are probably far more comprehensive than my own - I\'ll conclude by saying that this movie should required viewing at some point (as should the peace museums at Hiroshima and Nagasaki) for everyone.\n\nWhen you see war and conflict in the news or read about it in the paper, think back to this movie - your perspective will probably be broadened, and your eyes opened a bit more.\n\nI\'ve only watched this movie about 4 times - it usually takes a year or so to "decompress" after watching it.  To see it too often would lessen the impact, and that would be the worst possible thing to do to this movie.', u'-0.172416', u'\nWhen I watched this movie, I steeled myself for a traumatic experience, based on every review I\'d ever read of it, which usually include phrases like "don\'t watch this if you\'re suicidal." Instead, if I had to pick a single word to sum up the movie I saw, it would probably be \'beautiful\'.\n\nCertainly it was sad, and arguably depressing, but I\'ve read this movie compared with \'Saving Private Ryan\'. That\'s ridiculous. \'Grave of the Fireflies\' is gentle and poetic more often than it\'s violent, and it\'s remarkably restrained in its anti-war message. It simply tells a story : there\'s very little at all in the way of moralizing or polemics. Why would a story like this need such heavy-handed tactics?\n\nI\'ve also read it argued that the movie is robbed of any suspense or impact when it\'s revealed in the opening scene that the main characters are dead. I have a quite different view of that device.\n\nFirstly. the beginning of \'Fireflies\' is, for all intents and purposes, a \'happy ending\'. This is such a non-linear plot development that you could fail to notice it, and thereby only see the movie\'s gloom. The moment where the ghostly Seita takes the ghostly Setsuko\'s hand and nods to her is not only a happy moment, it signifies that the suffering - which is yet to come, as far as the viewer is concerned - is over, and they are together again (albeit still without parents).\n\nAs for a character revealing that he is dead in the first line of the movie, this is a device which has been used in centuries if not Milena. The crucial thing here is that \'Fireflies\' isn\'t _about_ tension. It tells a story whose ultimate conclusion you already know (a legitimate narrative approach), and everything which happens during that story is emotionally infused with a foreknowledge of its ending. You find yourself hoping that things will go right now for Setsuko and Seita, and then the knowledge that ultimately it won\'t undercuts you with real emotional power. You know the characters are going to die, but you hope things won\'t be so bad in the meantime. It doesn\'t take much of an effort to make that an analogy for our own lives, which makes us all fireflies.\n\nPerhaps what might make someone feel disappointed or cheated by this film is simply that it\'s so damn honest. I mean that: it\'s one of the most honest, artifice-free movies I\'ve ever seen. It doesn\'t even really try to ram an anti-war message down your throat there is very little overt violence, and if there are some scenes of corpses and suffering, it\'s never gratuitous, and it\'s over quickly. Compare this with \'Private Ryan\', where you have to suffer through 40 minutes of the most horrific blood and guts, only to reach a conclusion which, after much blood and thunder, signifies very little.\n\n\'Fireflies\', OTOH, has far more beauty than gore. This is what really surprised me about it. Probably two thirds of the movie takes place in gorgeously drawn, tranquil rural or urban settings, with an almost pleasant dreamlike quality - even when the American bombers are flying overhead at one point there is a surreal, almost serene sense to it - and there are plenty of moments of happiness to offset the undeniably sadness and frustration of other scenes.\n\nPerhaps best of all, Setsuko is one of the very, very few (if not the only) animated 4 year-old I\'ve ever seen who actually _behaves_ like a four year old. I\'m so sick of seeing preternaturally smart, sassy, sophisticated and precocious children in Hollywood movies. Setsuko\'s emotion and behaviors are _exactly_ right for a completely normal four year-old, and recognizing this lends many scenes incredible poignancy. Similarly, Seita is a teenage boy who behaves with the sort of mixture of pride, compassion and hubris which you\'d expect of someone his age. He still believes that Japan will win the war he thinks it\'s up to him to take care of his sister with their mother gone and father who knows where. This leads him to make mistakes: possibly the most obvious one being where he fails to take the farmer\'s advice, swallow his pride and ask his nasty aunt to take them back in again. You would probably have to say his decision not to even try - to go it alone instead, was a very bad one, but - hello, people - here is a character who makes mistakes because he\'s actually human: a believable teenage boy in an extraordinary situation, who doesn\'t miraculously save the day, because his best judgment just isn\'t good enough.\n\nOf course, his aunt may well have knocked them back anyway. Who knows?\n\nDon\'t go into the film expecting tension, drama or even a tirade against war. It\'s a movie about the beauty and fragility of life and youth. If you think Japanese animation is all giant robots and superhuman schoolgirls, this could be the film which changes your mind. It\'s slow, poetic, beautiful and sad, and extraordinarily honest.\n\nI must be the only person who didn\'t cry during this film (and I mean, I get choked up during some Disney movies). Yes, it is sad, but its beauty and honesty is what I\'ll remember.\n\nNB: this review refers to the subtitled version of the film.\n', u'-0.0468215', u"\nI was warned this movie would be emotional, but I had no idea just how understated that was.  By the end, my friend and I were huddled together, pouring out tears I've never shed for any movie before.  It was a mix of horror, empathy, sadness, and so many more emotions I can't even begin to list.\n\nVisions of this film have haunted me since first watching it, and I would find it hard to watch again, simply from it being so heart-wrenching. Only one movie has ever hit me hard enough to keep me from subjecting myself to it's strong emotions again (The thief, the cook, his wife and her lover).\n\nI strongly urge all to watch this, as it rises well about any films I've seen, anime or not.", u'-0.13138', u"This film is utterly emotionally draining whilst being rewarding at the same time.\n\nThe animation is both realistic and stylized but that's not the point, the main focus of this film is the character development of the brother and sister protagonists. Their relationship is nothing short of beautiful and touching.\n\nAnd without spoiling anything I have to say that this film touched me in a way no other film has ever touched me in my adult life. One or two films have upset me and reduced me to watery eyes but Grave of the Fireflies had me in fits of sobbing despair. I was a mess! I'm talking total emotional breakdown. Couldn't talk without sobbing! One of the best films I have EVER seen, animated or not.", u'-0.052221', u"\nOccasionally there's a film that literally changes one's perceptions of the world.   `Grave of the Fireflies' is one of those films.    No movie ever made generates such an intense and powerful emotional response as this one. \n\n\nIt's an animated film set in Japan during the closing days of World War II.  Two children; a boy named Seita and his much younger sister Setsuko; must quickly learn to cope with life after their mother is killed during a fire-bombing raid by American B-29's.    The film starts with the children and their mother preparing for the attack, then follows the children as they attempt to survive the death of their mother, and the possible death of their father, a naval officer serving aboard the Japanese heavy cruiser `Maya.'  (A US submarine torpedoed the `Maya' in late October of 1944 during the battle of Leyte Gulf.)\n\nThe story of two orphans trying to survive in war-ravaged Japan is not the subject of your typical light-hearted animated film.   In fact it may be much too serious for anyone under the age of 14.  The first five minutes of the film hits one like a sledgehammer \x96 by far the most emotional opening scene I've ever come across.  I found myself already reaching for the tissues, and trying to choke back the tears.\n\nYet there's more than just tragedy in `Grave of the Fireflies.' It is the most awesome love story one is ever likely to see.  But it's far from the typical Hollywood idea of a love story.   Instead of the usual highly attractive Hollywood actors of the opposite sex pining for one another in front of the camera, we have an animated Japanese brother and his much younger little sister.   It's not a tale of romantic love, but one of `brotherly' love.  \n\nSeita loves his little sister, and once he discovers that his mother has been killed in the bombing, he does everything he can to keep his sister from finding out about her horrible death.   Then, with typical Japanese seriousness, he begins to immediately provide for and comfort Setsuko; she being the only member of his immediate family he has left.   Though not stated in the film, it seems obvious that part of Seita's motivation for looking so carefully after his sister has to do with avoiding his own pain and despair having been left with NOTHING after the bombing attack.   No mother, no father, no home.   The war Japan is waging against the rest of the world takes its toll on these two little ones, without regard for their feelings or emotions.\n\nThat which truly broke my heart into ten thousand tiny pieces was the selfless way Seita looked after his younger sister, and shielded her from the horrors all around, especially the lack of food.  Films show us many things, some good, some evil, but rarely has any film shown how one person so unselfishly puts another ahead of them self.   Seita does makes some mistakes in the way he goes about taking care of his sister, but I can't fault him for his love and his devotion.   Who of us have always chosen the best path, the most perfect way of doing things?   Surely not I!   Seita's obvious love and devotion to Setsuko is the most moving and convicting thing I've ever come across on film. \n\nI use the word `convicting' because this movie convicted me of my own very selfish nature.   `Grave of the Fireflies' caused me sadness not just because of Seita's brave attempts to take care of his little sister; but because he gave of himself so totally and completely, even though his sister was a liability to his own survival.   I could not help to be convicted concerning all the many times there have been family and friends who have needed my help or understanding, but I ignored them in favor of `doing my own thing.'   How sad I am for all those times I've ignored the suffering of others and their cries for help.   This film showed the evil in my own heart \x96 something that I would not have noticed on my own.  But now that the blinders have been removed, I can repent of my selfishness, and look for ways to help others, instead of avoiding them.\n\n Some Japanese anime I've seen are very much anti-American.  But even though it's the Americans dropping the bombs in this film, there is no overt anti-American message.   In many ways, the Japanese civilians are shown in as bad a light as is the American air and naval forces!   Their hard hearts and stubborn ways are displayed on the screen without apology; and one can see how the plight of the two children is made even worst by the selfishness of the adults that they have come to rely upon. \n\nIt would be easy for someone from `the West' (i.e. the USA, Canada, Western Europe, Australia, etc.) to think that the two children depicted in this animated marvel were the exception, rather than the rule.  They lived in very trying times, and surely children in this day and age do not have to go through experiences similar to Seita's and Setsuko's.  Unfortunately, that's not the case.   There are still major problems with orphans and unwanted children in the former communist block countries of Eastern Europe and Russia itself.  There are also large numbers of unwanted children roaming the streets of China, India, Mongolia, and various other Asian nations.   We may not here about it on the news, or hear our friends talk about it; but I assure you that there are literally millions of children around the world whose situation is no better, if not much worst than that of Seita and Setsuko.      \n\nI am very thankful I had the honor of watching this film.   I'm also very thankful for the people who put it together.   But most of all, I'm very thankful for the positive impact it has had on my life.\n\n\n\n", u'-0.163848', u"\nBeing my first Anime review I thought I'd start off with my one of my favourite pieces of work from who else but Studio Ghibli. Ghibli have rarely produced anime that doesn't fall short of great but Graveyard is something different indeed.\n\nSet in the aftermath of World War II, Graveyard is focused on the lives of a\ncaring brother and his young sister (Setsuko and Seita) and how they struggle against both the elements of wartime and a depreciating Japanese empire. The most striking thing about Graveyard is probably how real everything seems. The animation is very unconventional to the likes of say Spirited Away or Laputa but in a good way. The horror of war is beautifully realised through the animation, whether it be the American destruction being shown or the bleak outlook on peoples lives, namely the two main characters. Thankfully it earns every shred of emotion it conveys through these two sympathetic characters that only the coldest of hearts wouldn't warm up to.\n\n\nAvoiding any Hollywood sentimentality, it is often a bleak and depressing perspective depicted but all the more brutally powerful in the process. With my eyes welling up through the duration of the film, it occured to me just how well the Director understands what raw heartfelt emotion is and how to play the audiences heart strings. Nevertheless nothing is shown in a heavy handed approach, no empthasis is put on the Americans nor is there any special attention taken to the war details. If anything the citizens of Japan are shown in the coldest light often giving little help to the plight of others, but demonstrating furthermore what desperate situation everyone is in.\n\nTakahata instead decides to focus on the plight of it's title characters against the background of war. With the empire of Japan in crisis and food shortages everywhere it is heart breaking to see a brother struggle to meet ends meet for his sister. Due to the approach taken it borders on being horrifying but fortunately the tone is changed with the spirit put into Setsuko's character. Much like 'The Pianist' the issue is not the war but the struggle and will to survive in it. This is clearly displayed in a plot that revolves around the downward spiral Setsuko trying to feed himself and more importantly the younger and more vulnerable sister Seita. The animation though detailed and indeed beautiful in some sequences (namely relating to the title), is not by any means flashy but captures emotions and interactions between the characters perfectly. It's the perfect mixture of such animation, realistic and highly likeable characters that makes the whole film one tearful experience. Dealing with such difficult issues it's very hard to imagine this being a film and if it was I don't think it would of been done as well.\n\nPart of the brilliance also comes from symbology and the association to many different worlds in such a understanding depiction. The child, Seita, is nothing short of perfection in child like behaviour happily oblivious to the desperate situation, amusing herself with simplicity and the quirks of nature and the outdoors. The older brother Setsuko who must carry the burdon of everything is also perfectly portrayed and to watch there decent is painful to say the least. To struggle is one thing but to have shock, shattered dreams and be depended on is something anyone can empthasise with.\n\n\nThere may be some people who will shy away from Anime, disregarding it as a\nmere cartoon. To those people and everyone else I recommend Graveyard as the tonic, which can be appreciated by anyone with a heart and soul. Among the finest pieces of Anime created and one of the most touching war films ever made. ", u'0.322365', u'"Grave of the Fireflies" is one of the most ambitious, depressing, and quite frankly, best films that I\'ve ever seen. I was nearly moved to tears by this film\'s brave treatment of such critical subject matter. Yes, it\'s an Anime\' piece, but surprisingly, it came out in 1988, during a time where most Japanese animation films were either relentless bloodbaths, borderline pornography, or both.\n\nAs a fan of the Anime\' genre of film-making, many great pieces have achieved some sort of cult status here in America, yet none have really reached mainstream success. Some have broken through the barrier and have gained acceptance with American critics, like Katsuhiro Otomo\'s "Akira," or "Princess Mononoke," or "Spirited Away" (both films directed by Hayao Miyazaki). One that I\'ve seen and has been barely mentioned by most critics is "Grave of the Fireflies."\n\nWhat we have with "Grave of the Fireflies," is a story of innocence lost and two children who ultimately face a losing battle with trying to survive in a small Japanese village in the closing days of World War II. WWII was the costliest conflict in world history, with millions dead and thousands left to pick up the pieces.\n\nIn the center of it, are the aforementioned two children, who are pretty much left to fend for themselves after their mother is killed in a bombing raid. Because their father is off fighting in the war and they have no way of contacting any other family, they\'re sent to live with their aunt, who is at first warm and welcoming to them, but eventually becomes very cruel and the children are forced to live in a nearby bomb shelter. From that point on, the two children embark on a journey that is every bit as unpleasant and difficult as the grim realities of the world around them.\n\nVery easily one of the best Anime\' films that I\'ve ever seen (or any animated film for that matter), I find it difficult to believe just how truly overlooked "Grave of the Fireflies" is. The animation is beautiful, though certainly not dated by any means (even though Japanese animation has progressed well since this film was made).\n\nWe get a sense of the dread of the two lead characters, who watch as the world around them crumbles into heaps of ashes, and aircraft loom ominously overhead, dropping their deadly, incendiary cargo on unsuspecting Japanese villagers.\n\nThe director, Isao Takahata, obviously has a special resentment of the war, but manages to avoid condemning it outright. The director instead lets us focus in on the conflict as seen through the eyes of the two children, who watch unflinchingly as the realities of their world begin to falter before them.\n\n"Grave of the Fireflies" is a bold statement on the condition of the human soul during conflict. I probably shouldn\'t say this but I am anyways, but this film has to be the "Schindler\'s List" of animated pieces. It\'s brave, it\'s not overly sentimental, but it is relentless in its dramatization of a dangerous reality. It should be required viewing in any high school world history class.\n\nA beautiful film; not to be missed by anyone.', u'-0.217867', u'\n"September 21, 1945...That was the night I died."-- Seita\n\nReading war statistics and even seeing bloody images on television does not fully communicate the horror of war as well as the heartbreaking Grave of the Fireflies, an anime feature directed by Isao Takahata, a long-time colleague of Hayao Miyazaki. The film tells the story of two children, Seita, a 14-year old boy and Setsuko, his 4-year old sister and their uphill struggle to survive the effects of American firebombing in Kobe near the end of World War II. Based on the semi-autobiographical novel of Akiyuki Nosaka, Grave is a powerful experience that powerfully communicates the strength of the human spirit to carry on against overwhelming odds.\n\n\nThough despairing, the film does not resort to cheap melodrama to achieve its effect but delineates simple and direct images that are not watered-down to appeal to the children\'s market. It would indeed be too sad for most children under 13. In an interview with Cedric Littardi, AnimeLand magazine from 1992, Takahata said that he did not set out to depress the audience but to show a natural death, as opposed to a "scientific" death, the way most of us view it -- behind closed curtains in a sanitized hospital.\n\n\nTakahata in some ways softens the impact of the tragedy at the outset by showing Seita dying outside a subway station and his spirit reunited with his little sister Setsuko. The story is told by flashback as the two children are left alone to fend for themselves when their mother is killed in the bombing campaign. When their father is also killed in the Navy, they must struggle against starvation, the cruelty of an aunt they trusted, people\'s general indifference, and their own pride. Though both children eventually succumb to malnutrition (or radiation poisoning), the animation is so lyrical that it creates a magical, dream-like effect. This does not mask the tragedy but makes it all the more poignant. \n\nNothing sums up the message of this film better than the beautiful poem, "I Come and Stand at Every Door" by Nazim Hikmat, one of the most important and influential figures in 20th-century Turkish literature.\n\n\nI come and stand at every door. But no one hears my silent tread. I knock and yet remain unseen. For I am dead, for I am dead.\n\nI\'m only seven although I died. In Hiroshima long ago. I\'m seven now as I was then. When children die they do not grow.\n\nMy hair was scorched by swirling flame. My eyes grew dim, my eyes grew blind. Death came and turned my bones to dust. And that was scattered by the wind.\n\nI need no fruit, I need no rice. I need no sweet, nor even bread. I ask for nothing for myself. For I am dead, for I am dead.\n\nAll that I ask is that for peace. You fight today, you fight today. So that the children of this world. May live and grow and laugh and play.\n\n\t-- Nazim Hikmet\n\nIn our day where our leaders are busily preparing for another war, it is important to remember the human cost of these plans and the untold suffering they will inevitably bring. Grave of the Fireflies should be required viewing in the Oval office.\n', u'-0.283843', u"\nDuring my searches on Anime on the net one day I came across this title. This was 2 years ago.\n\nThen last week I went to an Anime convention and at the DVD stand I saw it. I bought it immediately.\n\nWhen I got home 3 days later I popped it in. I was warned about it being tragic but nothing could have prepared me for the wave of emotion that hit me while watching it. I was depressed for a whole day. Even thinking about it made me cry..\n\nThis is the power of Grave Of The Fireflies..\n\nThis is not your typical Dragonball Z/Sailormoon/Pokemon style anime. While I love Sailormoon and some Dragonball Z, Grave Of The Fireflies surpasses it by lightyears. I bought it expecting an epic movie like Ghost In The Shell or Akira but even those paled compared to this.\n\nWe have here a story of a 14 year old boy(Seita) who loses his mother in a firebombing during World War 2. He then has to take care of his 4 year old sister(Setsuko). While at first they're taken in by his aunt the relationship between him and his aunt takes a turn for the worst. He then ends up on the street and the struggle begins... It doesn't take a genious to figure out that things get really depressing, yet I won't spoil the ending..\n\nAll I have left to say is that you have to see this movie.. It's the most powerful movie I've ever seen... It's painful to watch but still you have to see it...", u'-0.402942', u"Animation is often seen as a childish medium, and for good reason as kid's films often are animated. However, every now and then an animated film comes along that extends it's boundaries and manages to deliver a very adult story, and Grave of the Fireflies is one of those films. Through it's well observed and very real characters, Grave of the Fireflies portrays a story of loss, heartbreak and the effect of war on civilians in a manner that is more effective and more firmly based in reality than many live action films about the same subject are. We follow Seita and Setsuko, a brother and sister that have lost their parents in the war and are now forced to fend for themselves in the war torn country. How the two go about doing that and the boy's development from a child to a (somewhat) responsible adult due to the change in the surroundings makes up the spine of the movie.\n\nI'm not a big fan of animation, but there are some films that are so great that a person's personal preferences are irrelevant, and this is one of those films. The animation is beautiful and certain scenes, including the air raids and anything with the fireflies are amazing works of art. The way the music blends with the images on screen is haunting and beautiful, and helps add to the tragedy of the story. Because we are able to care for the characters, the tragedy is increased ten fold and the story on the whole is a sad one, but few movies have ever matched up to this film's ending in terms of pure despair. The conclusion is absolutely gut wrenching to an extent that few movies have ever matched, let alone animated pictures. The fact that it's so plain and blatant, with no attempt to console the audience takes the tragedy to a whole new level and I don't doubt that many audience members will be holding back tears upon the film's conclusion.\n\nThis film is a must see.", u'0.288045', u'\nOne of the great animated films of all time Grave of Fireflies tells the story of a couple of kids as the try to survive in war time Japan. What happens to them should be seen by anyone thinking of starting a war since it tells very graphically what happens to those often forgotten, the children.\n\nLike its companion piece, Barefoot Gen, which tells the story of survivors of atomic bombing and the horrors that were experienced by those unlucky enough not to have been killed out right, this film proves that war is hell for everyone, especially the children.\n\nIts very hard to send anyone out to see this unhappy little film (The previously mentioned Barefoot Gen spawned sequels, this has not) but at the same time you owe it to yourself to experience, however distantly what sort of monster we unleash upon the world every time we go to war. It helps that however depressing this is, its also a damn good and incredibly compelling story.\n\n9 out of 10', u'-0.16296', u"This film proves without any doubt that animation isn't just suited to tales of fantasy, sci-fi or cartoon comedy and violence. This absolutely heartbreaking Japanese anime tells the story of a young boy, Seito and his younger sister, Setsuko, as they attempt to survive the American bombings on Japan in the last year of World War II.\n\nThe story itself, based on a true story, is powerful enough but the decision to animate the film truly elevates this film to a higher level. This would have been a powerful enough live action drama, along the lines of Spielberg's Empire of the Sun or even Schindler's List. However, the Studio Ghibli team, have brought an extraordinary amount of life to all the characters, but especially the young siblings. Now we're not talking realism as such here - the characters are in no way photo-realistic, they do have the usual characteristics of Japanese anime humans, large eyes and exaggerated expressions. What this achieves however is a heightened level of subtle nuances in expression which are arguably more powerful and provocative than anything a real-life actor may achieve. Some may claim this is overly manipulative or sentimental, but coupled with the characters movements and actions, it gives the characters such a strong, and very human, presence. You truly care for these kids, which is an astonishing achievement. The voice cast (original Japanese) contributes significantly here also.\n\nIt is the tiny moments which give this film so much power and emotional depth - from subtle expressions to brief scenes showing Seito playing with his sister at bath time, attempting, unsuccessfully, to cheer her up when she misses her mother. The painted backgrounds are works of art in themselves, just beautiful. And of course the scenes with the fireflies bring a touch of pure magic - a heightened innocent reality to contrast the horrific realities of the war.\n\nThe greatest achievement of this film is that, apart from a couple of obviously sentimental scenes, such as Setsuko's sobbing or illness, it doesn't force any false emotion on the viewer. It really comes from your involvement with the characters. It's completely honest to it's own story and even cuts off scenes abruptly, which could potentially have been milked for cheap sentiment. It often seems to say - This is what happened, you don't need to see anymore. Another of it's strengths is that it really doesn't comment on the politics of the war in any way, just the effects on innocent people.\n\nThis is an intensely moving film and a masterpiece of animation. If you aren't moved by these characters, you really need to check your pulse. 10/10", u'0.269166', u'\n**SPOILERS**I saw "Hotaro no haka" on german TV the other day and it has changed my life! Never have I been so moved by a film in my whole life. I cried and cried and cried. Since then I can\xb4t get this heartbreaking story out of my head.\n\nAfter the movie I went upstairs to the bedroom, where my 3-year-old daughter was sleeping. I woke her up and took her in my arms. In the way she talks and acts she is just like Setsuko, one of the main characters in the film. And I can\xb4t help feeling like Seita, her brother - because my daughter and I\nare alone since my wife left us a few months ago.\n\nI found one of the most touching scenes was the one where the dying Setsuko starts sucking the buttons she collected, because she ran out of her special sweets. I will also never forget how her brother cremates her after having tried everything to save his little sister. The most depressing thing with this movie is: you feel so helpless. You think: Man, I wish I could have helped those kids.\n\nThis movie has changed my whole attitude to life. All the problems you may have - they become so small. Watch it and you\xb4ll be a different person.\n\nMichael Saunders\n\n\n\n', u'-0.324011', u'Truly one of Studio Ghibli\'s greatest crowning achievements, GRAVE OF THE FIREFLIES is a brilliant masterpiece fully deserving of a place in any of the best movies ever made. Not just an astonishingly great (and, at the risk of coming off as clich\xe9, perfect) work of art, this is a moving, thought-provoking, and ultimately heartbreaking tale about the loss of innocence and the tragedies of war.\n\nBased on an autobiography by Akiyuki Nosaka, the film, set during the bombing of Japan in --of all times-- World War II, centers on Seita, a loving, headstrong Navy soldier\'s son and his innocent little sister, Setsuko. Their fatal struggle for survival begins right at the start, when both are bombed out of house and home by American B-29s. Mom is seriously wounded and found wrapped in bandages at a hospital, where she dies shortly after. The children move to Nishinomiya to stay with their aunt. Auntie, a cold, bitter, self-serving woman, has no patience with Seita or Setsuko, especially when they would rather chase after fireflies at moonlight, play by the beach, or lounge around the house instead of helping out. After butting heads with Auntie long enough, the children decide to run away, setting up home in an abandoned cave by the lake. Both try by all means to live off of vegetables or whatever food they can afford to trade and/or steal, to no avail....\n\nThe outcome of the story is actually showcased at the opening of the movie, where we see a ghostly specter of Seita watching a more malnourished version of himself die a painful, lonely death at a train station. Indeed, as we see how these events came to pass, we find ourselves rooting for Seita and Setsuko to find a way to stay alive, but alas, it is not to be, given Seita\'s stubborn pride. The overall tone of the movie is of a very tragic nature--even such lighthearted moments as the aforementioned sequences involving Seita and Setsuko playing around the house or gathering fireflies as lights for their cave are all tainted with a touch of sadness, for we know that these brief scenes of happiness will not last.\n\nWho is to blame for the plight of these children? The movie never addresses this question to the audience, nor does it really care to. It would be easy for director Isao Takahata to make this an anti-American movie, but he does better than that. Instead, he aptly conveys that war can spell serious--and deadly--consequences for victims. He also eschews casting any character as a hero or villain, and instead makes this a very human story, with no clear-cut "good" or "bad" characters. The aunt, for example, is not evil; she is merely an angry, desperate woman who is only struggling to survive just as much as Seita and Setsuko are. Atrocious as her treatment of the children is, we somehow never see her as a true baddie, but a very flawed, multi-faceted human being.\n\nNormally one would think of this kind of story as suitable for live-action, but GRAVE OF THE FIREFLIES proves that it can be told through the art of animation as well. This is no mindless showcase of gorgeous visuals--although the artistic merits of the movie are, as with Ghibli productions, sumptuous and at times breathtaking--but a display of real characters struggling with very tangible emotions. And the most amazing accomplishment about this movie is how much we grow to care for Seita and Setsuko--their inseparable bond of love and companionship is the heart and soul behind the movie.\n\nThere are long stretches of silence on the soundtrack, with music used very sparingly, yet the movie is all the more powerful for it. The most effective moment is where we hear a scratchy rendition of "Home, Sweet Home" over a montage of Setsuko playing by the shelter. It\'s a simplistic, sweet, yet very saddening moment that not only works in the context of the movie, but on its own as well.\n\nI don\'t normally say this in my reviews, but I would definitely recommend watching this movie in its native language of Japanese for a truly powerful and memorable experience. That\'s not to imply, however, that the English dub, produced by New York-based Central Park Media, is inferior; on the contrary. It is, in fact, surprisingly good, with an effective lead in J. Robert Spencer and noteworthy cameo appearances by Anime voice-over actors Veronica Taylor, Crispin Freeman, and Dan Green. Rhoda Chrosite\'s Setsuko is the one voice that doesn\'t fare so well; she sounds more like an adult pretending to be a young girl, and comes across as strained during most scenes (save for when she is sick from diarrhea). Still, for those who can\'t read subtitles, the dub is more than adequate (although not as high-profile as others that I\'ve heard).\n\nEven in a genre as multi-faceted as Japanese Anime, there are few films that literally everyone really MUST see. GRAVE OF THE FIREFLIES is one such movie.', u'-0.106551']}